Date of Last Revision: November 1, 2023
Fandom, Inc. (“
Fandom
” “
we
,” “
us
,” and “
our
”) provides a home to explore, contribute to, and celebrate the world of pop culture. Our Privacy Policy (“
Privacy Policy
”) is designed to help you understand how we collect, use, and share your personal information, and to assist you in exercising the privacy rights available to you.
SCOPE
PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
HOW WE USE YOUR INFORMATION
DISCLOSING YOUR INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
YOUR CHOICES
DATA RETENTION
SECURITY OF YOUR INFORMATION
CHILDRENS’ INFORMATION
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY THAT ARE APPLICABLE TO EEA AND UK RESIDENTS
YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY THAT ARE APPLICABLE TO U.S. RESIDENTS
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY THAT ARE APPLICABLE TO RESIDENTS OF BRAZIL AND CHINA
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS
CONTACT US
SCOPE
Fandom, Inc. is a company registered in the State of Delaware, U.S.A. (corporate number C2935209), with a registered office at 550 California Street, Suite 830 San Francisco, CA 94104. We are the data controller of the personal information that we collect from you as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy applies to personal information processed by us in our business, including on our websites, mobile applications, and our related online and offline offerings (collectively, the “
Services
”). The Services include websites at fandom.com and wikia.org, and the respective subdomains thereof, and the mobile apps provided under the Fandom brand. The Services also include the websites at muthead.com and fanatical.com (and any related mobile applications).
We respect your right to privacy. Our overall aim is to ensure that our collection and use of personal information is appropriate to the provision of the Services for our users, and is in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time in our sole discretion. If there are any material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will notify you as required by applicable law. You understand and agree that you will be deemed to have accepted the updated Privacy Policy if you continue to use the Services after the new Privacy Policy takes effect.
PERSONAL INFORMATION WE COLLECT
The categories of personal information we collect depend on how you interact with our Services and the requirements of applicable law.
Visitors
are people who access the Services. Visitors include
Registered Users
who access the Services through their accounts, and
Non-Registered Users
who access the Services without using an account. We recognize that most Visitors are Non-Registered Users.
You do not need to be a Registered User in order to access most information on the Services. Being a Registered User is only required for certain activities, such as creating, managing, or administrating a Fandom community, making a contribution to a Fandom community that does not allow for contributions by non-Registered Users, submitting comments about other content on the Services, or participating in a chat forum. In addition, you must be a Registered User in order to make certain purchases or view certain content on our mobile applications.
Information You Provide to Us
Account Creation
. When you create an account on the Services in order to become a Registered User, we collect information such as your username and password, valid email address, and date of birth. You may optionally provide us with additional information including your first and last names, your gender, and your interests and hobbies. Certain websites and apps in the Services may require you to provide additional information, such as your postal mailing address, telephone number, and payment information. We refer to the information provided at account creation as “
Registration Data
.”
Visitors
. We collect the information you provide when modifying the content of a page on the Services (such as making edits, uploading images, etc.). We also collect your username that you associate with your user contributions. We also collect information you provide when you upload, purchase, view, or download certain content or products from the Services. Further, if you use the Fandom mobile app,
you may indicate the communities in which you are particularly interested. We refer to information collected directly from Visitors as “
Visitor Data
.”
Payment Information
. You may purchase digital items or other goods using the services. We use a third-party payment provider to process payments on the Services. We may receive information associated with your payment information, such as your billing address and transaction information, but we do not directly store your payment information ourselves.
Your Communications with Us
. We collect personal information from you such as your email address, phone number, or mailing address when you request information about our Services, register for our newsletters, request customer or technical support, or otherwise communicate with us.
Surveys
. We may contact you to participate in surveys. If you decide to participate, you may be asked to provide certain information, which may include personal information.
Interactive Features
. We offer interactive features such as forums, blogs, chat and messaging services, browser extensions, and social media pages. We and others who use our Services may collect the information you submit or make available through these interactive features. Any content you provide via the public sections of these features will be considered “public,” unless otherwise required by applicable law, and is not subject to the privacy protections referenced herein. By using these interactive features, you assume the risk that the personal information provided by you may be viewed and used by third parties for their own purposes. Please exercise caution before revealing any information that may identify you in the real world to other users, and review any additional disclosures on each feature’s download page for more information.
Registration for Sweepstakes or Contests
. We may run sweepstakes and contests. Contact information you provide may be used to inform you about the sweepstakes or contest and for other promotional, marketing and business purposes, if permitted by law. In some jurisdictions, we are required to publicly share information, such as the full names of winners.
Conferences, Trade Shows, and Other Events
. We may attend conferences, trade shows, and other events where we collect personal information from individuals who interact with or express an interest in the Services.
Business Development and Strategic Partnerships
. We may collect personal information from individuals and third parties to assess and pursue potential business opportunities.
Job Applications
. We may post job openings and opportunities on the Services. If you reply to one of these postings by submitting your application, CV and/or cover letter to us, we will collect and process the information contained therein to assess your suitability, aptitude, skills, and qualifications for employment.
Information Collected Automatically
Automatic Data Collection
. We may collect certain information automatically when you use the Services. This information may include your Internet protocol (IP) address, user settings, MAC address, cookie identifiers, mobile carrier, mobile advertising and other unique identifiers, details about your browser, operating system or device, location information (including inferred location based off of your IP address), Internet service provider, pages that you visit before, during, and after using the Services, information about the links you click, information about how you interact with the Services, including the frequency and duration of your activities, the search requests you submit on the Services, and other information about how you use the Services. If you use our browser extensions, we may also collect information about your activities on other sites in order to provide the extension’s intended functionality. We may attempt to infer other information about you based on this information or associate it with your accounts on other devices.
Crash Reports.
If you provide crash reports, such as when using our mobile app, we may collect personal information related to such crash reports, including detailed diagnostic information about your device and the activities that led to the crash.
Cookies, Pixel Tags/Web Beacons, and Analytics Information
. We, as well as third parties that provide content, advertising, or other functionality on the Services, may use cookies, pixel tags, and other technologies (“Technologies”) to automatically collect information through the Services. Technologies are essentially small data files placed on your devices that allow us and our partners to record certain pieces of information whenever you visit or interact with our Services.
Cookies
. Cookies are small text files placed in device browsers to store your preferences and facilitate and otherwise enhance your experience. Most browsers allow you to block and delete cookies. However, if you do that, the Services may not work properly.
Pixel Tags/Web Beacons
. A pixel tag (also known as a web beacon) is a piece of code embedded in the Services that collects information about engagement on the Services. The use of a pixel tag allows us to record, for example, that a user has visited a particular web page or clicked on a particular advertisement. We may also include web beacons in e-mails to understand whether messages have been opened, acted on, or forwarded.
Our uses of these Technologies fall into the following general categories:
Operationally Necessary.
This includes Technologies that allow you access to our Services, applications, and tools that are required to identify irregular website behavior, prevent fraudulent activity and improve security or that allow you to make use of our functionality;
Performance-Related.
We may use Technologies to assess the performance of our Services, including as part of our analytic practices to help us understand how you use our Services (see Analytics below);
Functionality-Related.
We may use Technologies that allow us to offer you enhanced functionality when accessing or using our Services. This may include identifying you when you sign into our Services or keeping track of your specified preferences, interests, or past items viewed;
Advertising- or Targeting-Related.
We may use first party or third-party Technologies to deliver content, including ads relevant to your interests, on our Services or on third-party websites.
See “
Your Choices
“
below to understand your choices regarding these Technologies.
Analytics
. We may use the following service providers to collect and process analytics information on our Services:
Google Analytics
For more information about how Google uses your personal information (including for its own purposes, e.g., for profiling or linking it to other data), please visit
Google Analytics’ Privacy Policy
. To learn more about how to opt-out of Google Analytics’ use of your information, please click
here
.
Quantcount by Quantcast
collects information about the number of visitors to our Services and extrapolates market research from that data.  For more information about Quantcast, please visit
www.quantcast.com/docs/privacy
.
Scorecard Research Beacon
by Full Circle Studies (Comscore
)
collects
information
regarding digital consumption behavior data. For more information, see Scorecard Research’s
Privacy Policy
. To exercise your rights around this data, visit
this page
.
Parse.ly
collects information about user activity on our sites. For more information about Parse.ly, please visit their
Privacy Policy
.
LiveIntent
collects user behavior information and combines it with other information it collects from elsewhere on the internet. To learn more, LiveIntent’s
Privacy Policy
. To opt out, please visit
this page
.
Crazy Egg
generates user heatmap data. To learn more, visit their
Privacy Policy
. To opt out, visit
this page
.
Optimizely
collects user activity data to refine our website. To learn more, visit their
Privacy Policy
. To exercise your rights around your data, you can fill out
this webform
.
We may use
LiveRamp Authenticated Traffic Solution
(ATS) to help us recognize the activities of users on our site. For more information about LiveRamp, please visit their
privacy policy
. To opt-out of the sharing of your personal information with LiveRamp, please click
here
.
Please see the “
Additional provisions of this privacy policy that are applicable to EEA and UK residents
” and the “
Additional provisions of this privacy policy that are applicable to China and Brazil residents
” sections of this Privacy Policy below.
Social Media Platforms.
Our Services may contain social media buttons, such as Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Instagram, and LinkedIn, which might include widgets such as the “share this” button or other interactive mini programs. These features may collect personal information such as your IP address and which page you are visiting on the Services, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. Your interactions with these platforms are governed by the privacy policy of the company providing it.
Information Collected from Other Sources
Third-Party Services and Sources.
We may obtain information about you from other sources, including through third-party services and organizations to supplement information provided by you. For example, if you access our Services through a third-party application, such as an app store, a third-party login service, or a social networking site, we may collect information about you from that third-party application that you have made public via your privacy settings. Information we collect through these services may include your name, your user identification number, your username, location, gender, birth date, email, profile picture, and your contacts stored in that service. We also may partner with third parties to enrich the data we collect from you with information they have collected independently.
We use information collected from third parties to supplement the information we collect about you in order to provide more relevant, safer experiences for you with the Services, and otherwise to improve our Services, analytics, and advertising.
Referrals and Sharing Features.
Our Services may offer various tools and functionalities that allow you to provide personal information about your friends through our referral service. Our referral services may also allow you to forward or share certain content with a friend or colleague, such as an email inviting your friend to use our Services. Please only share with us contact information of people with whom you have a relationship (e.g., relative, friend, neighbor, or co-worker).
HOW WE USE YOUR INFORMATION
We use your personal information, including your Registration Data, Visitor Data, information collected automatically, and information from other sources, for a variety of business purposes, including to:
Provide the Services or Requested Information, such as:
Fulfilling our contract with you;
Managing your information and accounts;
Responding to questions, comments, and other requests;
Providing access to certain areas, functionalities, and features of our Services;
Communicating with you about your account, activities on our Services and Privacy Policy changes;
Processing your financial information and other payment methods for products or Services purchased;
Processing applications if you apply for a job we post on our Services; and
Allowing you to register for sweepstakes, contests, and other events.
Analyze and improve our Services pursuant to our legitimate interests, such as:
Marketing, market research, and business development, including segmenting our users into specific categories;
Supporting internal administrative purposes such as providing network and information security and fraud prevention and ensuring internal quality control and safety;
Measuring interest and engagement in our Services;
Developing new products and services;
Authenticating and verifying individual identities;
Recording who is accessing and making changes to different parts of our Services and carrying out audits;
Preventing and prosecuting potentially prohibited or illegal activities;
Enforcing our agreements; and
Complying with our legal obligations.
Marketing Our Products and Services
. We use your personal information to tailor and provide you with content and advertisements, including to determine your interests and select content and advertisements to provide to you based on your interests.
Some of the ways we market to you include email campaigns, custom audiences advertising, and “interest-based” or “personalized advertising,” including through cross-device tracking and retargeting. Note that as an ad-supported website, we may receive revenue from third parties in connection with our serving of targeted ads on our Services.
You have control over the use of your data for advertising purposes.
If you have any questions about our marketing practices or if you would like to opt out of the use of your personal information for marketing purposes, you may change your cookie settings as set forth in “
Your Choices
” below, or contact us at any time as set forth in “
Contact Us
” below.
Cross-Device Tracking.
Your browsing activity may be tracked across different websites and different devices or apps. For example, we may attempt to match your browsing activity on your mobile device with your browsing activity on your laptop. To do this our technology partners may share data, such as your browsing patterns, general location and/or device identifiers, and will match the information of the browser and devices that appear to be used by the same person.
Consent
. We may use personal information for other purposes that are clearly disclosed to you at the time you provide personal information or with your consent.
De-identified and Aggregated Information Use
. We may use personal information and other data about you to create de-identified and/or aggregated information, such as de-identified demographic information, de-identified location information, information about the device from which you access our Services, or other analyses we create. We may use and disclose de-identified or aggregated information in a number of ways, including research, analytics, and any other legally permissible purposes.
DISCLOSING YOUR INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
Service Providers
. We may share any personal information we collect about you with our third-party service providers. The categories of service providers to whom we entrust personal information include service providers for: (i) the provision of the Services; (ii) the provision of information, products, and other services you have requested; (iii) marketing and advertising; (iv) payment and transaction processing; (v) customer service activities; and (vi) the provision IT and related services.
Business Partners
. We may provide personal information to business partners with whom we jointly offer products or services. In such cases, our business partner’s name will appear along with ours.
Networked Websites and Affiliates
. We may share personal information with and among the various sites we own, such as Fanatical and Muthead, and our “News and Ratings” sites (metacritic.com, gamespot.com, tvguide.com, giantbomb.com, gamefaqs.gamespot.com and comicvine.gamespot.com), as well as with our affiliated entities, including but not limited to Focus Multimedia Ltd. (doing business as Fanatical).
Third-Party Services
. The Services may link to third-party websites or services. The privacy practices of those third parties are not governed by this Privacy Policy. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of these third-party websites and services to understand their practices.
If you connect to a third-party service (such as Facebook, Twitter, or another third-party application) through the Services or otherwise link your account with a third-party service, you are requesting and authorizing us to share or grant access to information on your behalf (such as your username, the fact that your connection originated from the Services, and other relevant usage and diagnostic information) with such third party. For example, we may make information available to app developers, game developers, and game publishers to facilitate purchases and awards of digital goods, such as games and in-game items.
Advertising Partners
. Through our Services, we may allow third-party advertising partners to set Technologies and other tracking tools to collect information regarding your activities and your device (e.g., your IP address, cookie identifiers, page(s) visited, location, time of day). These advertising partners may use this information (and similar information collected from other websites) for purposes of delivering targeted advertisements to you when you visit third party services within their networks. We may receive revenue in connection with this activity. This practice is commonly referred to as “interest-based advertising” or “personalized advertising.” For example, we may use Technologies from Supply Side Platforms (also known as SSPs) such as Google’s ADX, which uses cookies to collect information about your browsing history to target advertising. We may also use Technologies from Audigent, Permutive, Google, Reddit or Liveramp to collect information for segmenting purposes based on its analysis of your interactions with the Services. We may also allow these third parties to place Technologies on our sites so they may better understand your behavior, and we may receive additional revenue in connection with that sharing.
For more information about your choices with respect to our use of these Technologies, please see the “
Additional provisions of this privacy policy that are applicable to EEA and UK residents
” and the “
Additional provisions of this privacy policy that are applicable to China and Brazil residents
” sections of this Privacy Policy below. Likewise, U.S. residents can opt out of this sharing by following the steps outlined in “
Additional provisions of this privacy policy that are applicable to U.S. residents
” below, or by visiting
this link
.
APIs and Software Development Kits.
We may use third-party APIs and software development kits (“SDKs”) as part of the functionality of our Services. APIs and SDKs may allow third parties including advertising partners to collect your personal information in order to provide content that is more relevant to you. For more information about our use of APIs and SDKs, please
contact us
as set forth below.
Disclosures to Protect Us or Others.
We may access, preserve, and disclose any information we store in association with you to external parties if we, in good faith, believe doing so is required or appropriate to: (i) comply with law enforcement or national security requests and legal process, such as a court order or subpoena; (ii) protect your, our, or others’ rights, property, or safety; (iii) enforce our policies or contracts; (iv) collect amounts owed to us; or (v) assist with an investigation and prosecution of suspected or actual illegal activity.
Disclosure in the Event of Merger, Sale, or Other Asset Transfer.
If we are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, purchase or sale of assets, or transition of service to another provider, then your information may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction, as permitted by law and/or contract.
YOUR CHOICES
General
You may have the right to object to or opt-out of certain uses of your personal information as described in more detail below.
Email Communications
If you receive an unwanted email from us, you can use the unsubscribe link found at the bottom of the email to opt out of receiving future emails. Note that you will continue to receive transaction-related emails regarding products or services you have requested. We may also send you certain non-promotional communications regarding us and our Services, and you will not be able to opt out of those communications (e.g., communications regarding the Services or updates to our Terms or this Privacy Policy).
Mobile Devices
We may send you push notifications through our mobile application. You may at any time opt-out from receiving these types of communications by changing the settings on your mobile device. You may opt-out of this collection by changing the settings on your mobile device.
“Do Not Track” / “Global Privacy Control”
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a privacy preference that users can set in certain web browsers. Additionally, some browsers or plug-ins use a “Global Privacy Control” (“GPC”), which you can learn more about at
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/
. Please note that we do not respond to or honor DNT signals transmitted by web browsers. However, if our site detects a GPC signal from your device, we will interpret it as a Do Not Sell or Share request under U.S. law and we will also interpret it as a request to limit the sale or sharing of personal information for targeted advertising for residents of the European Economic Area, the UK, China, and Brazil.
Cookies and Interest-Based Advertising
You may stop or restrict the placement of our or third-party Technologies on your device or remove them by amending your cookie preferences on our websites or adjusting your preferences as your browser or device permits. Please note that cookie-based opt-outs are not effective on mobile applications. However, you may opt-out of personalized advertisements on some mobile applications by following the instructions for
Android
and
iOS
.
The online advertising industry also provides websites from which you may opt out of receiving targeted ads from data partners and other advertising partners that participate in self-regulatory programs. You can access these websites and learn more about targeted advertising and consumer choice and privacy, at
www.networkadvertising.org/managing/opt_out.asp
,
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
,
https://youradchoices.ca/choices/
, and
www.aboutads.info/choices/
.
Please note you must separately opt out in each browser and on each device.
If you are resident in the EEA, the UK, China or Brazil, please see the “
Additional provisions of this privacy policy that are applicable to EEA and UK residents
” and the “
Additional provisions of this privacy policy that are applicable to China and Brazil residents
” sections of this Privacy Policy below for further details of how to restrict the placement of Technologies that are not Operationally Necessary.
DATA RETENTION
Subject to the user rights described below, we store the personal information we receive as described in this Privacy Policy for as long as you use our Services or as necessary to fulfill the purpose(s) for which it was collected, provide our Services, resolve disputes, establish legal defenses, conduct audits, pursue legitimate business purposes, enforce our agreements, and comply with applicable laws. This information is held by us in the United States, except where otherwise required by law.
We may also transfer the personal information that we collect about you to third party processors or to members of our group of companies in connection with the above purposes. We will take appropriate measures to ensure that the recipient protects your personal information adequately.
SECURITY OF YOUR INFORMATION
We take steps to ensure that your information is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy. Unfortunately, no system is 100% secure, and we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you provide to us. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, we do not accept liability for unauthorized disclosure.
By using the Services or providing personal information to us, you agree that we may communicate with you electronically regarding security, privacy, and administrative issues relating to your use of the Services. If we learn of a security system’s breach, we may attempt to notify you electronically by posting a notice on the Services, by mail, or by sending an email to you.
CHILDRENS’ INFORMATION
Children under 16 (applicable to users located in California and the EEA excluding the UK) or 13 (applicable to users located in the rest of the world) may not register for the Services, and we do not knowingly collect personal information from children.  For our wikis that may appeal to younger audiences, we take steps to limit the ability of underage users to disclose personal information, including but not limited to requiring a registered account by an individual of legal age for making wiki contributions. Note that although exposing a person’s private information is a violation of our
Community Guidelines
, users are able to freely share posts and media with other users on our Services, and these posts may contain personal information. We encourage all users to exercise caution before using our Services to reveal any information that could identify them in the real world.
If you learn that your child has provided us with personal information without your consent, you may
contact us
as set forth below. If we learn that we have collected a child’s personal information in violation of applicable law, we will promptly take steps to delete such information.
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY THAT ARE APPLICABLE TO EEA AND UK RESIDENTS
What is our justification for handling your personal data?
Under EEA and UK data protection laws, we have to ensure that we process your personal information fairly and lawfully. This means that we must have a “legal basis” for each of our processing activities where they relate to the personal data of an individual within the EEA or the UK. These bases include:
Consent
– we may decide to obtain your specific, freely given consent to one or more processing activities;
Legal obligation
– we may need to process your data where it is necessary to comply with applicable laws that we are subject to;
Performance of a contract
– we may process your data if we are entering into a contract with you, or taking preparatory steps to do so;
Legitimate interests
– we may process your personal data where we believe that we have a legitimate interest in doing so, and we have analyzed this and determined that our interests are not overridden by the impact on your rights and freedoms under data protection law.
We rely on these legal bases in different ways, and in relation to different types of processing of your personal data.
Consent
With respect to fandom.com, wikia.org, muthead.com, fanatical.com, and their respective subdomains, we process your personal information collected through the use of the following Technologies (as described above) on the basis of your consent, which we ask for when you first visit one of those sites:
Advertising or Targeting-Related Technologies;
Performance-Related Technologies; and
Functionality-Related Technologies.
The list of partners for which we request consent is located at our
Vendor List
.
You are entitled to withdraw your consent to our use of these Technologies. In order to change your consent settings for the applicable above-referenced domain that you are currently on, please click the following link:
Withdraw your consent to our use of Technologies
Legitimate Interests
Our use of your other personal information described herein is necessary for our legitimate interests, which are as follows:
To run, grow and develop our business;
To operate the Services;
For direct marketing, market research and business development; and
For internal administrative purposes.
If we rely on our, or another person’s, legitimate interests for using your personal information, then as required by law we will undertake a balancing test to ensure that our (or the other person’s) legitimate interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms which require protection. You can ask us for information on this balancing test by using the contact details provided below.
We process your personal information collected through the use of Operationally Necessary Technologies (as described above) on the basis of our legitimate interests. We also rely on legitimate interests to use your personal information in order to provide you with access to the Services, and to make sure that they work properly, and to keep a record of who is accessing and making changes to the different parts of our Services.
YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
Residents in the EEA and the UK have the rights to:
Access
personal information about you consistent with legal requirements. Please utilize the form found here when making this request:
Download Your Data
.
Request Correction
of your personal information where it is inaccurate or incomplete.
Request Deletion
of your personal information, subject to certain exceptions prescribed by law. Please utilize the form found here when making this request:
Right of Deletion
.
Opt out
of any marketing communications that we (or any third party to whom we have disclosed your personal information with your consent) may send you.
If you would like to exercise any of these rights, please use the indicated forms or links, where applicable, or otherwise email us at
support@fandom.com
.
We will process such requests in accordance with applicable laws. To protect your privacy, we may take steps to verify your identity before fulfilling your request.
Please note for security and fraud investigation and prevention purposes, we will retain the full IP address for users located in the EEA or the UK for up to 12 months.
In addition, we keep a copy of requests submitted to us to comply with our own legal obligation to maintain data processing records. Please also note that certain information, such as your IP address (if you edit while not logged in) and any public contributions to Fandom community sites are archived and displayed indefinitely by design; the transparency of each contribution and revision history is critical for efficacy and trustworthiness. In addition, our de-identification processes cannot ensure complete or comprehensive de-identification of all of the content or information posted on our Services related to your prior username. If your request is granted, the name change will only occur in automatically generated logs (such as page histories) in association with content that you posted. The name change will not delete mentions of your prior username by third parties.
In providing the Services, your personal information may be stored and processed in any country where we have facilities or in which we engage service providers, and by using the Services you acknowledge the storage and processing of your personal information in countries outside your country of residence, including the United States, which may have different data protection rules than your country.
Where we transfer your personal information to another entity located outside the EEA or the UK, we will take steps to ensure that such transfers comply with applicable privacy laws, including EU Regulation 2016/679 (the “
GDPR
“), the GDPR as retained in law in the UK (the “
UK GDPR
“) and the UK Data Protection at 2018 (“
DPA
“), such as:
by ensuring that the country to which your personal information will be transferred has been deemed “adequate” by the UK Government or the European Commission (as applicable) or by putting in place appropriate safeguards recognised by the GDPR, UK GDPR or DPA as applicable;
relying on the
EU Standard Contractual Clauses
in our contracts with third parties; and
taking all reasonable precautions to ensure that your personal information is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
In the EEA or the UK you may make a complaint to a supervisory authority for data protection matters (for example, the Polish President of the PDPO in Poland or the Information Commissioner’s Office in the UK) or seek a remedy through local courts if you believe your rights have been breached. See “Additional Provisions” below for more information on how to contact your supervisory authority.
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY THAT ARE APPLICABLE TO U.S. RESIDENTS
The laws of several U.S. States give their residents the right to opt-out of certain selling and/or sharing of personal information related to them. Fandom has elected to make this opt-out right available to all U.S. residents.
U.S. residents have the right to:
Know
about your personal information we have collected, disclosed, or sold in the last 12 months, upon verification of your identity.  In addition, you may have the right in some cases to receive or have your electronic personal information transferred to another party. Please utilize the form found here when making this request:
Download Your Data
.
Request Deletion
of your personal information. This right may be limited to the extent that we are permitted or required by applicable law to retain certain information. Please utilize the form found here when making this request:
Right of Deletion
. (Note that if you request deletion of your Personal Information, you may no longer be able to use or access all features of the Services as a Registered User. If you decide to use or access the Services again, we may consider this a new account, and may collect Personal Information associated with that account in accordance with this Privacy Policy.)
Opt out of the “sale” and certain sharing practices of your personal information
to third parties. Under the laws of several U.S. States, some information we share may be considered a “sale” In some states, like California, this information sharing may qualify as a “share” or a “sale” (even if there is no exchange of money), while in other states, like Virginia, this information sharing may qualify as “targeted advertising” (collectively, “personalized advertising”).
We may “sell” personal information. The categories of personal information we have “sold” and the categories of third parties we have “sold” personal information to in the preceding twelve months are listed in the table below. To opt-out of personalized advertising, please
click here
, or
contact us
as set forth below.
Request Correction
of incorrect personal information that we may have on file about you.
Obtain additional details regarding our information practices
by contacting us as set forth below. (Note that this information is generally available in this Privacy Policy).
Not be discriminated against
by us for exercising your privacy rights.
If you are a resident of Nevada
, you have the right to opt-out of the sale of certain personal information to third parties who intend to license or sell that personal information. You can exercise this right by contacting us at
support@fandom.com
with the subject line “Nevada Do Not Sell Request” and providing us with your name and the email address associated with your account. Please note that we do not currently sell your personal information as sales are defined in Nevada Revised Statutes Chapter 603A. If you have any questions, please
contact us
as set forth below.
If you would like to exercise any of these rights, please use the indicated forms or links, where applicable, or otherwise email us at
support@fandom.com
. We will process such requests in accordance with applicable laws. To protect your privacy, we may take steps to verify your identity before fulfilling your request.
In the table below, we identify each category of personal information we collected from U.S. consumers, and the categories of third parties to whom each category of information was disclosed for a business purpose or sold, within the last 12 months. The categories of sources from which we collect personal information are set forth above in the section “
Personal information we collect
“. We collected or sold the personal information for the business and commercial purposes set forth above in the section “
How we use your information
“.
Category of Personal Information Collected by Fandom
Category of Third Parties Personal Information is Disclosed to for a Business Purpose
Category of Third Parties to Whom Personal Information is Sold And/or Shared
Identifiers.
A real name, alias, postal address, unique personal identifier, online identifier, Internet Protocol address, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers.
Service providers
Other users or third parties you share or interact with
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Social networks
Service providers
Data analytics providers
Social networks
Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80€)
A name, address, telephone number, employment, employment history, financial information Note: Some personal information included in this category may overlap with other categories.
Service providers
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Service providers
Data analytics providers
Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
Age, sex (including gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy or childbirth and related medical conditions).
Service providers
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Service providers
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Commercial information
Records of personal property, products or services purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies.
Service providers
Business partners
Affiliates
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Service providers
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Internet or other electronic network activity
Browsing history, search history, information on a consumer’s interaction with an internet website, application, or advertisement.
Service providers
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Service providers
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Sensory data
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information.
Other users or third parties you share or interact with
Service providers
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Social networks
Inferences drawn from other personal information to create a profile about a consumer
Profile reflecting a consumer’s preferences, characteristics, behavior, and attitudes.
Service providers
Business partners
Other users or third parties you share or interact with
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Social networks
Advertising partners
Data analytics providers
Social networks
Minors:
We do not have actual knowledge of selling the personal information of minors under 16 years of age. Please
contact us
using the information provided below if you are aware of any personal information provided to us by a California resident under the age of 16.
Verification and Appeal Process
: We are required by law to take reasonable steps to verify your identity prior to responding to your request. Please note that your exercise of your rights is subject to certain exemptions to safeguard the public interest (e.g., the prevention or detection of crime) and our interests (e.g., the maintenance of legal privilege). If we are unable to process your request via you authenticating yourself on the Services, we may verify your request by asking for information sufficient to confirm your identity, based on the information we have on file. Requests to exercise these rights may be granted in whole, in part, or not at all, depending on the scope and nature of the request and as permitted by applicable law. Where required by applicable law, we will notify you if we reject your request, and notify you of the reasons we are unable to honor your request.
If you are a resident of Colorado, Virginia, or Connecticut, you have the right to appeal a request we deny when we have verified your identity and still decline to honor your request. The process for that appeal will be sent to you separately if your request is denied.
Authorized Agent
: Depending on where you live, you may have the right to use an authorized agent on your behalf to exercise a privacy right discussed above. If you are an authorized agent acting on behalf of a user to communicate with us or to exercise a privacy right discussed above, you must be able to demonstrate that you have the requisite authorization to act on behalf of the user, and have sufficient access to that user’s laptop, desktop, or mobile device to exercise that user’s right digitally. If you are an authorized agent trying to exercise rights on behalf of one of our users, then you can make a request on the user’s behalf by
contacting us
as set forth below: Such requests must include the following information: (1) a written authorization from the consumer that includes the consumer’s full name, address, telephone number and valid email address used by the consumer to interact with us, that is signed by the consumer and clearly bestows upon the agent the proper authority; and (2) a certificate of good standing with your state of organization.
Alternatively, an acting agent can provide a valid power of attorney signed by the consumer on the agent’s behalf and a valid email address used by the consumer to interact with us.
The email address of the consumer will be used to separately verify the agent’s authority with the consumer.
Refer-a-Friend, Promotions, and Similar Incentive Programs
: We may offer referral programs, promotions such as sweepstakes, or other incentivized information collection programs. We may offer incentives to you such as discounts or promotional items or credit in connection with these programs, wherein you provide Personal Information regarding your friends or colleagues (such as their email address) and receive rewards when they sign up to use our Services. (The referred party may also receive rewards for signing up via your referral.) Alternatively, we may ask you to provide your Personal Information in exchange for a reward or participation in a promotion. These programs are entirely voluntary and allow us to grow our business and provide additional benefits to you. The value of your information to us depends on how you ultimately use our Services, whereas the value of the referred party’s information to us depends on whether the referred party ultimately uses our Services. Said value will be reflected in the incentive offered in connection with each program. You may withdraw from the incentives at any time. In order to withdraw from the financial incentive, please
contact us
as described below.
Shine the Light Disclosure
: California residents are entitled to ask us for a notice that identifies the categories of Personal Information that we share with our affiliates and/or third parties for marketing purposes, and provides contact information for such affiliates and/or third parties. If you are a California resident and would like this information, please submit a written request to us using the contact information below.
De-Identified Information
. If we create or receive de-identified information, we will not attempt to reidentify such information, except to comply with applicable law.
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS OF THIS PRIVACY POLICY THAT ARE APPLICABLE TO RESIDENTS OF BRAZIL AND CHINA
In order to comply with the data protection laws of Brazil and China respectively, we have implemented the same requirements for collecting personal data through Advertising or Targeting Related Technologies, Performance-Related Technologies, and Functionality-Related Technologies on the Services, for the residents of those countries as the requirements set forth above for the collection of personal data through the use of such Technologies from the residents of the EEA and the UK.
ADDITIONAL PROVISIONS
Supervisory Authority
. If your personal information is subject to the applicable data protection laws of Australia, Brazil, the European Economic Area, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the competent supervisory authority or attorney general if you believe our processing of your personal information violates applicable law. Contact information for some applicable authorities include:
Office of the Australian Information Commissioner
Autoridade Nacionalde Proteçãode Dados (ANPD)
EEA Data Protection Authorities (DPAs)
Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC)
UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO)
Spanish Data Protection Agency (AEPD)
CONTACT US
If you have any questions about our privacy practices or this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
Desmond Cussen, Data Protection Officer
c/o Fandom, Inc.
550 California Street, Suite 830
San Francisco, CA 94104
Email
:
DPO@fandom.com
Phone
: (415) 980-5647
If you have any complaints about our Services, please contact us at:
Address
: 550 California Street, Suite 830 San Francisco, CA 94104
Email
:
support@fandom.com
Phone
: (415) 762-0780
Last updated: July 1, 2023
Previous Privacy Policy
July 1, 2023
February 11, 2023
August 11, 2022
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Technologies
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
How Google uses cookies
How Google uses location information
How Google uses credit card numbers for payments
How Google Voice works
Google Product Privacy Guide
How Google retains data we collect
Google advertising services are experimenting with new ways of supporting the delivery and measurement of digital advertising in ways that better protect people’s privacy online via the
Privacy Sandbox
initiative on Chrome and Android. Users with the relevant Privacy Sandbox settings enabled in Chrome or Android may see relevant ads from Google’s advertising services based on
Topics
or
Protected Audience
data stored on their browser or mobile device. Google’s advertising services may also measure ad performance using
Attribution Reporting
data stored on their browser or mobile device.
More information on the Privacy Sandbox
.
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Many websites and apps use Google services to improve their content and keep it free. When they integrate our services, these sites and apps share information with Google.
For example, when you visit a website that uses advertising services like AdSense, including analytics tools like Google Analytics, or embeds video content from YouTube, your web browser automatically sends certain information to Google. This includes the URL of the page you’re visiting and your IP address. We may use the IP address, for example, to identify your general location, to measure the effectiveness of ads, and, depending on your settings, to improve the relevance of the ads you see. We may also
set cookies on your browser
or read cookies that are already there. Apps that use Google advertising services also share information with Google, such as the name of the app and a unique identifier for advertising.
Google uses the information shared by sites and apps to deliver our services, maintain and improve them, develop new services, measure the effectiveness of advertising, protect against fraud and abuse, and personalize content and ads you see on Google and on our partners’ sites and apps. See our
Privacy Policy
to learn more about how we process data for each of these purposes and our
Advertising
page for more about Google ads, how your information is used in the context of advertising, and how long Google stores this information.
Our
Privacy Policy
explains the legal grounds Google relies upon to process your information — for example, we may process your information with your consent or to pursue legitimate interests such as providing, maintaining and improving our services to meet the needs of our users.
Sometimes, when processing information shared with us by sites and apps, those sites and apps will ask for your consent before allowing Google to process your information. For example, a banner may appear on a site asking for consent for Google to process the information that site collects. When that happens, we will respect the purposes described in the consent you give to the site or app, rather than the legal grounds described in the Google Privacy Policy. If you want to change or withdraw your consent, you should visit the site or app in question to do so.
Ad personalization
If ad personalization is turned on, Google will use your information to make your ads more useful for you. For example, a website that sells mountain bikes might use Google's ad services. After you visit that site, you could see an ad for mountain bikes on a different site that shows ads served by Google.
If ad personalization is off, Google will not collect or use your information to create an ad profile or personalize the ads Google shows to you. You will still see ads, but they may not be as useful. Ads may still be based on the topic of the website or app you're looking at, your current search terms, or on your general location, but not on your interests, search history, or browsing history. Your information can still be used for the other purposes mentioned above, such as to measure the effectiveness of advertising and protect against fraud and abuse.
When you interact with a website or app that uses Google services, you may be asked to choose whether you want to see personalized ads from ad providers, including Google. Regardless of your choice, Google will not personalize the ads you see if your ad personalization setting is off or your account is ineligible for personalized ads.
You can see and control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your
ad settings
.
How you can control the information collected by Google on these sites and apps
Here are some of the ways you can control the information that is shared by your device when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services:
Ad Settings
helps you control ads you see on Google services (such as Google Search or YouTube), or on non-Google websites and apps that use Google ad services. You can also
learn how
ads are personalized, opt out of ad personalization, and block specific advertisers.
If you are signed in to your Google Account, and depending on your Account settings,
My Activity
allows you to review and control data that’s created when you use Google services, including the information we collect from the sites and apps you have visited. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Many websites and apps use Google Analytics to understand how visitors engage with their sites or apps. If you don’t want Analytics to be used in your browser, you can
install the Google Analytics browser add-on
. Learn more about
Google Analytics and privacy
.
Incognito mode in Chrome
allows you to browse the web without recording webpages and files in your browser or Account history (unless you choose to sign in). Cookies are deleted after you've closed all of your incognito windows and tabs, and your bookmarks and settings are stored until you delete them. Learn more about
cookies
. Using Incognito mode in Chrome or other private browsing modes does not prevent the collection of data when you visit websites that use Google services, and Google may still collect data when you visit websites using these browsers.
Many browsers, including Chrome, allow you to block third-party cookies. You can also clear any existing cookies from within your browser. Learn more about
managing cookies in Chrome
.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 1
http://www.quantcast.com/privacy:
Error
All Contracts
Quantcast Measure and Publisher Terms of Service
US Data Privacy Addendum
Key Terms
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Publisher Partners
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners
Laws
Quantcast Partners
Quantcast Advertise Insertion Order Terms & Conditions
Campaign Policy
Quantcast Website and Corporate Privacy Policy
Quantcast Products and Services Privacy Policy
Quantcast Buyer Terms
International Data Privacy Addendum
Additional Terms
CCPA Transparency Report
Effective December 10th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
If you have an active, duly executed contract for Quantcast services (“
Existing Contract
”), the Existing Contract will govern your use of the service(s) covered in the Existing Contract instead of these Quantcast Measure Terms of Service (“
Terms
”). In addition, these Terms only apply to the Quantcast Measure service (i.e., the “
Service
” as described below) and not to any other Quantcast product or service.
Quantcast Measure Terms of Service
This Quantcast Measure Terms of Service (this
“Agreement”
)
describes the terms and conditions on which Quantcast makes Quantcast Measure (the
“Services”
)
available to you.
BY CLICKING THE “I ACCEPT” BUTTON, COMPLETING THE REGISTRATION PROCESS, USING THE SERVICES OR ENTERING INTO AN OFFLINE AGREEMENT THAT REFERENCES THIS AGREEMENT OR INCLUDES A LINK TO THIS AGREEMENT, YOU ARE AGREEING TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT. IF YOU ARE ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT ON BEHALF OF A COMPANY OR OTHER LEGAL ENTITY, YOU REPRESENT THAT YOU HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO BIND SUCH ENTITY, IN WHICH CASE THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY (OR, IF SUCH ENTITY IS ACTING AS AN AUTHORIZED AFFILIATE, THEN THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY, THE AUTHORIZING PARTY(IES), OR BOTH, AS APPLICABLE). QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY THIS AGREEMENT FROM TIME TO TIME; CONTINUED USE 30 DAYS AFTER NOTIFICATION WILL CONSTITUTE ACCEPTANCE (SEE SECTION 10).
Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein are defined in Section 14.
This Agreement incorporates the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing personal information that is subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing Addendum) and the
Privacy Implementation for
Quantcast Publisher Partners
.
1. Introduction: Reachpoints, Tags, and Measurement Data.
Quantcast Measure is a free digital audience measurement service that allows you to tag web pages, video, advertisements, apps, content, and paid search campaigns (what we call,
“
Reachpoints
”)
for direct measurement.
You can also define and measure actions and events by customizing your Tags with labels. You have complete control over (and are solely responsible for) which Reachpoints are tagged, how segments are labelled (e.g., with meaningful or obfuscated names), and how the resulting Measurement Results are or are not disclosed publicly.
Each time a browser visits your tagged Reachpoints, Quantcast may, in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws, collect traffic statistics like those in any web server log (what we call,
“
Measurement Data
”
). We then apply proprietary Quantcast algorithms and other data to the Measurement Data to generate the
“
Measurement Results
”,
which we make available to you on the Quantcast website (see Section 3).
To measure Reachpoints that you do not own or control, you may provide your Tag to a third party who accepts this Agreement (any such third party, an
“Authorized Affiliate”
); you may also instruct us to give the Authorized Affiliate access to the Measurement Results.
2. Registration.
In order to access the Services you must register for a Quantcast account on the Quantcast website. Each new app you Tag requires its own registration and then receives its own unique API key. In registering, you agree to provide accurate, current, and complete information, and to keep it up to date. Any processing of Personal Information when registering for a Quantcast account will be processed in accordance with the Quantcast Website and Corporate Privacy Policy which you can access
here
.
You are responsible for keeping your password confidential. You hereby take responsibility for all actions taken—and instructions
provided to Quantcast—under your account or with the Measurement Results, by you or any third parties, whether or not authorized. You will notify Quantcast immediately of any unauthorized or non-compliant use of your account and will cooperate with us in stopping it.
3. Measurement Data and Results.
Quantcast uses each piece of Measurement Data both to understand your audience (for your benefit only) and as one of trillions of data points for predictive analytics and in determining what content and advertising to show individuals across the internet and other digital applications. You acknowledge that Quantcast may use Personal Information it receives from you to provide services to other Quantcast clients or for Quantcast’s commercial interests that may be unrelated to providing the Services to you.
Quantcast will never sell your audience (whether identified as such or not) and you control the extent to which Quantcast displays the Measurement Results.
Quantcast grants you perpetual rights to use, copy, and distribute the Measurement Results, including with our sharable widgets, only as long as you:
Credit Us. Conspicuously include: “Source: Quantcast
www.quantcast.com
”;
Present the Measurement Results Exactly as We Provided It. Do not: (i) manipulate or modify the Measurement Results to state or suggest different results from those specifically presented by Quantcast; (ii) combine information related to different Quantcast profiles (for example, by adding together the reach from two different sites instead of presenting the cross-site unduplicated reach measurement provided by Quantcast); (iii) quantitatively aggregate or combine information in the Measurement Results with information derived from other sources (but offering a comparison with information derived from other sources is permissible);
Don’t Use Our Work to Compete with Us. Do not use the information in the Measurement Results in any way that competes with Quantcast; and
Bind Third Parties. If you provide the information in the Measurement Results directly to any third party (rather than by having them access the information through the Quantcast website), you must ensure that they agree to be bound by and comply with the terms of this Agreement including the foregoing requirements.
4. Tagging Rules and Privacy.
You agree not to misrepresent your digital traffic, audience, or user activity in connection with Quantcast, the Services, or any Tags. You agree not to tag any adware or spyware inventory, or any Reachpoint revealing precise geographic location (i.e., information that describes the precise location of a device derived through any technology that is capable of determining with reasonable specificity the actual physical location of an individual or device), specific health / medical /sex-life information, credit card or financial data, or criminal convictions or charges. In addition, you agree not to tag any Reachpoint revealing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category” Personal Information under Applicable Privacy Laws, including data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions or parties, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership, or health. You further agree not to tag any website that contains information about health conditions or treatments or that might otherwise reveal or suggest an individual’s health status or treatment. If you represent to Quantcast (e.g., during the signup process) that your Reachpoints are directed to users under the age of 16, Quantcast will not collect any Personal Information from such Reachpoints and you will not receive those of our services that require collection of data across different websites. You will not modify the Tag other than as described in a
Quantcast Learning Center Guide
. You agree to update your Tag (which may require retagging your Reachpoints) when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades. You will use the Tag in the top most frame possible. You will retain the Tag’s origin address that we provided, in full.
You agree to comply with Applicable Privacy Laws and also industry self-regulation Principles and Codes of Conduct for interest-based advertising in connection with your use of the Tag and the Services. You agree not to use the Services to track or collect personally identifiable information (i.e., information that can be used to contact or identify a particular individual, including name, address, telephone number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier) of end users. To the extent that the web
pages or apps in which you place the Technology are accessed by end users located in Europe, you agree to implement a transparency and consent solution compatible with the
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
or another solution mutually agreed by both parties in writing. While you are implementing such consent solution, you agree to (i) obtain consent for Quantcast to use cookies and similar technologies in compliance with Applicable Privacy Laws, (ii) provide proof of such consent if requested by Quantcast, and
(iii) not permit calls from your web pages or apps to Quantcast servers if such consent has not be obtained. You agree to name Quantcast as a party for or by whom cookies or similar technologies are used to access the device and Personal Information is collected through your webpages or apps.
You further agree to prominently display to end users a user friendly, easily accessible, clear and comprehensive privacy policy (and, if necessitated by Applicable Privacy Laws, a separate cookie policy) that, where required, complies with Applicable Privacy Laws and contains the following (a) a statement that your site or app permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the types of data collected for such advertising, (iii) an explanation of the purposes for which data is collected by, or transferred to, third parties, and (iv) a conspicuous link to either an opt-out mechanism, such as the NAI or DAA opt-outs for companies established outside of Europe or a consent revocation page for companies established in Europe. If you use the Services to collect data from a network of domains or subdomains, you will inform each in advance of such disclosures.
In the case of app measurement, operating system platforms provide device-level setting options that allow end users to indicate their preference with respect to third party data collection and targeted advertising (the
“
Ad Preference Setting
”
). Quantcast treats these device level Ad Preference Settings as consumer opt-outs and you will accurately pass the Ad Preference Setting to Quantcast. You will not send any identifier associated with a device to the extent that such device has otherwise indicated that the end user wishes to be opted out of advertisement tracking.
Unless agreed otherwise, you and Quantcast are each separate and independent Businesses or Controllers of any Personal Information which you and we may disclose or receive under this Agreement. You and Quantcast, pursuant to this Agreement, do not and will not jointly determine the purposes or the means of Processing of any Personal Information disclosed or received under this Agreement.
Each party shall comply with the obligations that apply to it under Applicable Privacy Laws and provide Personal Information Processed pursuant to this Agreement the level of privacy protection required by such laws. In the event that either party determines that it can no longer meet its privacy obligations under this Agreement or the Privacy Laws, it shall inform the other party without undue delay.
If you are a Business subject to CCPA, you agree to prominently post a “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link on all of your Reachpoints, and to provide consumers with the disclosures required of Businesses by CCPA.
You represent and warrant that you are not a covered entity under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (“HIPAA”), and you do not have equivalent status under comparable local or international laws and regulations.
5. Restrictions.
You agree to use the Services only in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement. You will not use the Services to engage in any illegal or offensive acts or serve any illegal content via any Reachpoint. You will not:
Interfere or attempt to interfere with the operation or security-related features of the Services or the Technology;
Delete, or in any manner alter, the copyright, trademark, or other proprietary rights notices appearing on any Quantcast Content;
Represent that Quantcast endorses or supports your services; make any representations and warranties concerning any aspect of the Services, the Technology, or Measurement Results to any Authorized Third Parties or other third parties; or
Attempt to index, scrape, search, or crawl the Services or the Quantcast website with any automated process; or attempt to access any information or technology relating to the Services, the Quantcast website, or our proprietary algorithms through any means not intentionally made available by Quantcast to you.
6. Quantcast Rights.
All right, title, and interest, including intellectual property rights, in and to the Quantcast website, the Services, the Technology, and the Quantcast Content are and will remain the exclusive property of Quantcast (
“
Quantcast Property
”
). Except as expressly permitted in this Agreement, you will not reproduce, modify, or prepare derivative works based upon, distribute, license, sell, transfer, publicly
display, publicly perform, transmit, or use such Quantcast Property. In the event that your Quantcast account is suspended or terminated, Quantcast will continue to respect this Agreement’s limits on our use of the Measurement Data and will cease all public display of the Measurement Results.
Quantcast servers may choose to occasionally respond to any publisher’s Tag by redirecting the browser to a third-party anonymous beacon to support the provision of Quantcast services in market. The decision to beacon is not related to you, your traffic, or your user base.
7. Indemnity.
Quantcast agrees to defend, indemnify, and hold you harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim that the Technology or the Services infringe any U.S. or European intellectual property rights, provided that you (i) promptly inform and furnish Quantcast with a copy of each related communication and action, (ii) allow Quantcast to assume full control of the defense and settlement, and (iii) assist and cooperate with Quantcast, at Quantcast’s expense. Quantcast will have no obligation or liability hereunder where the claim results from any combination with, addition to, or modification of the Services or the Technology, from your failure to update your Tag, from your or any Authorized Affiliate breach of this Agreement, or from failure to obtain consent for your and our use of cookies or other tracking technology in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws. If the Services or Technology become, or, in Quantcast’s opinion are likely to become, the subject of a third-party claim against you, Quantcast may, at its option and expense, procure rights for you to continue using the Services or the Technology, replace or modify the same so that it performs substantially similar functions but does not infringe, or terminate this Agreement.
The foregoing states the sole and exclusive liability of Quantcast and your sole remedy with respect to third party claims of any kind.
You agree to indemnify and hold Quantcast harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim resulting from your failure to update your Tag when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades.
8. Warranty Disclaimer.
The services and related information are provided “as is,” without warranty or condition of any kind, either express or implied. Without limiting the foregoing, Quantcast explicitly disclaims any warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, quiet enjoyment, or non-infringement. Quantcast makes no warranty that the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content will (1) meet your requirements, (2) be available on an uninterrupted, secure, or error-free basis, or (3) not cause any latency or processing delays. Quantcast is under no obligation to retain any Measurement Data or to keep the site up and running for any period of time. Quantcast makes no warranty regarding the accuracy, timeliness, truthfulness, completeness, or reliability of any information obtained through the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content. No information, whether oral or written, will create any warranty or representation not expressly made herein. The foregoing exclusions and disclaimers are an essential part of this Agreement and formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer the Services to you. Some jurisdictions do not allow exclusion of certain warranties so this disclaimer may not apply to you in full.
9. Suspension and Termination.
Unless otherwise terminated as set forth herein, this Agreement will remain in full force and effect while you use the Services. You may terminate your Quantcast account and this Agreement at any time by both (i) “dequantifying” by deleting all Reachpoints from your profile on the Quantcast website (or, alternatively, by emailing
contact@quantcast.com
(if you are resident in the US) or
contact.dublin@quantcast.com
(if you are resident outside the US) with your complete account information and explicit request to terminate) and (ii) removing the Tags from all of your Reachpoints. Quantcast may terminate or suspend your access to the Services or terminate this Agreement at any time, for any reason or no reason and without any liability to you. Upon termination, all licenses and other rights granted to you under this Agreement will immediately cease. Quantcast will not be liable to you or any third party for
termination of this Agreement (whether by Quantcast or by you) or any termination or suspension of your use of the Services. Upon any termination or suspension, information in connection with your account may no longer be accessed by you. Notwithstanding the above, Sections 4 through 9, Sections 11 through 13, and the second paragraph of Section 3 will survive termination.
10. Modification of the Service and of the Terms.
Quantcast reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to modify or discontinue the Quantcast website and Services without notice. Quantcast may also modify this Agreement from time to time. If the modified Agreement is not acceptable to you, you may terminate your account within 30 days by following the two-step procedure described in Section 9. Use of the Quantcast website, use of any Tag to contact Quantcast’s servers, or use of the Services will constitute your acceptance thereof.
11. Limitation of Liability.
In no event will Quantcast be liable to you or any third party for any consequential loss, exemplary damages, incidental loss, special damages or loss, lost profit, loss or deletion of Measurement Data or Measurement Results, or punitive damages arising from your use of the Services, even if Quantcast has been advised of the possibility of such damages. These limitations formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer these Services to you. This paragraph will apply regardless of any failure of the exclusive remedy provided in the following paragraph.
Except with regard to Quantcast’s obligations under Section 7, liability stemming from death or personal injury resulting from Quantcast’s negligence, or Quantcast’s fraud, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, Quantcast’s liability to you for any cause whatsoever and regardless of the form of the action, will at all times be limited to two hundred fifty U.S. dollars (US$250.00).
12. Miscellaneous.
This Agreement constitutes the entire Agreement between the parties with respect to the Services and supersedes all previous and contemporaneous agreements, proposals, and communications, written or oral between Quantcast and you with respect thereto. Any agreements regarding the delivery or use of advertising segments will govern the parties’ relationship in connection with the applicable segments but will not affect the parties’ rights, restrictions, or obligations under this Agreement, which the parties acknowledge as separate subject matter. Any waiver by either party of any violation of this Agreement will not be deemed to waive any further or future violation of the same or any other provision. If any parts or provisions of this Agreement are held to be unenforceable, then you and Quantcast agree that such parts or provisions will be given maximum permissible force and effect and the remainder of the Agreement will be fully enforceable. You and Quantcast agree that there are no third party beneficiaries of any promises, obligations or representations made by Quantcast. Either Party may assign its rights, data, and duties, under this Agreement in their entirety in connection with a sale of all (or substantially all) of its assets relating to this Agreement, a merger, or a reorganization. Nothing in this Agreement will constitute a partnership or joint venture or joint controllership between you and Quantcast.
This Agreement and any dispute relating to this Agreement will be governed by the laws of the United States and the laws of the State of California, without regard to U.S. or California choice of law rules. You and Quantcast agree and consent that jurisdiction, proper venue, and the most convenient forums for all claims, actions, and proceedings of any kind relating to Quantcast or the matters in this Agreement will be exclusively in courts located in San Francisco, California.
This Agreement is drafted in the English language. Any translation into another language is provided for convenience only. In the event of any inconsistency between the English language version and any translation, the English language version shall prevail.
13. Notice.
All notices or other communications to Quantcast from you will be deemed given only when received by hand delivery, electronic mail, or prepaid first class mail, at the address below or any other address provided by Quantcast to you for these purposes:
Persons in the United States, please contact:
Quantcast Corp. 795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107 Attn: Legal Department
Email:
contact@quantcast.com
Persons outside of the United States, please contact:
Quantcast International Limited Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street, 1st Floor Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn: Legal Department
Email:
contact.dublin@quantcast.com
14. Definitions.
“Applicable Privacy Laws”
means any applicable international, federal, state, or local privacy or data protection laws, statutes or regulations as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, including but not limited to (a) the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679 (
“GDPR”
) and any EU Member State laws implementing GDPR; (b) the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.100
et seq.
as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act and implementing regulations (
“CCPA”)
; (c) the e-Privacy Directive 2002/58/EC, as amended and as transposed into EU Member State law and any legislation replacing the e-Privacy Directive; (d) The Brazilian General Data Protection Law, Law No. 13.709, of August 14, 2018 (“LGPD”)”.
“Authorized Affiliate”
means a third party that you allow to use your Tag, your account, or the Measurement Results.
“
Business
”
has the same meaning as in CCPA.
“Measurement Data”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Measurement Results”
has the meaning defined in Section 1.
“
Personal Information
”
means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or
could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular individual or household and any other information that may otherwise be considered “personal information” or “personal data” under Applicable Privacy Law.
“Quantcast Content”
means the content of the Quantcast website and the Services, including the Measurement Data and Measurement Results.
“
Quantcast Property
”
has the meaning given to it in Section 6.
“Reachpoint”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Services”
means Quantcast Measurement: the digital audience ratings service that allows you (or an Authorized Affiliate) to define and measure specific online events by tagging Reachpoints, as described herein and as governed by these terms and conditions.
“Tag”
means the particular javascript or other audience measurement code or software development kit provided to you by Quantcast, which allows Quantcast to set a cookie and embeddable on web pages, media files, and other Reachpoints, together with any labels and any fixes, updates, and upgrades provided to you.
“Technology”
means, separately and collectively, the Tags, and Quantcast’s proprietary technology that generates the Measurement Results.
15. Contracting Party.
If you reside in the US this Agreement is between you and Quantcast Corporation. If you reside outside of the US, this Agreement is between you and Quantcast International Limited, an Irish limited liability company. References to “Quantcast”, “us”, “we” and “our” mean either Quantcast Corporation or Quantcast International Limited as appropriate.
Effective April 5th 2024
to
December 10th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
If you have an active, duly executed contract for Quantcast services (“
Existing Contract
”), the Existing Contract will govern your use of the service(s) covered in the Existing Contract instead of these Quantcast Measure Terms of Service (“
Terms
”). In addition, these Terms only apply to the Quantcast Measure service (i.e., the “
Service
” as described below) and not to any other Quantcast product or service.
Quantcast Measure Terms of Service
This Quantcast Measure Terms of Service (this
“Agreement”
)
describes the terms and conditions on which Quantcast makes Quantcast Measure (the
“Services”
)
available to you.
BY CLICKING THE “I ACCEPT” BUTTON, COMPLETING THE REGISTRATION PROCESS, USING THE SERVICES OR ENTERING INTO AN OFFLINE AGREEMENT THAT REFERENCES THIS AGREEMENT OR INCLUDES A LINK TO THIS AGREEMENT, YOU ARE AGREEING TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT. IF YOU ARE ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT ON BEHALF OF A COMPANY OR OTHER LEGAL ENTITY, YOU REPRESENT THAT YOU HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO BIND SUCH ENTITY, IN WHICH CASE THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY (OR, IF SUCH ENTITY IS ACTING AS AN AUTHORIZED AFFILIATE, THEN THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY, THE AUTHORIZING PARTY(IES), OR BOTH, AS APPLICABLE). QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY THIS AGREEMENT FROM TIME TO TIME; CONTINUED USE 30 DAYS AFTER NOTIFICATION WILL CONSTITUTE ACCEPTANCE (SEE SECTION 10).
Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein are defined in Section 14.
This Agreement incorporates the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing personal information that is subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing Addendum) and the
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Publisher Partners
.
1.     Introducti
on: Reachpoints, Tags, and Measurement Data.
Quantcast Measure is a free digital audience measurement service that allows you to tag web pages, video, advertisements, apps, content, and paid search campaigns (what we call,
“
Reachpoints
”)
for direct measurement.
You can also define and measure actions and events by customizing your Tags with labels. You have complete control over (and are solely responsible for) which Reachpoints are tagged, how segments are labelled (e.g., with meaningful or obfuscated names), and how the resulting Measurement Results are or are not disclosed publicly.
Each time a browser visits your tagged Reachpoints, Quantcast may, in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws, collect traffic statistics like those in any web server log (what we call,
“
Measurement Data
”
). We then apply proprietary Quantcast algorithms and other data to the Measurement Data to generate the
“
Measurement Results
”,
which we make available to you on the Quantcast website (see Section 3).
To measure Reachpoints that you do not own or control, you may provide your Tag to a third party who accepts this Agreement (any such third party, an
“Authorized Affiliate”
); you may also instruct us to give the Authorized Affiliate access to the Measurement Results.
2.     Registration.
In order to access the Services you must register for a Quantcast account on the Quantcast website. Each new app you Tag requires its own registration and then receives its own unique API key. In registering, you agree to provide accurate, current, and complete information, and to keep it up to date. Any processing of Personal Information when registering for a Quantcast account will be processed in accordance with the Quantcast Website and Corporate Privacy Policy which you can access
here
.
You are responsible for keeping your password confidential. You hereby take responsibility for all actions taken—and instructions provided to Quantcast—under your account or with the Measurement Results, by you or any third parties, whether or not authorized. You will notify Quantcast immediately of any unauthorized or non-compliant use of your account and will cooperate with us in stopping it.
3.     Measurement Data and Results.
Quantcast uses each piece of Measurement Data both to understand your audience (for your benefit only) and as one of trillions of data points for predictive analytics and in determining what content and advertising to show individuals across the internet and other digital applications. You acknowledge that Quantcast may use Personal Information it receives from you to provide services to other Quantcast clients or for Quantcast’s commercial interests that may be unrelated to providing the Services to you.
Quantcast will never sell your audience (whether identified as such or not) and you control the extent to which Quantcast displays the Measurement Results.
Quantcast grants you perpetual rights to use, copy, and distribute the Measurement Results, including with our sharable widgets, only as long as you:
Credit Us. Conspicuously include: “Source: Quantcast
www.quantcast.com
”;
Present the Measurement Results Exactly as We Provided It. Do not: (i) manipulate or modify the Measurement Results to state or suggest different results from those specifically presented by Quantcast; (ii) combine information related to different Quantcast profiles (for example, by adding together the reach from two different sites instead of presenting the cross-site unduplicated reach measurement provided by Quantcast); (iii) quantitatively aggregate or combine information in the Measurement Results with information derived from other sources (but offering a comparison with information derived from other sources is permissible);
Don’t Use Our Work to Compete with Us. Do not use the information in the Measurement Results in any way that competes with Quantcast; and
Bind Third Parties. If you provide the information in the Measurement Results directly to any third party (rather than by having them access the information through the Quantcast website), you must ensure that they agree to be bound by and comply with the terms of this Agreement including the foregoing requirements.
4.     Tagging Rules and Privacy.
You agree not to misrepresent your digital traffic, audience, or user activity in connection with Quantcast, the Services, or any Tags. You agree not to tag any adware or spyware inventory, or any Reachpoint revealing precise geographic location (i.e., information that describes the precise location of a device derived through any technology that is capable of determining with reasonable specificity the actual physical location of an individual or device), specific health / medical /sex-life information, credit card or financial data, or criminal convictions or charges. In addition, you agree not to tag any Reachpoint revealing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category” Personal Information under Applicable Privacy Laws, including data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions or parties, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership, or health. You further agree not to tag any website that contains information about health conditions or treatments or that might otherwise reveal or suggest an individual’s health status or treatment. If you represent to Quantcast (e.g., during the signup process) that your Reachpoints are directed to users under the age of 16, Quantcast will not collect any Personal Information from such Reachpoints and you will not receive those of our services that require collection of data across different websites. You will not modify the Tag other than as described in a
Quantcast Learning Center Guide
. You agree to update your Tag (which may require retagging your Reachpoints) when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades. You will use the Tag in the top most frame possible. You will retain the Tag’s origin address that we provided, in full.
You agree to comply with Applicable Privacy Laws and also industry self-regulation Principles and Codes of Conduct for interest-based advertising in connection with your use of the Tag and the Services. You agree not to use the Services to track or collect personally identifiable information (i.e., information that can be used to contact or identify a particular individual, including name, address, telephone number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier) of end users. To the extent that the web pages or apps in which you place the Technology are accessed by end users located in Europe, you agree to implement a transparency and consent solution compatible with the
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
or another solution mutually agreed by both parties in writing. While you are implementing such consent solution, you agree to (i) obtain consent for Quantcast to use cookies and similar technologies in compliance with Applicable Privacy Laws, (ii) provide proof of such consent if requested by Quantcast, and (iii) not permit calls from your web pages or apps to Quantcast servers if such consent has not be obtained. You agree to name Quantcast as a party for or by whom cookies or similar technologies are used to access the device and Personal Information is collected through your webpages or apps.
You further agree to prominently display to end users a user friendly, easily accessible, clear and comprehensive privacy policy (and, if necessitated by Applicable Privacy Laws, a separate cookie policy) that, where required, complies with Applicable Privacy Laws and contains the following (a) a statement that your site or app permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the types of data collected for such advertising, (iii) an explanation of the purposes for which data is collected by, or transferred to, third parties, and (iv) a conspicuous link to either an opt-out mechanism, such as the NAI or DAA opt-outs for companies established outside of Europe or a consent revocation page for companies established in Europe. If you use the Services to collect data from a network of domains or subdomains, you will inform each in advance of such disclosures.
In the case of app measurement, operating system platforms provide device-level setting options that allow end users to indicate their preference with respect to third party data collection and targeted advertising (the
“
Ad Preference Setting
”
). Quantcast treats these device level Ad Preference Settings as consumer opt-outs and you will accurately pass the Ad Preference Setting to Quantcast. You will not send any identifier associated with a device to the extent that such device has otherwise indicated that the end user wishes to be opted out of advertisement tracking.
Unless agreed otherwise, you and Quantcast are each separate and independent Businesses or Controllers of any Personal Information which you and we may disclose or receive under this Agreement. You and Quantcast, pursuant to this Agreement, do not and will not jointly determine the purposes or the means of Processing of any Personal Information disclosed or received under this Agreement. Each party shall comply with the obligations that apply to it under Applicable Privacy Laws and provide Personal Information Processed pursuant to this Agreement the level of privacy protection required by such laws. In the event that either party determines that it can no longer meet its privacy obligations under this Agreement or the Privacy Laws, it shall inform the other party without undue delay.
If you are a Business subject to CCPA, you agree to prominently post a “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link on all of your Reachpoints, and to provide consumers with the disclosures required of Businesses by CCPA.
5.     Restrictions.
You agree to use the Services only in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement. You will not use the Services to engage in any illegal or offensive acts or serve any illegal content via any Reachpoint. You will not:
Interfere or attempt to interfere with the operation or security-related features of the Services or the Technology;
Delete, or in any manner alter, the copyright, trademark, or other proprietary rights notices appearing on any Quantcast Content;
Represent that Quantcast endorses or supports your services; make any representations and warranties concerning any aspect of the Services, the Technology, or Measurement Results to any Authorized Third Parties or other third parties; or
Attempt to index, scrape, search, or crawl the Services or the Quantcast website with any automated process; or attempt to access any information or technology relating to the Services, the Quantcast website, or our proprietary algorithms through any means not intentionally made available by Quantcast to you.
6.     Quantcast Rights.
All right, title, and interest, including intellectual property rights, in and to the Quantcast website, the Services, the Technology, and the Quantcast Content are and will remain the exclusive property of Quantcast (
“
Quantcast Property
”
). Except as expressly permitted in this Agreement, you will not reproduce, modify, or prepare derivative works based upon, distribute, license, sell, transfer, publicly display, publicly perform, transmit, or use such Quantcast Property. In the event that your Quantcast account is suspended or terminated, Quantcast will continue to respect this Agreement’s limits on our use of the Measurement Data and will cease all public display of the Measurement Results.
Quantcast servers may choose to occasionally respond to any publisher’s Tag by redirecting the browser to a third-party anonymous beacon to support the provision of Quantcast services in market. The decision to beacon is not related to you, your traffic, or your user base.
7.     Indemnity.
Quantcast agrees to defend, indemnify, and hold you harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim that the Technology or the Services infringe any U.S. or European intellectual property rights, provided that you (i) promptly inform and furnish Quantcast with a copy of each related communication and action, (ii) allow Quantcast to assume full control of the defense and settlement, and (iii) assist and cooperate with Quantcast, at Quantcast’s expense. Quantcast will have no obligation or liability hereunder where the claim results from any combination with, addition to, or modification of the Services or the Technology, from your failure to update your Tag, from your or any Authorized Affiliate breach of this Agreement, or from failure to obtain consent for your and our use of cookies or other tracking technology in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws. If the Services or Technology become, or, in Quantcast’s opinion are likely to become, the subject of a third-party claim against you, Quantcast may, at its option and expense, procure rights for you to continue using the Services or the Technology, replace or modify the same so that it performs substantially similar functions but does not infringe, or terminate this Agreement.
The foregoing states the sole and exclusive liability of Quantcast and your sole remedy with respect to third party claims of any kind.
You agree to indemnify and hold Quantcast harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim resulting from your failure to update your Tag when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades.
8.     Warranty Disclaimer.
The services and related information are provided “as is,” without warranty or condition of any kind, either express or implied. Without limiting the foregoing, Quantcast explicitly disclaims any warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, quiet enjoyment, or non-infringement. Quantcast makes no warranty that the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content will (1) meet your requirements, (2) be available on an uninterrupted, secure, or error-free basis, or (3) not cause any latency or processing delays. Quantcast is under no obligation to retain any Measurement Data or to keep the site up and running for any period of time. Quantcast makes no warranty regarding the accuracy, timeliness, truthfulness, completeness, or reliability of any information obtained through the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content. No information, whether oral or written, will create any warranty or representation not expressly made herein. The foregoing exclusions and disclaimers are an essential part of this Agreement and formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer the Services to you. Some jurisdictions do not allow exclusion of certain warranties so this disclaimer may not apply to you in full.
9.     Suspension and Termination.
Unless otherwise terminated as set forth herein, this Agreement will remain in full force and effect while you use the Services. You may terminate your Quantcast account and this Agreement at any time by both (i) “dequantifying” by deleting all Reachpoints from your profile on the Quantcast website (or, alternatively, by emailing contact@quantcast.com (if you are resident in the US) or contact.dublin@quantcast.com (if you are resident outside the US) with your complete account information and explicit request to terminate) and (ii) removing the Tags from all of your Reachpoints. Quantcast may terminate or suspend your access to the Services or terminate this Agreement at any time, for any reason or no reason and without any liability to you. Upon termination, all licenses and other rights granted to you under this Agreement will immediately cease. Quantcast will not be liable to you or any third party for termination of this Agreement (whether by Quantcast or by you) or any termination or suspension of your use of the Services. Upon any termination or suspension, information in connection with your account may no longer be accessed by you. Notwithstanding the above, Sections 4 through 9, Sections 11 through 13, and the second paragraph of Section 3 will survive termination.
10.
Modification of the Service and of the Terms.
Quantcast reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to modify or discontinue the Quantcast website and Services without notice. Quantcast may also modify this Agreement from time to time. If the modified Agreement is not acceptable to you, you may terminate your account within 30 days by following the two-step procedure described in Section 9. Use of the Quantcast website, use of any Tag to contact Quantcast’s servers, or use of the Services will constitute your acceptance thereof.
11.     Limitation of Liability.
In no event will Quantcast be liable to you or any third party for any consequential loss, exemplary damages, incidental loss, special damages or loss, lost profit, loss or deletion of Measurement Data or Measurement Results, or punitive damages arising from your use of the Services, even if Quantcast has been advised of the possibility of such damages. These limitations formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer these Services to you. This paragraph will apply regardless of any failure of the exclusive remedy provided in the following paragraph.
Except with regard to Quantcast’s obligations under Section 7, liability stemming from death or personal injury resulting from Quantcast’s negligence, or Quantcast’s fraud, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, Quantcast’s liability to you for any cause whatsoever and regardless of the form of the action, will at all times be limited to two hundred fifty U.S. dollars (US$250.00).
12.     Miscellaneous.
This Agreement constitutes the entire Agreement between the parties with respect to the Services and supersedes all previous and contemporaneous agreements, proposals, and communications, written or oral between Quantcast and you with respect thereto. Any agreements regarding the delivery or use of advertising segments will govern the parties’ relationship in connection with the applicable segments but will not affect the parties’ rights, restrictions, or obligations under this Agreement, which the parties acknowledge as separate subject matter. Any waiver by either party of any violation of this Agreement will not be deemed to waive any further or future violation of the same or any other provision. If any parts or provisions of this Agreement are held to be unenforceable, then you and Quantcast agree that such parts or provisions will be given maximum permissible force and effect and the remainder of the Agreement will be fully enforceable. You and Quantcast agree that there are no third party beneficiaries of any promises, obligations or representations made by Quantcast. Either Party may assign its rights, data, and duties, under this Agreement in their entirety in connection with a sale of all (or substantially all) of its assets relating to this Agreement, a merger, or a reorganization. Nothing in this Agreement will constitute a partnership or joint venture or joint controllership between you and Quantcast.
This Agreement and any dispute relating to this Agreement will be governed by the laws of the United States and the laws of the State of California, without regard to U.S. or California choice of law rules. You and Quantcast agree and consent that jurisdiction, proper venue, and the most convenient forums for all claims, actions, and proceedings of any kind relating to Quantcast or the matters in this Agreement will be exclusively in courts located in San Francisco, California.
This Agreement is drafted in the English language. Any translation into another language is provided for convenience only. In the event of any inconsistency between the English language version and any translation, the English language version shall prevail.
13.     Notice.
All notices or other communications to Quantcast from you will be deemed given only when received by hand delivery, electronic mail, or prepaid first class mail, at the address below or any other address provided by Quantcast to you for these purposes:
Persons in the United States, please contact:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Attn: Legal Department
Email: contact@quantcast.com
Persons outside of the United States, please contact:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street, 1st Floor
Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn: Legal Department
Email: contact.dublin@quantcast.com
14.     Definitions
“Applicable Privacy Laws”
means any applicable international, federal, state, or local privacy or data protection laws, statutes or regulations as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, including but not limited to (a) the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679 (
“GDPR”
) and any EU Member State laws implementing GDPR; (b) the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.100
et seq.
as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act and implementing regulations (
“CCPA”)
; (c) the e-Privacy Directive 2002/58/EC, as amended and as transposed into EU Member State law and any legislation replacing the e-Privacy Directive; (d) The Brazilian General Data Protection Law, Law No. 13.709, of August 14, 2018 (“LGPD”)”.
“Authorized Affiliate”
means a third party that you allow to use your Tag, your account, or the Measurement Results.
“
Business
”
has the same meaning as in CCPA.
“Measurement Data”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Measurement Results”
has the meaning defined in Section 1.
“
Personal Information
”
means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular individual or household and any other information that may otherwise be considered “personal information” or “personal data” under Applicable Privacy Law.
“Quantcast Content”
means the content of the Quantcast website and the Services, including the Measurement Data and Measurement Results.
“
Quantcast Property
”
has the meaning given to it in Section 6.
“Reachpoint”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Services”
means Quantcast Measurement: the digital audience ratings service that allows you (or an Authorized Affiliate) to define and measure specific online events by tagging Reachpoints, as described herein and as governed by these terms and conditions.
“Tag”
means the particular javascript or other audience measurement code or software development kit provided to you by Quantcast, which allows Quantcast to set a cookie and embeddable on web pages, media files, and other Reachpoints, together with any labels and any fixes, updates, and upgrades provided to you.
“Technology”
means, separately and collectively, the Tags, and Quantcast’s proprietary technology that generates the Measurement Results.
15.     Contracting Party.
If you reside in the US this Agreement is between you and Quantcast Corporation. If you reside outside of the US, this Agreement is between you and Quantcast International Limited, an Irish limited liability company. References to “Quantcast”, “us”, “we” and “our” mean either Quantcast Corporation or Quantcast International Limited as appropriate.
Effective August 17th 2023
to
April 5th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
If you have an active, duly executed contract for Quantcast services (“
Existing Contract
”), the Existing Contract will govern your use of the service(s) covered in the Existing Contract instead of these Quantcast Measure Terms of Service (“
Terms
”).       In addition, these Terms only apply to the Quantcast Measure service (i.e., the “
Service
” as described below) and not to any other Quantcast product or service.
Quantcast Measure Terms of Service
This Quantcast Measure Terms of Service (this
“Agreement”
)
describes the terms and conditions on which Quantcast makes Quantcast Measure (the
“Services”
)
available to you.
BY CLICKING THE “I ACCEPT” BUTTON, COMPLETING THE REGISTRATION PROCESS, USING THE SERVICES OR ENTERING INTO AN OFFLINE AGREEMENT THAT REFERENCES THIS AGREEMENT OR INCLUDES A LINK TO THIS AGREEMENT, YOU ARE AGREEING TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT. IF YOU ARE ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT ON BEHALF OF A COMPANY OR OTHER LEGAL ENTITY, YOU REPRESENT THAT YOU HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO BIND SUCH ENTITY, IN WHICH CASE THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY (OR, IF SUCH ENTITY IS ACTING AS AN AUTHORIZED AFFILIATE, THEN THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY, THE AUTHORIZING PARTY(IES), OR BOTH, AS APPLICABLE). QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY THIS AGREEMENT FROM TIME TO TIME; CONTINUED USE 30 DAYS AFTER NOTIFICATION WILL CONSTITUTE ACCEPTANCE (SEE SECTION 10).
Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein are defined in Section 14.
This Agreement incorporates the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing personal information that is subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing Addendum) and the
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Publisher Partners
.
Introduction: Reachpoints, Tags, and Measurement Data.
Quantcast Measure is a free digital audience measurement service that allows you to tag web pages, video, advertisements, apps, content, and paid search campaigns (what we call,
“
Reachpoints
”)
for direct measurement.
You can also define and measure actions and events by customizing your Tags with labels. You have complete control over (and are solely responsible for) which Reachpoints are tagged, how segments are labelled (e.g., with meaningful or obfuscated names), and how the resulting Measurement Results are or are not disclosed publicly.
Each time a browser visits your tagged Reachpoints, Quantcast may, in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws, collect traffic statistics like those in any web server log (what we call,
“
Measurement Data
”
). We then apply proprietary Quantcast algorithms and other data to the Measurement Data to generate the
“
Measurement Results
”,
which we make available to you on the Quantcast website (see Section 3).
To measure Reachpoints that you do not own or control, you may provide your Tag to a third party who accepts this Agreement (any such third party, an
“Authorized Affiliate”
); you may also instruct us to give the Authorized Affiliate access to the Measurement Results.
Registration.
In order to access the Services you must register for a Quantcast account on the Quantcast website. Each new app you Tag requires its own registration and then receives its own unique API key. In registering, you agree to provide accurate, current, and complete information, and to keep it up to date. Any processing of Personal Information when registering for a Quantcast account will be processed in accordance with the Quantcast Website and Corporate Privacy Policy which you can access
here
.
You are responsible for keeping your password confidential. You hereby take responsibility for all actions taken—and instructions provided to Quantcast—under your account or with the Measurement Results, by you or any third parties, whether or not authorized. You will notify Quantcast immediately of any unauthorized or non-compliant use of your account and will cooperate with us in stopping it.
Measurement Data and Results.
Quantcast uses each piece of Measurement Data both to understand your audience (for your benefit only) and as one of trillions of data points for predictive analytics and in determining what content and advertising to show individuals across the internet and other digital applications. You acknowledge that Quantcast may use Personal Information it receives from you to provide services to other Quantcast clients or for Quantcast’s commercial interests that may be unrelated to providing the Services to you.
Quantcast will never sell your audience (whether identified as such or not) and you control the extent to which Quantcast displays the Measurement Results.
Quantcast grants you perpetual rights to use, copy, and distribute the Measurement Results, including with our sharable widgets, only as long as you:
Credit Us. Conspicuously include: “Source: Quantcast
www.quantcast.com
”;
Present the Measurement Results Exactly as We Provided It. Do not: (i) manipulate or modify the Measurement Results to state or suggest different results from those specifically presented by Quantcast; (ii) combine information related to different Quantcast profiles (for example, by adding together the reach from two different sites instead of presenting the cross-site unduplicated reach measurement provided by Quantcast); (iii) quantitatively aggregate or combine information in the Measurement Results with information derived from other sources (but offering a comparison with information derived from other sources is permissible);
Don’t Use Our Work to Compete with Us. Do not use the information in the Measurement Results in any way that competes with Quantcast; and
Bind Third Parties. If you provide the information in the Measurement Results directly to any third party (rather than by having them access the information through the Quantcast website), you must ensure that they agree to be bound by and comply with the terms of this Agreement including the foregoing requirements.
Tagging Rules and Privacy.
You agree not to misrepresent your digital traffic, audience, or user activity in connection with Quantcast, the Services, or any Tags. You agree not to tag any adware or spyware inventory, or any Reachpoint revealing precise geographic location (i.e., information that describes the precise location of a device derived through any technology that is capable of determining with reasonable specificity the actual physical location of an individual or device), specific health / medical /sex-life information, credit card or financial data, or criminal convictions or charges. In addition, you agree not to tag any Reachpoint revealing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category” Personal Information under Applicable Privacy Laws, including data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions or parties, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership, or health. If you represent to Quantcast (e.g., during the signup process) that your Reachpoints are directed to users under the age of 16, Quantcast will not collect any Personal Information from such Reachpoints and you will not receive those of our services that require collection of data across different websites. You will not modify the Tag other than as described in a
Quantcast Learning Center Guide
. You agree to update your Tag (which may require retagging your Reachpoints) when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades. You will use the Tag in the top most frame possible. You will retain the Tag’s origin address that we provided, in full.
You agree to comply with Applicable Privacy Laws and also industry self-regulation Principles and Codes of Conduct for interest-based advertising in connection with your use of the Tag and the Services. You agree not to use the Services to track or collect personally identifiable information (i.e., information that can be used to contact or identify a particular individual, including name, address, telephone number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier) of end users. To the extent that the web pages or apps in which you place the Technology are accessed by end users located in Europe, you agree to implement a transparency and consent solution compatible with the
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
or another solution mutually agreed by both parties in writing. While you are implementing such consent solution, you agree to (i) obtain consent for Quantcast to use cookies and similar technologies in compliance with Applicable Privacy Laws, (ii) provide proof of such consent if requested by Quantcast, and (iii) not permit calls from your web pages or apps to Quantcast servers if such consent has not be obtained. You agree to name Quantcast as a party for or by whom cookies or similar technologies are used to access the device and Personal Information is collected through your webpages or apps.
You further agree to prominently display to end users a user friendly, easily accessible, clear and comprehensive privacy policy (and, if necessitated by Applicable Privacy Laws, a separate cookie policy) that, where required, complies with Applicable Privacy Laws and contains the following (a) a statement that your site or app permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the types of data collected for such advertising, (iii) an explanation of the purposes for which data is collected by, or transferred to, third parties, and (iv) a conspicuous link to either an opt-out mechanism, such as the NAI or DAA opt-outs for companies established outside of Europe or a consent revocation page for companies established in Europe. If you use the Services to collect data from a network of domains or subdomains, you will inform each in advance of such disclosures.
In the case of app measurement, operating system platforms provide device-level setting options that allow end users to indicate their preference with respect to third party data collection and targeted advertising (the
“
Ad Preference Setting
”
). Quantcast treats these device level Ad Preference Settings as consumer opt-outs and you will accurately pass the Ad Preference Setting to Quantcast. You will not send any identifier associated with a device to the extent that such device has otherwise indicated that the end user wishes to be opted out of advertisement tracking.
Unless agreed otherwise, you and Quantcast are each separate and independent Businesses or Controllers of any Personal Information which you and we may disclose or receive under this Agreement. You and Quantcast, pursuant to this Agreement, do not and will not jointly determine the purposes or the means of Processing of any Personal Information disclosed or received under this Agreement. Each party shall comply with the obligations that apply to it under Applicable Privacy Laws and provide Personal Information Processed pursuant to this Agreement the level of privacy protection required by such laws. In the event that either party determines that it can no longer meet its privacy obligations under this Agreement or the Privacy Laws, it shall inform the other party without undue delay.
If you are a Business subject to CCPA, you agree to prominently post a “Do Not Sell or Share My Personal Information” link on all of your Reachpoints, and to provide consumers with the disclosures required of Businesses by CCPA.
Restrictions.
You agree to use the Services only in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement. You will not use the Services to engage in any illegal or offensive acts or serve any illegal content via any Reachpoint. You will not:
Interfere or attempt to interfere with the operation or security-related features of the Services or the Technology;
Delete, or in any manner alter, the copyright, trademark, or other proprietary rights notices appearing on any Quantcast Content;
Represent that Quantcast endorses or supports your services; make any representations and warranties concerning any aspect of the Services, the Technology, or Measurement Results to any Authorized Third Parties or other third parties; or
Attempt to index, scrape, search, or crawl the Services or the Quantcast website with any automated process; or attempt to access any information or technology relating to the Services, the Quantcast website, or our proprietary algorithms through any means not intentionally made available by Quantcast to you.
Quantcast Rights.
All right, title, and interest, including intellectual property rights, in and to the Quantcast website, the Services, the Technology, and the Quantcast Content are and will remain the exclusive property of Quantcast (
“
Quantcast Property
”
). Except as expressly permitted in this Agreement, you will not reproduce, modify, or prepare derivative works based upon, distribute, license, sell, transfer, publicly display, publicly perform, transmit, or use such Quantcast Property. In the event that your Quantcast account is suspended or terminated, Quantcast will continue to respect this Agreement’s limits on our use of the Measurement Data and will cease all public display of the Measurement Results.
Quantcast servers may choose to occasionally respond to any publisher’s Tag by redirecting the browser to a third-party anonymous beacon to support the provision of Quantcast services in market. The decision to beacon is not related to you, your traffic, or your user base.
Indemnity.
Quantcast agrees to defend, indemnify, and hold you harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim that the Technology or the Services infringe any U.S. or European intellectual property rights, provided that you (i) promptly inform and furnish Quantcast with a copy of each related communication and action, (ii) allow Quantcast to assume full control of the defense and settlement, and (iii) assist and cooperate with Quantcast, at Quantcast’s expense. Quantcast will have no obligation or liability hereunder where the claim results from any combination with, addition to, or modification of the Services or the Technology, from your failure to update your Tag, from your or any Authorized Affiliate breach of this Agreement, or from failure to obtain consent for your and our use of cookies or other tracking technology in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws. If the Services or Technology become, or, in Quantcast’s opinion are likely to become, the subject of a third-party claim against you, Quantcast may, at its option and expense, procure rights for you to continue using the Services or the Technology, replace or modify the same so that it performs substantially similar functions but does not infringe, or terminate this Agreement.
The foregoing states the sole and exclusive liability of Quantcast and your sole remedy with respect to third party claims of any kind.
You agree to indemnify and hold Quantcast harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim resulting from your failure to update your Tag when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades.
Warranty Disclaimer.
The services and related information are provided “as is,” without warranty or condition of any kind, either express or implied. Without limiting the foregoing, Quantcast explicitly disclaims any warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, quiet enjoyment, or non-infringement. Quantcast makes no warranty that the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content will (1) meet your requirements, (2) be available on an uninterrupted, secure, or error-free basis, or (3) not cause any latency or processing delays. Quantcast is under no obligation to retain any Measurement Data or to keep the site up and running for any period of time. Quantcast makes no warranty regarding the accuracy, timeliness, truthfulness, completeness, or reliability of any information obtained through the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content. No information, whether oral or written, will create any warranty or representation not expressly made herein. The foregoing exclusions and disclaimers are an essential part of this Agreement and formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer the Services to you. Some jurisdictions do not allow exclusion of certain warranties so this disclaimer may not apply to you in full.
Suspension and Termination.
Unless otherwise terminated as set forth herein, this Agreement will remain in full force and effect while you use the Services. You may terminate your Quantcast account and this Agreement at any time by both (i) “dequantifying” by deleting all Reachpoints from your profile on the Quantcast website (or, alternatively, by emailing contact@quantcast.com (if you are resident in the US) or contact.dublin@quantcast.com (if you are resident outside the US) with your complete account information and explicit request to terminate) and (ii) removing the Tags from all of your Reachpoints. Quantcast may terminate or suspend your access to the Services or terminate this Agreement at any time, for any reason or no reason and without any liability to you. Upon termination, all licenses and other rights granted to you under this Agreement will immediately cease. Quantcast will not be liable to you or any third party for termination of this Agreement (whether by Quantcast or by you) or any termination or suspension of your use of the Services. Upon any termination or suspension, information in connection with your account may no longer be accessed by you. Notwithstanding the above, Sections 4 through 9, Sections 11 through 13, and the second paragraph of Section 3 will survive termination.
Modification of the Service and of the Terms.
Quantcast reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to modify or discontinue the Quantcast website and Services without notice. Quantcast may also modify this Agreement from time to time. If the modified Agreement is not acceptable to you, you may terminate your account within 30 days by following the two-step procedure described in Section 9. Use of the Quantcast website, use of any Tag to contact Quantcast’s servers, or use of the Services will constitute your acceptance thereof.
Limitation of Liability.
In no event will Quantcast be liable to you or any third party for any consequential loss, exemplary damages, incidental loss, special damages or loss, lost profit, loss or deletion of Measurement Data or Measurement Results, or punitive damages arising from your use of the Services, even if Quantcast has been advised of the possibility of such damages. These limitations formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer these Services to you. This paragraph will apply regardless of any failure of the exclusive remedy provided in the following paragraph.
Except with regard to Quantcast’s obligations under Section 7, liability stemming from death or personal injury resulting from Quantcast’s negligence, or Quantcast’s fraud, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, Quantcast’s liability to you for any cause whatsoever and regardless of the form of the action, will at all times be limited to two hundred fifty U.S. dollars (US$250.00).
Miscellaneous.
This Agreement constitutes the entire Agreement between the parties with respect to the Services and supersedes all previous and contemporaneous agreements, proposals, and communications, written or oral between Quantcast and you with respect thereto. Any agreements regarding the delivery or use of advertising segments will govern the parties’ relationship in connection with the applicable segments but will not affect the parties’ rights, restrictions, or obligations under this Agreement, which the parties acknowledge as separate subject matter. Any waiver by either party of any violation of this Agreement will not be deemed to waive any further or future violation of the same or any other provision. If any parts or provisions of this Agreement are held to be unenforceable, then you and Quantcast agree that such parts or provisions will be given maximum permissible force and effect and the remainder of the Agreement will be fully enforceable. You and Quantcast agree that there are no third party beneficiaries of any promises, obligations or representations made by Quantcast. Either Party may assign its rights, data, and duties, under this Agreement in their entirety in connection with a sale of all (or substantially all) of its assets relating to this Agreement, a merger, or a reorganization. Nothing in this Agreement will constitute a partnership or joint venture or joint controllership between you and Quantcast.
This Agreement and any dispute relating to this Agreement will be governed by the laws of the United States and the laws of the State of California, without regard to U.S. or California choice of law rules. You and Quantcast agree and consent that jurisdiction, proper venue, and the most convenient forums for all claims, actions, and proceedings of any kind relating to Quantcast or the matters in this Agreement will be exclusively in courts located in San Francisco, California.
This Agreement is drafted in the English language. Any translation into another language is provided for convenience only. In the event of any inconsistency between the English language version and any translation, the English language version shall prevail.
Notice.
All notices or other communications to Quantcast from you will be deemed given only when received by hand delivery, electronic mail, or prepaid first class mail, at the address below or any other address provided by Quantcast to you for these purposes:
Persons in the United States, please contact:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Attn: Legal Department
Email: contact@quantcast.com
Persons outside of the United States, please contact:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street, 1st Floor
Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn: Legal Department
Email: contact.dublin@quantcast.com
Definitions
“Applicable Privacy Laws”
means any applicable international, federal, state, or local privacy or data protection laws, statutes or regulations as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, including but not limited to (a) the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679 (
“GDPR”
) and any EU Member State laws implementing GDPR; (b) the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.100
et seq.
as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act and implementing regulations (
“CCPA”)
; (c) the e-Privacy Directive 2002/58/EC, as amended and as transposed into EU Member State law and any legislation replacing the e-Privacy Directive; (d) The Brazilian General Data Protection Law, Law No. 13.709, of August 14, 2018 (“LGPD”)”.
“Authorized Affiliate”
means a third party that you allow to use your Tag, your account, or the Measurement Results.
“
Business
”
has the same meaning as in CCPA.
“Measurement Data”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Measurement Results”
has the meaning defined in Section 1.
“
Personal Information
”
means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular individual or household and any other information that may otherwise be considered “personal information” or “personal data” under Applicable Privacy Law.
“Quantcast Content”
means the content of the Quantcast website and the Services, including the Measurement Data and Measurement Results.
“
Quantcast Property
”
has the meaning given to it in Section 6.
“Reachpoint”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Services”
means Quantcast Measurement: the digital audience ratings service that allows you (or an Authorized Affiliate) to define and measure specific online events by tagging Reachpoints, as described herein and as governed by these terms and conditions.
“Tag”
means the particular javascript or other audience measurement code or software development kit provided to you by Quantcast, which allows Quantcast to set a cookie and embeddable on web pages, media files, and other Reachpoints, together with any labels and any fixes, updates, and upgrades provided to you.
“Technology”
means, separately and collectively, the Tags, and Quantcast’s proprietary technology that generates the Measurement Results.
Contracting Party.
If you reside in the US this Agreement is between you and Quantcast Corporation. If you reside outside of the US, this Agreement is between you and Quantcast International Limited, an Irish limited liability company. References to “Quantcast”, “us”, “we” and “our” mean either Quantcast Corporation or Quantcast International Limited as appropriate.
Effective July 23rd 2021
to
August 17th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Quantcast Measure and Q for Publishers Terms of Service
Effective: January 1, 2020
Once you have agreed to these
Terms and Conditions
you will be able to download and install the Quantcast Measure Tag. These terms will apply only after such download and installation.
This Quantcast Measure and Q for Publishers Terms of Service (this
“Agreement”
) describes the terms and conditions on which Quantcast makes Quantcast Measure and Q for Publishers (the
“Services”
) available to you.
BY CLICKING THE “I ACCEPT” BUTTON, COMPLETING THE REGISTRATION PROCESS, OR USING THE SERVICES, YOU ARE AGREEING TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT. IF YOU ARE ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT ON BEHALF OF A COMPANY OR OTHER LEGAL ENTITY, YOU REPRESENT THAT YOU HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO BIND SUCH ENTITY, IN WHICH CASE THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY (OR, IF SUCH ENTITY IS ACTING AS AN AUTHORIZED AFFILIATE, THEN THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY, THE AUTHORIZING PARTY(IES), OR BOTH, AS APPLICABLE). QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY THIS AGREEMENT FROM TIME TO TIME; CONTINUED USE 30 DAYS AFTER NOTIFICATION WILL CONSTITUTE ACCEPTANCE (SEE SECTION 10).
Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein are defined in Section 14.
Introduction: Reachpoints, Tags, and Measurement Data.
Quantcast Measure is a free digital audience measurement service that allows you to tag web pages, video, advertisements, apps, content, and paid search campaigns (what we call, “
Reachpoints
”) for direct measurement.
You can also define and measure actions and events by customizing your Tags with labels. You have complete control over (and are solely responsible for) which Reachpoints are tagged, how segments are labelled (e.g., with meaningful or obfuscated names), and how the resulting Measurement Results are or are not disclosed publicly.
Each time a browser visits your tagged Reachpoints, Quantcast may, in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws, collect traffic statistics like those in any web server log (what we call, “
Measurement Data
”). We then apply proprietary Quantcast algorithms and other data to the Measurement Data to generate the “
Measurement Results
”, which we make available to you on the Quantcast website (see Section 3). For more information about how the Services work, please see our
FAQ
.
To measure Reachpoints that you do not own or control, you may provide your Tag to a third party who accepts this Agreement (any such third party, an
“
Authorized Affiliate
”
); you may also instruct us to give the Authorized Affiliate access to the Measurement Results.
Registration.
In order to access the Services you must register for a Quantcast account on the Quantcast website. Each new app you Tag requires its own registration and then receives its own unique API key. In registering, you agree to provide accurate, current, and complete information, and to keep it up to date. Any processing of Personal Data when registering for a Quantcast account will be processed in accordance with the Quantcast Privacy Policy which you can access
here
.
You are responsible for keeping your password confidential. You hereby take responsibility for all actions taken—and instructions provided to Quantcast—under your account or with the Measurement Results, by you or any third parties, whether or not authorized. You will notify Quantcast immediately of any unauthorized or non-compliant use of your account and will cooperate with us in stopping it.
Measurement Data and Results.
Quantcast uses each piece of Measurement Data both to understand your audience (for your benefit only) and as one of trillions of data points for predictive analytics and in determining what content and advertising to show individuals across the internet and other digital applications. You acknowledge that Quantcast may use Personal Information it receives from you to provide services to other Quantcast clients or for Quantcast’s commercial interests that may be unrelated to providing the Services to you.
Quantcast will never sell your audience (whether identified as such or not) and you control the extent to which Quantcast displays the Measurement Results.
Quantcast grants you perpetual rights to use, copy, and distribute the Measurement Results, including with our sharable widgets, only as long as you:
Credit Us. Conspicuously include: “Source: Quantcast
www.quantcast.com
”;
Present the Measurement Results Exactly as We Provided It. Do not: (i) manipulate or modify the Measurement Results to state or suggest different results from those specifically presented by Quantcast; (ii) combine information related to different Quantcast profiles (for example, by adding together the reach from two different sites instead of presenting the cross-site unduplicated reach measurement provided by Quantcast); (iii) quantitatively aggregate or combine information in the Measurement Results with information derived from other sources (but offering a comparison with information derived from other sources is permissible);
Don’t Use Our Work to Compete with Us. Do not use the information in the Measurement Results in any way that competes with Quantcast; and
Bind Third Parties. If you provide the information in the Measurement Results directly to any third party (rather than by having them access the information through the Quantcast website), you must ensure that they agree to be bound by and comply with the terms of this Agreement including the foregoing requirements.
Tagging Rules and Privacy.
You agree not to misrepresent your digital traffic, audience, or user activity in connection with Quantcast, the Services, or any Tags. You agree not to tag any adware or spyware inventory, or any Reachpoint revealing precise geographic location (i.e., information that describes the precise location of a device derived through any technology that is capable of determining with reasonable specificity the actual physical location of an individual or device), specific health / medical /sex-life information, credit card or financial data, or criminal convictions or charges. In addition, if you are an EU established company or person or your Reachpoints are directed towards end users in the EU, you agree not to tag any Reachpoint revealing other sensitive or special category Personal Data, including racial or ethnic origin, political opinions or parties, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership. If you represent to Quantcast (e.g., during the signup process) that your Reachpoints are directed to users under the age of 16, Quantcast will not collect any Personal Data from such Reachpoints and you will not receive those of our services that require collection of data across different websites. You will not modify the Tag other than as described in a
Quantcast Learning Center Guide
. You agree to update your Tag (which may require retagging your Reachpoints) when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades. You will use the Tag in the top most frame possible. You will retain the Tag’s origin address that we provided, in full.
You agree to comply with Applicable Privacy Laws and also industry self-regulation Principles and Codes of Conduct for interest-based advertising in connection with your use of the Tag and the Services. You agree not to use the Services to track or collect personally identifiable information of end users. To the extent that the web pages or apps in which you place the Technology are accessed by end users in the EU, you agree to implement a transparency and consent solution compatible with the
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
(such as
Quantcast Choice
) or another solution mutually agreed by both parties in writing. While you are implementing such consent solution, you agree to (i) obtain consent for Quantcast to use cookies and similar technologies in compliance with Applicable Privacy Laws, (ii) provide proof of such consent if requested by Quantcast, and (iii) not permit calls from your web pages or apps to Quantcast servers if such consent has not be obtained. Wherever possible, you agree to name Quantcast as a party for or by whom cookies or similar technologies are used to access the device and Personal Data is collected through your webpages or apps.
You further agree to prominently display to end users a user friendly, easily accessible, clear and comprehensive privacy policy (and, if necessitated by Applicable Privacy Laws, a separate cookie policy) that, where required, complies with Applicable Privacy Laws and contains the following (a) a statement that your site or app permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the types of data collected for such advertising, (iii) an explanation of the purposes for which data is collected by, or transferred to, third parties, and (iv) a conspicuous link to either an opt-out mechanism, such as the NAI or DAA opt-outs for non-EU established companies or a consent revocation page for EU established companies. If you use the Services to collect data from a network of domains or subdomains, you will inform each in advance of such disclosures.
In the case of app measurement, operating system platforms provide device-level setting options that allow end users to indicate their preference with respect to third party data collection and targeted advertising (the “
Ad Preference Setting
”). Quantcast treats these device level Ad Preference Settings as consumer opt-outs and you will accurately pass the Ad Preference Setting to Quantcast. You will not send any identifier associated with a device to the extent that such device has otherwise indicated that the end user wishes to be opted out of advertisement tracking.
To the extent that GDPR applies, you and Quantcast are each separate and independent data controllers of any Personal Data which you and we may disclose or receive under this Agreement. You and Quantcast, pursuant to this Agreement, do not and will not jointly determine the purposes or the means of processing of any Personal Data disclosed or received under this Agreement.
To the extent that CCPA applies, Quantcast is a Third Party in its relationship with you regarding your use of the Services.
If you are a Business subject to CCPA, you agree to prominently post a “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” link on all of your Reachpoints, and to provide consumers with the disclosures required of Businesses by CCPA.
Restrictions.
You agree to use the Services only in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement. You will not use the Service to engage in any illegal or offensive acts or serve any illegal content via any Reachpoint. You will not:
Interfere or attempt to interfere with the operation or security-related features of the Services or the Technology;
Delete, or in any manner alter, the copyright, trademark, or other proprietary rights notices appearing on any Quantcast Content;
Represent that Quantcast endorses or supports your services; make any representations and warranties concerning any aspect of the Services, the Technology, or Measurement Results to any Authorized Third Parties or other third parties; or
Attempt to index, scrape, search, or crawl the Services or the Quantcast website with any automated process; or attempt to access any information or technology relating to the Services, the Quantcast website, or our proprietary algorithms through any means not intentionally made available by Quantcast to you.
Quantcast Rights.
All right, title, and interest, including intellectual property rights, in and to the Quantcast website, the Services, the Technology, and the Quantcast Content are and will remain the exclusive property of Quantcast (“
Quantcast Property
”). Except as expressly permitted in this Agreement, you will not reproduce, modify, or prepare derivative works based upon, distribute, license, sell, transfer, publicly display, publicly perform, transmit, or use such Quantcast Property. In the event that your Quantcast account is suspended or terminated, Quantcast will continue to respect this Agreement’s limits on our use of the Measurement Data and will cease all public display of the Measurement Results.
Quantcast servers may choose to occasionally respond to any publisher’s Tag by redirecting the browser to a third-party anonymous beacon to support the provision of Quantcast services in market. The decision to beacon is not related to you, your traffic, or your user base.
Indemnity.
Quantcast agrees to defend, indemnify, and hold you harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim that the Technology or the Services infringe any U.S. or European intellectual property rights, provided that you (i) promptly inform and furnish Quantcast with a copy of each related communication and action, (ii) allow Quantcast to assume full control of the defense and settlement, and (iii) assist and cooperate with Quantcast, at Quantcast’s expense. Quantcast will have no obligation or liability hereunder where the claim results from any combination with, addition to, or modification of the Services or the Technology, from your failure to update your Tag, from your or any Authorized Affiliate breach of this Agreement, or from failure to obtain consent for your and our use of cookies or other tracking technology in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws. If the Services or Technology become, or, in Quantcast’s opinion are likely to become, the subject of a third-party claim against you, Quantcast may, at its option and expense, procure rights for you to continue using the Services or the Technology, replace or modify the same so that it performs substantially similar functions but does not infringe, or terminate this Agreement.
The foregoing states the sole and exclusive liability of Quantcast and your sole remedy with respect to third party claims of any kind.
You agree to indemnify and hold Quantcast harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim resulting from your failure to update your Tag when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades.
Warranty Disclaimer.
The services and related information are provided “as is,” without warranty or condition of any kind, either express or implied. Without limiting the foregoing, Quantcast explicitly disclaims any warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, quiet enjoyment, or non-infringement. Quantcast makes no warranty that the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content will (1) meet your requirements, (2) be available on an uninterrupted, secure, or error-free basis, or (3) not cause any latency or processing delays. Quantcast is under no obligation to retain any Measurement Data or to keep the site up and running for any period of time. Quantcast makes no warranty regarding the accuracy, timeliness, truthfulness, completeness, or reliability of any information obtained through the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content. No information, whether oral or written, will create any warranty or representation not expressly made herein. The foregoing exclusions and disclaimers are an essential part of this Agreement and formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer the Services to you. Some jurisdictions do not allow exclusion of certain warranties so this disclaimer may not apply to you in full.
Suspension and Termination.
Unless otherwise terminated as set forth herein, this Agreement will remain in full force and effect while you use the Services. You may terminate your Quantcast account and this Agreement at any time by both (i) “dequantifying” by deleting all Reachpoints from your profile on the Quantcast website (or, alternatively, by emailing
contact@quantcast.com
(if you are resident in the US) or
contact.dublin@quantcast.com
(if you are resident outside the US) with your complete account information and explicit request to terminate) and (ii) removing the Tags from all of your Reachpoints. Quantcast may terminate or suspend your access to the Services or terminate this Agreement at any time, for any reason or no reason and without any liability to you. Upon termination, all licenses and other rights granted to you under this Agreement will immediately cease. Quantcast will not be liable to you or any third party for termination of this Agreement (whether by Quantcast or by you) or any termination or suspension of your use of the Services. Upon any termination or suspension, information in connection with your account may no longer be accessed by you. Notwithstanding the above, Sections 4 through 9, Sections 11 through 13, and the second paragraph of Section 3 will survive termination.
Modification of the Service and of the Terms.
Quantcast reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to modify or discontinue the Quantcast website and Services without notice. Quantcast may also modify this Agreement from time to time. If the modified Agreement is not acceptable to you, you may terminate your account within 30 days by following the two-step procedure described in Section 9. Use of the Quantcast website, use of any Tag to contact Quantcast’s servers, or use of the Services, after 30 days, will constitute your acceptance thereof.
Limitation of Liability.
In no event will Quantcast be liable to you or any third party for any consequential loss, exemplary damages, incidental loss, special damages or loss, lost profit, loss or deletion of Measurement Data or Measurement Results, or punitive damages arising from your use of the Services, even if Quantcast has been advised of the possibility of such damages. These limitations formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer these Services to you. This paragraph will apply regardless of any failure of the exclusive remedy provided in the following paragraph.
Except with regard to Quantcast’s obligations under Section 7, liability stemming from death or personal injury resulting from Quantcast’s negligence, or Quantcast’s fraud, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, Quantcast’s liability to you for any cause whatsoever and regardless of the form of the action, will at all times be limited to two hundred fifty U.S. dollars (US$250.00).
Miscellaneous.
This Agreement constitutes the entire Agreement between the parties with respect to the Services and supersedes all previous and contemporaneous agreements, proposals, and communications, written or oral between Quantcast and you with respect thereto. Any agreements regarding the delivery or use of advertising segments will govern the parties’ relationship in connection with the applicable segments but will not affect the parties’ rights, restrictions, or obligations under this Agreement, which the parties acknowledge as separate subject matter. Any waiver by either party of any violation of this Agreement will not be deemed to waive any further or future violation of the same or any other provision. If any parts or provisions of this Agreement are held to be unenforceable, then you and Quantcast agree that such parts or provisions will be given maximum permissible force and effect and the remainder of the Agreement will be fully enforceable. You and Quantcast agree that there are no third party beneficiaries of any promises, obligations or representations made by Quantcast. Either Party may assign its rights, data, and duties, under this Agreement in their entirety in connection with a sale of all (or substantially all) of its assets relating to this Agreement, a merger, or a reorganization. Nothing in this Agreement will constitute a partnership or joint venture or joint controllership between you and Quantcast.
This Agreement and any dispute relating to this Agreement will be governed by the laws of the United States and the laws of the State of California, without regard to U.S. or California choice of law rules. You and Quantcast agree and consent that jurisdiction, proper venue, and the most convenient forums for all claims, actions, and proceedings of any kind relating to Quantcast or the matters in this Agreement will be exclusively in courts located in San Francisco, California.
This Agreement is drafted in the English language. Any translation into another language is provided for convenience only. In the event of any inconsistency between the English language version and any translation, the English language version shall prevail.
Notice.
All notices or other communications to Quantcast from you will be deemed given only when received by hand delivery, electronic mail, or prepaid first class mail, at the address below or any other address provided by Quantcast to you for these purposes:
Persons in the United States, please contact:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Attn: Legal Department
Email:
contact@quantcast.com
Persons outside of the United States, please contact:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street, 1st Floor
Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn: Legal Department
Email:
contact.dublin@quantcast.com
Definitions
“Applicable Privacy Laws”
means any applicable privacy or data protection laws, statutes or regulations as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, including, where applicable, (a) the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679 (“
GDPR
”)  and any EU Member State laws implementing GDPR; (b) the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.100
et seq.
(“
CCPA
”); and; (c) the e-Privacy Directive 2002/58/EC, as amended and as transposed into EU Member State law and any legislation replacing the e-Privacy Directive.
“Authorized Affiliate”
means a third party that you allow to use your Tag, your account, or the Measurement Results.
“
Business
” has the same meaning as in CCPA.
“Measurement Data”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Measurement Results”
has the meaning defined in Section 1.
“
Personal Data
”
has the same meaning as in GDPR.
“
Personal Information
” has the same meaning as in CCPA.
“Quantcast Content”
means the content of the Quantcast website and the Services, including the Measurement Data and Measurement Results.
“
Quantcast Property
” has the meaning given to it in Section 6.
“Reachpoint”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Services”
means Quantcast Measurement: the digital audience ratings service that allows you (or an Authorized Affiliate) to define and measure specific online events by tagging Reachpoints, as described herein and as governed by these terms and conditions.
“Tag”
means the particular javascript or other audience measurement code or software development kit provided to you by Quantcast, which allows Quantcast to set a cookie and embeddable on web pages, media files, and other Reachpoints, together with any labels and any fixes, updates, and upgrades provided to you.
“Technology”
means, separately and collectively, the Tags, and Quantcast’s proprietary technology that generates the Measurement Results.
“Third Party”
has the same meaning as in CCPA.
Contracting Party.
If you reside in the US this Agreement is between you and Quantcast Corporation. If you reside outside of the US, this Agreement is between you and Quantcast International Limited, an Irish limited liability company. References to “Quantcast”, “us”, “we” and “our” mean either Quantcast Corporation or Quantcast International Limited as appropriate.
Effective July 21st 2021
to
July 23rd 2021
Download
Table of Contents
Quantcast Measure and Q for Publishers Terms of Service
Effective: January 1, 2020
Once you have agreed to these
Terms and Conditions
you will be able to download and install the Quantcast Measure Tag. These terms will apply on after such download and installation.
This Quantcast Measure and Q for Publishers Terms of Service (this
“Agreement”
) describes the terms and conditions on which Quantcast makes Quantcast Measure and Q for Publishers (the
“Services”
) available to you.
BY CLICKING THE “I ACCEPT” BUTTON, COMPLETING THE REGISTRATION PROCESS, OR USING THE SERVICES, YOU ARE AGREEING TO BE BOUND BY THIS AGREEMENT. IF YOU ARE ENTERING INTO THIS AGREEMENT ON BEHALF OF A COMPANY OR OTHER LEGAL ENTITY, YOU REPRESENT THAT YOU HAVE THE AUTHORITY TO BIND SUCH ENTITY, IN WHICH CASE THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY (OR, IF SUCH ENTITY IS ACTING AS AN AUTHORIZED AFFILIATE, THEN THE TERMS “YOU” OR “YOUR” WILL REFER TO SUCH ENTITY, THE AUTHORIZING PARTY(IES), OR BOTH, AS APPLICABLE). QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY THIS AGREEMENT FROM TIME TO TIME; CONTINUED USE 30 DAYS AFTER NOTIFICATION WILL CONSTITUTE ACCEPTANCE (SEE SECTION 10).
Capitalized terms not otherwise defined herein are defined in Section 14.
Introduction: Reachpoints, Tags, and Measurement Data.
Quantcast Measure is a free digital audience measurement service that allows you to tag web pages, video, advertisements, apps, content, and paid search campaigns (what we call, “
Reachpoints
”) for direct measurement.
You can also define and measure actions and events by customizing your Tags with labels. You have complete control over (and are solely responsible for) which Reachpoints are tagged, how segments are labelled (e.g., with meaningful or obfuscated names), and how the resulting Measurement Results are or are not disclosed publicly.
Each time a browser visits your tagged Reachpoints, Quantcast may, in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws, collect traffic statistics like those in any web server log (what we call, “
Measurement Data
”). We then apply proprietary Quantcast algorithms and other data to the Measurement Data to generate the “
Measurement Results
”, which we make available to you on the Quantcast website (see Section 3). For more information about how the Services work, please see our
FAQ
.
To measure Reachpoints that you do not own or control, you may provide your Tag to a third party who accepts this Agreement (any such third party, an
“
Authorized Affiliate
”
); you may also instruct us to give the Authorized Affiliate access to the Measurement Results.
Registration.
In order to access the Services you must register for a Quantcast account on the Quantcast website. Each new app you Tag requires its own registration and then receives its own unique API key. In registering, you agree to provide accurate, current, and complete information, and to keep it up to date. Any processing of Personal Data when registering for a Quantcast account will be processed in accordance with the Quantcast Privacy Policy which you can access
here
.
You are responsible for keeping your password confidential. You hereby take responsibility for all actions taken—and instructions provided to Quantcast—under your account or with the Measurement Results, by you or any third parties, whether or not authorized. You will notify Quantcast immediately of any unauthorized or non-compliant use of your account and will cooperate with us in stopping it.
Measurement Data and Results.
Quantcast uses each piece of Measurement Data both to understand your audience (for your benefit only) and as one of trillions of data points for predictive analytics and in determining what content and advertising to show individuals across the internet and other digital applications. You acknowledge that Quantcast may use Personal Information it receives from you to provide services to other Quantcast clients or for Quantcast’s commercial interests that may be unrelated to providing the Services to you.
Quantcast will never sell your audience (whether identified as such or not) and you control the extent to which Quantcast displays the Measurement Results.
Quantcast grants you perpetual rights to use, copy, and distribute the Measurement Results, including with our sharable widgets, only as long as you:
Credit Us. Conspicuously include: “Source: Quantcast
www.quantcast.com
”;
Present the Measurement Results Exactly as We Provided It. Do not: (i) manipulate or modify the Measurement Results to state or suggest different results from those specifically presented by Quantcast; (ii) combine information related to different Quantcast profiles (for example, by adding together the reach from two different sites instead of presenting the cross-site unduplicated reach measurement provided by Quantcast); (iii) quantitatively aggregate or combine information in the Measurement Results with information derived from other sources (but offering a comparison with information derived from other sources is permissible);
Don’t Use Our Work to Compete with Us. Do not use the information in the Measurement Results in any way that competes with Quantcast; and
Bind Third Parties. If you provide the information in the Measurement Results directly to any third party (rather than by having them access the information through the Quantcast website), you must ensure that they agree to be bound by and comply with the terms of this Agreement including the foregoing requirements.
Tagging Rules and Privacy.
You agree not to misrepresent your digital traffic, audience, or user activity in connection with Quantcast, the Services, or any Tags. You agree not to tag any adware or spyware inventory, or any Reachpoint revealing precise geographic location (i.e., information that describes the precise location of a device derived through any technology that is capable of determining with reasonable specificity the actual physical location of an individual or device), specific health / medical /sex-life information, credit card or financial data, or criminal convictions or charges. In addition, if you are an EU established company or person or your Reachpoints are directed towards end users in the EU, you agree not to tag any Reachpoint revealing other sensitive or special category Personal Data, including racial or ethnic origin, political opinions or parties, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership. If you represent to Quantcast (e.g., during the signup process) that your Reachpoints are directed to users under the age of 16, Quantcast will not collect any Personal Data from such Reachpoints and you will not receive those of our services that require collection of data across different websites. You will not modify the Tag other than as described in a
Quantcast Learning Center Guide
. You agree to update your Tag (which may require retagging your Reachpoints) when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades. You will use the Tag in the top most frame possible. You will retain the Tag’s origin address that we provided, in full.
You agree to comply with Applicable Privacy Laws and also industry self-regulation Principles and Codes of Conduct for interest-based advertising in connection with your use of the Tag and the Services. You agree not to use the Services to track or collect personally identifiable information of end users. To the extent that the web pages or apps in which you place the Technology are accessed by end users in the EU, you agree to implement a transparency and consent solution compatible with the
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
(such as
Quantcast Choice
) or another solution mutually agreed by both parties in writing. While you are implementing such consent solution, you agree to (i) obtain consent for Quantcast to use cookies and similar technologies in compliance with Applicable Privacy Laws, (ii) provide proof of such consent if requested by Quantcast, and (iii) not permit calls from your web pages or apps to Quantcast servers if such consent has not be obtained. Wherever possible, you agree to name Quantcast as a party for or by whom cookies or similar technologies are used to access the device and Personal Data is collected through your webpages or apps.
You further agree to prominently display to end users a user friendly, easily accessible, clear and comprehensive privacy policy (and, if necessitated by Applicable Privacy Laws, a separate cookie policy) that, where required, complies with Applicable Privacy Laws and contains the following (a) a statement that your site or app permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the types of data collected for such advertising, (iii) an explanation of the purposes for which data is collected by, or transferred to, third parties, and (iv) a conspicuous link to either an opt-out mechanism, such as the NAI or DAA opt-outs for non-EU established companies or a consent revocation page for EU established companies. If you use the Services to collect data from a network of domains or subdomains, you will inform each in advance of such disclosures.
In the case of app measurement, operating system platforms provide device-level setting options that allow end users to indicate their preference with respect to third party data collection and targeted advertising (the “
Ad Preference Setting
”). Quantcast treats these device level Ad Preference Settings as consumer opt-outs and you will accurately pass the Ad Preference Setting to Quantcast. You will not send any identifier associated with a device to the extent that such device has otherwise indicated that the end user wishes to be opted out of advertisement tracking.
To the extent that GDPR applies, you and Quantcast are each separate and independent data controllers of any Personal Data which you and we may disclose or receive under this Agreement. You and Quantcast, pursuant to this Agreement, do not and will not jointly determine the purposes or the means of processing of any Personal Data disclosed or received under this Agreement.
To the extent that CCPA applies, Quantcast is a Third Party in its relationship with you regarding your use of the Services.
If you are a Business subject to CCPA, you agree to prominently post a “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” link on all of your Reachpoints, and to provide consumers with the disclosures required of Businesses by CCPA.
Restrictions.
You agree to use the Services only in accordance with the terms and conditions of this Agreement. You will not use the Service to engage in any illegal or offensive acts or serve any illegal content via any Reachpoint. You will not:
Interfere or attempt to interfere with the operation or security-related features of the Services or the Technology;
Delete, or in any manner alter, the copyright, trademark, or other proprietary rights notices appearing on any Quantcast Content;
Represent that Quantcast endorses or supports your services; make any representations and warranties concerning any aspect of the Services, the Technology, or Measurement Results to any Authorized Third Parties or other third parties; or
Attempt to index, scrape, search, or crawl the Services or the Quantcast website with any automated process; or attempt to access any information or technology relating to the Services, the Quantcast website, or our proprietary algorithms through any means not intentionally made available by Quantcast to you.
Quantcast Rights.
All right, title, and interest, including intellectual property rights, in and to the Quantcast website, the Services, the Technology, and the Quantcast Content are and will remain the exclusive property of Quantcast (“
Quantcast Property
”). Except as expressly permitted in this Agreement, you will not reproduce, modify, or prepare derivative works based upon, distribute, license, sell, transfer, publicly display, publicly perform, transmit, or use such Quantcast Property. In the event that your Quantcast account is suspended or terminated, Quantcast will continue to respect this Agreement’s limits on our use of the Measurement Data and will cease all public display of the Measurement Results.
Quantcast servers may choose to occasionally respond to any publisher’s Tag by redirecting the browser to a third-party anonymous beacon to support the provision of Quantcast services in market. The decision to beacon is not related to you, your traffic, or your user base.
Indemnity.
Quantcast agrees to defend, indemnify, and hold you harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim that the Technology or the Services infringe any U.S. or European intellectual property rights, provided that you (i) promptly inform and furnish Quantcast with a copy of each related communication and action, (ii) allow Quantcast to assume full control of the defense and settlement, and (iii) assist and cooperate with Quantcast, at Quantcast’s expense. Quantcast will have no obligation or liability hereunder where the claim results from any combination with, addition to, or modification of the Services or the Technology, from your failure to update your Tag, from your or any Authorized Affiliate breach of this Agreement, or from failure to obtain consent for your and our use of cookies or other tracking technology in accordance with Applicable Privacy Laws. If the Services or Technology become, or, in Quantcast’s opinion are likely to become, the subject of a third-party claim against you, Quantcast may, at its option and expense, procure rights for you to continue using the Services or the Technology, replace or modify the same so that it performs substantially similar functions but does not infringe, or terminate this Agreement.
The foregoing states the sole and exclusive liability of Quantcast and your sole remedy with respect to third party claims of any kind.
You agree to indemnify and hold Quantcast harmless from any judgments, damages, loss, liability, or costs (including reasonable attorneys’ fees) resulting from a third-party claim resulting from your failure to update your Tag when we notify you of any Tag fixes, updates or upgrades.
Warranty Disclaimer.
The services and related information are provided “as is,” without warranty or condition of any kind, either express or implied. Without limiting the foregoing, Quantcast explicitly disclaims any warranties of merchantability, fitness for a particular purpose, quiet enjoyment, or non-infringement. Quantcast makes no warranty that the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content will (1) meet your requirements, (2) be available on an uninterrupted, secure, or error-free basis, or (3) not cause any latency or processing delays. Quantcast is under no obligation to retain any Measurement Data or to keep the site up and running for any period of time. Quantcast makes no warranty regarding the accuracy, timeliness, truthfulness, completeness, or reliability of any information obtained through the Services, the Quantcast website, or the Quantcast content. No information, whether oral or written, will create any warranty or representation not expressly made herein. The foregoing exclusions and disclaimers are an essential part of this Agreement and formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer the Services to you. Some jurisdictions do not allow exclusion of certain warranties so this disclaimer may not apply to you in full.
Suspension and Termination.
Unless otherwise terminated as set forth herein, this Agreement will remain in full force and effect while you use the Services. You may terminate your Quantcast account and this Agreement at any time by both (i) “dequantifying” by deleting all Reachpoints from your profile on the Quantcast website (or, alternatively, by emailing
contact@quantcast.com
(if you are resident in the US) or
contact.dublin@quantcast.com
(if you are resident outside the US) with your complete account information and explicit request to terminate) and (ii) removing the Tags from all of your Reachpoints. Quantcast may terminate or suspend your access to the Services or terminate this Agreement at any time, for any reason or no reason and without any liability to you. Upon termination, all licenses and other rights granted to you under this Agreement will immediately cease. Quantcast will not be liable to you or any third party for termination of this Agreement (whether by Quantcast or by you) or any termination or suspension of your use of the Services. Upon any termination or suspension, information in connection with your account may no longer be accessed by you. Notwithstanding the above, Sections 4 through 9, Sections 11 through 13, and the second paragraph of Section 3 will survive termination.
Modification of the Service and of the Terms.
Quantcast reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to modify or discontinue the Quantcast website and Services without notice. Quantcast may also modify this Agreement from time to time. If the modified Agreement is not acceptable to you, you may terminate your account within 30 days by following the two-step procedure described in Section 9. Use of the Quantcast website, use of any Tag to contact Quantcast’s servers, or use of the Services, after 30 days, will constitute your acceptance thereof.
Limitation of Liability.
In no event will Quantcast be liable to you or any third party for any consequential loss, exemplary damages, incidental loss, special damages or loss, lost profit, loss or deletion of Measurement Data or Measurement Results, or punitive damages arising from your use of the Services, even if Quantcast has been advised of the possibility of such damages. These limitations formed a basis for enabling Quantcast to offer these Services to you. This paragraph will apply regardless of any failure of the exclusive remedy provided in the following paragraph.
Except with regard to Quantcast’s obligations under Section 7, liability stemming from death or personal injury resulting from Quantcast’s negligence, or Quantcast’s fraud, notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, Quantcast’s liability to you for any cause whatsoever and regardless of the form of the action, will at all times be limited to two hundred fifty U.S. dollars (US$250.00).
Miscellaneous.
This Agreement constitutes the entire Agreement between the parties with respect to the Services and supersedes all previous and contemporaneous agreements, proposals, and communications, written or oral between Quantcast and you with respect thereto. Any agreements regarding the delivery or use of advertising segments will govern the parties’ relationship in connection with the applicable segments but will not affect the parties’ rights, restrictions, or obligations under this Agreement, which the parties acknowledge as separate subject matter. Any waiver by either party of any violation of this Agreement will not be deemed to waive any further or future violation of the same or any other provision. If any parts or provisions of this Agreement are held to be unenforceable, then you and Quantcast agree that such parts or provisions will be given maximum permissible force and effect and the remainder of the Agreement will be fully enforceable. You and Quantcast agree that there are no third party beneficiaries of any promises, obligations or representations made by Quantcast. Either Party may assign its rights, data, and duties, under this Agreement in their entirety in connection with a sale of all (or substantially all) of its assets relating to this Agreement, a merger, or a reorganization. Nothing in this Agreement will constitute a partnership or joint venture or joint controllership between you and Quantcast.
This Agreement and any dispute relating to this Agreement will be governed by the laws of the United States and the laws of the State of California, without regard to U.S. or California choice of law rules. You and Quantcast agree and consent that jurisdiction, proper venue, and the most convenient forums for all claims, actions, and proceedings of any kind relating to Quantcast or the matters in this Agreement will be exclusively in courts located in San Francisco, California.
This Agreement is drafted in the English language. Any translation into another language is provided for convenience only. In the event of any inconsistency between the English language version and any translation, the English language version shall prevail.
Notice.
All notices or other communications to Quantcast from you will be deemed given only when received by hand delivery, electronic mail, or prepaid first class mail, at the address below or any other address provided by Quantcast to you for these purposes:
Persons in the United States, please contact:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Attn: Legal Department
Email:
contact@quantcast.com
Persons outside of the United States, please contact:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street, 1st Floor
Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn: Legal Department
Email:
contact.dublin@quantcast.com
Definitions
“Applicable Privacy Laws”
means any applicable privacy or data protection laws, statutes or regulations as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, including, where applicable, (a) the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679 (“
GDPR
”)  and any EU Member State laws implementing GDPR; (b) the California Consumer Privacy Act, Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.100
et seq.
(“
CCPA
”); and; (c) the e-Privacy Directive 2002/58/EC, as amended and as transposed into EU Member State law and any legislation replacing the e-Privacy Directive.
“Authorized Affiliate”
means a third party that you allow to use your Tag, your account, or the Measurement Results.
“
Business
” has the same meaning as in CCPA.
“Measurement Data”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Measurement Results”
has the meaning defined in Section 1.
“
Personal Data
”
has the same meaning as in GDPR.
“
Personal Information
” has the same meaning as in CCPA.
“Quantcast Content”
means the content of the Quantcast website and the Services, including the Measurement Data and Measurement Results.
“
Quantcast Property
” has the meaning given to it in Section 6.
“Reachpoint”
has the meaning given to it in Section 1.
“Services”
means Quantcast Measurement: the digital audience ratings service that allows you (or an Authorized Affiliate) to define and measure specific online events by tagging Reachpoints, as described herein and as governed by these terms and conditions.
“Tag”
means the particular javascript or other audience measurement code or software development kit provided to you by Quantcast, which allows Quantcast to set a cookie and embeddable on web pages, media files, and other Reachpoints, together with any labels and any fixes, updates, and upgrades provided to you.
“Technology”
means, separately and collectively, the Tags, and Quantcast’s proprietary technology that generates the Measurement Results.
“Third Party”
has the same meaning as in CCPA.
Contracting Party.
If you reside in the US this Agreement is between you and Quantcast Corporation. If you reside outside of the US, this Agreement is between you and Quantcast International Limited, an Irish limited liability company. References to “Quantcast”, “us”, “we” and “our” mean either Quantcast Corporation or Quantcast International Limited as appropriate.
Effective August 28th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Effective Date: May 16, 2023
This US Data Privacy Addendum (this “
Addendum
”) entered into by Customer and Quantcast (each, a “
Party
” and collectively, the “
Parties
”), governs the Processing of Personal Information that Customer transmits or otherwise makes available to Quantcast in connection with the delivery of Quantcast’s services (“
Services
”).
This Addendum is incorporated into the relevant Quantcast services agreement executed by the Parties (the “
Agreement
”). This Addendum reflects the Parties’ agreement with respect to the Processing of Personal Information pursuant to the Agreement and is applicable solely to the extent that the US State Privacy Laws apply.
In the event of any inconsistency between the terms of the Agreement and this Addendum, the terms of this Addendum shall prevail.
1.
Definitions
. Capitalized terms used in this Addendum that are not defined herein shall have the same meaning as set forth in the Agreement.
1.1. “
Consumer
” means a natural person to whom Personal Information relates.
1.2. “
Consumer Rights Request
” means a request made by a Consumer to exercise his or her rights under the US State Privacy Laws in relation to Personal Information.
1.3. “
Controller
” means the party that alone or jointly with others determines the purpose and means of the Processing of Personal Information.
1.4. “
Personal Information
” means any information relating to a Consumer that is subject to protection under the US State Privacy Laws and includes information that is referred to as “personal data” and similar terms as may be defined in the US State Privacy Laws.
1.5. “
Processor
” means the party that Processes Personal Information on behalf of the Controller.
1.6. “
Subprocessor
” means a party engaged by Quantcast in the Processing of the Customer Personal Information on Customer’s behalf.
1.7. “
US State Privacy Laws
” means privacy laws, regulations, or guidance applicable to the Processing of Personal Information in any relevant jurisdiction, including the California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act and implementing regulations (“
CCPA
”), the Colorado Privacy Act (“
CPA
”), the Connecticut Act Concerning Protection and Online Monitoring (“
CTDPA
”), the Utah Consumer Privacy Act (“
UCPA
”), the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (“
VCDPA
”), and any other similar applicable laws that are in effect or come into effect during the term of the Agreement.
1.8. The terms “
Business
,” “
Process
,”
“Sale
” (or “
Sell
”), “
Service Provider
,” “
Share
,” and “
Third Party
” have the meanings ascribed to them in the CCPA.
2.
Quantcast as a Third Party
.
2.1.
Role of Quantcast.
The Parties acknowledge and agree that with regard to the Personal Information that Customer makes available to Quantcast through the Tag pursuant to the Agreement and any Personal Information included in the Customer Data (the “
Disclosed Personal Information
”), Quantcast is a Third Party. In its role as a Third Party, Quantcast shall comply with the obligations that apply to it under the US State Privacy Laws (including with respect to the Disclosed Personal Information) and provide the Disclosed Personal Information the level of privacy protection required by such laws. In the event that Quantcast determines that it can no longer meet its obligations under the US State Privacy Laws with respect to the Disclosed Personal Information, it shall take commercially reasonable steps to notify Customer.
2.2.
Processing of the Disclosed Personal Information.
Customer makes the Disclosed Personal Information available to Quantcast for the limited and specified purpose of providing Customer with access to Quantcast’s platform and the Services and as otherwise described in the Agreement. Quantcast shall not Process the Disclosed Personal Information for any other purpose unless such Processing is explicitly permitted or required by the US State Privacy Laws or other applicable law.
2.3.
Data Security
. Quantcast shall maintain technical and organizational measures designed to protect the Disclosed Personal Information against any breach of security leading to the accidental or unlawful destruction, use, loss, alteration, unauthorized disclosure of, or access to the Disclosed Personal Information.
2.4.
Consumer Rights Requests
. In accordance with the US State Privacy Laws, Customer shall notify Quantcast in writing or through other methods agreed upon by the Parties of all Consumer Rights Requests it receives relating to the Disclosed Personal Information with which Quantcast must comply (including deletion and opt-out requests).
2.5.
Compliance Verification
. At reasonable intervals during the term of the Agreement not to exceed more than once in a given twelve (12) month period, Quantcast shall, upon written request, make available to Customer information or documentation necessary to demonstrate its compliance with its obligations under this Addendum with respect to the Disclosed Personal Information. In the event that the information or documentation provided by Quantcast reveals any unauthorized use of the Disclosed Personal Information, Customer and Quantcast shall promptly work together in good faith to agree upon reasonable and appropriate steps to stop and remediate the unauthorized use.
3.
Modifications
. The Parties agree to cooperate in good faith to amend the terms of this Addendum and/or enter into additional terms as necessary to address modifications, amendments, or updates to the US State Privacy Laws.
Effective December 16th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Key Terms
Effective: December 15 2024
Capitalized terms that are not defined in these Key Terms are as defined in the
Quantcast Products and Services Privacy Policy
. These Key Terms are for use in understanding the Quantcast Products and Services Privacy Policy. Nothing in these Key Terms modifies any active agreement with any Quantcast customer, vendor or other business partner (e.g., agreements for the Advertise and Measure product, etc.).
Advertising Exchange
See
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
.
Attributes/Attribute Information
Attributes are known, observed, or inferred characteristics. Examples of attributes are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Attributes may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
. Quantcast associates attributes with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Audience
An Audience is a group of devices and/or users who are known to or are estimated to have certain common characteristics. A characteristic in common may be an
Interest
, such as an interest in cooking. A characteristic in common may be an
Attribute
, such as being male, visited a particular digital property, or viewed or interacted with a particular advertisement. One type of Audience is a group who have visited a Quantcast Client’s digital property. Another type of Audience is a group who have been shown, or may potentially be shown, a Quantcast Client’s advertisement.
Audience Insights
Audience Insights are data collected, or data that is inferred from data collected, about an
Audience
. Audience Insights are aggregated, anonymised data and are not
Personal Information
. An example of an Audience Insight is a report that a given audience is estimated to be 70% male and 3 times as likely to be interested in cooking compared to the general population.
Quantcast provides Audience Insights based on
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferred Data
to Quantcast Clients. Audience Insights enable Quantcast Clients to better understand the audiences who engage with their content and ads.
Bid Request/Bid Request Data
A Bid Request is a request by a digital content publisher (e.g., website owner, app developer, streaming content provider, etc.) for an offer to place an ad in the publisher’s digital content. For example, when you visit an ad-supported web page, Bid Requests are sent by, or on behalf of, the publisher of the web page to multiple parties that may want to show an ad to you. Those parties can bid for the opportunity to show an ad in an auction, and an ad is selected to show on the page. Bid Requests typically go through an
Advertising Exchange
. This all happens via digital communication between computer servers in less than a second. The contents of the Bid Request may include information about the ad unit (the container in the digital content that will display the ad), the digital content, the device it will be seen on, and your engagement with the publisher’s digital content, so that prospective buyers can choose whether to bid and how much. For most cases, the contents of the Bid Request are defined by the OpenRTB industry standard (
https://iabtechlab.com/standards/openrtb/
), though not all fields are necessarily included in every Bid Request. Bid Request Data consists of data provided in the Bid Request and will commonly consist of one or more
Pseudonymous Identifier
s (if available), the content that the ad would serve in (such as the web page, app, video, etc.), the type of device the ad would be served on (e.g.., your device type), the approximate geographic location of your device, the size of the ad, the auction ID, and consent information, such as
TCF Signals
. Bid Request Data also includes Quantcast’s response to the Bid Request, such as whether a Quantcast Client bid on the ad opportunity.
Browsing Data
Browsing Data is information collected relating to your
Online
activity or behaviour. Browsing Data is generated when a
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
installed by a Quantcast Client on its digital property loads and sends information to us. This includes the website
URL
of the page you are visiting, often along with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, as well as fields of information that may be automatically included from
HTTP Header Information
, such as referral
URLs
(which is the
URL
that directed your browser to the website where an advertisement was served to you).
Browsing Data is included in
Event Data
.
Client Data
Client Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform by a particular Quantcast advertiser Client for use on its behalf. Client Data is
Pseudonymised Information,
which defines groups of users. These groups might typically be based on users’
Online Data
or
Offline Data
, or other characteristics or aspects of users’ relationship with the Quantcast Client. The groups are then used by Quantcast to help deliver advertising campaigns to the right
Audiences
and assess their effectiveness, all on behalf of the Quantcast Client.
Cookie
A Cookie is a small bit of text that is sent to and saved on your computer or device when you visit a website. A Cookie is associated with a single web browser profile; each web browser and browser profile that you use on your device will have separate Cookies. Cookies allow a website to recognise a browser and are commonly used to store user preferences or identifiers, which enables us to collect and use information about browsers over time and across different internet content. Cookies enable us to understand more about users and the content they are visiting over time, which in turn can be used to improve our Quantcast Clients’ advertising activities and the quality of advertising you experience. The identifiers we store in Cookies are
Pseudonymous Information
; in other words, they cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link a
Pseudonymous Identifier
to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
or
Pseudonymous Information
from doing the same. Browsers have controls that enable users to clear or block Cookies. See your browser help for details.
There are two forms of cookies: First Party Cookies and Third Party Cookies.
A “First Party Cookie” is limited in scope to a particular website you visit (“First Party Cookie”). In some instances, Quantcast is able to store or access information in a First Party Cookie. If
www.example.com
incorporates Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
into their website, and if you visit www.example.com, Quantcast may set a First-Party Cookie associated with www.example.com. In these instances, Quantcast can store a
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the First-Party Cookie, but because it is a First Party Cookie, Quantcast can only access that
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the context of your visits to that site.
A “Third Party Cookie” is a cookie associated with an internet domain that is different from the one you are visiting. For example, if you are visiting
www.example.com
and a Quantcast
Pixel, Tag or SDK
on that website is able to set a cookie associated with quantcast.com, that is a Third Party Cookie. That same cookie will be accessible to Quantcast on other sites that also incorporate Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
. Quantcast uses
Pseudonymous Identifiers
stored in Third Party Cookies in order to collect information across multiple websites.
Quantcast Cookies placed on your device have a maximum expiry period of 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). Each time you visit a website and a First or Third Party Cookie is placed on your device, the placement of a Cookie begins a new expiry period of up to 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). All Quantcast Cookies automatically cease providing any data to Quantcast from your browser upon expiration.
Cookie ID/Identifier
A Cookie ID is a unique string of characters that we store in a
Cookie
that allows us to identify a single web browser instance over time and across different web sites. Our Cookie IDs are
Pseudonymous Identifiers
. A
First Party Cookie
ID is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
First-Party Cookie
set by the owner of the website you are visiting. A
Third Party Cookie ID
is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
Third-Party Cookie
set by Quantcast.
Cookie Syncing/Matching
In the online advertising industry, Cookie Syncing/Matching generally refers to a process through which two entities who each, and separately, identify a device using their own
Pseudonymous Identifier
can determine which of their respective
Pseudonymous Identifiers
may relate to the same device. For example, Quantcast may pseudonymously identify a device as “cookie ID 123.” Company B may pseudonymously identify the same device as “cookie ID ABC.” Cookie Syncing/Matching enables Quantcast and Company B to recognise that their respective
Pseudonymous identifiers
may relate to the device that Quantcast records as “cookie ID 123”.
Quantcast’s Cookie Syncing activities work similarly. If you visit a website that incorporates
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
from Quantcast, Company B may match its own pseudonymous identifiers to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(this creates a record of matching pseudonymous identifiers for Company B). Once a match is established, Company B can reference a particular device when communicating with Quantcast, using Quantcast’s
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
The Cookie Syncing/Matching process does not in itself result in Quantcast sharing
Attributes
related to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with Company B. The Cookie Syncing/Matching enables transactions between the parties at a later time; for example, in the case of an Advertising Exchange sending a Bid Request, the Bid Request can contain a previously synched
Pseudonymous Identifier.
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
In the online advertising industry, Cross-Media Matching generally refers to a process through which Quantcast links identifiers across a user’s consumption of various media (e.g. audio, video, websites, apps, etc) because such identifiers are known to or
Inferred
to relate to the same user. Matching/Linking may be undertaken for consumption of media on a single device and for consumption of media on more than one device. As an example, if you visit a digital property using your mobile phone and later visit that same digital property using a browser on your laptop or make visits to several different digital properties using a browser over a period of time, Quantcast may initially determine that these visits are made by different users and assign each device user their own profile.
If, however, Quantcast finds there is sufficient commonality between the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with the consumption of media, Quantcast will assess that those identifiers may be joined as they are likely to emanate from the same user. This assessment is“probabilistic”– in other words, it uses statistical techniques to determine that the identifiers to be matched have a higher likelihood of relating to the same device and/or user.
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers provide
Third Party Data
to Quantcast, or provide a platform through which Quantcast Clients can provide
Client Data
to Quantcast. These companies either directly licence first and third party
Audience
Segment Data
from different sources (such as
Online Data
and
Offline Data
) to businesses or provide a platform through which Quantcast Clients can collect, organise, and activate such data for Quantcast’s use in connection with the Solutions. We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers
in order to sync/match identifiers to effectively integrate with their services (see
Cookie Syncing/Matching
).
Device ID/Identifier
A unique string of characters that can be used to identify a device set by the developer of the device’s operating system (e.g., a mobile phone, tablet, TV, or console). Device Identifiers (or “Device IDs”) serve a similar purpose as
Cookies
and can be used to provide personalised advertising. A Device ID is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
A Mobile Advertising ID (or “MAID”) is a Device ID assigned to a mobile device or connected TV (“CTV”) device by the device operating system. Typically, the device user can reset or turn off the ID via the device’s settings. A MAID is referred to as the IDFA (ID for Advertisers) on iOS devices and GAID (Google Ad ID) on Android mobile devices.
Device Configuration/Device Information
Information about a device or its configuration, transmitted from the device, and typically associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
. The information includes device type and version, screen size and resolution, browser language, device operating system and version, browser type and version, application and version, or other information about the device. Some Device Information is derived from
HTTP Request Header Information
.
Email Address
See Hashed Email Address
Event Data
Information collected relating to your
Online
activity/behaviour, which may include
Personal Information
in
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
,
Browsing Data
and
TCF Signals
. Event Data is generated when a
Pixel, Tag, or SDK
installed on a Quantcast Client’s digital property loads and sends information to us. Event Data can also be collected from ads, when you view or click on an ad which contains a
Tag
.
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
A marketplace platform that facilitates automated, real-time, auction-based buying and selling of ad inventory (which are spaces available on sites and apps to display ads). An Advertising Exchange receives
Bid Requests
from digital publishers and forwards them to advertisers, or to entities like Quantcast who act on behalf of advertisers. Advertisers, or their agents, respond to
Bid Requests
with a bid amount and an advertisement to provide to a user if they win the auction.
First Party Cookie
See
Cookie
.
Hashed Email Address
A hashed email address (HEM) is an email address that has been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function. A hashed email is treated as a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
HTTP Request Header Information
HTTP headers are defined by internet standards and contain a number of data fields designed to facilitate communication and interoperability on the internet. On the web, your web browser controls which headers are sent and what the contents are. We receive the headers when a request is sent over the internet to our system, such as when a
Pixel
loads in your web browser. We also might receive information that has been derived from the HTTP headers from another party, such as in a
Bid Request
. We use a subset of the header fields for purposes described in the Privacy Policy, which includes:
IP Address
Cookie
(if available)
User Agent, which is a string (a line of text) that includes
Device Information
.
Date, which includes the precise time of access
Referral
URL
, which is the web page you were on when the request was sent
TLS Session ID, which identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server
Content-Language, which is the languages of the intended audience for the enclosed content
Detailed documentation related to HTTP header information can be found online in a general search for “HTTP header information fields”.
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework (“TCF”)
The IAB Transparency & Consent Framework, or “TCF,” is a standardised industry program active in countries governed by the GDPR, and designed for notifying users about data
Processing
by companies involved in digital advertising on sites and apps that users visit, and for establishing a legal basis for that
Processing
.
The TCF is designed to be used on digital properties, such as websites and apps. The TCF incorporates a consent dialog that displays when users visit a website or app, giving them information about vendors, the data they collect, and the purposes for which they collect it. It also offers an opportunity for users to give or change their permissions for such data collection and use.
The TCF allows Quantcast to work with publishers of websites and other digital properties in a consistent manner using standardised technical specifications to:
(a) provide a link to Quantcast's Privacy Policy, as well as transparency about Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
, the specific purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
, and Quantcast's legal basis for such
Processing
, directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user;
(b) allow the user, in a granular manner, to express their consent or refusal to consent, to Quantcast's (i) use of
Cookies
, and (ii) the purposes of Quantcast's
Processing
, which are the reasons why Quantcast
Processes
the personal data of users (“
TCF Purposes”
), including where Quantcast relies on the user’s consent for such
Processing
directly on the website or other digital property that the user is accessing;
(c) allow the user to object to Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
(for purposes where Quantcast relies on legitimate interests) directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user.
Using the
TCF
allows publishers of websites or other digital properties to provide information about Quantcast’s
Processing
to users in a consistent manner. The user-facing disclosures presented by these digital properties are sourced from information that Quantcast has registered with the
TCF's
“
Global Vendor List
”, a publicly accessible, machine-readable repository of information about TCF-compliant vendors, like Quantcast. This information includes Quantcast’s Privacy Policy
URL
, the purposes for which it
Processes
Personal Information
, and its legal basis for each of these purposes. As the description of these purposes and minimum standards for disclosures are standardised across all TCF participants, Quantcast knows how operators of websites or other digital properties using the TCF are making disclosures about Quantcast and can have confidence in such disclosures.
In addition, the TCF enables publishers of websites or other digital properties to create and send to Quantcast a standardised technical signal that indicates (A) whether Quantcast’s transparency disclosures were provided to a user; (B) whether or not the user has consented to Quantcast’s
Processing
and/or each purpose for which Quantcast sought the user's consent; and (c) whether the user objected to Quantcast’s
Processing
and/or any purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
on the basis of its legitimate interests (the “TCF Signal”).
TCF Signal is collected via Quantcast
Tags
if the digital property on which the
Tag
is implemented has also implemented a TCF-compatible Consent Management Platform, which is a company or organisation that centralises and manages transparency for, and consent and objections of, the user (“CMP”) . In addition, TCF Signal is received by Quantcast as part of the
Bid Requests
it receives from
Advertising Exchanges
. Quantcast is able to read the standardised TCF Signal and will only
Process
Personal Information
for purposes to which the user has consented (where consent is the legal basis) or not objected (where legitimate interests is the legal basis) in order to provide the Solutions.
Read more about the TCF here
https://iabeurope.eu/transparency-consent-framework/
Imported Data
Imported Data is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”). Imported Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include information relating to your
Online data
or
Offline data
or other information that Quantcast Clients or partners have about you. For examples of Imported Data provided to Quantcast, see
Client Data
or
Third Party Data
.
Imported Data (Client)
See
Client Data
.
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
See
Third Party Data
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Typically, in digital advertising we distinguish between precise and imprecise geolocation information.
Precise geolocation usually comes from GPS coordinates from mobile devices, and can have precision up to about one meter. Quantcast does not use precise geolocation data and we request that Quantcast Clients, partners, and third parties refrain from sending precise geolocation to us. If a party inadvertently sends it, we do not use it in the Solutions and it is removed from our systems within 30 days.
Imprecise geolocation is lower precision, and refers to a general geographic area, for example a country, region, city or division of a metropolitan area, and/or some combination of these, and is often derived from
IP Addresses
.
Inferences/Inferred Data
Inferences, or Inferred Data, is information that is inferred from data that we have collected about a device, such as
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
, or
Third Party Data
. Our inferences are made using algorithms that estimate the likelihood that the user of a device has particular interests or characteristics. The Inferences are then associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
as part of a set of device
Attributes
.
For example, if a device frequently visits sports websites, it might be inferred that there is some probability the user of that device likes sports. Similarly, if a device frequently visits an airline provider’s website, it might be inferred that there is some probability a user of that device likes to travel. Other Inferences include things such as
Interests
, income range, gender, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information.
Inferences associated with any individual device have a high degree of uncertainty. Inferences become more accurate when used to estimate the characteristics of a large group of devices, like an
Audience
.
Interests
Interests are known, observed, or inferred non-demographic characteristics. Interests are associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to characterise particular interests of users. Examples of Interests include “cooking” and “outdoor activities”. Interests may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
.
IP Address
An IP (“Internet Protocol”) Address is a unique numerical label corresponding to a computer or device. Computers use IP Addresses to identify each other and know where to send information over the Internet. For example, when you open a web page in your browser a request is made to a server for the web page content. The server knows where to send the content based on the IP Address contained in the request. Computers or other devices are assigned an IP Address from the network the device is on. A device’s IP Address may change over time or as a device changes locations. Also, an IP Address can refer to multiple devices, for example if the devices are behind an internet router.
Labels/Label Data
Labels, or Label Data, are descriptors associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to denote particular groups of users that can be subsequently used to index all
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with that label. An analogy would be applying a “label” to messages in an email inbox - you might decide to label messages from work as “Work,” family members as “Family,” and so on. These labels then help you readily index and recall particular categories of email.
Labels processed by Quantcast are:
Labels from
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
: these are category Labels (e.g., male, female, age 21-24) acquired from third party data partners relating to a
Pseudonymous Identifier
;
Custom-
Client Data
Labels: these are custom category labels set by Quantcast Clients corresponding to a device associated with the identifier visiting their digital property (e.g., byline of the news article accessed by the user) or product name (of the product accessed by the user).
Inferred Data
Labels: these are inferred category Labels about a user using a device associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, e.g., inferred age, inferred gender, inferred interest.
Example Labels are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Labels may be inferred information (see
Inferences/Inferred Data
) or may be
Imported Data
(see
Client Data
and
Third Party Data
).
Log Data
Log Data is an industry term that is generally used to refer to data collected from interactions with computer systems, and is used differently by different companies. For purposes of describing our
Processing
, we use more precise terms, such as
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and/or
Inferences/Inferred Data
, which are all types of data that can be subsumed within the general industry term “Log Data.” Some elements within Log Data, when isolated from the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
, will not qualify as
Personal Information
. For example, a single time zone and publisher
URL
without an associated
Pseudonymous Identifier
would not qualify as
Personal Information
.
Online Data
Data relating to a user’s interaction with digital media including websites, apps and streaming media services.
Offline Data
Data relating to a user’s real-world purchases and/or activity.
Panel
A Panel is a set of individuals who have consented to participate in market research and share information about themselves, their preferences and interests for purposes of research and market analytics.
This information can then be used as the basis for learning or making inferences about a larger population. For example, if a number of people on a Panel share that they visit a particular news website, and of those people, most of them are male and over the age of 50, we might extrapolate from that and say that most of the audience for that website is male and over 50.
Another way to use Panel data is to compare Panel results to the estimates that we have made using our algorithms in order to score the effectiveness of our algorithms. So, if our algorithm predicted for the same news website that most of the audience is under 30, we would learn that our algorithm might be wrong.
Personal Information
Personal Information refers to information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to you, your browser, or your device. We use the term “personal information” to refer to information that is subject to protection under data protection and privacy laws and regulatory regimes around the world. Depending on the jurisdiction, such information may be referred to as “personal data.”
The Personal Information
Processed
by Quantcast is limited to
Pseudonymised Identifiers.
Quantcast does not
Process
Personal Information
that directly identifies you as an individual, and that can be used to directly identify you without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs are computer code embedded in a website, mobile applications, and advertisements that we use to enable the Solutions. We tend to use the terms Pixels, Tags, and SDKs interchangeably. Quantcast Clients that use the Solutions can put them on their sites, in their apps, or in their ads in order to send us information that is then used in the Solutions. When a Pixel, Tag, or SDK loads and calls our servers, we receive
HTTP Header Information
, along with other information that is configured by the Quantcast Client who is using the Solutions. That information includes IDs from partners, so we know which partner the data is coming from.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs include:
Sync Pixels: These are used to exchange and match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
between companies that participate in the digital advertising market. By matching, they can synchronise these identifiers to deliver and measure ads.
Tags or Pixels in ads: When a digital ad loads on a page, it can include a Tag or Pixel that we use on behalf of Quantcast Clients to gather information about where and when the ad was served. This can help to measure ad performance, to ensure ads are shown where intended, and to learn in order to improve ad effectiveness.
Tags or Pixels on publisher Clients’ web pages: For publisher Clients that use the Solutions, they can put our Tags on their sites. The information we collect then enables the Client to learn about their audience, and it enables us to build models for better targeting ads.
Tags or Pixels used by advertiser Clients: When advertiser Clients use our Tags or Pixels, they send us information so we can learn about their customers in order to help them better target their ads.
SDKs: SDKs are bits of computer code that mobile app publisher Clients incorporate into their apps, enabling them to send us information. Similar to Pixels or Tags, the information enables us to offer the Solutions as described in our Privacy Policy.
Probabilistic Identifier
A Probabilistic Identifier is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
which we create by combining
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(such as
IP Addresses
) with
Bid Request Data
and/or
Event Data
using non-deterministic, statistical methods to estimate the likelihood that a group of devices may be used by the same user or household, if applicable law or rules allow. For example, we might be able to determine that because a mobile phone and a TV are on the same network, they are likely in the same house. We can then use that information to select and measure ads. Unlike using
Cookie IDs
, this approach is not 100% accurate and could identify one or many devices.
Process
Refers to any operation or set of operations performed upon
Personal Information
or sets of
Personal Information
, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure, or destruction.
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Pseudonymous Identifiers are unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s). Pseudonymous Identifiers cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link Pseudonymous Identifiers to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share Pseudonymous Identifiers from doing the same.
Pseudonymous Identifiers are important in digital advertising because they help distinguish browsers or devices over time across different contexts. This is useful for example, to limit the number of times that we show the same ad to one device, to measure the performance of ads, and to target and select personalised ads.
We may incorporate any one of the following types of information in a Quantcast Pseudonymous Identifier:
Third Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
First Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
IP Addresses
.
Hashed email addresses
Third party identifiers
Device ID
.
Application ID: an ID that is unique to your mobile device and a particular app on your device.
Application Session ID: like an application ID, except that it is reset periodically (e.g., many browsers reset these after 30 minutes of inactivity).
Exchange User ID: an ID that is sent to us with a
Bid Request
that identifies the device or browser where an ad is to be shown.
Probabilistic Identifier
.
Publisher User ID: digital publishers that use the Solutions can send us an ID to use in the Solutions. The digital publisher hashes or encrypts an identifier available to it. The resulting ID is pseudonymous because it does not directly identify you, but it would be consistent across different publishers, so the Publisher User ID can be used to match data.
TLS Session ID: when you visit a website
URL
that starts with “https” instead of “http”, that means you have an encrypted connection between your browser and the site. If one of our
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
loads on the site, that call to our server will also be encrypted. The Session ID identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server.
Pseudonymous/Pseudonymised Information
Pseudonymised Information is
Personal Information
that has been
Processed
in such a manner that the information can no longer be attributed to a specific user without the use of additional information, provided that such additional information is kept separately and is subject to technical and organisational measures to ensure that the personal information is not attributed to a specific user.
Segment Data
Segment Data is imported data that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by
Clients
or
Third Party Data Partners
. Segment Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
and/or
Offline Data
as well as
Attributes
,
Inferences
, or
Interests
inferred from that data. This category of information is typically called “Segment Data” because it identifies groups of users who fall into advertising segments (e.g., “auto buyers,” “shoe shoppers,” or “women 25-35”). These segments represent groups of users that share (or that are inferred to share) one or more certain characteristics in common (e.g., a client may want to advertise to a segment of “male shoppers who are interested in sports fashion”). These groupings are created by using the intersection of different segments (in the example given, an audience that is simultaneously in the “male”, “shopper”, and “sports fashion” segments). A segment may be identified with a
Label
(in which case it is referred to as “
Label Data
”).
Software Development Kit (SDK)
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
Tag
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
TCF
See
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
TCF Purpose/Special Purpose/Feature/Special Feature
The
TCF
has standardised certain Purposes, Special Purposes, Features and Special Features and the descriptions of data processing activity in the digital advertising industry. Through this standardisation, the digital advertising industry can ascribe consistent meanings for the permissions that data subjects give via the
TCF
. This also ensures a consistent experience for users because they then do not have to read and understand an entirely different set of Purposes, Special Purposes, Features, and Special Features for each website they visit.
Because of the benefits of standardising the purposes across the industry, we use the
TCF
to establish the legal basis to
Process
Personal Information
governed by the GDPR, and use the Purposes, Special Purposes, Features, and Special Features in our Privacy Policy to describe much of our data processing activity.
For detailed descriptions of TCF Purposes, Special Purposes, Features, and Special Features, see
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
Third Party Cookie/Cookie ID
See
Cookie
.
Third Party Data
Third Party Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via API by third party
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
. Third Party Data may include
Segment Data
.
Training Data
Training Data is
Pseudonymous Information
that we receive from Quantcast Clients and third party data providers, where the actual
Attributes
or
Interests
of the underlying users are known (even though their actual identities are not known to Quantcast). The Training Data is segmented across various
Interests
and
Attributes
, such as shopping interests (e.g., automotive, technology, or restaurants), business and occupation (e.g., management, IT professional or retail), media interests (e.g., cinema, video games, TV), income range, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information and used for data modeling purposes. We use the Training Data to train statistical models to make
Inferences
. When our systems subsequently receive
Event Data
relating to a user, we can infer whether the
Event Data
displays characteristics similar to the Training Data. If the
Event Data
displays characteristics that are similar to the Training Data, we can infer from that the likely
Attributes
and
Interests
of the user to whom the
Event Data
relates. These
Inferences
are then used to deliver advertising and provide aggregated, analytical reporting to our Quantcast Clients.
URL (Uniform Resource Locator)
A URL, also known as a web address, is a reference to a unique web resource that specifies its location on a computer network. Most commonly, a URL points to a web page. URLs can also point to a document, image, video, etc. URLs often use plain text, such as
www.quantcast.com
; in that case, the domain name must be processed by a Domain Name Server in order to convert the domain name into an
IP Address
.
Effective June 11th 2024
to
December 16th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Key Terms
Effective: June 6 2024
Capitalized terms that are not defined in these Key Terms are as defined in the
Quantcast Products and Services Privacy Policy
. These Key Terms are for use in understanding the Quantcast Products and Services Privacy Policy. Nothing in these Key Terms modifies any active agreement with any Quantcast customer, vendor or other business partner (e.g., agreements for the Advertise and Measure product, etc.).
Advertising Exchange
See
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
.
Attributes/Attribute Information
Attributes are known, observed, or inferred characteristics. Examples of attributes are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Attributes may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
. Quantcast associates attributes with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Audience
An Audience is a group of devices and/or users who are known to or are estimated to have certain common characteristics. A characteristic in common may be an
Interest
, such as an interest in cooking. A characteristic in common may be an
Attribute
, such as being male, visited a particular digital property, or viewed or interacted with a particular advertisement. One type of Audience is a group who have visited a Quantcast Client’s digital property. Another type of Audience is a group who have been shown, or may potentially be shown, a Quantcast Client’s advertisement.
Audience Insights
Audience Insights are data collected, or data that is inferred from data collected, about an
Audience
. Audience Insights are aggregated, anonymised data and are not
Personal Information
. An example of an Audience Insight is a report that a given audience is estimated to be 70% male and 3 times as likely to be interested in cooking compared to the general population.
Quantcast provides Audience Insights based on
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferred Data
to Quantcast Clients. Audience Insights enable Quantcast Clients to better understand the audiences who engage with their content and ads.
Bid Request/Bid Request Data
A Bid Request is a request by a digital content publisher (e.g., website owner, app developer, streaming content provider, etc.) for an offer to place an ad in the publisher’s digital content. For example, when you visit an ad-supported web page, Bid Requests are sent by, or on behalf of, the publisher of the web page to multiple parties that may want to show an ad to you. Those parties can bid for the opportunity to show an ad in an auction, and an ad is selected to show on the page. Bid Requests typically go through an
Advertising Exchange
. This all happens via digital communication between computer servers in less than a second. The contents of the Bid Request may include information about the ad unit (the container in the digital content that will display the ad), the digital content, the device it will be seen on, and your engagement with the publisher’s digital content, so that prospective buyers can choose whether to bid and how much. For most cases, the contents of the Bid Request are defined by the OpenRTB industry standard (
https://iabtechlab.com/standards/openrtb/
), though not all fields are necessarily included in every Bid Request. Bid Request Data consists of data provided in the Bid Request and will commonly consist of one or more
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(if available), the content that the ad would serve in (such as the web page, app, video, etc.), the type of device the ad would be served on (i.e., your device type), the approximate geographic location of your device, the size of the ad, the auction ID, and consent information, such as
TCF Signals
. Bid Request Data also includes Quantcast’s response to the Bid Request, such as whether a Quantcast Client bid on the ad opportunity.
Browsing Data
Browsing Data is information collected relating to your
Online
activity or behaviour. Browsing Data is generated when a
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
installed by a Quantcast Client on its digital property loads and sends information to us. This includes the website
URL
of the page you are visiting, often along with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, as well as fields of information that may be automatically included from
HTTP Header Information
, such as referral
URLs
(which is the
URL
that directed your browser to the website where an advertisement was served to you).
Browsing Data is included in
Event Data
.
Client Data
Client Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform by a particular Quantcast advertiser Client for use on its behalf. Client Data is
Pseudonymised Information,
which defines groups of users. These groups might typically be based on users’
Online Data
or
Offline Data
, or other characteristics or aspects of users’ relationship with the Quantcast Client. The groups are then used by Quantcast to help deliver advertising campaigns to the right
Audiences
and assess their effectiveness, all on behalf of the Quantcast Client.
Cookie
A Cookie is a small bit of text that is sent to and saved on your computer or device when you visit a website. A Cookie is associated with a single web browser profile; each web browser and browser profile that you use on your device will have separate Cookies. Cookies allow a website to recognise a browser and are commonly used to store user preferences or identifiers, which enables us to collect and use information about browsers over time and across different internet content. Cookies enable us to understand more about users and the content they are visiting over time, which in turn can be used to improve our Quantcast Clients’ advertising activities and the quality of advertising you experience. The identifiers we store in Cookies are
Pseudonymous Information
; in other words, they cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link a
Pseudonymous Identifier
to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
or
Pseudonymous Information
from doing the same. Browsers have controls that enable users to clear or block Cookies. See your browser help for details.
There are two forms of cookies: First Party Cookies and Third Party Cookies.
A “First Party Cookie” is limited in scope to a particular website you visit (“First Party Cookie”). In some instances, Quantcast is able to store or access information in a First Party Cookie. If
www.example.com
incorporates Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
into their website, and if you visit www.example.com, Quantcast may set a First-Party Cookie associated with www.example.com. In these instances, Quantcast can store a
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the First-Party Cookie, but because it is a First Party Cookie, Quantcast can only access that
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the context of your visits to that site.
A “Third Party Cookie” is a cookie associated with an internet domain that is different from the one you are visiting. For example, if you are visiting
www.example.com
and a Quantcast
Pixel, Tag or SDK
on that website is able to set a cookie associated with quantcast.com, that is a Third Party Cookie. That same cookie will be accessible to Quantcast on other sites that also incorporate Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
. Quantcast uses
Pseudonymous Identifiers
stored in Third Party Cookies in order to collect information across multiple websites.
Quantcast Cookies placed on your device have a maximum expiry period of 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). Each time you visit a website and a First or Third Party Cookie is placed on your device, the placement of a Cookie begins a new expiry period of up to 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). All Quantcast Cookies automatically cease providing any data to Quantcast from your browser upon expiration.
Cookie ID/Identifier
A Cookie ID is a unique string of characters that we store in a
Cookie
that allows us to identify a single web browser instance over time and across different web sites. Our Cookie IDs are
Pseudonymous Identifiers
. A
First Party Cookie
ID is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
First-Party Cookie
set by the owner of the website you are visiting. A
Third Party Cookie ID
is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
Third-Party Cookie
set by Quantcast.
Cookie Syncing/Matching
In the online advertising industry, Cookie Syncing/Matching generally refers to a process through which two entities who each, and separately, identify a device using their own
Pseudonymous Identifier
can determine which of their respective
Pseudonymous Identifiers
may relate to the same device. For example, Quantcast may pseudonymously identify a device as “cookie ID 123.” Company B may pseudonymously identify the same device as “cookie ID ABC.” Cookie Syncing/Matching enables Quantcast and Company B to recognise that their respective
Pseudonymous identifiers
may relate to the device that Quantcast records as “cookie ID 123”.
Quantcast’s Cookie Syncing activities work similarly. If you visit a website that incorporates
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
from Quantcast, Company B may match its own pseudonymous identifiers to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(this creates a record of matching pseudonymous identifiers for Company B). Once a match is established, Company B can reference a particular device when communicating with Quantcast, using Quantcast’s
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
The Cookie Syncing/Matching process does not in itself result in Quantcast sharing
Attributes
related to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with Company B. The Cookie Syncing/Matching enables transactions between the parties at a later time; for example, in the case of an Advertising Exchange sending a Bid Request, the Bid Request can contain a previously synched
Pseudonymous Identifier.
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
In the online advertising industry, Cross-Media Matching generally refers to a process through which Quantcast links identifiers across a user’s consumption of various media (e.g. audio, video, websites, apps, etc) because such identifiers are known to or
Inferred
to relate to the same user. Matching/Linking may be undertaken for consumption of media on a single device and for consumption of media on more than one device. As an example, if you visit a digital property using your mobile phone and later visit that same digital property using a browser on your laptop or make visits to several different digital properties using a browser over a period of time, Quantcast may initially determine that these visits are made by different users and assign each device user their own profile.
If, however, Quantcast finds there is sufficient commonality between the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with the consumption of media, Quantcast will assess that those identifiers may be joined as they are likely to emanate from the same user. This assessment is“probabilistic”– in other words, it uses statistical techniques to determine that the identifiers to be matched have a higher likelihood of relating to the same device and/or user.
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers provide
Third Party Data
to Quantcast, or provide a platform through which Quantcast Clients can provide
Client Data
to Quantcast. These companies either directly licence first and third party
Audience
Segment Data
from different sources (such as
Online Data
and
Offline Data
) to businesses or provide a platform through which Quantcast Clients can collect, organise, and activate such data for Quantcast’s use in connection with the Solutions. We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers
in order to sync/match identifiers to effectively integrate with their services (see
Cookie Syncing/Matching
).
Device ID/Identifier
A unique string of characters that can be used to identify a device set by the developer of the device’s operating system (e.g., a mobile phone, tablet, TV, or console). Device Identifiers (or “Device IDs”) serve a similar purpose as
Cookies
and can be used to provide personalised advertising. A Device ID is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
A Mobile Advertising ID (or “MAID”) is a Device ID assigned to a mobile device or connected TV (“CTV”) device by the device operating system. Typically, the device user can reset or turn off the ID via the device’s settings. A MAID is referred to as the IDFA (ID for Advertisers) on iOS devices and GAID (Google Ad ID) on Android mobile devices.
Device Configuration/Device Information
Information about a device or its configuration, transmitted from the device, and typically associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
. The information includes browser, app, or other information about the device (such as device type, screen size and resolution, date and time, and language), which also may include a
User Agent.
Some Device Information is derived from
HTTP Request Header Information
.
Email Address
See Hashed Email Address
Event Data
Information collected relating to your
Online
activity/behaviour, which may include
Personal Information
in
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
,
Browsing Data
and
TCF Signals
. Event Data is generated when a
Pixel, Tag, or SDK
installed on a Quantcast Client’s digital property loads and sends information to us. Event Data can also be collected from ads, when you view or click on an ad which contains a
Tag
.
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
A marketplace platform that facilitates automated, real-time, auction-based buying and selling of ad inventory (which are spaces available on sites and apps to display ads). An Advertising Exchange receives
Bid Requests
from digital publishers and forwards them to advertisers, or to entities like Quantcast who act on behalf of advertisers. Advertisers, or their agents, respond to
Bid Requests
with a bid amount and an advertisement to provide to a user if they win the auction.
First Party Cookie
See
Cookie
.
Hashed Email Address
A hashed email address (HEM) is an email address that has been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function. A hashed email is treated as a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
HTTP Request Header Information
HTTP headers are defined by internet standards and contain a number of data fields designed to facilitate communication and interoperability on the internet. On the web, your web browser controls which headers are sent and what the contents are. We receive the headers when a request is sent over the internet to our system, such as when a
Pixel
loads in your web browser. We also might receive information that has been derived from the HTTP headers from another party, such as in a
Bid Request
. We use a subset of the header fields for purposes described in the Privacy Policy, which includes:
IP Address
Cookie
(if available)
User Agent, which is a string (a line of text) identifying the device type, browser type, and version that the user is using to access the web server (“User Agent”)
Date, which includes the precise time of access
Referral
URL
, which is the web page you were on when the request was sent
TLS Session ID, which identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server
Content-Language, which is the languages of the intended audience for the enclosed content
Detailed documentation related to HTTP header information can be found online in a general search for “HTTP header information fields”.
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework (“TCF”)
The IAB Transparency & Consent Framework, or “TCF,” is a standardised industry program active in countries governed by the GDPR, and designed for notifying users about data
Processing
by companies involved in digital advertising on sites and apps that users visit, and for establishing a legal basis for that
Processing
.
The TCF is designed to be used on digital properties, such as websites and apps. The TCF incorporates a consent dialog that displays when users visit a website or app, giving them information about vendors, the data they collect, and the purposes for which they collect it. It also offers an opportunity for users to give or change their permissions for such data collection and use.
The TCF allows Quantcast to work with publishers of websites and other digital properties in a consistent manner using standardised technical specifications to:
(a) provide a link to Quantcast's Privacy Policy, as well as transparency about Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
, the specific purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
, and Quantcast's legal basis for such
Processing
, directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user;
(b) allow the user, in a granular manner, to express their consent or refusal to consent, to Quantcast's (i) use of
Cookies
, and (ii) the purposes of Quantcast's
Processing
, which are the reasons why Quantcast
Processes
the personal data of users (“
TCF Purposes”
), including where Quantcast relies on the user’s consent for such
Processing
directly on the website or other digital property that the user is accessing;
(c) allow the user to object to Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
(for purposes where Quantcast relies on legitimate interests) directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user.
Using the
TCF
allows publishers of websites or other digital properties to provide information about Quantcast’s
Processing
to users in a consistent manner. The user-facing disclosures presented by these digital properties are sourced from information that Quantcast has registered with the
TCF's
“
Global Vendor List
”, a publicly accessible, machine-readable repository of information about TCF-compliant vendors, like Quantcast. This information includes Quantcast’s Privacy Policy
URL
, the purposes for which it
Processes
Personal Information
, and its legal basis for each of these purposes. As the description of these purposes and minimum standards for disclosures are standardised across all TCF participants, Quantcast knows how operators of websites or other digital properties using the TCF are making disclosures about Quantcast and can have confidence in such disclosures.
In addition, the TCF enables publishers of websites or other digital properties to create and send to Quantcast a standardised technical signal that indicates (A) whether Quantcast’s transparency disclosures were provided to a user; (B) whether or not the user has consented to Quantcast’s
Processing
and/or each purpose for which Quantcast sought the user's consent; and (c) whether the user objected to Quantcast’s
Processing
and/or any purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
on the basis of its legitimate interests (the “TCF Signal”).
TCF Signal is collected via Quantcast
Tags
if the digital property on which the
Tag
is implemented has also implemented a TCF-compatible Consent Management Platform, which is a company or organisation that centralises and manages transparency for, and consent and objections of, the user (“CMP”) . In addition, TCF Signal is received by Quantcast as part of the
Bid Requests
it receives from
Advertising Exchanges
. Quantcast is able to read the standardised TCF Signal and will only
Process
Personal Information
for purposes to which the user has consented (where consent is the legal basis) or not objected (where legitimate interests is the legal basis) in order to provide the Solutions.
Read more about the TCF here
https://iabeurope.eu/transparency-consent-framework/
Imported Data
Imported Data is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”). Imported Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include information relating to your
Online data
or
Offline data
or other information that Quantcast Clients or partners have about you. For examples of Imported Data provided to Quantcast, see
Client Data
or
Third Party Data
.
Imported Data (Client)
See
Client Data
.
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
See
Third Party Data
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Typically, in digital advertising we distinguish between precise and imprecise geolocation information.
Precise geolocation usually comes from GPS coordinates from mobile devices, and can have precision up to about one meter. Quantcast does not use precise geolocation data and we request that Quantcast Clients, partners, and third parties refrain from sending precise geolocation to us. If a party inadvertently sends it, we do not use it in the Solutions and it is removed from our systems within 30 days.
Imprecise geolocation is lower precision, and refers to a general geographic area, for example a country, region, city or division of a metropolitan area, and/or some combination of these, and is often derived from
IP Addresses
.
Inferences/Inferred Data
Inferences, or Inferred Data, is information that is inferred from data that we have collected about a device, such as
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
, or
Third Party Data
. Our inferences are made using algorithms that estimate the likelihood that the user of a device has particular interests or characteristics. The Inferences are then associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
as part of a set of device
Attributes
.
For example, if a device frequently visits sports websites, it might be inferred that there is some probability the user of that device likes sports. Similarly, if a device frequently visits an airline provider’s website, it might be inferred that there is some probability a user of that device likes to travel. Other Inferences include things such as
Interests
, income range, gender, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information.
Inferences associated with any individual device have a high degree of uncertainty. Inferences become more accurate when used to estimate the characteristics of a large group of devices, like an
Audience
.
Interests
Interests are known, observed, or inferred non-demographic characteristics. Interests are associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to characterise particular interests of users. Examples of Interests include “cooking” and “outdoor activities”. Interests may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
.
IP Address
An IP (“Internet Protocol”) Address is a unique numerical label corresponding to a computer or device. Computers use IP Addresses to identify each other and know where to send information over the Internet. For example, when you open a web page in your browser a request is made to a server for the web page content. The server knows where to send the content based on the IP Address contained in the request. Computers or other devices are assigned an IP Address from the network the device is on. A device’s IP Address may change over time or as a device changes locations. Also, an IP Address can refer to multiple devices, for example if the devices are behind an internet router.
Labels/Label Data
Labels, or Label Data, are descriptors associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to denote particular groups of users that can be subsequently used to index all
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with that label. An analogy would be applying a “label” to messages in an email inbox - you might decide to label messages from work as “Work,” family members as “Family,” and so on. These labels then help you readily index and recall particular categories of email.
Labels processed by Quantcast are:
Labels from
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
: these are category Labels (e.g., male, female, age 21-24) acquired from third party data partners relating to a
Pseudonymous Identifier
;
Custom-
Client Data
Labels: these are custom category labels set by Quantcast Clients corresponding to a device associated with the identifier visiting their digital property (e.g., byline of the news article accessed by the user) or product name (of the product accessed by the user).
Inferred Data
Labels: these are inferred category Labels about a user using a device associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, e.g., inferred age, inferred gender, inferred interest.
Example Labels are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Labels may be inferred information (see
Inferences/Inferred Data
) or may be
Imported Data
(see
Client Data
and
Third Party Data
).
Log Data
Log Data is an industry term that is generally used to refer to data collected from interactions with computer systems, and is used differently by different companies. For purposes of describing our
Processing
, we use more precise terms, such as
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and/or
Inferences/Inferred Data
, which are all types of data that can be subsumed within the general industry term “Log Data.” Some elements within Log Data, when isolated from the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
, will not qualify as
Personal Information
. For example, a single time zone and publisher
URL
without an associated
Pseudonymous Identifier
would not qualify as
Personal Information
.
Online Data
Data relating to a user’s interaction with digital media including websites, apps and streaming media services.
Offline Data
Data relating to a user’s real-world purchases and/or activity.
Panel
A Panel is a set of individuals who have consented to participate in market research and share information about themselves, their preferences and interests for purposes of research and market analytics.
This information can then be used as the basis for learning or making inferences about a larger population. For example, if a number of people on a Panel share that they visit a particular news website, and of those people, most of them are male and over the age of 50, we might extrapolate from that and say that most of the audience for that website is male and over 50.
Another way to use Panel data is to compare Panel results to the estimates that we have made using our algorithms in order to score the effectiveness of our algorithms. So, if our algorithm predicted for the same news website that most of the audience is under 30, we would learn that our algorithm might be wrong.
Personal Information
Personal Information refers to information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to you, your browser, or your device. We use the term “personal information” to refer to information that is subject to protection under data protection and privacy laws and regulatory regimes around the world. Depending on the jurisdiction, such information may be referred to as “personal data.”
The Personal Information
Processed
by Quantcast is limited to
Pseudonymised Identifiers
Quantcast does not
Process
Personal Information
that directly identifies you as an individual, and that can be used to directly identify you without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs are computer code embedded in a website, mobile applications, and advertisements that we use to enable the Solutions. We tend to use the terms Pixels, Tags, and SDKs interchangeably. Quantcast Clients that use the Solutions can put them on their sites, in their apps, or in their ads in order to send us information that is then used in the Solutions. When a Pixel, Tag, or SDK loads and calls our servers, we receive
HTTP Header Information
, along with other information that is configured by the Quantcast Client who is using the Solutions. That information includes IDs from partners, so we know which partner the data is coming from.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs include:
Sync Pixels: These are used to exchange and match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
between companies that participate in the digital advertising market. By matching, they can synchronise these identifiers to deliver and measure ads.
Tags or Pixels in ads: When a digital ad loads on a page, it can include a Tag or Pixel that we use on behalf of Quantcast Clients to gather information about where and when the ad was served. This can help to measure ad performance, to ensure ads are shown where intended, and to learn in order to improve ad effectiveness.
Tags or Pixels on publisher Clients’ web pages: For publisher Clients that use the Solutions, they can put our Tags on their sites. The information we collect then enables the Client to learn about their audience, and it enables us to build models for better targeting ads.
Tags or Pixels used by advertiser Clients: When advertiser Clients use our Tags or Pixels, they send us information so we can learn about their customers in order to help them better target their ads.
SDKs: SDKs are bits of computer code that mobile app publisher Clients incorporate into their apps, enabling them to send us information. Similar to Pixels or Tags, the information enables us to offer the Solutions as described in our Privacy Policy.
Probabilistic Identifier
A Probabilistic Identifier is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
which we create by combining
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(such as
IP Addresses
) with
Bid Request Data
and/or
Event Data
using non-deterministic, statistical methods to estimate the likelihood that a group of devices may be used by the same user or household, if applicable law or rules allow. For example, we might be able to determine that because a mobile phone and a TV are on the same network, they are likely in the same house. We can then use that information to select and measure ads. Unlike using
Cookie IDs
, this approach is not 100% accurate and could identify one or many devices.
Process
Refers to any operation or set of operations performed upon
Personal Information
or sets of
Personal Information
, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure, or destruction.
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Pseudonymous Identifiers are unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s). Pseudonymous Identifiers cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link Pseudonymous Identifiers to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share Pseudonymous Identifiers from doing the same.
Pseudonymous Identifiers are important in digital advertising because they help distinguish browsers or devices over time across different contexts. This is useful for example, to limit the number of times that we show the same ad to one device, to measure the performance of ads, and to target and select personalised ads.
We may incorporate any one of the following types of information in a Quantcast Pseudonymous Identifier:
Third Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
First Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
IP Addresses
.
Hashed email addresses
Third party identifiers
Device ID
.
Application ID: an ID that is unique to your mobile device and a particular app on your device.
Application Session ID: like an application ID, except that it is reset periodically (e.g., many browsers reset these after 30 minutes of inactivity).
Exchange User ID: an ID that is sent to us with a
Bid Request
that identifies the device or browser where an ad is to be shown.
Probabilistic Identifier
.
Publisher User ID: digital publishers that use the Solutions can send us an ID to use in the Solutions. The digital publisher hashes or encrypts an identifier available to it. The resulting ID is pseudonymous because it does not directly identify you, but it would be consistent across different publishers, so the Publisher User ID can be used to match data.
TLS Session ID: when you visit a website
URL
that starts with “https” instead of “http”, that means you have an encrypted connection between your browser and the site. If one of our
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
loads on the site, that call to our server will also be encrypted. The Session ID identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server.
Pseudonymous/Pseudonymised Information
Pseudonymised Information is
Personal Information
that has been
Processed
in such a manner that the information can no longer be attributed to a specific user without the use of additional information, provided that such additional information is kept separately and is subject to technical and organisational measures to ensure that the personal information is not attributed to a specific user.
Segment Data
Segment Data is imported data that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by
Clients
or
Third Party Data Partners
. Segment Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
and/or
Offline Data
as well as
Attributes
,
Inferences
, or
Interests
inferred from that data. This category of information is typically called “Segment Data” because it identifies groups of users who fall into advertising segments (e.g., “auto buyers,” “shoe shoppers,” or “women 25-35”). These segments represent groups of users that share (or that are inferred to share) one or more certain characteristics in common (e.g., a client may want to advertise to a segment of “male shoppers who are interested in sports fashion”). These groupings are created by using the intersection of different segments (in the example given, an audience that is simultaneously in the “male”, “shopper”, and “sports fashion” segments). A segment may be identified with a
Label
(in which case it is referred to as “
Label Data
”).
Software Development Kit (SDK)
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
Tag
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
TCF
See
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
TCF Purpose/Special Purpose/Feature/Special Feature
The
TCF
has standardised certain Purposes, Special Purposes, Features and Special Features and the descriptions of data processing activity in the digital advertising industry. Through this standardisation, the digital advertising industry can ascribe consistent meanings for the permissions that data subjects give via the
TCF
. This also ensures a consistent experience for users because they then do not have to read and understand an entirely different set of Purposes, Special Purposes, Features, and Special Features for each website they visit.
Because of the benefits of standardising the purposes across the industry, we use the
TCF
to establish the legal basis to
Process
Personal Information
governed by the GDPR, and use the Purposes, Special Purposes, Features, and Special Features in our Privacy Policy to describe much of our data processing activity.
For detailed descriptions of TCF Purposes, Special Purposes, Features, and Special Features, see
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
Third Party Cookie/Cookie ID
See
Cookie
.
Third Party Data
Third Party Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via API by third party
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
. Third Party Data may include
Segment Data
.
Training Data
Training Data is
Pseudonymous Information
that we receive from Quantcast Clients and third party data providers, where the actual
Attributes
or
Interests
of the underlying users are known (even though their actual identities are not known to Quantcast). The Training Data is segmented across various
Interests
and
Attributes
, such as shopping interests (e.g., automotive, technology, or restaurants), business and occupation (e.g., management, IT professional or retail), media interests (e.g., cinema, video games, TV), income range, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information and used for data modeling purposes. We use the Training Data to train statistical models to make
Inferences
. When our systems subsequently receive
Event Data
relating to a user, we can infer whether the
Event Data
displays characteristics similar to the Training Data. If the
Event Data
displays characteristics that are similar to the Training Data, we can infer from that the likely
Attributes
and
Interests
of the user to whom the
Event Data
relates. These
Inferences
are then used to deliver advertising and provide aggregated, analytical reporting to our Quantcast Clients.
URL (Uniform Resource Locator)
A URL, also known as a web address, is a reference to a unique web resource that specifies its location on a computer network. Most commonly, a URL points to a web page. URLs can also point to a document, image, video, etc. URLs often use plain text, such as
www.quantcast.com
; in that case, the domain name must be processed by a Domain Name Server in order to convert the domain name into an
IP Address
.
Effective February 17th 2024
to
June 11th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Key Terms
Effective: March 1 2024
Advertising Exchange
See
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
.
Attributes/Attribute Information
Attributes are known, observed, or inferred characteristics.  Examples of attributes are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Attributes may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
. Quantcast associates attributes with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Audience
An Audience is a group of devices and/or users who are known to or are estimated to have certain common characteristics. A characteristic in common may be an
Interest
, such as an interest in cooking. A characteristic in common may be an
Attribute
, such as being male, visited a particular digital property, or viewed or interacted with a particular advertisement. One type of Audience is a group who have visited a Client’s digital property. Another type of Audience is a group who have been shown, or may potentially be shown, a Client’s advertisement.
Audience Insights
Audience Insights are data collected, or data that is inferred from data collected, about an
Audience
. Audience Insights are aggregated, anonymised data and are not
Personal Information
.  An example of an Audience Insight is a report that a given audience is estimated to be 70% male and 3 times as likely to be interested in cooking compared to the general population.
Quantcast provides Audience Insights based on
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and Inferred Data to Clients. Audience Insights enable Clients to better understand the audiences who engage with their content and ads.
Bid Request/Bid Request Data
A Bid Request is a request by a digital content publisher (e.g., website owner, app developer, streaming content provider, etc.) for an offer to place an ad in the publisher’s digital content. For example, when you visit an ad-supported web page, Bid Requests are sent by, or on behalf of, the publisher of the web page to multiple parties that may want to show an ad to you. Those parties can bid for the opportunity to show an ad in an auction, and one ad is selected to show on the page. Bid Requests typically go through an
Advertising Exchange
. This all happens via digital communication between computer servers in less than a second. The contents of the Bid Request may include information about the ad unit (the container in the digital content that will display the ad), the digital content, the device it will be seen on, and your engagement with the  publisher’s digital content, so that prospective buyers can choose whether to bid and how much. For most cases, the contents of the Bid Request are defined by the OpenRTB industry standard (
https://iabtechlab.com/standards/openrtb/
), though not all fields are necessarily included in every Bid Request. Bid Request Data consists of data provided in the Bid Request and will commonly consist of a
Pseudonymous Identifier
(if available), the content  that the ad would serve in (such as the web page, app,  video, etc.), the type of device the ad would be served on (i.e., your device type), the approximate geographic location of your device, the size of the ad, the auction ID, and consent information, such as
TCF Signals
. Bid Request Data also includes Quantcast’s response to the Bid Request, such as whether Quantcast bid on the ad opportunity.
Browsing Data
Browsing Data is information collected relating to your
Online
activity or behaviour. Browsing Data is generated when a
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
installed by a Client on its digital property loads and sends information to us. This includes the website
URL
of the page you are visiting, often along with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, as well as fields of information that may be automatically included from
HTTP Header Information
, such as referral
URLs
(which is the
URL
that directed your browser to the website where an advertisement was served to you).
Browsing Data is included in
Event Data
.
Client Data
Client Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform by a particular advertiser Client for use on its behalf. Client Data is
Pseudonymised Information,
which defines groups of users. These groups might typically be based on users’
Online Data
or
Offline Data
, or other characteristics or aspects of users’ relationship with the Client. The groups are then used by Quantcast to help deliver advertising campaigns to the right
Audiences
on behalf of the Client.
Cookie
A Cookie is a small bit of text that is sent to and saved on your computer or device when you visit a website. A Cookie is associated with a single web browser profile; each web browser and browser profile that you use on your device will have separate Cookies. Cookies allow a website to recognise a browser and are commonly used to store user preferences or identifiers, which enables us to collect and use information about browsers over time and across different internet content. Cookies enable us to understand more about users and the content they are visiting over time, which in turn can be used to improve our Clients’ advertising activities and the quality of advertising you experience. The identifiers we store in Cookies are
Pseudonymous Information
; in other words, they cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link a
Pseudonymous Identifier
to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
or
Pseudonymous Information
from doing the same. Browsers have controls that enable users to clear or block Cookies. See your browser help for details.
There are two forms of cookies: First Party Cookies and Third Party Cookies.
A “First Party Cookie” is limited in scope to a particular website you visit (“First Party Cookie”). In some instances, Quantcast is able to store or access information in a First Party Cookie. If
www.example.com
incorporates Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
into their website, and if you visit www.example.com, Quantcast may set a First-Party Cookie associated with www.example.com. In these instances, Quantcast can store  a
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the First-Party Cookie, but because it is a First Party Cookie, Quantcast can only access that
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the context of your visits to that site.
A “Third Party Cookie” is a cookie associated with an internet domain that is different from the one you are visiting. For example, if you are visiting
www.example.com
and a Quantcast
Pixel, Tag or SDK
on that website is able to set a cookie associated with quantcast.com, that is a Third Party Cookie. That same cookie will be accessible to Quantcast on other sites that also incorporate Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
. Quantcast uses
Pseudonymous Identifiers
stored in Third Party Cookies in order to collect information across multiple websites.
Quantcast Cookies placed on your device have a maximum expiry period of 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). Each time you visit a website and a First or Third Party Cookie is placed on your device, the placement of a Cookie begins a new expiry period of up to 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). All Quantcast Cookies automatically cease providing any data to Quantcast from your browser upon expiration.
Cookie ID/Identifier
A Cookie ID is a unique string of characters that we store in a
Cookie
that allows us to identify a single web browser instance over time and across different web sites. Our Cookie IDs are
Pseudonymous Identifiers
. A
First Party Cookie
ID is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
First-Party Cookie
set by the owner of the website you are visiting. A
Third Party Cookie ID
is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
Third-Party Cookie
set by Quantcast.
Cookie Syncing/Matching
In the online advertising industry, Cookie Syncing/Matching generally refers to a process through which two entities who each, and separately, identify a device using their own
Pseudonymous Identifier
can determine which of their respective
Pseudonymous Identifiers
may relate to the same device. For example, Quantcast may pseudonymously identify a device as “cookie ID 123.” Company B may pseudonymously identify the same device as “cookie ID ABC.” Cookie Syncing/Matching enables Quantcast and Company B to recognise that their respective
Pseudonymous identifiers
may relate to the device that Quantcast records as “cookie ID 123”.
Quantcast’s Cookie Syncing activities work similarly. If you visit a website that incorporates
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
from Quantcast, Company B may match its own pseudonymous identifiers to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(this creates a record of matching pseudonymous identifiers for Company B).  Once a match is established, Company B can reference a particular device when communicating with Quantcast, using Quantcast’s
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
The Cookie Syncing/Matching process does not in itself result in Quantcast sharing
Attributes
related to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with Company B. The Cookie Syncing/Matching enables transactions between the parties at a later time; for example, in the case of an Advertising Exchange sending a Bid Request, the Bid Request can contain a previously synched
Pseudonymous Identifier.
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
In the online advertising industry, Cross-Media Matching generally refers to a process through which Quantcast links identifiers across a user’s consumption of various media (e.g. audio, video, websites, apps, etc) because such identifiers are known to or
Inferred
to relate to the same user.  Matching/Linking may be undertaken for consumption of media on a single device and for consumption of media on more than one device. As an example, if you visit a digital property using your mobile phone and later visit that same digital property using a browser on your laptop or make visits to several different digital properties using a browser over a period of time, Quantcast may initially determine that these visits are made by different users and assign each device user their own profile.
If, however, Quantcast finds there is sufficient commonality between the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with the consumption of media, Quantcast will assess that those identifiers may be joined as they are likely to emanate from the same user. This assessment is“probabilistic”– in other words, it uses statistical techniques to determine that the identifiers to be matched have a higher likelihood of relating to the same device and/or user.
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers provide
Third Party Data
to Quantcast, or provide a platform through which Clients can provide
Client Data
to Quantcast. These companies either directly licence first and third party
Audience Segment Data
from different sources (such as
Online Data
and
Offline Data
) to businesses or provide a platform through which Clients can collect, organise, and activate such data for Quantcast’s use in connection with the Solutions. We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers
in order to sync/match identifiers to effectively integrate with their services (see
Cookie Syncing/Matching
).
Device ID/Identifier
A unique string of characters that can be used to identify a device set by the developer of the device’s operating system (e.g., a mobile phone, tablet, TV, or console). Device Identifiers (or “Device IDs”) serve a similar purpose as
Cookies
and can be used to provide personalised advertising. A Device ID is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
A Mobile Advertising ID (or “MAID”) is a Device ID assigned to a mobile device  or connected TV (“CTV”) device by the device operating system. Typically, the device user can reset or turn off the ID via the device’s settings. A MAID is referred to as the IDFA (ID for Advertisers) on iOS devices and GAID (Google Ad ID) on Android mobile devices.
Device Configuration/Device Information
Information about a device or its configuration, transmitted from the device, and typically associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
. The information includes browser, app, or other information about the device (such as device type, screen size and resolution, date and time, and language), which also may include a
User Agent.
Some Device Information is derived from
HTTP Request Header Information
.
Event Data
Information collected relating to your
Online
activity/behaviour, which may include
Personal Information
in
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
,
Browsing Data
and
TCF Signals
. Event Data is generated when a
Pixel, Tag, or SDK
installed on a Client’s digital property loads and sends information to us. Event Data can also be collected from ads, when you view or click on an ad which contains a
Tag
.
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
A marketplace platform that facilitates automated, real-time, auction-based buying and selling of ad inventory (which are spaces available on sites and apps to display ads). An Advertising Exchange receives Bid Requests from digital publishers and forwards them to advertisers, or to entities like Quantcast who act on behalf of advertisers. Advertisers, or their agents, respond to
Bid Requests
with a bid amount and an advertisement to provide to a user if they win the auction.
First Party Cookie
See
Cookie
.
HTTP Request Header Information
HTTP headers are defined by internet standards and contain a number of data fields designed to facilitate communication and interoperability on the internet. On the web, your web browser controls which headers are sent and what the contents are. We receive the headers when a request is sent over the internet to our system, such as when a
Pixel
loads in your web browser. We also might receive information that has been derived from the HTTP headers from another party, such as in a
Bid Request
. We use a subset of the header fields for purposes described in the Privacy Policy, which includes:
IP Address
Cookie
(if available)
User Agent, which is a string (a line of text) identifying the device type, browser type, and version that the user is using to access the web server (“User Agent”)
Date, which includes the precise time of access
Referral
URL
, which is the web page you were on when the request was sent
TLS Session ID, which identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server
Content-Language, which is the languages of the intended audience for the enclosed content
Detailed documentation related to HTTP header information can be found online in a general search for “HTTP header information fields”.
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework (“TCF”)
The IAB Transparency & Consent Framework, or “TCF,” is a standardised industry program active in countries governed by the GDPR, and designed for notifying users about data
Processing
by companies involved in digital advertising on sites and apps that users visit, and for establishing a legal basis for that
Processing
.
The TCF is designed to be used on digital properties, such as websites and apps. The TCF incorporates a consent dialog that displays when users visit a website or app, giving them information about vendors, the data they collect, and the purposes for which they collect it. It also offers an opportunity for users to give or change their permissions for such data collection and use.
The TCF allows Quantcast to work with publishers of websites and other digital properties in a consistent manner using standardised technical specifications to:
(a) provide a link to Quantcast's Privacy Policy, as well as transparency about Quantcast's
Processing
of Personal Information, the specific purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
, and Quantcast's legal basis for such
Processing
, directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user;
(b) allow the user, in a granular manner, to express their consent or refusal to consent, to Quantcast's (i) use of
Cookies
, and (ii) the purposes of Quantcast's
Processing
, which are the reasons why Quantcast
Processes
the personal data of users (“
TCF Purposes”
), including where Quantcast relies on the user’s consent for such
Processing
directly on the website or other digital property that the user is accessing;
(c) allow the user to object to Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
(for purposes where Quantcast relies on legitimate interests) directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user.
Using the
TCF
allows publishers of websites or other digital properties to provide information about Quantcast’s
Processing
to users in a consistent manner. The user-facing disclosures presented by these digital properties are sourced from information that Quantcast has registered with the
TCF's
“
Global Vendor List
”, a publicly accessible, machine-readable repository of information about TCF-compliant vendors, like Quantcast. This information includes Quantcast’s Privacy Policy
URL
, the purposes for which it
Processes
Personal Information
, and its legal basis for each of these purposes. As the description of these purposes and minimum standards for disclosures are standardised across all TCF participants, Quantcast knows how operators of websites or other digital properties using the TCF are making disclosures about Quantcast and can have confidence in such disclosures.
In addition, the TCF enables publishers of websites or other digital properties to create and send to Quantcast a standardised technical signal that indicates (A) whether Quantcast’s transparency disclosures were provided  to a user; (B) whether  or not the user has consented to Quantcast’s Processing and/or each purpose for which Quantcast sought the user's consent; and (c) whether the user objected to Quantcast’s Processing and/or any purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
on the basis of its legitimate interests (the “TCF Signal”).
TCF Signal is collected via Quantcast
Tags
if the digital property on which the
Tag
is implemented has also implemented a TCF-compatible Consent Management Platform, which is a company or organisation that centralises and manages transparency for, and consent and objections of, the user (“CMP”) . In addition, TCF Signal is received by Quantcast as part of the
Bid Requests
it receives from
Advertising Exchanges
. Quantcast is able to read the standardised TCF Signal and will only
Process
Personal Information
for purposes to which the user has consented (where consent is the legal basis) or not objected (where legitimate interests is the legal basis) in order to provide the Solutions.
Read more about the TCF here
https://iabeurope.eu/transparency-consent-framework/
Imported Data
Imported Data is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”). Imported Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include information relating to your
Online data
or
Offline data
or other information that Clients or partners have about you.  For examples of Imported Data provided to Quantcast, see
Client Data
or
Third Party Data
.
Imported Data (Client)
See
Client Data
.
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
See
Third Party Data
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Typically, in digital advertising we distinguish between precise and imprecise geolocation information.
Precise geolocation usually comes from GPS coordinates from mobile devices, and can have precision up to about one metre. Quantcast does not use precise geolocation data and we request that Clients, partners, and third parties refrain from sending precise geolocation to us. If a party inadvertently sends it, we do not use it in the Solutions and it is removed from our systems within 30 days.
Imprecise geolocation is lower precision, and refers to a general geographic area, for example a country, region, city or division of a metropolitan area, and/or some combination of these, and is often derived from GPS coordinates or from
IP Addresses
.
Inferences/Inferred Data
Inferences, or Inferred Data, is information that is inferred from data that we have collected about a device, such as
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
, or
Third Party Data
. Our inferences are made using algorithms that estimate the likelihood that the user of a device has particular interests or characteristics. The Inferences are then associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
as part of a set of device
Attributes
.
For example, if a device frequently visits sports websites, it might be inferred that there is some probability the user of that device likes sports. Similarly, if a device frequently visits an airline provider’s website, it might be inferred that there is some probability a user of that device likes to travel.  Other Inferences  include things such as
Interests
, income range, gender, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information.
Inferences associated with any individual device have a high degree of uncertainty. Inferences become more accurate when used to estimate the characteristics of a large group of devices, like an
Audience
.
Interests
Interests are known, observed, or inferred non-demographic characteristics. Interests are associated with Pseudonymous Identifiers to characterise particular interests of users. Examples of Interests include “cooking” and “outdoor activities”. Interests may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and Inferences/Inferred Data.
IP Address
An IP (“Internet Protocol”) Address is a unique numerical label corresponding to a computer or device. Computers use IP Addresses to identify each other and know where to send information over the Internet. For example, when you open a web page in your browser a request is made to a server for the web page content. The server knows where to send the content based on the IP Address contained in the request. Computers or other devices are assigned an IP Address from the network the device is on. A device’s IP Address may change over time or as a device changes locations. Also, an IP Address can refer to multiple devices, for example if the devices are behind an internet router.
An IP Address that has been hashed, or encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email, is treated as a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
Labels/Label Data
Labels, or Label Data, are descriptors associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to denote particular groups of users that can be subsequently used to index all
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with that label. An analogy would be applying a “label” to messages in an email inbox - you might decide to label messages from work as “Work”, family members as “Family,” and so on. These labels then help you readily index and recall particular categories of email.
Labels processed by Quantcast are:
Labels from
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
: these are category Labels (e.g., male, female, age 21-24) acquired from third party data partners relating to a
Pseudonymous Identifier
;
Custom-
Client Data
Labels: these are custom category labels set by Clients corresponding to a device associated with the identifier visiting their digital property (e.g., byline of the news article accessed by the user) or product name (of the product accessed by the user).
Inferred Data
Labels: these are inferred category Labels about a user using a device associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, e.g., inferred age, inferred gender, inferred interest.
Example Labels are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Labels may be inferred information (see
Inferences/Inferred Data
) or may be
Imported Data
(see
Client Data
and
Third Party Data
).
Log Data
Log Data is an industry term that is generally used to refer to data collected from interactions with computer systems, and is used differently by different companies. For purposes of describing our
Processing
, we use more precise terms, such as Pseudonymous Identifiers,
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and/or Inferences/Inferred Data, which are all types of data that can be subsumed within the general industry term “Log Data”. Some elements within Log Data, when isolated from the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
, will not qualify as Personal Information. For example, a single time zone and publisher
URL
without an associated
Pseudonymous Identifier
would not qualify as
Personal Information
.
Online Data
Data relating to a user’s interaction with digital media including websites, apps and streaming media services.
Offline Data
Data relating to a user’s real-world purchases and/or activity.
Panel
A Panel is a set of individuals who have consented to participate in market research and share information about themselves, their preferences and interests for purposes of research and market analytics.
This information can then be used as the basis for learning or making inferences about a larger population. For example, if a number of people on a Panel share that they visit a particular news website, and of those people, most of them are male and over the age of 50, we might extrapolate from that and say that most of the audience for that website is male and over 50.
Another way to use Panel data is to compare Panel results to the estimates that we have made using our algorithms in order to score the effectiveness of our algorithms. So, if our algorithm predicted for the same news website that most of the audience is under 30, we would learn that our algorithm might be wrong.
Personal Information
Personal Information refers to information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to you, your browser, or your device. We use the term “personal information” to refer to information that is subject to protection under data protection and privacy laws and regulatory regimes around the world. Depending on the jurisdiction, such information may be referred to as “personal data.”
The Personal Information
Processed
by Quantcast is limited to Pseudonymised Identifiers. Quantcast does not
Process
Personal Information
that directly identifies you as an individual, and that can be used to directly identify you without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs are computer code embedded in a website that we use to enable the Solutions. We tend to use the terms Pixels, Tags, and SDKs interchangeably. Clients that use the Solutions can put them on their sites, in their apps, or in their ads in order to send us information that is then used in the Solutions. When a Pixel, Tag, or SDK loads and calls our servers, we receive
HTTP Header Information
, along with other information that is configured by the Client who is using the Solutions. That information includes IDs from partners, so we know which partner the data is coming from.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs include:
Sync Pixels: These are used to exchange and match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
between companies that participate in the digital advertising market. By matching, they can synchronise these identifiers to deliver and measure ads.
Tags or Pixels in ads: When a digital ad loads on a page, it can include a Tag or Pixel that we use on behalf of Clients to gather information about where and when the ad was served. This can help to measure ad performance, to ensure ads are shown where intended, and to learn in order to improve ad effectiveness.
Tags or Pixels on publisher Clients’ web pages: For publisher Clients that use the Solutions, they can put our Tags on their sites. The information we collect then enables the Client to learn about their audience, and it enables us to build models for better targeting ads.
Tags or Pixels used by advertiser Clients: When advertiser Clients use our Tags or Pixels, they send us information so we can learn about their customers in order to help them better target their ads.
SDKs: SDKs are bits of computer code that mobile app publisher Clients incorporate into their apps, enabling them to send us information. Similar to Pixels or Tags, the information enables us to offer the Solutions as described in our Privacy Policy.
Probabilistic Identifier
A Probabilistic Identifier is a Pseudonymous Identifier which we create by combining
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(such as IP Addresses) with Bid Request Data and/or Event Data using non-deterministic, statistical methods to estimate the likelihood that a group of devices may be used by the same user or household, if applicable law or rules allow. For example, we might be able to determine that because a mobile phone and a TV are on the same network, they are likely in the same house. We can then use that information to select and measure ads. Unlike using Cookie IDs, this approach is not 100% accurate and could identify one or many devices.
Process
Refers to any operation or set of operations performed upon Personal Information or sets of
Personal Information
, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure, or destruction.
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Pseudonymous Identifiers are unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s). Pseudonymous Identifiers cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link Pseudonymous Identifiers to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share Pseudonymous Identifiers from doing the same.
Pseudonymous Identifiers are important in digital advertising because they help distinguish browsers or devices over time across different contexts. This is useful for example, to limit the number of times that we show the same ad to one device, to measure the performance of ads, and to target and select personalised ads.
We may incorporate any one of the following types of information in a Quantcast Pseudonymous Identifier:
Third Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
First Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
IP Addresses
.
Hashed email addresses, which are email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email.
Third party identifiers
Device ID
.
Application ID: an ID that is unique to your mobile device and a particular app on your device.
Application Session ID: like an application ID, except that it is reset periodically (e.g., many browsers reset these after 30 minutes of inactivity).
Exchange User ID: an ID that is sent to us with a
Bid Request
that identifies the device or browser where an ad is to be shown.
Probabilistic Identifier
.
Publisher User ID: digital publishers that use the Solutions can send us an ID to use in the Solutions. The digital publisher hashes or encrypts an identifier available to it. The resulting ID is pseudonymous because it does not directly identify you, but it would be consistent across different publishers, so the Publisher User ID can be used to match data.
TLS Session ID: when you visit a website
URL
that starts with “https” instead of “http”, that means you have an encrypted connection between your browser and the site. If one of our
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
loads on the site, that call to our server will also be encrypted. The Session ID identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server.
Pseudonymous/Pseudonymised Information
Pseudonymised Information is
Personal Information
that has been
Processed
in such a manner that the information can no longer be attributed to a specific user without the use of additional information, provided that such additional information is kept separately and is subject to technical and organisational measures to ensure that the personal information is not attributed to a specific user.
Segment Data
Segment Data is imported data that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by Clients or Third Party Data Partners. Segment Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
and/or
Offline Data
as well as
Attributes
, Inferences, or
Interests
inferred from that data. This category of information is typically called “Segment Data” because it identifies groups of users who fall into advertising segments (e.g., “auto buyers,” “shoe shoppers,” or “women 25-35”). These segments represent groups of users that share (or that are inferred to share) one or more certain characteristics in common (e.g., a client may want to advertise to a segment of “male shoppers who are interested in sports fashion”). These groupings are created by using the intersection of different segments (in the example given, an audience that is simultaneously in the “male”, “shopper”, and “sports fashion” segments). A segment may be identified with a Label (in which case it is referred to as “
Label Data
”).
Software Development Kit (SDK)
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
Tag
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
TCF
See
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
TCF Purpose/TCF Special Purpose
The
TCF
has standardised certain Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features and the descriptions of data processing activity in the digital advertising industry. Through this standardisation, the digital advertising industry can ascribe consistent meanings for the permissions that data subjects give via the
TCF
. This also ensures a consistent experience for users because they then do not have to read and understand an entirely different set of Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features for each website they visit.
Because of the benefits of standardising the purposes across the industry, we use the
TCF
to establish the legal basis to
Process
Personal Information
and use the Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features in our Privacy Policy to describe much of our data processing activity.
For detailed descriptions of TCF “Purpose” or TCF “Special Purpose”, see
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
Third Party Cookie/Cookie ID
See
Cookie
.
Third Party Data
Third Party Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via API by third party
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
. Third Party Data may include
Segment Data
.
Training Data
Training Data is
Pseudonymous Information
that we receive from Clients and third party data providers,  where the actual
Attributes
or
Interests
of the underlying users are known (even though their actual identities are not known to Quantcast). The Training Data is segmented across various
Interests
and
Attributes
, such as shopping interests (e.g., automotive, technology, or restaurants), business and occupation (e.g., management, IT professional or retail), media interests (e.g., cinema, video games, TV), income range, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information and used  for data modeling purposes. We use the Training Data to train statistical models to make
Inferences
. When our systems subsequently receive
Event Data
relating to a user, we can infer whether the
Event Data
displays characteristics similar to the Training Data. If the
Event Data
displays characteristics that are similar to the Training Data, we can infer from that the likely
Attributes
and
Interests
of the user to whom the
Event Data
relates. These Inferences are then used to deliver advertising and provide aggregated, analytical reporting to our Clients.
URL (Uniform Resource Locator)
A URL, also known as a web address, is a reference to a unique web resource that specifies its location on a computer network. Most commonly, a URL points to a web page. URLs can also point to a document, image, video, etc. URLs often use plain text, such as
www.quantcast.com
; in that case, the domain name must be processed by a Domain Name Server in order to convert the domain name into an
IP Address
.
Effective February 12th 2024
to
February 17th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Key Terms
Effective: March 1 2024
Advertising Exchange
See
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
.
Attributes/Attribute Information
Attributes are known, observed, or inferred characteristics.  Examples of attributes are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Attributes may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
. Quantcast associates attributes with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Audience
An Audience is a group of devices and/or users who are known to or are estimated to have certain common characteristics. A characteristic in common may be an
Interest
, such as an interest in cooking. A characteristic in common may be an
Attribute
, such as being male, visited a particular digital property, or viewed or interacted with a particular advertisement. One type of Audience is a group who have visited a Client’s digital property. Another type of Audience is a group who have been shown, or may potentially be shown, a Client’s advertisement.
Audience Insights
Audience Insights are data collected, or data that is inferred from data collected, about an
Audience
. Audience Insights are aggregated, anonymised data and are not
Personal Information
.  An example of an Audience Insight is a report that a given audience is estimated to be 70% male and 3 times as likely to be interested in cooking compared to the general population.
Quantcast provides Audience Insights based on
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferred Data
to Clients. Audience Insights enable Clients to better understand the audiences who engage with their content and ads.
Bid Request/Bid Request Data
A Bid Request is a request by a digital content publisher (e.g., website owner, app developer, streaming content provider, etc.) for an offer to place an ad in the publisher’s digital content. For example, when you visit an ad-supported web page, Bid Requests are sent by, or on behalf of, the publisher of the web page to multiple parties that may want to show an ad to you. Those parties can bid for the opportunity to show an ad in an auction, and one ad is selected to show on the page. Bid Requests typically go through an
Advertising Exchange
. This all happens via digital communication between computer servers in less than a second. The contents of the Bid Request may include information about the ad unit (the container in the digital content that will display the ad), the digital content, the device it will be seen on, and your engagement with the  publisher’s digital content, so that prospective buyers can choose whether to bid and how much. For most cases, the contents of the Bid Request are defined by the OpenRTB industry standard (
https://iabtechlab.com/standards/openrtb/
), though not all fields are necessarily included in every Bid Request. Bid Request Data consists of data provided in the Bid Request and will commonly consist of a
Pseudonymous Identifier
(if available), the content  that the ad would serve in (such as the web page, app,  video, etc.), the type of device the ad would be served on (i.e., your device type), the approximate geographic location of your device, the size of the ad, the auction ID, and consent information, such as
TCF Signals
. Bid Request Data also includes Quantcast’s response to the Bid Request, such as whether Quantcast bid on the ad opportunity.
Browsing Data
Browsing Data is information collected relating to your
Online
activity or behaviour. Browsing Data is generated when a
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
installed by a Client on its digital property loads and sends information to us. This includes the website
URL
of the page you are visiting, often along with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, as well as fields of information that may be automatically included from
HTTP Header Information
, such as referral
URLs
(which is the
URL
that directed your browser to the website where an advertisement was served to you).
Browsing Data is included in
Event Data
.
Client Data
Client Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform by a particular advertiser Client for use on its behalf. Client Data is
Pseudonymised Information,
which defines groups of users. These groups might typically be based on users’
Online Data
or
Offline Data
, or other characteristics or aspects of users’ relationship with the Client. The groups are then used by Quantcast to help deliver advertising campaigns to the right
Audiences
on behalf of the Client.
Cookie
A Cookie is a small bit of text that is sent to and saved on your computer or device when you visit a website. A Cookie is associated with a single web browser profile; each web browser and browser profile that you use on your device will have separate Cookies. Cookies allow a website to recognise a browser and are commonly used to store user preferences or identifiers, which enables us to collect and use information about browsers over time and across different internet content. Cookies enable us to understand more about users and the content they are visiting over time, which in turn can be used to improve our Clients’ advertising activities and the quality of advertising you experience. The identifiers we store in Cookies are
Pseudonymous Information
; in other words, they cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link a
Pseudonymous Identifier
to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
or
Pseudonymous Information
from doing the same. Browsers have controls that enable users to clear or block Cookies. See your browser help for details.
There are two forms of cookies: First Party Cookies and Third Party Cookies.
A “First Party Cookie” is limited in scope to a particular website you visit (“First Party Cookie”). In some instances, Quantcast is able to store or access information in a First Party Cookie. If
www.example.com
incorporates Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
into their website, and if you visit www.example.com, Quantcast may set a First-Party Cookie associated with www.example.com. In these instances, Quantcast can store  a
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the First-Party Cookie, but because it is a First Party Cookie, Quantcast can only access that
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the context of your visits to that site.
A “Third Party Cookie” is a cookie associated with an internet domain that is different from the one you are visiting. For example, if you are visiting
www.example.com
and a Quantcast
Pixel, Tag or SDK
on that website is able to set a cookie associated with quantcast.com, that is a Third Party Cookie. That same cookie will be accessible to Quantcast on other sites that also incorporate Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
. Quantcast uses
Pseudonymous Identifiers
stored in Third Party Cookies in order to collect information across multiple websites.
Quantcast Cookies placed on your device have a maximum expiry period of 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). Each time you visit a website and a First or Third Party Cookie is placed on your device, the placement of a Cookie begins a new expiry period of up to 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). All Quantcast Cookies automatically cease providing any data to Quantcast from your browser upon expiration.
Cookie ID/Identifier
A Cookie ID is a unique string of characters that we store in a
Cookie
that allows us to identify a single web browser instance over time and across different web sites. Our Cookie IDs are
Pseudonymous Identifiers
. A
First Party Cookie
ID is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
First-Party Cookie
set by the owner of the website you are visiting. A
Third Party Cookie ID
is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
Third-Party Cookie
set by Quantcast.
Cookie Syncing/Matching
In the online advertising industry, Cookie Syncing/Matching generally refers to a process through which two entities who each, and separately, identify a device using their own
Pseudonymous Identifier
can determine which of their respective
Pseudonymous Identifiers
may relate to the same device. For example, Quantcast may pseudonymously identify a device as “cookie ID 123.” Company B may pseudonymously identify the same device as “cookie ID ABC.” Cookie Syncing/Matching enables Quantcast and Company B to recognise that their respective
Pseudonymous identifiers
may relate to the device that Quantcast records as “cookie ID 123”.
Quantcast’s Cookie Syncing activities work similarly. If you visit a website that incorporates
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
from Quantcast, Company B may match its own pseudonymous identifiers to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(this creates a record of matching pseudonymous identifiers for Company B).  Once a match is established, Company B can reference a particular device when communicating with Quantcast, using Quantcast’s
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
The Cookie Syncing/Matching process does not in itself result in Quantcast sharing
Attributes
related to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with Company B. The Cookie Syncing/Matching enables transactions between the parties at a later time; for example, in the case of an Advertising Exchange sending a Bid Request, the Bid Request can contain a previously synched
Pseudonymous Identifier.
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
In the online advertising industry, Cross-Media Matching generally refers to a process through which Quantcast links identifiers across a user’s consumption of various media (e.g. audio, video, websites, apps, etc) because such identifiers are known to or
Inferred
to relate to the same user.  Matching/Linking may be undertaken for consumption of media on a single device and for consumption of media on more than one device. As an example, if you visit a digital property using your mobile phone and later visit that same digital property using a browser on your laptop or make visits to several different digital properties using a browser over a period of time, Quantcast may initially determine that these visits are made by different users and assign each device user their own profile.
If, however, Quantcast finds there is sufficient commonality between the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with the consumption of media, Quantcast will assess that those identifiers may be joined as they are likely to emanate from the same user. This assessment is“probabilistic”– in other words, it uses statistical techniques to determine that the identifiers to be matched have a higher likelihood of relating to the same device and/or user.
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers provide
Third Party Data
to Quantcast, or provide a platform through which Clients can provide
Client Data
to Quantcast. These companies either directly licence first and third party
Audience
Segment Data
from different sources (such as
Online Data
and
Offline Data
) to businesses or provide a platform through which Clients can collect, organise, and activate such data for Quantcast’s use in connection with the Solutions. We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers
in order to sync/match identifiers to effectively integrate with their services (see
Cookie Syncing/Matching
).
Device ID/Identifier
A unique string of characters that can be used to identify a device set by the developer of the device’s operating system (e.g., a mobile phone, tablet, TV, or console). Device Identifiers (or “Device IDs”) serve a similar purpose as
Cookies
and can be used to provide personalised advertising. A Device ID is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
A Mobile Advertising ID (or “MAID”) is a Device ID assigned to a mobile device  or connected TV (“CTV”) device by the device operating system. Typically, the device user can reset or turn off the ID via the device’s settings. A MAID is referred to as the IDFA (ID for Advertisers) on iOS devices and GAID (Google Ad ID) on Android mobile devices.
Device Configuration/Device Information
Information about a device or its configuration, transmitted from the device, and typically associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
. The information includes browser, app, or other information about the device (such as device type, screen size and resolution, date and time, and language), which also may include a
User Agent.
Some Device Information is derived from
HTTP Request Header Information
.
Event Data
Information collected relating to your
Online
activity/behaviour, which may include
Personal Information
in
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
,
Browsing Data
and
TCF Signals
. Event Data is generated when a
Pixel, Tag, or SDK
installed on a Client’s digital property loads and sends information to us. Event Data can also be collected from ads, when you view or click on an ad which contains a
Tag
.
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
A marketplace platform that facilitates automated, real-time, auction-based buying and selling of ad inventory (which are spaces available on sites and apps to display ads). An Advertising Exchange receives
Bid Requests
from digital publishers and forwards them to advertisers, or to entities like Quantcast who act on behalf of advertisers. Advertisers, or their agents, respond to
Bid Requests
with a bid amount and an advertisement to provide to a user if they win the auction.
First Party Cookie
See
Cookie
.
HTTP Request Header Information
HTTP headers are defined by internet standards and contain a number of data fields designed to facilitate communication and interoperability on the internet. On the web, your web browser controls which headers are sent and what the contents are. We receive the headers when a request is sent over the internet to our system, such as when a
Pixel
loads in your web browser. We also might receive information that has been derived from the HTTP headers from another party, such as in a
Bid Request
. We use a subset of the header fields for purposes described in the Privacy Policy, which includes:
IP Address
Cookie
(if available)
User Agent, which is a string (a line of text) identifying the device type, browser type, and version that the user is using to access the web server (“User Agent”)
Date, which includes the precise time of access
Referral
URL
, which is the web page you were on when the request was sent
TLS Session ID, which identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server
Content-Language, which is the languages of the intended audience for the enclosed content
Detailed documentation related to HTTP header information can be found online in a general search for “HTTP header information fields”.
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework (“TCF”)
The IAB Transparency & Consent Framework, or “TCF,” is a standardised industry program active in countries governed by the GDPR, and designed for notifying users about data
Processing
by companies involved in digital advertising on sites and apps that users visit, and for establishing a legal basis for that
Processing
.
The TCF is designed to be used on digital properties, such as websites and apps. The TCF incorporates a consent dialog that displays when users visit a website or app, giving them information about vendors, the data they collect, and the purposes for which they collect it. It also offers an opportunity for users to give or change their permissions for such data collection and use.
The TCF allows Quantcast to work with publishers of websites and other digital properties in a consistent manner using standardised technical specifications to:
(a) provide a link to Quantcast's Privacy Policy, as well as transparency about Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
, the specific purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
, and Quantcast's legal basis for such
Processing
, directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user;
(b) allow the user, in a granular manner, to express their consent or refusal to consent, to Quantcast's (i) use of
Cookies
, and (ii) the purposes of Quantcast's
Processing
, which are the reasons why Quantcast
Processes
the personal data of users (“
TCF Purposes”
), including where Quantcast relies on the user’s consent for such
Processing
directly on the website or other digital property that the user is accessing;
(c) allow the user to object to Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
(for purposes where Quantcast relies on legitimate interests) directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user.
Using the
TCF
allows publishers of websites or other digital properties to provide information about Quantcast’s
Processing
to users in a consistent manner. The user-facing disclosures presented by these digital properties are sourced from information that Quantcast has registered with the
TCF's
“
Global Vendor List
”, a publicly accessible, machine-readable repository of information about TCF-compliant vendors, like Quantcast. This information includes Quantcast’s Privacy Policy
URL
, the purposes for which it
Processes
Personal Information
, and its legal basis for each of these purposes. As the description of these purposes and minimum standards for disclosures are standardised across all TCF participants, Quantcast knows how operators of websites or other digital properties using the TCF are making disclosures about Quantcast and can have confidence in such disclosures.
In addition, the TCF enables publishers of websites or other digital properties to create and send to Quantcast a standardised technical signal that indicates (A) whether Quantcast’s transparency disclosures were provided  to a user; (B) whether  or not the user has consented to Quantcast’s
Processing
and/or each purpose for which Quantcast sought the user's consent; and (c) whether the user objected to Quantcast’s
Processing
and/or any purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
on the basis of its legitimate interests (the “TCF Signal”).
TCF Signal is collected via Quantcast
Tags
if the digital property on which the
Tag
is implemented has also implemented a TCF-compatible Consent Management Platform, which is a company or organisation that centralises and manages transparency for, and consent and objections of, the user (“CMP”) . In addition, TCF Signal is received by Quantcast as part of the
Bid Requests
it receives from
Advertising Exchanges
. Quantcast is able to read the standardised TCF Signal and will only
Process
Personal Information
for purposes to which the user has consented (where consent is the legal basis) or not objected (where legitimate interests is the legal basis) in order to provide the Solutions.
Read more about the TCF here
https://iabeurope.eu/transparency-consent-framework/
Imported Data
Imported Data is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”). Imported Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include information relating to your
Online data
or
Offline data
or other information that Clients or partners have about you.  For examples of Imported Data provided to Quantcast, see
Client Data
or
Third Party Data
.
Imported Data (Client)
See
Client Data
.
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
See
Third Party Data
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Typically, in digital advertising we distinguish between precise and imprecise geolocation information.
Precise geolocation usually comes from GPS coordinates from mobile devices, and can have precision up to about one metre. Quantcast does not use precise geolocation data and we request that Clients, partners, and third parties refrain from sending precise geolocation to us. If a party inadvertently sends it, we do not use it in the Solutions and it is removed from our systems within 30 days.
Imprecise geolocation is lower precision, and refers to a general geographic area, for example a country, region, city or division of a metropolitan area, and/or some combination of these, and is often derived from GPS coordinates or from
IP Addresses
.
Inferences/Inferred Data
Inferences, or Inferred Data, is information that is inferred from data that we have collected about a device, such as
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
, or
Third Party Data
. Our inferences are made using algorithms that estimate the likelihood that the user of a device has particular interests or characteristics. The Inferences are then associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
as part of a set of device
Attributes
.
For example, if a device frequently visits sports websites, it might be inferred that there is some probability the user of that device likes sports. Similarly, if a device frequently visits an airline provider’s website, it might be inferred that there is some probability a user of that device likes to travel.  Other Inferences  include things such as
Interests
, income range, gender, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information.
Inferences associated with any individual device have a high degree of uncertainty. Inferences become more accurate when used to estimate the characteristics of a large group of devices, like an
Audience
.
Interests
Interests are known, observed, or inferred non-demographic characteristics. Interests are associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to characterise particular interests of users. Examples of Interests include “cooking” and “outdoor activities”. Interests may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
.
IP Address
An IP (“Internet Protocol”) Address is a unique numerical label corresponding to a computer or device. Computers use IP Addresses to identify each other and know where to send information over the Internet. For example, when you open a web page in your browser a request is made to a server for the web page content. The server knows where to send the content based on the IP Address contained in the request. Computers or other devices are assigned an IP Address from the network the device is on. A device’s IP Address may change over time or as a device changes locations. Also, an IP Address can refer to multiple devices, for example if the devices are behind an internet router.
An IP Address that has been hashed, or encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email, is treated as a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
Labels/Label Data
Labels, or Label Data, are descriptors associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to denote particular groups of users that can be subsequently used to index all
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with that label. An analogy would be applying a “label” to messages in an email inbox - you might decide to label messages from work as “Work”, family members as “Family,” and so on. These labels then help you readily index and recall particular categories of email.
Labels processed by Quantcast are:
Labels from
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
: these are category Labels (e.g., male, female, age 21-24) acquired from third party data partners relating to a
Pseudonymous Identifier
;
Custom-
Client Data
Labels: these are custom category labels set by Clients corresponding to a device associated with the identifier visiting their digital property (e.g., byline of the news article accessed by the user) or product name (of the product accessed by the user).
Inferred Data
Labels: these are inferred category Labels about a user using a device associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, e.g., inferred age, inferred gender, inferred interest.
Example Labels are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Labels may be inferred information (see
Inferences/Inferred Data
) or may be
Imported Data
(see
Client Data
and
Third Party Data
).
Log Data
Log Data is an industry term that is generally used to refer to data collected from interactions with computer systems, and is used differently by different companies. For purposes of describing our
Processing
, we use more precise terms, such as
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and/or
Inferences/Inferred Data
, which are all types of data that can be subsumed within the general industry term “Log Data”. Some elements within Log Data, when isolated from the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
, will not qualify as
Personal Information
. For example, a single time zone and publisher
URL
without an associated
Pseudonymous Identifier
would not qualify as
Personal Information
.
Online Data
Data relating to a user’s interaction with digital media including websites, apps and streaming media services.
Offline Data
Data relating to a user’s real-world purchases and/or activity.
Panel
A Panel is a set of individuals who have consented to participate in market research and share information about themselves, their preferences and interests for purposes of research and market analytics.
This information can then be used as the basis for learning or making inferences about a larger population. For example, if a number of people on a Panel share that they visit a particular news website, and of those people, most of them are male and over the age of 50, we might extrapolate from that and say that most of the audience for that website is male and over 50.
Another way to use Panel data is to compare Panel results to the estimates that we have made using our algorithms in order to score the effectiveness of our algorithms. So, if our algorithm predicted for the same news website that most of the audience is under 30, we would learn that our algorithm might be wrong.
Personal Information
Personal Information refers to information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to you, your browser, or your device. We use the term “personal information” to refer to information that is subject to protection under data protection and privacy laws and regulatory regimes around the world. Depending on the jurisdiction, such information may be referred to as “personal data.”
The Personal Information
Processed
by Quantcast is limited to
Pseudonymised Identifiers.
Quantcast does not
Process
Personal Information
that directly identifies you as an individual, and that can be used to directly identify you without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs are computer code embedded in a website that we use to enable the Solutions. We tend to use the terms Pixels, Tags, and SDKs interchangeably. Clients that use the Solutions can put them on their sites, in their apps, or in their ads in order to send us information that is then used in the Solutions. When a Pixel, Tag, or SDK loads and calls our servers, we receive
HTTP Header Information
, along with other information that is configured by the Client who is using the Solutions. That information includes IDs from partners, so we know which partner the data is coming from.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs include:
Sync Pixels: These are used to exchange and match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
between companies that participate in the digital advertising market. By matching, they can synchronise these identifiers to deliver and measure ads.
Tags or Pixels in ads: When a digital ad loads on a page, it can include a Tag or Pixel that we use on behalf of Clients to gather information about where and when the ad was served. This can help to measure ad performance, to ensure ads are shown where intended, and to learn in order to improve ad effectiveness.
Tags or Pixels on publisher Clients’ web pages: For publisher Clients that use the Solutions, they can put our Tags on their sites. The information we collect then enables the Client to learn about their audience, and it enables us to build models for better targeting ads.
Tags or Pixels used by advertiser Clients: When advertiser Clients use our Tags or Pixels, they send us information so we can learn about their customers in order to help them better target their ads.
SDKs: SDKs are bits of computer code that mobile app publisher Clients incorporate into their apps, enabling them to send us information. Similar to Pixels or Tags, the information enables us to offer the Solutions as described in our Privacy Policy.
Probabilistic Identifier
A Probabilistic Identifier is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
which we create by combining
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(such as
IP Addresses
) with
Bid Request Data
and/or
Event Data
using non-deterministic, statistical methods to estimate the likelihood that a group of devices may be used by the same user or household, if applicable law or rules allow. For example, we might be able to determine that because a mobile phone and a TV are on the same network, they are likely in the same house. We can then use that information to select and measure ads. Unlike using
Cookie IDs
, this approach is not 100% accurate and could identify one or many devices.
Process
Refers to any operation or set of operations performed upon
Personal Information
or sets of
Personal Information
, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure, or destruction.
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Pseudonymous Identifiers are unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s). Pseudonymous Identifiers cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link Pseudonymous Identifiers to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share Pseudonymous Identifiers from doing the same.
Pseudonymous Identifiers are important in digital advertising because they help distinguish browsers or devices over time across different contexts. This is useful for example, to limit the number of times that we show the same ad to one device, to measure the performance of ads, and to target and select personalised ads.
We may incorporate any one of the following types of information in a Quantcast Pseudonymous Identifier:
Third Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
First Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
IP Addresses
.
Hashed email addresses, which are email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email.
Third party identifiers
Device ID
.
Application ID: an ID that is unique to your mobile device and a particular app on your device.
Application Session ID: like an application ID, except that it is reset periodically (e.g., many browsers reset these after 30 minutes of inactivity).
Exchange User ID: an ID that is sent to us with a
Bid Request
that identifies the device or browser where an ad is to be shown.
Probabilistic Identifier
.
Publisher User ID: digital publishers that use the Solutions can send us an ID to use in the Solutions. The digital publisher hashes or encrypts an identifier available to it. The resulting ID is pseudonymous because it does not directly identify you, but it would be consistent across different publishers, so the Publisher User ID can be used to match data.
TLS Session ID: when you visit a website
URL
that starts with “https” instead of “http”, that means you have an encrypted connection between your browser and the site. If one of our
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
loads on the site, that call to our server will also be encrypted. The Session ID identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server.
Pseudonymous/Pseudonymised Information
Pseudonymised Information is
Personal Information
that has been
Processed
in such a manner that the information can no longer be attributed to a specific user without the use of additional information, provided that such additional information is kept separately and is subject to technical and organisational measures to ensure that the personal information is not attributed to a specific user.
Segment Data
Segment Data is imported data that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by
Clients
or
Third Party Data Partners
. Segment Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
and/or
Offline Data
as well as
Attributes
,
Inferences
, or
Interests
inferred from that data. This category of information is typically called “Segment Data” because it identifies groups of users who fall into advertising segments (e.g., “auto buyers,” “shoe shoppers,” or “women 25-35”). These segments represent groups of users that share (or that are inferred to share) one or more certain characteristics in common (e.g., a client may want to advertise to a segment of “male shoppers who are interested in sports fashion”). These groupings are created by using the intersection of different segments (in the example given, an audience that is simultaneously in the “male”, “shopper”, and “sports fashion” segments). A segment may be identified with a
Label
(in which case it is referred to as “
Label Data
”).
Software Development Kit (SDK)
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
Tag
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
TCF
See
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
TCF Purpose/TCF Special Purpose
The
TCF
has standardised certain Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features and the descriptions of data processing activity in the digital advertising industry. Through this standardisation, the digital advertising industry can ascribe consistent meanings for the permissions that data subjects give via the
TCF
. This also ensures a consistent experience for users because they then do not have to read and understand an entirely different set of Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features for each website they visit.
Because of the benefits of standardising the purposes across the industry, we use the
TCF
to establish the legal basis to
Process
Personal Information
and use the Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features in our Privacy Policy to describe much of our data processing activity.
For detailed descriptions of TCF “Purpose” or TCF “Special Purpose”, see
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
Third Party Cookie/Cookie ID
See
Cookie
.
Third Party Data
Third Party Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via API by third party
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
. Third Party Data may include
Segment Data
.
Training Data
Training Data is
Pseudonymous Information
that we receive from Clients and third party data providers,  where the actual
Attributes
or
Interests
of the underlying users are known (even though their actual identities are not known to Quantcast). The Training Data is segmented across various
Interests
and
Attributes
, such as shopping interests (e.g., automotive, technology, or restaurants), business and occupation (e.g., management, IT professional or retail), media interests (e.g., cinema, video games, TV), income range, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information and used  for data modeling purposes. We use the Training Data to train statistical models to make
Inferences
. When our systems subsequently receive
Event Data
relating to a user, we can infer whether the
Event Data
displays characteristics similar to the Training Data. If the
Event Data
displays characteristics that are similar to the Training Data, we can infer from that the likely
Attributes
and
Interests
of the user to whom the
Event Data
relates. These
Inferences
are then used to deliver advertising and provide aggregated, analytical reporting to our Clients.
URL (Uniform Resource Locator)
A URL, also known as a web address, is a reference to a unique web resource that specifies its location on a computer network. Most commonly, a URL points to a web page. URLs can also point to a document, image, video, etc. URLs often use plain text, such as
www.quantcast.com
; in that case, the domain name must be processed by a Domain Name Server in order to convert the domain name into an
IP Address
.
Effective August 29th 2023
to
February 12th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Last Updated: April 21, 2023
Advertising Exchange
See
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
.
Attributes/Attribute Information
Attributes are known, observed, or inferred characteristics. Examples of attributes are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Attributes may be derived from
Event Data
, Bid Request Data,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
. Quantcast associates attributes with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Audience
An Audience is a group of devices and/or users who are known to or are estimated to have certain common characteristics. A characteristic in common may be an
Interest
, such as an interest in cooking. A characteristic in common may be an
Attribute
, such as being male, visited a particular digital property, or viewed or interacted with a particular advertisement. One type of Audience is a group who have visited a Client’s digital property. Another type of Audience is a group who have been shown, or may potentially be shown, a Client’s advertisement.
Audience Insights
Audience Insights are data collected, or data that is inferred from data collected, about an
Audience
. Audience Insights are aggregated, anonymised data and are not
Personal Information
. An example of an Audience Insight is a report that a given audience is estimated to be 70% male and 3 times as likely to be interested in cooking compared to the general population.
Quantcast provides Audience Insights based on
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferred Data
to Clients. Audience Insights enable Clients to better understand the audiences who engage with their content and ads.
Bid Request/Bid Request Data
A Bid Request is a request by a digital content publisher (e.g., website owner, app developer, streaming content provider, etc.) for an offer to place an ad in the publisher’s digital content. For example, when you visit an ad-supported web page, Bid Requests are sent by, or on behalf of, the publisher of the web page to multiple parties that may want to show an ad to you. Those parties can bid for the opportunity to show an ad in an auction, and one ad is selected to show on the page. Bid Requests typically go through an
Advertising Exchange
. This all happens via digital communication between computer servers in less than a second. The contents of the Bid Request may include information about the ad unit (the container in the digital content that will display the ad), the digital content, the device it will be seen on, and your engagement with the publisher’s digital content, so that prospective buyers can choose whether to bid and how much. For most cases, the contents of the Bid Request are defined by the OpenRTB industry standard (
https://iabtechlab.com/standards/openrtb/
), though not all fields are necessarily included in every Bid Request. Bid Request Data consists of data provided in the Bid Request and will commonly consist of a
Pseudonymous Identifier
(if available), the content that the ad would serve in (such as the web page, app, video, etc.), the type of device the ad would be served on (i.e., your device type), the approximate geographic location of your device, the size of the ad, the auction ID, and consent information, such as
TCF Signals
. Bid Request Data also includes Quantcast’s response to the Bid Request, such as whether Quantcast bid on the ad opportunity.
Browsing Data
Browsing Data is information collected relating to your
Online
activity or behaviour. Browsing Data is generated when a
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
installed by a Client on its digital property loads and sends information to us. This includes the website
URL
of the page you are visiting, often along with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, as well as fields of information that may be automatically included from
HTTP Header Information
, such as referral
URLs
(which is the
URL
that directed your browser to the website where an advertisement was served to you).
Browsing Data is included in
Event Data
.
Client Data
Client Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform by a particular advertiser Client for use on its behalf. Client Data is
Pseudonymised Information,
which defines groups of users. These groups might typically be based on users’
Online Data
or
Offline Data
, or other characteristics or aspects of users’ relationship with the Client. The groups are then used by Quantcast to help deliver advertising campaigns to the right
Audiences
on behalf of the Client.
Cookie
A Cookie is a small bit of text that is sent to and saved on your computer or device when you visit a website. A Cookie is associated with a single web browser profile; each web browser and browser profile that you use on your device will have separate Cookies. Cookies allow a website to recognise a browser and are commonly used to store user preferences or identifiers, which enables us to collect and use information about browsers over time and across different internet content. Cookies enable us to understand more about users and the content they are visiting over time, which in turn can be used to improve our Clients’ advertising activities and the quality of advertising you experience. The identifiers we store in Cookies are
Pseudonymous Information
; in other words, they cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link a
Pseudonymous Identifier
to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
or
Pseudonymous Information
from doing the same. Browsers have controls that enable users to clear or block Cookies. See your browser help for details.
There are two forms of cookies: First Party Cookies and Third Party Cookies.
A “First Party Cookie” is limited in scope to a particular website you visit (“
First Party Cookie
”). In some instances, Quantcast is able to store or access information in a First Party Cookie. If
www.example.com
incorporates Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
into their website, and if you visit www.example.com, Quantcast may set a First-Party Cookie associated with www.example.com. In these instances, Quantcast can store a
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the First-Party Cookie, but because it is a First Party Cookie, Quantcast can only access that
Pseudonymous Identifier
in the context of your visits to that site.
A “Third Party Cookie” is a cookie associated with an internet domain that is different from the one you are visiting. For example, if you are visiting
www.example.com
and a Quantcast
Pixel, Tag or SDK
on that website is able to set a cookie associated with quantcast.com, that is a Third Party Cookie. That same cookie will be accessible to Quantcast on other sites that also incorporate Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
. Quantcast uses
Pseudonymous Identifiers
stored in Third Party Cookies in order to collect information across multiple websites.
Quantcast Cookies placed on your device have a maximum expiry period of 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). Each time you visit a website and a First or Third Party Cookie is placed on your device, the placement of a Cookie begins a new expiry period of up to 13 months (or such shorter period as described in the Privacy Policy “Information Collection” section). All Quantcast Cookies automatically cease providing any data to Quantcast from your browser upon expiration.
Cookie ID/Identifier
A Cookie ID is a unique string of characters that we store in a
Cookie
that allows us to identify a single web browser instance over time and across different web sites. Our Cookie IDs are
Pseudonymous Identifiers
. A
First Party Cookie
ID is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
First-Party Cookie
set by the owner of the website you are visiting. A
Third Party Cookie ID
is a unique
Pseudonymous Identifier
relating to the
Third-Party Cookie
set by Quantcast.
Cookie Syncing/Matching
In the online advertising industry, Cookie Syncing/Matching generally refers to a process through which two entities who each, and separately, identify a device using their own
Pseudonymous Identifier
can determine which of their respective
Pseudonymous Identifiers
may relate to the same device. For example, Quantcast may pseudonymously identify a device as “cookie ID 123.” Company B may pseudonymously identify the same device as “cookie ID ABC.” Cookie Syncing/Matching enables Quantcast and Company B to recognise that their respective
Pseudonymous identifiers
may relate to the device that Quantcast records as “cookie ID 123”.
Quantcast’s Cookie Syncing activities work similarly. If you visit a website that incorporates
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
from Quantcast, Company B may match its own pseudonymous identifiers to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(this creates a record of matching pseudonymous identifiers for Company B). Once a match is established, Company B can reference a particular device when communicating with Quantcast, using Quantcast’s
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
The Cookie Syncing/Matching process does not in itself result in Quantcast sharing
Attributes
related to Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with Company B. The Cookie Syncing/Matching enables transactions between the parties at a later time; for example, in the case of an Advertising Exchange sending a Bid Request, the Bid Request can contain a previously synched
Pseudonymous Identifier.
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
In the online advertising industry, Cross-Media Matching generally refers to a process through which Quantcast links identifiers across a user’s consumption of various media (e.g. audio, video, websites, apps, etc) because such identifiers are known to or
Inferred
to relate to the same user. Matching/Linking may be undertaken for consumption of media on a single device and for consumption of media on more than one device. As an example, if you visit a digital property using your mobile phone and later visit that same digital property using a browser on your laptop or make visits to several different digital properties using a browser over a period of time, Quantcast may initially determine that these visits are made by different users and assign each device user their own profile.
If, however, Quantcast finds there is sufficient commonality between the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with the consumption of media, Quantcast will assess that those identifiers may be joined as they are likely to emanate from the same user. This assessment is“probabilistic”– in other words, it uses statistical techniques to determine that the identifiers to be matched have a higher likelihood of relating to the same device and/or user.
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers provide
Third Party Data
to Quantcast, or provide a platform through which Clients can provide
Client Data
to Quantcast. These companies either directly licence first and third party
Audience
Segment Data
from different sources (such as
Online Data
and
Offline Data
) to businesses or provide a platform through which Clients can collect, organise, and activate such data for Quantcast’s use in connection with the Solutions. We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers
in order to sync/match identifiers to effectively integrate with their services (see
Cookie Syncing/Matching
).
Device ID/Identifier
A unique string of characters that can be used to identify a device set by the developer of the device’s operating system (e.g., a mobile phone, tablet, TV, or console). Device Identifiers (or “
Device IDs
”) serve a similar purpose as
Cookies
and can be used to provide personalised advertising. A Device ID is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
A Mobile Advertising ID (or “
MAID
”) is a Device ID assigned to a mobile device by the mobile device operating system. Typically, the device user can reset or turn off the ID via the device’s settings. A MAID is referred to as the IDFA (ID for Advertisers) on iOS devices and GAID (Google Ad ID) on Android mobile devices.
Device Configuration/Device Information
Information about a device or its configuration, transmitted from the device, and typically associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
. The information includes browser, app, or other information about the device (such as device type, screen size and resolution, date and time, and language), which also may include a
User Agent.
Some Device Information is derived from
HTTP Request Header Information
.
Event Data
Information collected relating to your
Online
activity/behaviour, which may include
Personal Information
in
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
,
Browsing Data
and
TCF Signals
. Event Data is generated when a
Pixel, Tag, or SDK
installed on a Client’s digital property loads and sends information to us. Event Data can also be collected from ads, when you view or click on an ad which contains a
Tag
.
Exchange/Advertising Exchange
A marketplace platform that facilitates automated, real-time, auction-based buying and selling of ad inventory (which are spaces available on sites and apps to display ads). An Advertising Exchange receives
Bid Requests
from digital publishers and forwards them to advertisers, or to entities like Quantcast who act on behalf of advertisers. Advertisers, or their agents, respond to
Bid Requests
with a bid amount and an advertisement to provide to a user if they win the auction.
First Party Cookie
See
Cookie
.
HTTP Request Header Information
HTTP headers are defined by internet standards and contain a number of data fields designed to facilitate communication and interoperability on the internet. On the web, your web browser controls which headers are sent and what the contents are. We receive the headers when a request is sent over the internet to our system, such as when a
Pixel
loads in your web browser. We also might receive information that has been derived from the HTTP headers from another party, such as in a
Bid Request
. We use a subset of the header fields for purposes described in the Privacy Policy, which includes:
IP Address
Cookie
(if available)
User Agent, which is a string (a line of text) identifying the device type, browser type, and version that the user is using to access the web server (“User Agent”)
Date, which includes the precise time of access
Referral
URL
, which is the web page you were on when the request was sent
TLS Session ID, which identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server
Content-Language, which is the languages of the intended audience for the enclosed content
Detailed documentation related to HTTP header information can be found online in a general search for “HTTP header information fields”.
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework (“TCF”)
The IAB Transparency & Consent Framework, or “TCF,” is a standardised industry program active in countries governed by the GDPR, and designed for notifying users about data
Processing
by companies involved in digital advertising on sites and apps that users visit, and for establishing a legal basis for that
Processing
.
The TCF is designed to be used on digital properties, such as websites and apps. The TCF incorporates a consent dialog that displays when users visit a website or app, giving them information about vendors, the data they collect, and the purposes for which they collect it. It also offers an opportunity for users to give or change their permissions for such data collection and use.
The TCF allows Quantcast to work with publishers of websites and other digital properties in a consistent manner using standardised technical specifications to:
(a) provide a link to Quantcast's Privacy Policy, as well as transparency about Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
, the specific purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
, and Quantcast's legal basis for such
Processing
, directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user;
(b) allow the user, in a granular manner, to express their consent or refusal to consent, to Quantcast's (i) use of
Cookies
, and (ii) the purposes of Quantcast's
Processing
, which are the reasons why Quantcast
Processes
the personal data of users (“
TCF Purposes”
), including where Quantcast relies on the user’s consent for such
Processing
directly on the website or other digital property that the user is accessing;
(c) allow the user to object to Quantcast's
Processing
of
Personal Information
(for purposes where Quantcast relies on legitimate interests) directly on the website or other digital property accessed by the user.
Using the
TCF
allows publishers of websites or other digital properties to provide information about Quantcast’s
Processing
to users in a consistent manner. The user-facing disclosures presented by these digital properties are sourced from information that Quantcast has registered with the
TCF's
“
Global Vendor List
”, a publicly accessible, machine-readable repository of information about TCF-compliant vendors, like Quantcast. This information includes Quantcast’s Privacy Policy
URL
, the purposes for which it
Processes
Personal Information
, and its legal basis for each of these purposes. As the description of these purposes and minimum standards for disclosures are standardised across all TCF participants, Quantcast knows how operators of websites or other digital properties using the TCF are making disclosures about Quantcast and can have confidence in such disclosures.
In addition, the TCF enables publishers of websites or other digital properties to create and send to Quantcast a standardised technical signal that indicates (A) whether Quantcast’s transparency disclosures were provided to a user; (B) whether or not the user has consented to Quantcast’s
Processing
and/or each purpose for which Quantcast sought the user's consent; and (c) whether the user objected to Quantcast’s
Processing
and/or any purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
on the basis of its legitimate interests (the “
TCF Signal
”).
TCF Signal is collected via Quantcast
Tags
if the digital property on which the
Tag
is implemented has also implemented a TCF-compatible Consent Management Platform, which is a company or organisation that centralises and manages transparency for, and consent and objections of, the user (“
CMP
”) . In addition, TCF Signal is received by Quantcast as part of the
Bid Requests
it receives from
Advertising Exchanges
. Quantcast is able to read the standardised TCF Signal and will only
Process
Personal Information
for purposes to which the user has consented (where consent is the legal basis) or not objected (where legitimate interests is the legal basis) in order to provide the Solutions.
Read more about the TCF here
https://iabeurope.eu/transparency-consent-framework/
Imported Data
Imported Data is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“
API
”). Imported Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include information relating to your
Online data
or
Offline data
or other information that Clients or partners have about you. For examples of Imported Data provided to Quantcast, see
Client Data
or
Third Party Data
.
Imported Data (Client)
See
Client Data
.
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
See
Third Party Data
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Typically, in digital advertising we distinguish between precise and imprecise geolocation information.
Precise geolocation usually comes from GPS coordinates from mobile devices, and can have precision up to about one metre. Quantcast does not use precise geolocation data and we request that Clients, partners, and third parties refrain from sending precise geolocation to us. If a party inadvertently sends it, we do not use it in the Solutions and it is removed from our systems within 30 days.
Imprecise geolocation is lower precision, and refers to a general geographic area, for example a country, region, city or division of a metropolitan area, and/or some combination of these, and is often derived from GPS coordinates or from
IP Addresses
.
Inferences/Inferred Data
Inferences, or Inferred Data, is information that is inferred from data that we have collected about a device, such as
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
, or
Third Party Data
. Our inferences are made using algorithms that estimate the likelihood that the user of a device has particular interests or characteristics. The Inferences are then associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
as part of a set of device
Attributes
.
For example, if a device frequently visits sports websites, it might be inferred that there is some probability the user of that device likes sports. Similarly, if a device frequently visits an airline provider’s website, it might be inferred that there is some probability a user of that device likes to travel. Other Inferences include things such as
Interests
, income range, gender, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information.
Inferences associated with any individual device have a high degree of uncertainty. Inferences become more accurate when used to estimate the characteristics of a large group of devices, like an
Audience
.
Interests
Interests are known, observed, or inferred non-demographic characteristics. Interests are associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to characterise particular interests of users. Examples of Interests include “cooking” and “outdoor activities”. Interests may be derived from
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and
Inferences/Inferred Data
.
IP Address
An IP (“
Internet Protocol
”) Address is a unique numerical label corresponding to a computer or device. Computers use IP Addresses to identify each other and know where to send information over the Internet. For example, when you open a web page in your browser a request is made to a server for the web page content. The server knows where to send the content based on the IP Address contained in the request. Computers or other devices are assigned an IP Address from the network the device is on. A device’s IP Address may change over time or as a device changes locations. Also, an IP Address can refer to multiple devices, for example if the devices are behind an internet router.
An IP Address that has been hashed, or encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email, is treated as a
Pseudonymous Identifier
.
Labels/Label Data
Labels, or Label Data, are descriptors associated with
Pseudonymous Identifiers
to denote particular groups of users that can be subsequently used to index all
Pseudonymous Identifiers
associated with that label. An analogy would be applying a “label” to messages in an email inbox - you might decide to label messages from work as “Work”, family members as “Family,” and so on. These labels then help you readily index and recall particular categories of email.
Labels processed by Quantcast are:
Labels from
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
: these are category Labels (e.g., male, female, age 21-24) acquired from third party data partners relating to a
Pseudonymous Identifier
;
Custom-
Client Data
Labels: these are custom category labels set by Clients corresponding to a device associated with the identifier visiting their digital property (e.g., byline of the news article accessed by the user) or product name (of the product accessed by the user).
Inferred Data
Labels: these are inferred category Labels about a user using a device associated with a
Pseudonymous Identifier
, e.g., inferred age, inferred gender, inferred interest.
Example Labels are “male” and “visited XYZ website”. Labels may be inferred information (see
Inferences/Inferred Data
) or may be
Imported Data
(see
Client Data
and
Third Party Data
).
Log Data
Log Data is an industry term that is generally used to refer to data collected from interactions with computer systems, and is used differently by different companies. For purposes of describing our
Processing
, we use more precise terms, such as
Pseudonymous Identifiers
,
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Client Data
,
Third Party Data
, and/or
Inferences/Inferred Data
, which are all types of data that can be subsumed within the general industry term “Log Data”. Some elements within Log Data, when isolated from the
Pseudonymous Identifiers
, will not qualify as
Personal Information
. For example, a single time zone and publisher
URL
without an associated
Pseudonymous Identifier
would not qualify as
Personal Information
.
Online Data
Data relating to a user’s interaction with digital media including websites, apps and streaming media services.
Offline Data
Data relating to a user’s real-world purchases and/or activity.
Panel
A Panel is a set of individuals who have consented to participate in market research and share information about themselves, their preferences and interests for purposes of research and market analytics.
This information can then be used as the basis for learning or making inferences about a larger population. For example, if a number of people on a Panel share that they visit a particular news website, and of those people, most of them are male and over the age of 50, we might extrapolate from that and say that most of the audience for that website is male and over 50.
Another way to use Panel data is to compare Panel results to the estimates that we have made using our algorithms in order to score the effectiveness of our algorithms. So, if our algorithm predicted for the same news website that most of the audience is under 30, we would learn that our algorithm might be wrong.
Personal Information
Personal Information refers to information that identifies, relates to, describes, is capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to you, your browser, or your device. We use the term “personal information” to refer to information that is subject to protection under data protection and privacy laws and regulatory regimes around the world. Depending on the jurisdiction, such information may be referred to as “personal data.”
The Personal Information
Processed
by Quantcast is limited to
Pseudonymised Identifiers.
Quantcast does not
Process
Personal Information
that directly identifies you as an individual, and that can be used to directly identify you without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs are computer code embedded in a website that we use to enable the Solutions. We tend to use the terms Pixels, Tags, and SDKs interchangeably. Clients that use the Solutions can put them on their sites, in their apps, or in their ads in order to send us information that is then used in the Solutions. When a Pixel, Tag, or SDK loads and calls our servers, we receive
HTTP Header Information
, along with other information that is configured by the Client who is using the Solutions. That information includes IDs from partners, so we know which partner the data is coming from.
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs include:
Sync Pixels: These are used to exchange and match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
between companies that participate in the digital advertising market. By matching, they can synchronise these identifiers to deliver and measure ads.
Tags or Pixels in ads: When a digital ad loads on a page, it can include a Tag or Pixel that we use on behalf of Clients to gather information about where and when the ad was served. This can help to measure ad performance, to ensure ads are shown where intended, and to learn in order to improve ad effectiveness.
Tags or Pixels on publisher Clients’ web pages: For publisher Clients that use the Solutions, they can put our Tags on their sites. The information we collect then enables the Client to learn about their audience, and it enables us to build models for better targeting ads.
Tags or Pixels used by advertiser Clients: When advertiser Clients use our Tags or Pixels, they send us information so we can learn about their customers in order to help them better target their ads.
SDKs: SDKs are bits of computer code that mobile app publisher Clients incorporate into their apps, enabling them to send us information. Similar to Pixels or Tags, the information enables us to offer the Solutions as described in our Privacy Policy.
Probabilistic Identifier
A Probabilistic Identifier is a
Pseudonymous Identifier
which we create by combining
Pseudonymous Identifiers
(such as
IP Addresses
) with
Bid Request Data
and/or
Event Data
using non-deterministic, statistical methods to estimate the likelihood that a group of devices may be used by the same user or household, if applicable law or rules allow. For example, we might be able to determine that because a mobile phone and a TV are on the same network, they are likely in the same house. We can then use that information to select and measure ads. Unlike using
Cookie IDs
, this approach is not 100% accurate and could identify one or many devices.
Process
Refers to any operation or set of operations performed upon
Personal Information
or sets of
Personal Information
, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, consultation, use, disclosure by transmission, dissemination or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure, or destruction.
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Pseudonymous Identifiers are unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s). Pseudonymous Identifiers cannot be linked to you as an individual without technical efforts to add additional information, which Quantcast does not have. We do not attempt to link Pseudonymous Identifiers to you as an individual, and we prohibit other parties with whom we share Pseudonymous Identifiers from doing the same.
Pseudonymous Identifiers are important in digital advertising because they help distinguish browsers or devices over time across different contexts. This is useful for example, to limit the number of times that we show the same ad to one device, to measure the performance of ads, and to target and select personalised ads.
We may incorporate any one of the following types of information in a Quantcast Pseudonymous Identifier:
Third Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
First Party Cookie ID: see
Cookie ID
.
IP Addresses
.
Hashed email addresses, which are email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email.
Device ID
.
Application ID: an ID that is unique to your mobile device and a particular app on your device.
Application Session ID: like an application ID, except that it is reset periodically (e.g., many browsers reset these after 30 minutes of inactivity).
Exchange User ID: an ID that is sent to us with a
Bid Request
that identifies the device or browser where an ad is to be shown.
Probabilistic Identifier
.
Publisher User ID: digital publishers that use the Solutions can send us an ID to use in the Solutions. The digital publisher hashes or encrypts an identifier available to it. The resulting ID is pseudonymous because it does not directly identify you, but it would be consistent across different publishers, so the Publisher User ID can be used to match data.
TLS Session ID: when you visit a website
URL
that starts with “https” instead of “http”, that means you have an encrypted connection between your browser and the site. If one of our
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
loads on the site, that call to our server will also be encrypted. The Session ID identifies a particular session of communication between the browser and the server.
Pseudonymous/Pseudonymised Information
Pseudonymised Information is
Personal Information
that has been
Processed
in such a manner that the information can no longer be attributed to a specific user without the use of additional information, provided that such additional information is kept separately and is subject to technical and organisational measures to ensure that the personal information is not attributed to a specific user.
Segment Data
Segment Data is imported data that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by
Clients
or
Third Party Data Partners
. Segment Data is
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
and/or
Offline Data
as well as
Attributes
,
Inferences
, or
Interests
inferred from that data. This category of information is typically called “Segment Data” because it identifies groups of users who fall into advertising segments (e.g., “auto buyers,” “shoe shoppers,” or “women 25-35”). These segments represent groups of users that share (or that are inferred to share) one or more certain characteristics in common (e.g., a client may want to advertise to a segment of “male shoppers who are interested in sports fashion”). These groupings are created by using the intersection of different segments (in the example given, an audience that is simultaneously in the “male”, “shopper”, and “sports fashion” segments). A segment may be identified with a
Label
(in which case it is referred to as “
Label Data
”).
Software Development Kit (SDK)
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
Tag
See
Pixels, Tags, and SDKs
.
TCF
See
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
TCF Purpose/TCF Special Purpose
The
TCF
has standardised certain Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features and the descriptions of data processing activity in the digital advertising industry. Through this standardisation, the digital advertising industry can ascribe consistent meanings for the permissions that data subjects give via the
TCF
. This also ensures a consistent experience for users because they then do not have to read and understand an entirely different set of Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features for each website they visit.
Because of the benefits of standardising the purposes across the industry, we use the
TCF
to establish the legal basis to
Process
Personal Information
and use the Purposes, Special Purposes and Special Features in our Privacy Policy to describe much of our data processing activity.
For detailed descriptions of TCF “Purpose” or TCF “Special Purpose”, see
IAB Transparency & Consent Framework
.
Third Party Cookie/Cookie ID
See
Cookie
.
Third Party Data
Third Party Data is
Imported Data
that is uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via API by third party
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
. Third Party Data may include
Segment Data
.
Training Data
Training Data is
Pseudonymous Information
that we receive from Clients and third party data providers, where the actual
Attributes
or
Interests
of the underlying users are known (even though their actual identities are not known to Quantcast). The Training Data is segmented across various
Interests
and
Attributes
, such as shopping interests (e.g., automotive, technology, or restaurants), business and occupation (e.g., management, IT professional or retail), media interests (e.g., cinema, video games, TV), income range, age, marital status, and other socio-economic information and used for data modeling purposes. We use the Training Data to train statistical models to make
Inferences
. When our systems subsequently receive
Event Data
relating to a user, we can infer whether the
Event Data
displays characteristics similar to the Training Data. If the
Event Data
displays characteristics that are similar to the Training Data, we can infer from that the likely
Attributes
and
Interests
of the user to whom the
Event Data
relates. These
Inferences
are then used to deliver advertising and provide aggregated, analytical reporting to our Clients.
URL (Uniform Resource Locator)
A URL, also known as a web address, is a reference to a unique web resource that specifies its location on a computer network. Most commonly, a URL points to a web page. URLs can also point to a document, image, video, etc. URLs often use plain text, such as
www.quantcast.com
; in that case, the domain name must be processed by a Domain Name Server in order to convert the domain name into an
IP Address
.
Effective August 29th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Last Update: May 16, 2023
This Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Publisher Partners is for Quantcast publisher partners and clients (“publishers”) who include Quantcast code, such as pixels or tags, on their websites for Quantcast Measure or the Quantcast QID Module in Prebid. It documents certain privacy-related responsibilities for publishers, which are in addition to the
US Data Privacy Addendum
(the “DPA”). If there is any conflict between this document and the DPA, the DPA is the controlling document.
Privacy regulation around the world is dynamic. Quantcast may update this document from time to time at its own discretion in order to keep pace with changes in privacy rules and risks, and industry best practices, as well as to ensure users’ rights are honored appropriately.
Quantcast may take reasonable measures to ensure that data processed in its services is collected and processed in accordance with privacy rules and industry best practices. We may review locations where data is collected and may refuse to accept data that is not collected in a manner consistent with the approaches described in this document.
This document does not contain legal advice, and adherence to this document does not ensure legal compliance. Publishers must ensure for themselves that they operate in a legal manner, based on their particular circumstances. In the event of any conflict between this document and applicable laws or regulations, the laws or regulations should prevail.
Terminology
This document uses “user” or “users” as interchangeable with “data subject” or “consumer” or other equivalent terms from various rules.
When we say rules, we mean laws, regulations, and industry self-regulatory codes that are applicable to the processing of personal data in relation to Quantcast’s services. Quantcast has a global footprint, including operations in the EU, the UK, and the US (including California), so those jurisdictions’ rules are applicable to Quantcast for data about users who reside in those jurisdictions.
We also will use “personal data” as interchangeable with terms such as, “personal information.” Personal data processed by Quantcast’s service is pseudonymous, including but not limited to IP address, cookie or device IDs, and other identifiers used for advertising-related purposes. In the case where a publisher has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Industry standards and self-regulatory programs
Quantcast supports and participates in industry self-regulatory programs, and generally implements industry standards and best practices when it comes to handling personal data. Publishers are responsible for ensuring their own implementation of self-regulatory rules and industry best practices, in particular related to providing transparency and choice to users in places where data is collected or used by Quantcast’s services.
Controller, processor, service provider, vendor, etc.
Unfortunately, terms used across jurisdictions that describe the relationships between parties sharing data are not interchangeable. Quantcast determines its role based on applicable law and the facts of its processing of personal data.
Where the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR applies, Quantcast is a “controller” of personal data collected using Quantcast tags and pixels dropped on your sites. This document, together with the Quantcast agreement under which you access our services, addresses our respective GDPR compliance responsibilities. Where US state privacy law applies, Quantcast acts as a “third party” unless agreed otherwise.
Notice/Transparency and Choice
Laws, self-regulatory rules, and industry best practice require users be notified about processing of personal data, and be offered a choice – either opt in or opt out — with respect to that processing.
When deploying Quantcast tags or pixels, including Quantcast Measure tags and the QID prebid module, publishers are responsible to make sure that users are given notice and choice that is required for Quantcast to be able to collect and process the data. And, of course, publishers have to make sure of notice and choice for their own collection and processing of personal data.
At minimum, and further subject to any other applicable laws or rules, notice must include the fact that third parties are collecting and processing users’ data, along with information about the data collected, the means of collection, the purposes for processing (including interest-based advertising and advertising measurement), and how users can exercise their choices. Laws or rules in some jurisdictions, including the EU and the UK, would require that Quantcast be specifically identified in the notice, and a link to Quantcast’s
privacy policy
be included.
Quantcast’s methods of collection include, depending on particular circumstances, cookies, pixels, JavaScript tags, probabilistic device matching, and cross-device matching (using passively collected data). The data Quantcast collects includes information about users’ visits to sites, such as IP address, device information, timestamp, referrer URL, etc.
Quantcast implements choice using industry standard methods, and will be responsible for honoring that choice with respect to personal data within Quantcast’s services.
For their part, publishers need to provide access to the choice using industry standard and legally compliant methods, depending on the applicable laws and rules. Publishers should, at minimum, and subject to any additional legal requirements provide a link to the geographically relevant industry opt-out page, including but not limited to
YourAdChoices
and the
NAI
in the US,
Your Online Choices
in Europe, and
Your Ad Choices
in Canada.
In all cases, publishers should have user-facing privacy policies that are prominently linked from their homepages and from content (sites, apps, etc.) where personal data are collected or used.
Privacy policies will adhere to applicable laws, as well as industry self-regulatory requirements and industry best practices. At minimum, policies should disclose the fact that third parties are collecting personal data for advertising-related purposes, and should describe the methods of collection, as described above. Particular circumstances and applicable rules may create additional requirements.
Where consent (opt-in) is required prior to setting cookies or collecting data, such as in Europe under ePrivacy, the GDPR, and the UK GDPR, publishers are responsible to make sure that tags or pixels don’t fire until that consent is obtained. Publishers must not send to Quantcast, or enable Quantcast to collect, personal data without having established required permissions, and certainly not if the user has explicitly opted out.
EU and the UK
: The industry standard means for ensuring notice and choice for vendors like Quantcast in the EU and the UK is the IAB Transparency and Consent Framework. Quantcast is vendor ID 11. Quantcast’s required purposes and associated legal bases are viewable in the Global Vendor List. Because Quantcast is subject to European law, the TCF should be used for all users in the EU or the UK, even if the publisher has no operations in Europe. Alternatively, such publishers may elect not to introduce data about EU or UK users into Quantcast’s services. Quantcast Choice is a leading, and TCF compliant, Consent Management Platform. Proper use of Quantcast Choice will meet these TCF requirements.
Publishers not using the TCF for EU or UK users may, only with Quantcast’s express written permission, use a legally compliant alternative means to ensure Quantcast’s legal basis for using cookies, where applicable, and for processing the data. This includes that Quantcast must be identified as a controller of the user’s personal data, and a link to Quantcast’s privacy policy must be provided. Quantcast may in the future require TCF. In any case, publishers should not allow data to be collected by, or transmitted to, Quantcast on their sites without user consent, and must be able to provide proof of consent to Quantcast, upon request.
Privacy policies in the EU and the UK need to include a link to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) opt-out page, located at youronlinechoices.com.
US
: In the US, along with other requirements laid out here, privacy policies need to include links to an industry standard opt out page, like those offered by the NAI or DAA.
California
: The CCPA applies for users in California. Publishers need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “share” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable. Unless agreed otherwise with Quantcast, Quantcast acts as a “third-party,” as defined under the CCPA, with respect to personal data it collects or receives from publishers’ sites. Quantcast will check the US Privacy String,
as specified by the IAB
.
Other US states:
Applicable state privacy law applies for users in Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, Virginia and elsewhere. Publishers need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “targeted advertising” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
US State Privacy Addendum
: The processing of US users’ personal data in connection with Quantcast’s services shall be governed by the US Data Privacy Addendum,
which is available here
.
Access and Deletion
Under applicable law, including the EU GDPR, the UK GDPR, and the US state privacy laws, when acting as a controller or third party, Quantcast will be responsible for honoring users’ access and deletion requests with respect to their personal data that is within Quantcast’s services.
Other Matters
Sensitive data
. Because Quantcast’s services are not intended for processing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category data” under applicable law or data about children under the age of 16, publishers must not transmit to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect any such data. Quantcast tags and pixels may not be deployed on content that is directed at children under the age of 16. Sensitive or special category data includes the types of data listed in Article 9 of the EU GDPR, Section 1798.140 of the CCPA (as amended by the CPRA), or any equivalent term under applicable law.
Directly identifying personal data
. Quantcast’s services are not designed to process directly identifying personal data, such as names or email addresses, and publishers may not send such information to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect it. If a publisher has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Reidentification
. Under no circumstances will publishers use any information collected or generated by Quantcast’s services to identify an individual user.
Effective August 26th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners documents certain privacy-related responsibilities for advertisers and agencies, which are in addition to the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
and the
International Data Privacy Addendum
(collectively, the “DPAs”). If there is any conflict between this document and the DPAs, the DPAs are the controlling documents.
Privacy regulation around the world is dynamic. Quantcast may update this document from time to time at its own discretion in order to keep pace with changes in privacy rules and risks, and industry best practices, as well as to ensure users’ rights are honored appropriately.
Quantcast may take reasonable measures to ensure that data processed in its services is collected and processed in accordance with privacy rules and industry best practices. We may review locations where data is collected and may refuse to accept data that is not collected in a manner consistent with the approaches described in this document.
Terminology
This document uses “user” or “users” as interchangeable with “data subject” or “consumer” or other equivalent terms from various rules.
When we say rules, we mean laws, regulations, and industry self-regulatory codes that are applicable to the processing of personal data in relation to Quantcast’s services. Quantcast has a global footprint, including operations in the EU, the UK, and the US (including California), so those jurisdictions’ rules are applicable to Quantcast for data about users who reside in those jurisdictions.
We also will use “personal data” as interchangeable with terms such as, “personal information.” Personal data processed by Quantcast’s service is pseudonymous, including but not limited to IP address, cookie or device IDs, and other identifiers used for advertising-related purposes. In the case where a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Industry standards and self-regulatory programs
Quantcast supports and participates in industry self-regulatory programs, and generally implements industry standards and best practices when it comes to handling personal data. Partners and clients are responsible for ensuring their own implementation of self- regulatory rules and industry best practices, in particular related to providing transparency and choice to users in places where data is collected or used by Quantcast’s services.
Controller, processor, service provider, vendor, etc
.
Unfortunately, terms describing the relationships between parties sharing data are not interchangeable. Quantcast determines its role based on applicable law and the facts of its processing of personal data. In many relationships with advertiser partners or clients, Quantcast is a controller or joint controller, because of the role that Quantcast plays in defining exactly how data is used. This does not mean Quantcast has unfettered rights to use this data; rather, Quantcast’s use of the data is usually restricted by contractual limitations. If you have questions about this, please consult your agreement or ask your account representative.
Advertisers: Where the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR applies, Quantcast is a joint controller of personal data collected using Quantcast tags and pixels and of other personal data introduced into Quantcast’s services by the advertiser. Where US state privacy law applies, Quantcast acts as a “third party.”
Notice/Transparency and Choice
Laws, self-regulatory rules, and industry best practice require users be notified about processing of personal data, and be offered a choice – either opt in or opt out — with respect to that processing.
When deploying Quantcast tags or pixels, or otherwise introducing data into Quantcast’s services, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that users are given notice and choice that is required for Quantcast to be able to collect and process the data. And, of course, partners and clients have to make sure of notice and choice for their own personal data collection and processing.
Generally, notice must include the fact that third parties are collecting and processing users’ data, along with information about the data collected, the means of collection, the purposes for processing (including interest-based advertising), and how users can exercise their choices. Laws or rules in some jurisdictions would require that Quantcast be specifically identified in the notice and a link to Quantcast’s
privacy policy
be included.
Quantcast’s methods of collection include, depending on particular circumstances, cookies, pixels, JavaScript tags, probabilistic device matching and cross-device matching (using passively collected data).
Quantcast implements choice using industry standard methods and will be responsible for honoring that choice with respect to personal data within Quantcast’s services.
For their part, partners and clients need to provide access to the choice using industry standard and legally compliant methods, depending on the applicable laws and rules. Usually this means providing access to choose within other privacy disclosures, including in a privacy policy.
In all cases, partners and clients should have user-facing privacy policies that are prominently linked from their homepages and from content (sites, apps, etc.) where personal data are collected or used.
Privacy policies will adhere to applicable laws, as well as industry self-regulatory requirements and industry best practices. At minimum, policies should disclose the fact that third parties are collecting personal data for advertising-related purposes, and should describe the methods of collection, as described above. Particular circumstances and applicable rules may create additional requirements.
Where consent (opt-in) is required prior to setting cookies or collecting data, such as in Europe under ePrivacy, the GDPR, and the UK GDPR, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that tags or pixels don’t fire until that consent is obtained.
EU and the UK: The industry standard means for ensuring notice and choice for vendors like Quantcast in the EU and the UK is the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework. Quantcast is vendor ID 11. Quantcast’s required purposes and associated legal bases are viewable in the Global Vendor List. Because Quantcast is subject to European law, the TCF should be used for all users in the EU or the UK, even if the client or partner has no operations in Europe. Alternatively, such partners and clients may elect not to introduce data about EU or UK users into Quantcast’s services.
Partners and clients not using the TCF for EU or UK users need to use a legally compliant alternative means to ensure Quantcast’s legal basis for using cookies, where applicable, and for processing the data. This includes that Quantcast must be identified as a controller of the user’s personal data, and a link to Quantcast’s privacy policy must be provided. Quantcast may in the future require TCF.
Privacy policies in the EU and the UK need to include a link to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) opt out page, located at youronlinechoices.com.
US: In the US, along with other requirements laid out here, privacy policies need to include links to an industry standard opt out page, like those offered by the NAI or DAA.
California: The CCPA applies for users in California. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “share” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
Other US states: Applicable state privacy law applies for users in Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “targeted advertising” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
US State Privacy Addendum: The processing of US users’ personal data in connection with Quantcast’s services shall be governed by the US State Privacy Addendum,
which is available here
.
Access and Deletion
Under applicable law, including the EU GDPR, the UK GDPR, and the US state privacy laws, as a joint controller or third party, Quantcast will be responsible for providing users access to their personal data that is within Quantcast’s services, and for deleting personal data
after it receives (or is notified of) a user’s request.
Other Matters
Sensitive data. Because Quantcast’s services are not intended for processing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category” under applicable law (including data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, or parties, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or related to health status or treatment) or data about children under the age of 16, partners and clients must not transmit to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect any such data. Quantcast tags and pixels may not be deployed on content that is directed at children under the age of 16. Sensitive or special category data includes the types of data listed in Article 9 of the EU GDPR, Section 1798.140 of the CCPA (as amended by the CPRA), or any equivalent term under applicable law. Sensitive data also includes any data that qualifies as “consumer health data” under the Washington My Health My Data Act, 2023 Wash. Laws 191 or any other equivalent laws.
Directly identifying personal data. Quantcast’s services are not designed to process directly identifying personal data, such as names or email addresses, and partners and clients may not send such information to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect it. If a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Reidentification. Under no circumstances will clients and other partners use any information collected or generated by Quantcast’s services to identify an individual user.
Effective July 29th 2024
to
August 26th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners documents certain privacy-related responsibilities for advertisers and agencies, which are in addition to the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
and the
International Data Privacy Addendum
(collectively, the “DPAs”). If there is any conflict between this document and the DPAs, the DPAs are the controlling documents.
Privacy regulation around the world is dynamic. Quantcast may update this document from time to time at its own discretion in order to keep pace with changes in privacy rules and risks, and industry best practices, as well as to ensure users’ rights are honored appropriately.
Quantcast may take reasonable measures to ensure that data processed in its services is collected and processed in accordance with privacy rules and industry best practices. We may review locations where data is collected and may refuse to accept data that is not collected in a manner consistent with the approaches described in this document.
Terminology
This document uses “user” or “users” as interchangeable with “data subject” or “consumer” or other equivalent terms from various rules.
When we say rules, we mean laws, regulations, and industry self-regulatory codes that are applicable to the processing of personal data in relation to Quantcast’s services. Quantcast has a global footprint, including operations in the EU, the UK, and the US (including California), so those jurisdictions’ rules are applicable to Quantcast for data about users who reside in those jurisdictions.
We also will use “personal data” as interchangeable with terms such as, “personal information.” Personal data processed by Quantcast’s service is pseudonymous, including but not limited to IP address, cookie or device IDs, and other identifiers used for advertising-related purposes. In the case where a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Industry standards and self-regulatory programs
Quantcast supports and participates in industry self-regulatory programs, and generally implements industry standards and best practices when it comes to handling personal data. Partners and clients are responsible for ensuring their own implementation of self- regulatory rules and industry best practices, in particular related to providing transparency and choice to users in places where data is collected or used by Quantcast’s services.
Controller, processor, service provider, vendor, etc
.
Unfortunately, terms describing the relationships between parties sharing data are not interchangeable. Quantcast determines its role based on applicable law and the facts of its processing of personal data. In many relationships with advertiser partners or clients, Quantcast is a controller or joint controller, because of the role that Quantcast plays in defining exactly how data is used. This does not mean Quantcast has unfettered rights to use this data; rather, Quantcast’s use of the data is usually restricted by contractual limitations. If you have questions about this, please consult your agreement or ask your account representative.
Advertisers: Where the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR applies, Quantcast is a joint controller of personal data collected using Quantcast tags and pixels and of other personal data introduced into Quantcast’s services by the advertiser. Where US state privacy law applies, Quantcast acts as a “third party.”
Notice/Transparency and Choice
Laws, self-regulatory rules, and industry best practice require users be notified about processing of personal data, and be offered a choice – either opt in or opt out — with respect to that processing.
When deploying Quantcast tags or pixels, or otherwise introducing data into Quantcast’s services, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that users are given notice and choice that is required for Quantcast to be able to collect and process the data. And, of course, partners and clients have to make sure of notice and choice for their own personal data collection and processing.
Generally, notice must include the fact that third parties are collecting and processing users’ data, along with information about the data collected, the means of collection, the purposes for processing (including interest-based advertising), and how users can exercise their choices. Laws or rules in some jurisdictions would require that Quantcast be specifically identified in the notice and a link to Quantcast’s
privacy policy
be included.
Quantcast’s methods of collection include, depending on particular circumstances, cookies, pixels, JavaScript tags, probabilistic device matching and cross-device matching (using passively collected data).
Quantcast implements choice using industry standard methods and will be responsible for honoring that choice with respect to personal data within Quantcast’s services.
For their part, partners and clients need to provide access to the choice using industry standard and legally compliant methods, depending on the applicable laws and rules. Usually this means providing access to choose within other privacy disclosures, including in a privacy policy.
In all cases, partners and clients should have user-facing privacy policies that are prominently linked from their homepages and from content (sites, apps, etc.) where personal data are collected or used.
Privacy policies will adhere to applicable laws, as well as industry self-regulatory requirements and industry best practices. At minimum, policies should disclose the fact that third parties are collecting personal data for advertising-related purposes, and should describe the methods of collection, as described above. Particular circumstances and applicable rules may create additional requirements.
Where consent (opt-in) is required prior to setting cookies or collecting data, such as in Europe under ePrivacy, the GDPR, and the UK GDPR, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that tags or pixels don’t fire until that consent is obtained.
EU and the UK: The industry standard means for ensuring notice and choice for vendors like Quantcast in the EU and the UK is the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework. Quantcast is vendor ID 11. Quantcast’s required purposes and associated legal bases are viewable in the Global Vendor List. Because Quantcast is subject to European law, the TCF should be used for all users in the EU or the UK, even if the client or partner has no operations in Europe. Alternatively, such partners and clients may elect not to introduce data about EU or UK users into Quantcast’s services. Quantcast Choice is a leading, and TCF compliant, Consent Management Platform.
Proper use of Quantcast Choice will meet these requirements.
Partners and clients not using the TCF for EU or UK users need to use a legally compliant alternative means to ensure Quantcast’s legal basis for using cookies, where applicable, and for processing the data. This includes that Quantcast must be identified as a controller of the user’s personal data, and a link to Quantcast’s privacy policy must be provided. Quantcast may in the future require TCF.
Privacy policies in the EU and the UK need to include a link to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) opt out page, located at youronlinechoices.com.
US: In the US, along with other requirements laid out here, privacy policies need to include links to an industry standard opt out page, like those offered by the NAI or DAA.
California: The CCPA applies for users in California. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “share” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
Other US states: Applicable state privacy law applies for users in Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “targeted advertising” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
US State Privacy Addendum: The processing of US users’ personal data in connection with Quantcast’s services shall be governed by the US State Privacy Addendum,
which is available here
.
Access and Deletion
Under applicable law, including the EU GDPR, the UK GDPR, and the US state privacy laws, as a joint controller or third party, Quantcast will be responsible for providing users access to their personal data that is within Quantcast’s services, and for deleting personal data after it receives (or is notified of) a user’s request.
Other Matters
Sensitive data. Because Quantcast’s services are not intended for processing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category” under applicable law (including data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, or parties, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or related to health status or treatment) or data about children under the age of 16, partners and clients must not transmit to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect any such data. Quantcast tags and pixels may not be deployed on content that is directed at children under the age of 16. Sensitive or special category data includes the types of data listed in Article 9 of the EU GDPR, Section 1798.140 of the CCPA (as amended by the CPRA), or any equivalent term under applicable law. Sensitive data also includes any data that qualifies as “consumer health data” under the Washington My Health My Data Act, 2023 Wash. Laws 191 or any other equivalent laws.
Directly identifying personal data. Quantcast’s services are not designed to process directly identifying personal data, such as names or email addresses, and partners and clients may not send such information to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect it. If a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Reidentification. Under no circumstances will clients and other partners use any information collected or generated by Quantcast’s services to identify an individual user.
Effective April 5th 2024
to
July 29th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
This Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners documents certain privacy-related responsibilities for advertisers and agencies, which are in addition to the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
and the
International Data Privacy Addendum
(collectively, the “DPAs”). If there is any conflict between this document and the DPAs, the DPAs are the controlling documents.
Privacy regulation around the world is dynamic. Quantcast may update this document from time to time at its own discretion in order to keep pace with changes in privacy rules and risks, and industry best practices, as well as to ensure users’ rights are honored appropriately.
Quantcast may take reasonable measures to ensure that data processed in its services is collected and processed in accordance with privacy rules and industry best practices. We may review locations where data is collected and may refuse to accept data that is not collected in a manner consistent with the approaches described in this document.
Terminology
This document uses “user” or “users” as interchangeable with “data subject” or “consumer” or other equivalent terms from various rules.
When we say rules, we mean laws, regulations, and industry self-regulatory codes that are applicable to the processing of personal data in relation to Quantcast’s services. Quantcast has a global footprint, including operations in the EU, the UK, and the US (including California), so those jurisdictions’ rules are applicable to Quantcast for data about users who reside in those jurisdictions.
We also will use “personal data” as interchangeable with terms such as, “personal information.” Personal data processed by Quantcast’s service is pseudonymous, including but not limited to IP address, cookie or device IDs, and other identifiers used for advertising-related purposes. In the case where a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Industry standards and self-regulatory programs
Quantcast supports and participates in industry self-regulatory programs, and generally implements industry standards and best practices when it comes to handling personal data. Partners and clients are responsible for ensuring their own implementation of self-regulatory rules and industry best practices, in particular related to providing transparency and choice to users in places where data is collected or used by Quantcast’s services.
Controller, processor, service provider, vendor, etc.
Unfortunately, terms describing the relationships between parties sharing data are not interchangeable. Quantcast determines its role based on applicable law and the facts of its processing of personal data. In many relationships with advertiser partners or clients, Quantcast is a controller or joint controller, because of the role that Quantcast plays in defining exactly how data is used. This does not mean Quantcast has unfettered rights to use this data; rather, Quantcast’s use of the data is usually restricted by contractual limitations. If you have questions about this, please consult your agreement or ask your account representative.
Advertisers: Where the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR applies, Quantcast is a joint controller of personal data collected using Quantcast tags and pixels and of other personal data introduced into Quantcast’s services by the advertiser. Where US state privacy law applies, Quantcast acts as a “third party.”
Notice/Transparency and Choice
Laws, self-regulatory rules, and industry best practice require users be notified about processing of personal data, and be offered a choice – either opt in or opt out — with respect to that processing.
When deploying Quantcast tags or pixels, or otherwise introducing data into Quantcast’s services, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that users are given notice and choice that is required for Quantcast to be able to collect and process the data. And, of course, partners and clients have to make sure of notice and choice for their own personal data collection and processing.
Generally, notice must include the fact that third parties are collecting and processing users’ data, along with information about the data collected, the means of collection, the purposes for processing (including interest-based advertising), and how users can exercise their choices. Laws or rules in some jurisdictions would require that Quantcast be specifically identified in the notice and a link to Quantcast’s
privacy policy
be included.
Quantcast’s methods of collection include, depending on particular circumstances, cookies, pixels, JavaScript tags, probabilistic device matching and cross-device matching (using passively collected data).
Quantcast implements choice using industry standard methods and will be responsible for honoring that choice with respect to personal data within Quantcast’s services.
For their part, partners and clients need to provide access to the choice using industry standard and legally compliant methods, depending on the applicable laws and rules. Usually this means providing access to choose within other privacy disclosures, including in a privacy policy.
In all cases, partners and clients should have user-facing privacy policies that are prominently linked from their homepages and from content (sites, apps, etc.) where personal data are collected or used.
Privacy policies will adhere to applicable laws, as well as industry self-regulatory requirements and industry best practices. At minimum, policies should disclose the fact that third parties are collecting personal data for advertising-related purposes, and should describe the methods of collection, as described above. Particular circumstances and applicable rules may create additional requirements.
Where consent (opt-in) is required prior to setting cookies or collecting data, such as in Europe under ePrivacy, the GDPR, and the UK GDPR, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that tags or pixels don’t fire until that consent is obtained.
EU and the UK: The industry standard means for ensuring notice and choice for vendors like Quantcast in the EU and the UK is the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework. Quantcast is vendor ID 11. Quantcast’s required purposes and associated legal bases are viewable in the Global Vendor List. Because Quantcast is subject to European law, the TCF should be used for all users in the EU or the UK, even if the client or partner has no operations in Europe. Alternatively, such partners and clients may elect not to introduce data about EU or UK users into Quantcast’s services. Quantcast Choice is a leading, and TCF compliant, Consent Management Platform. Proper use of Quantcast Choice will meet these requirements.
Partners and clients not using the TCF for EU or UK users need to use a legally compliant alternative means to ensure Quantcast’s legal basis for using cookies, where applicable, and for processing the data. This includes that Quantcast must be identified as a controller of the user’s personal data, and a link to Quantcast’s privacy policy must be provided. Quantcast may in the future require TCF.
Privacy policies in the EU and the UK need to include a link to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) opt out page, located at youronlinechoices.com.
US: In the US, along with other requirements laid out here, privacy policies need to include links to an industry standard opt out page, like those offered by the NAI or DAA.
California: The CCPA applies for users in California. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “share” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
Other US states: Applicable state privacy law applies for users in Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “targeted advertising” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
US State Privacy Addendum: The processing of US users’ personal data in connection with Quantcast’s services shall be governed by the US State Privacy Addendum,
which is available here
.
Access and Deletion
Under applicable law, including the EU GDPR, the UK GDPR, and the US state privacy laws, as a joint controller or third party, Quantcast will be responsible for providing users access to their personal data that is within Quantcast’s services, and for deleting personal data after it receives (or is notified of) a user’s request.
Other Matters
Sensitive data. Because Quantcast’s services are not intended for processing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category” under applicable law (including data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, or parties, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or related to health status or treatment) or data about children under the age of 16, partners and clients must not transmit to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect any such data. Quantcast tags and pixels may not be deployed on content that is directed at children under the age of 16. Sensitive or special category data includes the types of data listed in Article 9 of the EU GDPR, Section 1798.140 of the CCPA (as amended by the CPRA), or any equivalent term under applicable law. Sensitive data also includes any data that qualifies as “consumer health data” under the Washington My Health My Data Act, 2023 Wash. Laws 191 or any other equivalent laws.
Directly identifying personal data. Quantcast’s services are not designed to process directly identifying personal data, such as names or email addresses, and partners and clients may not send such information to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect it. If a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Reidentification. Under no circumstances will publishers use any information collected or generated by Quantcast’s services to identify an individual user.
Effective January 23rd 2024
to
April 5th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Last Update: September 28, 2023
This Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners documents certain privacy-related responsibilities for advertisers and agencies, which are in addition to the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
and the
International Data Privacy Addendum
(collectively, the “DPAs”). If there is any conflict between this document and the DPAs, the DPAs are the controlling documents.
Privacy regulation around the world is dynamic. Quantcast may update this document from time to time at its own discretion in order to keep pace with changes in privacy rules and risks, and industry best practices, as well as to ensure users’ rights are honored appropriately.
Quantcast may take reasonable measures to ensure that data processed in its services is collected and processed in accordance with privacy rules and industry best practices. We may review locations where data is collected and may refuse to accept data that is not collected in a manner consistent with the approaches described in this document.
Terminology
This document uses “user” or “users” as interchangeable with “data subject” or “consumer” or other equivalent terms from various rules.
When we say rules, we mean laws, regulations, and industry self-regulatory codes that are applicable to the processing of personal data in relation to Quantcast’s services. Quantcast has a global footprint, including operations in the EU, the UK, and the US (including California), so those jurisdictions’ rules are applicable to Quantcast for data about users who reside in those jurisdictions.
We also will use “personal data” as interchangeable with terms such as, “personal information.” Personal data processed by Quantcast’s service is pseudonymous, including but not limited to IP address, cookie or device IDs, and other identifiers used for advertising-related purposes. In the case where a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Industry standards and self-regulatory programs
Quantcast supports and participates in industry self-regulatory programs, and generally implements industry standards and best practices when it comes to handling personal data. Partners and clients are responsible for ensuring their own implementation of self-regulatory rules and industry best practices, in particular related to providing transparency and choice to users in places where data is collected or used by Quantcast’s services.
Controller, processor, service provider, vendor, etc.
Unfortunately, terms describing the relationships between parties sharing data are not interchangeable. Quantcast determines its role based on applicable law and the facts of its processing of personal data. In many relationships with advertiser partners or clients, Quantcast is a controller or joint controller, because of the role that Quantcast plays in defining exactly how data is used. This does not mean Quantcast has unfettered rights to use this data; rather, Quantcast’s use of the data is usually restricted by contractual limitations. If you have questions about this, please consult your agreement or ask your account representative.
Advertisers: Where the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR applies, Quantcast is a joint controller of personal data collected using Quantcast tags and pixels and of other personal data introduced into Quantcast’s services by the advertiser. Where US state privacy law applies, Quantcast acts as a “third party.”
Notice/Transparency and Choice
Laws, self-regulatory rules, and industry best practice require users be notified about processing of personal data, and be offered a choice – either opt in or opt out — with respect to that processing.
When deploying Quantcast tags or pixels, or otherwise introducing data into Quantcast’s services, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that users are given notice and choice that is required for Quantcast to be able to collect and process the data. And, of course, partners and clients have to make sure of notice and choice for their own personal data collection and processing.
Generally, notice must include the fact that third parties are collecting and processing users’ data, along with information about the data collected, the means of collection, the purposes for processing (including interest-based advertising), and how users can exercise their choices. Laws or rules in some jurisdictions would require that Quantcast be specifically identified in the notice and a link to Quantcast’s
privacy policy
be included.
Quantcast’s methods of collection include, depending on particular circumstances, cookies, pixels, JavaScript tags, probabilistic device matching and cross-device matching (using passively collected data).
Quantcast implements choice using industry standard methods and will be responsible for honoring that choice with respect to personal data within Quantcast’s services.
For their part, partners and clients need to provide access to the choice using industry standard and legally compliant methods, depending on the applicable laws and rules. Usually this means providing access to choose within other privacy disclosures, including in a privacy policy.
In all cases, partners and clients should have user-facing privacy policies that are prominently linked from their homepages and from content (sites, apps, etc.) where personal data are collected or used.
Privacy policies will adhere to applicable laws, as well as industry self-regulatory requirements and industry best practices. At minimum, policies should disclose the fact that third parties are collecting personal data for advertising-related purposes, and should describe the methods of collection, as described above. Particular circumstances and applicable rules may create additional requirements.
Where consent (opt-in) is required prior to setting cookies or collecting data, such as in Europe under ePrivacy, the GDPR, and the UK GDPR, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that tags or pixels don’t fire until that consent is obtained.
EU and the UK:
The industry standard means for ensuring notice and choice for vendors like Quantcast in the EU and the UK is the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework. Quantcast is vendor ID 11. Quantcast’s required purposes and associated legal bases are viewable in the Global Vendor List. Because Quantcast is subject to European law, the TCF should be used for all users in the EU or the UK, even if the client or partner has no operations in Europe. Alternatively, such partners and clients may elect not to introduce data about EU or UK users into Quantcast’s services. Quantcast Choice is a leading, and TCF compliant, Consent Management Platform. Proper use of Quantcast Choice will meet these requirements.
Partners and clients not using the TCF for EU or UK users need to use a legally compliant alternative means to ensure Quantcast’s legal basis for using cookies, where applicable, and for processing the data. This includes that Quantcast must be identified as a controller of the user’s personal data, and a link to Quantcast’s privacy policy must be provided. Quantcast may in the future require TCF.
Privacy policies in the EU and the UK need to include a link to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) opt out page, located at youronlinechoices.com.
US
: In the US, along with other requirements laid out here, privacy policies need to include links to an industry standard opt out page, like those offered by the NAI or DAA.
California
: The CCPA applies for users in California. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “share” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
Other US states
: Applicable state privacy law applies for users in Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “targeted advertising” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
US State Privacy Addendum:
The processing of US users’ personal data in connection with Quantcast’s services shall be governed by the US State Privacy Addendum,
which is available here
.
Access and Deletion
Under applicable law, including the EU GDPR, the UK GDPR, and the US state privacy laws, as a joint controller or third party, Quantcast will be responsible for providing users access to their personal data that is within Quantcast’s services, and for deleting personal data after it receives (or is notified of) a user’s request.
Other Matters
Sensitive data
. Because Quantcast’s services are not intended for processing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category” under applicable law or data about children under the age of 16, partners and clients must not transmit to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect any such data. Quantcast tags and pixels may not be deployed on content that is directed at children under the age of 16. Sensitive or special category data includes the types of data listed in Article 9 of the EU GDPR, Section 1798.140 of the CCPA (as amended by the CPRA), or any equivalent term under applicable law.
Directly identifying personal data
. Quantcast’s services are not designed to process directly identifying personal data, such as names or email addresses, and partners and clients may not send such information to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect it. If a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Reidentification
. Under no circumstances will publishers use any information collected or generated by Quantcast’s services to identify an individual user.
Effective August 29th 2023
to
January 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Last Update: May 16, 2023
This Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners documents certain privacy-related responsibilities for advertisers and agencies, which are in addition to the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
and the
EEA/UK/Swiss Data Privacy Addendum
(collectively, the “DPAs”). If there is any conflict between this document and the DPAs, the DPAs are the controlling documents.
Privacy regulation around the world is dynamic. Quantcast may update this document from time to time at its own discretion in order to keep pace with changes in privacy rules and risks, and industry best practices, as well as to ensure users’ rights are honored appropriately.
Quantcast may take reasonable measures to ensure that data processed in its services is collected and processed in accordance with privacy rules and industry best practices. We may review locations where data is collected and may refuse to accept data that is not collected in a manner consistent with the approaches described in this document.
Terminology
This document uses “user” or “users” as interchangeable with “data subject” or “consumer” or other equivalent terms from various rules.
When we say rules, we mean laws, regulations, and industry self-regulatory codes that are applicable to the processing of personal data in relation to Quantcast’s services. Quantcast has a global footprint, including operations in the EU, the UK, and the US (including California), so those jurisdictions’ rules are applicable to Quantcast for data about users who reside in those jurisdictions.
We also will use “personal data” as interchangeable with terms such as, “personal information.” Personal data processed by Quantcast’s service is pseudonymous, including but not limited to IP address, cookie or device IDs, and other identifiers used for advertising-related purposes. In the case where a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Industry standards and self-regulatory programs
Quantcast supports and participates in industry self-regulatory programs, and generally implements industry standards and best practices when it comes to handling personal data. Partners and clients are responsible for ensuring their own implementation of self-regulatory rules and industry best practices, in particular related to providing transparency and choice to users in places where data is collected or used by Quantcast’s services.
Controller, processor, service provider, vendor, etc.
Unfortunately, terms describing the relationships between parties sharing data are not interchangeable. Quantcast determines its role based on applicable law and the facts of its processing of personal data. In many relationships with advertiser partners or clients, Quantcast is a controller or joint controller, because of the role that Quantcast plays in defining exactly how data is used. This does not mean Quantcast has unfettered rights to use this data; rather, Quantcast’s use of the data is usually restricted by contractual limitations. If you have questions about this, please consult your agreement or ask your account representative.
Advertisers: Where the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR applies, Quantcast is a joint controller of personal data collected using Quantcast tags and pixels and of other personal data introduced into Quantcast’s services by the advertiser. Where US state privacy law applies, Quantcast acts as a “third party.”
Notice/Transparency and Choice
Laws, self-regulatory rules, and industry best practice require users be notified about processing of personal data, and be offered a choice – either opt in or opt out — with respect to that processing.
When deploying Quantcast tags or pixels, or otherwise introducing data into Quantcast’s services, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that users are given notice and choice that is required for Quantcast to be able to collect and process the data. And, of course, partners and clients have to make sure of notice and choice for their own personal data collection and processing.
Generally, notice must include the fact that third parties are collecting and processing users’ data, along with information about the data collected, the means of collection, the purposes for processing (including interest-based advertising), and how users can exercise their choices. Laws or rules in some jurisdictions would require that Quantcast be specifically identified in the notice and a link to Quantcast’s
privacy policy
be included.
Quantcast’s methods of collection include, depending on particular circumstances, cookies, pixels, JavaScript tags, probabilistic device matching and cross-device matching (using passively collected data).
Quantcast implements choice using industry standard methods and will be responsible for honoring that choice with respect to personal data within Quantcast’s services.
For their part, partners and clients need to provide access to the choice using industry standard and legally compliant methods, depending on the applicable laws and rules. Usually this means providing access to choose within other privacy disclosures, including in a privacy policy.
In all cases, partners and clients should have user-facing privacy policies that are prominently linked from their homepages and from content (sites, apps, etc.) where personal data are collected or used.
Privacy policies will adhere to applicable laws, as well as industry self-regulatory requirements and industry best practices. At minimum, policies should disclose the fact that third parties are collecting personal data for advertising-related purposes, and should describe the methods of collection, as described above. Particular circumstances and applicable rules may create additional requirements.
Where consent (opt-in) is required prior to setting cookies or collecting data, such as in Europe under ePrivacy, the GDPR, and the UK GDPR, partners and clients are responsible to make sure that tags or pixels don’t fire until that consent is obtained.
EU and the UK:
The industry standard means for ensuring notice and choice for vendors like Quantcast in the EU and the UK is the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework. Quantcast is vendor ID 11. Quantcast’s required purposes and associated legal bases are viewable in the Global Vendor List. Because Quantcast is subject to European law, the TCF should be used for all users in the EU or the UK, even if the client or partner has no operations in Europe. Alternatively, such partners and clients may elect not to introduce data about EU or UK users into Quantcast’s services. Quantcast Choice is a leading, and TCF compliant, Consent Management Platform. Proper use of Quantcast Choice will meet these requirements.
Partners and clients not using the TCF for EU or UK users need to use a legally compliant alternative means to ensure Quantcast’s legal basis for using cookies, where applicable, and for processing the data. This includes that Quantcast must be identified as a controller of the user’s personal data, and a link to Quantcast’s privacy policy must be provided. Quantcast may in the future require TCF.
Privacy policies in the EU and the UK need to include a link to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) opt out page, located at youronlinechoices.com.
US
: In the US, along with other requirements laid out here, privacy policies need to include links to an industry standard opt out page, like those offered by the NAI or DAA.
California
: The CCPA applies for users in California. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “share” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
Other US states
: Applicable state privacy law applies for users in Colorado, Connecticut, Utah, and Virginia. Partners and clients need to provide users with notice of their “sale” and “targeted advertising” opt-out rights and the ability to exercise such rights, as applicable.
US State Privacy Addendum:
The processing of US users’ personal data in connection with Quantcast’s services shall be governed by the US State Privacy Addendum,
which is available here
.
Access and Deletion
Under applicable law, including the EU GDPR, the UK GDPR, and the US state privacy laws, as a joint controller or third party, Quantcast will be responsible for providing users access to their personal data that is within Quantcast’s services, and for deleting personal data after it receives (or is notified of) a user’s request.
Other Matters
Sensitive data
. Because Quantcast’s services are not intended for processing data regarded as “sensitive” or “special category” under applicable law or data about children under the age of 16, partners and clients must not transmit to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect any such data. Quantcast tags and pixels may not be deployed on content that is directed at children under the age of 16. Sensitive or special category data includes the types of data listed in Article 9 of the EU GDPR, Section 1798.140 of the CCPA (as amended by the CPRA), or any equivalent term under applicable law.
Directly identifying personal data
. Quantcast’s services are not designed to process directly identifying personal data, such as names or email addresses, and partners and clients may not send such information to Quantcast or cause Quantcast to collect it. If a partner has express permission from Quantcast to use email address, phone number, or other directly identifying information, such information will be pseudonymized (usually hashed or encrypted,) according to Quantcast specifications, before transmitting to Quantcast.
Reidentification
. Under no circumstances will publishers use any information collected or generated by Quantcast’s services to identify an individual user.
Effective September 11th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Laws that may require us to process your information
As described in our Privacy Policy, we process information when we comply with a legal obligation including, for example, to access, preserve or disclose certain information if there is a valid legal request from a regulator, law enforcement or others. See below the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Quantcast which results in the processing of information. New laws may be enacted, or other obligations may become binding on our processing of your information which may require us to process your information, and we will update this list from time to time.
Civil and Commercial Laws:
Court orders requiring the processing of information can be issued under:
Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters.
Council Regulation (EC) No 1206/2001 of 28 May 2001 on cooperation between the courts of the Member States in the taking of evidence in civil or commercial matters.
Criminal Laws:
Search warrants and production orders requiring the processing of information can be issued under:
Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006
Section 7 of the Child Trafficking and Pornography Act 1998
Section 14 of the Criminal Assets Bureau Act 1996
Section 63 Criminal Justice Act 1994, as amended
Section 15 of the Criminal Justice Act 2011
Section 7 Criminal Justice (Offences Relating to Information Systems) Act 2017
Section 48(2) and Section 52 of the Criminal Justice (Theft and Fraud Offences) Act 2001
Section 74 and Section 75 of the Criminal Law (Mutual Assistance) Act 2008
Section 96 of the Garda Síochána Act 2005
Section 51(6)(b) of the International Criminal Court Act 2006
Section 26 of the Misuse of Drugs Act 1977, as amended
Section 29 of the Offences Against the State Act 1939
Section 16 of the Official Secrets Act 1963
Section 25 of the Prevention of Corruption (Amendment) Act 2001
Consumer Laws:
Regulatory requests requiring the processing of information can be issued under:
Section 11, Section 18 and Section 36 of the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014.
Corporate and Taxation Laws:
Regulatory requests requiring the processing of information can be issued under:
Section 787 of the Companies Act 2014.
Regulatory:
Regulatory requests requiring the processing of information can be issued under:
Chapters IV and VI of General Data Protection Regulation, Part 6 of the Data Protection Act 2018.
Effective September 11th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Last Updated: December 8, 2022
We partner with other companies to help us provide and improve our services and products. Sometimes, it is necessary for us to share information that could be considered to be personal information about you with these partners. (Remember that we don’t share directly identifiable information about consumers, such as your name or address, because we do not collect that type of information, as discussed in our
Products and Services Privacy Policy
).
Products and Services Partners
Listed below are the partners with whom we share information in the provision of Quantcast’s products and services to our clients. This list identifies those partners, and lists links to their respective privacy policies and opt-out links so that you can learn more about their data collection and usage practices.
We are continually improving and updating our services and our partners will change over time. We will update this page to reflect those changes. Please visit our
Products and Services Privacy Policy
for more information about Quantcast’s data practices.
Please note that the links in the tables below are provided for your convenience. Each is solely maintained by the respective partner, and are subject to change at such partner’s discretion.
Ad Serving
The companies in this category serve digital advertisements on various digital platforms such as the web, social media, or mobile apps, and issue reports on the performance of advertising campaigns (e.g., the number of users who saw a particular ad, the particular ad type that was served, etc.). We need to use these vendors to deliver and measure the advertising campaigns that we serve. To do this, these vendors collect and use certain identifiers, such as the IP address of the visitor to the digital platform (e.g. to deliver the ad to that visitor’s browser or device) and an identifier specific to the advertisement (so they can identify the ad they need to serve and measure).
Partner
Privacy Policy
Opt-Out Link or Contact
Advanse, LLC
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Google LLC (fka Doubleclick, a division of Google Inc.)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Jivox Corporation
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Ad Verification
These companies provide a technology to ensure that digital advertisements appear on intended sites and reach the targeted audience; examples include measuring the viewability of an ad, brand safety and fraud (e.g., whether a site is safe for the particular advertiser’s brand or whether it is a fraudulent site). We use these vendors in order to better meet the requirements of our clients and deliver more effective advertising. These companies collect and use certain identifiers, such as the IP address of the visitor to the digital platform and an identifier specific to the advertisement (so that they can pass these details to the ad server, if they determine it is appropriate for the ad server to deliver the ad).
Partner
Privacy Policy
Opt-Out Link or Contact
DoubleVerify, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Integral Ad Science (IAS)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Rockerbox, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
These companies either directly license first and third party digital audience segment data from different sources (such as online, offline and mobile) to businesses or provide a platform through which Quantcast clients can collect, organize and activate such data for Quantcast’s use in connection with its advertising or analytics services. We share online identifiers (e.g., cookie IDs) with them in order to sync identifiers to effectively integrate with their services.
Partner
Privacy Policy
Opt-Out Link or Contact
Adobe Systems Incorporated
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Dynata, LLC/Research Now Group, Inc.
Privacy Policy
privacy@dynata.com
LiveRamp, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Lotame Solutions, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Neustar Information Services, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Oracle America, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Salesforce Audience Studio (formerly Krux Digital LLC)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Real-Time Bidding Exchanges
These companies provide a platform that facilitates the buying and selling of online ad impressions through real-time auctions. Quantcast participates as a buyer on these platforms in order to deliver an ad to an end user on a webpage or app. We share online identifiers (e.g., cookie ID) with them in order to sync identifiers to effectively integrate with their services.
Partner
Privacy Policy
Opt-Out Link or Contact
Bidswitch GmbH
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Google LLC (fka DoubleClick Ad Exchange, a division of Google Inc.)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
EMX Digital, LLC
Privacy Policy
US Opt Out Link
EU Opt Out Link
Index Exchange Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Lijit Networks, Inc. (Sovrn)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
LKQD, a division of Nexstar Digital LLC
Privacy Policy
US Opt Out Link
EU Opt Out Link
Magnite, Inc. (fka SpotX, Telaria, Inc. and The Rubicon Project, Inc.)
Privacy Policy
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Opt Out Link
OpenX Technologies, Inc.
Privacy Policy
US Opt Out Link
EU Opt Out Link
Outbrain Inc.
Privacy Policy
privacy@outbrain.com
Publisher First, Inc. (dba Freestar)
Privacy Policy
privacy@freestar.com
PubMatic, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Sharethrough, Inc.
Privacy Policy
US Opt Out Link
EU Opt Out Link
Smart AdServer
Privacy Policy
privacy@smartadserver.com
SpotX, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Taboola, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Teads France SAS
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Triple Lift, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Unruly Group, Limited
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Verizon Media Group (fka Oath Americas, Inc. and YahooAdTech LLC)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Xandr Inc. (fka AppNexus, Inc.)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Corporate Partners
In addition to the products and services partners listed above, Quantcast also shares information with the partners listed below in the course of its general corporate activities, such as sales, marketing, and general administration, as governed by our
Website and Corporate Privacy Policy.
Infrastructure
These are companies who provide cloud-based hosting, storage and processing infrastructure and services to enable Quantcast to provide its services to clients. Quantcast may store any of the data that it collects on its own servers or through these infrastructure partners.
Partner
Privacy Policy
Opt-Out Link or Contact
Amazon Web Services
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Snowflake Computing, Inc.
Privacy Policy
privacy@snowflake.com
Marketing and Customer Research
Quantcast works with companies to collect and analyze online behavior about Quantcast products for market research, customer satisfaction, website feedback and concept testing. To do so, Quantcast includes the tag of these companies on its webpages or other digital applications. By virtue of their tag on the Quantcast site or code in a Quantcast SDK, these vendors collect online identifiers (e.g., cookie identifiers, IP address and device identifiers). Please see their privacy policies for more information about the data they collect via their tags or SDKs.
Partner
Privacy Policy
Opt-Out Link or Contact
Drift.com, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Episerver Inc. (t/a Optimizely)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Facebook, Inc. (social plugins)
Privacy Policy
US Opt Out Link
EU Opt Out Link
Flashtalking, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
FullStory, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Google LLC (Google Analytics and Google Adwords)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Heap, Inc.
Privacy Policy
legal@Heap.io
Hotjar Ltd.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Marketo, Inc.
Privacy Policy
privacyofficer@marketo.com
Microsoft Corporation (Bing Advertise)
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
OneClipboard Inc. (dba Splashthat)
Privacy Policy
US Opt Out Link
EU Opt Out Link
Qualtrics, LLC
Privacy Policy
privacy@qualtrics.com
Zendesk, Inc.
Privacy Policy
privacy@zendesk.com
Zoominfo, inc.
Privacy Policy
Opt Out Link
Effective April 3rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Last Updated: September 28, 2023
These Quantcast Advertise Insertion Order Terms & Conditions (“
IO Terms
”) govern the Insertion Orders (“IOs”) that reference these IO Terms. In these IO Terms, the party entering into the IO will be called “
Company
” and the Quantcast entity identified on the relevant Insertion Order will be called “
Quantcast
”. Quantcast will provide the services set forth in the IO and these IO Terms (“
Services
”).
These IO Terms are comprised of the following:
(1) 4A’s/IAB Standard Terms and Conditions for Internet Advertising for Media Buys One Year or Less, Version 3 (“4As Term”)
, located
here
are incorporated herein by reference; and
(2) The
following additional and controlling terms:
a
.Services
: The Services include Quantcast’s campaign management services, including campaign strategy and campaign execution and any other data services, products, features and/or tools provided by Quantcast under an IO or selected via the Platform (as defined below). Quantcast may use the Platform on Company’s behalf to provide the Services, including to (i) purchase inventory, (ii) run campaigns, (iii) build audiences (iv) select additional Services, including Third-Party Services (as defined below). Any selection made by  Quantcast in the Platform on Company’s behalf shall be deemed a selection made by Company for purposes of the IO Terms.
b. Geo-targeting
: Geo-targeting will be agreed to by the parties.
c. Cross-Platform
: All campaigns are served with blended devices (desktop, mobile web, tablet) targeting unless otherwise agreed to by the parties.
d. Payment and
Invoicing
:
i. Payment to be made in the currency identified in the
Campaign Total Budget
(as shown in the IO).
ii. Quantcast will provide monthly invoices electronically.
iii. In the case of non-US placements, the Campaign Total Budget is exclusive of VAT.
iv.Section III(c) of the 4As Terms shall not apply. Company will pay invoices within 30 days of the invoice date. Quantcast reserves the right to charge interest of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company will be responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect any unpaid invoices.
v. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is solely responsible for all amounts payable for Third-Party Services (defined below) and the cost of placing the AdChoices or similar icon (“
Third-Party Costs
”), whether Quantcast includes such Third-Party Costs on its invoices or Company pays such Third-Party Costs directly. Quantcast reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon. Company acknowledges that any Third-Party Costs shown in the Platform
are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
e
.Budget Fluidity for Performance Optimization
:
Quantcast may shift budgets among placements across the entire date range of a campaign in order to optimize performance; provided, that Quantcast stays within the Campaign Total Budget.
f.
Privacy Requirements and Campaign Policy
i. Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services). Without limiting the foregoing, throughout the term of the IO, the parties agree to adhere to Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self- regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). If a change in Applicable Privacy Laws or self- regulatory principles necessitates a change to these IO Terms, the parties will work together in good faith to agree to appropriate revisions. “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means all applicable international, federal, state, or local laws and regulations relating to personal data or personal information, as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, such as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) and any EU Member State laws implementing the GDPR, the UK GDPR and the UK Data Protection Act 2018 (collectively, “
GDPR
”), the e-Privacy Directive (Directive 2002/58/EC) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (collectively, “
ePD
”) and the California Consumer Privacy Act (Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 – 1798.199), as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CCPA”).
ii. Each party will (a) prominently display a user-friendly, easily-accessible, clear, and comprehensive privacy policy on its website or mobile application that complies with all applicable laws (including Applicable Privacy Laws) and applicable self- regulatory principles; and (b) if and as applicable, provide website or application visitors in its privacy policy (i) notice that its website, application, or service permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the data collected and the means of collection, and (iii) a link to an industry-standard opt- out mechanism, such as the
NAI
or
DAA
opt out page.
iii. Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of a user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties directed at children. “Direct Identifier” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID or other digital identifiers. For purposes of these IO Terms, “children” refers to anyone age 16 or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
iv. These IO Terms incorporate (i) the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing personal information that is subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing Addendum) and (ii) the
International Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing of personal data that is subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing Addendum).
In addition, Company will comply with Quantcast’s then-current
Campaign and Data Policy
and
Privacy Requirements
(collectively the “
Campaign Policy
”). All of the foregoing linked adden
da and policies constitute “Policies” under the 4As Terms.
g.
Viewability
i.
Viewability Calculation
:
Viewability is calculated as the number of in-view impressions divided by the number of vendor-measured, delivered impressions served across the entire campaign. The percentage viewability for measured impressions will be imputed to unmeasured impressions.
ii.
Viewability Goal
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will optimize delivery towards the applicable Viewability Goal.
iii.
Viewability Guarantee
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will provide the Viewability Guarantee. Such guarantee will only be offered for video placements, Search Powered Audiences, Demographic Audiences, and Data Partner Audiences.
a.
Makegood
. If the Viewability Guarantee is not met, Company’s sole remedy will be Quantcast’s delivery, for a brand campaign, of a number of impressions equal to double the difference between the Viewability Guarantee and the actual viewability delivered. This double makegood will fulfill the stated guarantee, and is not itself subject to a viewability requirement.
b.
Conditions
.
1.Viewability Vendor must be MRC accredited. Other than for MOAT, Company will provide Quantcast with the Viewability Vendor’s daily reporting.
2. Company must raise any viewability dispute within 30 days of the campaign end date.
3. Lowering the viewability requirement during a campaign voids the guarantee.
4. Makegood impressions expire 90 days from the campaign end date.
5. At its discretion, Quantcast may issue a credit memo for the value of makegood impressions.
iv.
vCPM
:
If a placement uses a vCPM pricing model, Company will only be billed for viewable (or “in-view”) impressions (regardless of the percentage of viewability) as reported by the Viewability Vendor (specified in the placement on the IO).
h
.Third-Party Ad Server
:
If Company is using a third-party ad server, Company will provide Quantcast log-in access to each Ad Server listed in the placements above within 24 hours of campaign start date for reporting access (including conversions, if applicable).
j.
Additional Company Representation and Warranty
.
i. Company represents and warrants that it will comply with all applicable laws and has obtained all necessary licensure for performance hereunder, and that Ads will not infringe or violate any applicable laws, ordinances, rules, codes, or regulations (including, without limitation, any industry-specific ethical, professional, or self-regulatory requirements or guidelines, and Applicable Privacy Laws) or the rights of any third party. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), Company also represents and warrants that it has the authority to bind its Clients to these IO Terms and each IO, and that all of Company’s actions related to these IO Terms and each IO will be within the scope of such agency.
k.
For Placements Priced on a CPA basis.
i.
Company agrees to pay Quantcast for the conversions and click-thru conversions as stated within the applicable placement. The conversion is defined as from both click-thru and view-thru conversions.
I.
IAB Ads.txt Principles
:
Quantcast supports the principles of IAB initiative ads.txt and recommends all publishers adopt ads.txt as soon as possible. For inventory where we crawl a non-empty ads.txt file, Quantcast will only consider buying inventory from authorized sellers.
m.
Advertise Platform Access
:
If Quantcast provides Company with access to Quantcast’s platform (“
Platform
”), the following terms apply:
i. Quantcast may provide individuals authorized by Company (“
Authorized Users
”) with view only access to the Platform. Quantcast will set up the initial Authorized Users requested by Company. Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials. Company is required to maintain at least one Authorized User, and access credentials for that user, during the Services. Each Authorized User will have the ability to add new Authorized Users and terminate access for existing Authorized Users. Company may also request that Quantcast add additional Authorized Users (email being sufficient for such requests). Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including maintaining the confidentiality of its account logins and passwords and shall immediately notify Quantcast in writing of any loss or involuntary disclosure thereof. Company shall ensure that all Authorized Users (a) use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, as Company is authorized to access and use the Services under these IO Terms, and (b) are aware of, and comply with, all requirements and restrictions described in these IO Terms. For the avoidance of doubt, Company shall be liable for any breach of these IO Terms by any Authorized User.
ii. Subject to these IO Terms, during the term of the IO and for any additional period permitted by Quantcast, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, revocable and non-sublicensable license to access and use the Platform solely to (a) view campaigns set-up in the Platform as part of the Services, and/or (b) view reports generated by the Services.
iii. Company will ensure that its account information is accurate and current. Quantcast reserves the right to review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
iv. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of Company, if applicable), (d) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate,
and data made available on the Platform, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform, or (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than Company’s own Clients who are obligated to treat such reports confidentially, if applicable).
v.For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing and improving the Services.
n.
Client Data
:
Upon written request from an advertiser client (“
Client
”), Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in accordance with their written request (including, without limitation, sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Platform). For clarity, “
Client Data
” means the (i) data Quantcast receives from campaign tag(s) placed by or on behalf of Company or its Clients on websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments that Company may have created using the tag data or any campaign performance data generated from campaigns delivered by Company using such Client Data.
o.
Jurisdiction and Venue.
i.
If signed by Quantcast Corp.:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of the state of California. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
ii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
International
Limited:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Ireland. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Dublin, Ireland, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
iii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
Australia
Pty
Ltd:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Australia. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Sydney, Australia, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
p.
Taxes
:
All charges under these IO Terms are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of these IO Terms for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
q.
System of Record:
Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating and reporting metrics related to inventory purchases, impressions and all amounts owed under these IO Terms.
r.
Promotion:
Section IX(g) of the 4As Terms is hereby amended by adding the following after the last sentence in Section IX(g): “Notwithstanding all the foregoing, Quantcast may include Agency’s and Advertiser’s names and logos in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, and in promotional materials.”
s
. Breach by Company:
Without limiting any of Quantcast’s other remedies hereunder, Quantcast may, in its sole discretion, immediately suspend or terminate any individual campaign if Quantcast reasonably suspects that such campaign is in breach or violation of any of Company’s obligations, representations, or warranties set forth in these IO Terms (including, without limitation, any failure to comply with the Campaign Policy).
t.INDEMNIFICATION
: Section X of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
X. MUTUAL
INDEMNITY
a. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents (and their respective successors, heirs and assigns) (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including, for clarity, any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast and its directors, officers, employees and agents, its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) violation of these IO Terms (including the 4As Terms and Policies); (b) Company- provided or Client-provided data or ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of subsection j. (Additional Company Representation and Warranty) above.
b.The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
c. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or data, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast which would have cured the cause of action, provided that following such instructions would not have caused Company substantial additional cost, or (e) use of the Services or data other than as described herein. In the case of any of the foregoing, Company will indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
d. In the event that Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s reasonable opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing, or, if such remedies are not reasonably available,
above, Quantcast shall provide Company with as much written notice as reasonably practicable prior to the effective date of such termination. Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section X are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability to Company and Company’s sole remedies as to infringement of intellectual property rights.”
u. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY: Section XI of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the            following:
“
XI. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS TO COMPANY FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE QUANTCAST PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED BY INVENTORY PARTNERS WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION XI LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE, AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE
(12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE. The parties acknowledge that the limitations and exclusions contained in these IO Terms have been the subject of negotiation between the parties and represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with their respective obligations under these IO Terms and the payments made hereunder.”
v.
Third-Party Services:
To the extent Company receives any services or products of a third party in conjunction with the Services, including without limitation any third-party data provider (each service, a “
Third- Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply. For the avoidance of doubt, these terms are supplementary: they do not replace or limit any other terms and conditions of these IO Terms.
i. Third-Party Services Terms.
Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third party terms and conditions of such Third-Party Service in addition to the terms of these IO Terms. Any such third party terms and conditions are as provided to Company in writing by Quantcast or by the relevant third party.
ii. Limitations.
Quantcast does not endorse, is not responsible or liable for, and makes no representations as to any Third-Party Services, including, without limitation, their content or the manner in which they handle, protect, manage or process data, or any interaction between Company and the provider of such Third-Party Service. Quantcast cannot guarantee the continued availability or pricing of such Third-Party Services, or any features thereof, and may cease enabling access to them without liability to Company, if, for example and without limitation, the provider of a Third-Party Service ceases to make the Third-Party Service available for interoperation with the corresponding Service in a manner acceptable to Quantcast. Company irrevocably waives any claim against Quantcast with respect to such Third-Party Services.
Quantcast is not liable for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with Company’s receipt, enablement, access or use of any such Third-Party Services, or Company’s reliance on the privacy practices, data security processes or other policies of such Third-Party Services. Company may be required to register for or log into such Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company-provided or Client-provided data or ads with such Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
iii. LiveRamp Usage Restrictions.
To the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “LiveRamp”) in connection with the Services outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to these IO Terms, and Company agrees : (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Service to Company, including to access and download Company’s CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp’s SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Service to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) reverse engineer, aggregate, or disambiguate any data or technology received from LiveRamp or its services (except as expressly agreed by LiveRamp in writing), (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are sexually- oriented or related to tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to an individual’s health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), (iii) with attributes that correlate to unique records or individuals, or (iv) for which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent to provide to LiveRamp; and (e) Company additionally warrants that: (y) it will not direct data to any other destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such destination, and (z) obtained and maintained all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder.
w.
Conflicts, Responsibility, Terminology
:
To the extent of any conflict with the 4As Terms, these IO Terms govern. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is responsible for the actions/inactions of its Clients in connection with this IO and the Services and for ensuring compliance with these IO Terms by its Clients.
i. Any references to “
Customer
” in an IO shall mean Company.
ii.Any references to “
Media Company
” in the 4As Terms and/or an IO shall mean Quantcast.
iii. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), then all references to “
Agency
” shall mean Company and all references to “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company’s Clients.
iv. If Company is an Advertiser (as defined in the 4As Terms), then references to both “
Agency
” and “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company. For clarity, if there is no Agency then Advertiser takes on all obligations of Agency under the IO and these IO Terms.
Effective January 23rd 2024
to
April 3rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Last Updated: September 28, 2023
These Quantcast Advertise Insertion Order Terms & Conditions (“
IO Terms
”) govern the Insertion Orders (“IOs”) that reference these IO Terms. In these IO Terms, the party entering into the IO will be called “
Company
” and the Quantcast entity identified on the relevant Insertion Order will be called “
Quantcast
”. Quantcast will provide the services set forth in the IO and these IO Terms (“
Services
”).
These IO Terms are comprised of the following:
(1) 4A’s/IAB Standard Terms and Conditions for Internet Advertising for Media Buys One Year or Less, Version 3 (“4As Term”)
, located
here
are incorporated herein by reference; and
(2) The
following additional and controlling terms:
a
.Services
: The Services include Quantcast’s campaign management services, including campaign strategy and campaign execution and any other data services, products, features and/or tools provided by Quantcast under an IO or selected via the Platform (as defined below). Quantcast may use the Platform on Company’s behalf to provide the Services, including to (i) purchase inventory, (ii) run campaigns, (iii) build audiences (iv) select additional Services, including Third-Party Services (as defined below). Any selection made by  Quantcast in the Platform on Company’s behalf shall be deemed a selection made by Company for purposes of the IO Terms.
b. Geo-targeting
: Geo-targeting will be agreed to by the parties.
c. Cross-Platform
: All campaigns are served with blended devices (desktop, mobile web, tablet) targeting unless otherwise agreed to by the parties.
d. Payment and
Invoicing
:
i. Payment to be made in the currency identified in the
Campaign Total Budget
(as shown in the IO).
ii. Quantcast will provide monthly invoices electronically.
iii. In the case of non-US placements, the Campaign Total Budget is exclusive of VAT.
iv.Section III(c) of the 4As Terms shall not apply. Company will pay invoices within 30 days of the invoice date. Quantcast reserves the right to charge interest of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company will be responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect any unpaid invoices.
v. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is solely responsible for all amounts payable for Third-Party Services (defined below) and the cost of placing the AdChoices or similar icon (“
Third-Party Costs
”), whether Quantcast includes such Third-Party Costs on its invoices or Company pays such Third-Party Costs directly. Quantcast reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon. Company acknowledges that any Third-Party Costs shown in the Platform
are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
e
.Budget Fluidity for Performance Optimization
:
Quantcast may shift budgets among placements across the entire date range of a campaign in order to optimize performance; provided, that Quantcast stays within the Campaign Total Budget.
f.
Privacy Requirements and Campaign Policy
i. Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services). Without limiting the foregoing, throughout the term of the IO, the parties agree to adhere to Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self- regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). If a change in Applicable Privacy Laws or self- regulatory principles necessitates a change to these IO Terms, the parties will work together in good faith to agree to appropriate revisions. “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means all applicable international, federal, state, or local laws and regulations relating to personal data or personal information, as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, such as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) and any EU Member State laws implementing the GDPR, the UK GDPR and the UK Data Protection Act 2018 (collectively, “
GDPR
”), the e-Privacy Directive (Directive 2002/58/EC) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (collectively, “
ePD
”) and the California Consumer Privacy Act (Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 – 1798.199), as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CCPA”).
ii. Each party will (a) prominently display a user-friendly, easily-accessible, clear, and comprehensive privacy policy on its website or mobile application that complies with all applicable laws (including Applicable Privacy Laws) and applicable self- regulatory principles; and (b) if and as applicable, provide website or application visitors in its privacy policy (i) notice that its website, application, or service permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the data collected and the means of collection, and (iii) a link to an industry-standard opt- out mechanism, such as the
NAI
or
DAA
opt out page.
iii. Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of a user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties directed at children. “Direct Identifier” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID or other digital identifiers. For purposes of these IO Terms, “children” refers to anyone age 16 or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
iv. These IO Terms incorporate (i) the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing personal information that is subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing Addendum) and (ii) the
International Data
Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing of personal data that is subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing Addendum).
In addition, Company will comply with Quantcast’s then-current
Campaign and Data Policy
and
Privacy Requirements
(collectively the “
Campaign Policy
”). All of the foregoing linked adden
da and policies constitute “Policies” under the 4As Terms.
g.
Viewability
i.
Viewability Calculation
:
Viewability is calculated as the number of in-view impressions divided by the number of vendor-measured, delivered impressions served across the entire campaign. The percentage viewability for measured impressions will be imputed to unmeasured impressions.
ii.
Viewability Goal
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will optimize delivery towards the applicable Viewability Goal.
iii.
Viewability Guarantee
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will provide the Viewability Guarantee. Such guarantee will only be offered for video placements, Search Powered Audiences, Demographic Audiences, and Data Partner Audiences.
a.
Makegood
. If the Viewability Guarantee is not met, Company’s sole remedy will be Quantcast’s delivery, for a brand campaign, of a number of impressions equal to double the difference between the Viewability Guarantee and the actual viewability delivered. This double makegood will fulfill the stated guarantee, and is not itself subject to a viewability requirement.
b.
Conditions
.
1.Viewability Vendor must be MRC accredited. Other than for MOAT, Company will provide Quantcast with the Viewability Vendor’s daily reporting.
2. Company must raise any viewability dispute within 30 days of the campaign end date.
3. Lowering the viewability requirement during a campaign voids the guarantee.
4. Makegood impressions expire 90 days from the campaign end date.
5. At its discretion, Quantcast may issue a credit memo for the value of makegood impressions.
iv.
vCPM
:
If a placement uses a vCPM pricing model, Company will only be billed for viewable (or “in-view”) impressions (regardless of the percentage of viewability) as reported by the Viewability Vendor (specified in the placement on the IO).
h
.Third-Party Ad Server
:
If Company is using a third-party ad server, Company will provide Quantcast log-in access to each Ad Server listed in the placements above within 24 hours of campaign start date for reporting access (including conversions, if applicable).
j.
Additional Company Representation and Warranty
.
i. Company represents and warrants that it will comply with all applicable laws and has obtained all necessary licensure for performance hereunder, and that Ads will not infringe or violate any applicable laws, ordinances, rules, codes, or regulations (including, without limitation, any industry-specific ethical, professional, or self-regulatory requirements or guidelines, and Applicable Privacy Laws) or the rights of any third party. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), Company also represents and warrants that it has the authority to bind its Clients to these IO Terms and each IO, and that all of Company’s actions related to these IO Terms and each IO will be within the scope of such agency.
k.
For Placements Priced on a CPA basis.
i.
Company agrees to pay Quantcast for the conversions and click-thru conversions as stated within the applicable placement. The conversion is defined as from both click-thru and view-thru conversions.
I.
IAB Ads.txt Principles
:
Quantcast supports the principles of IAB initiative ads.txt and recommends all publishers adopt ads.txt as soon as possible. For inventory where we crawl a non-empty ads.txt file, Quantcast will only consider buying inventory from authorized sellers.
m.
Advertise Platform Access
:
If Quantcast provides Company with access to Quantcast’s platform (“
Platform
”), the following terms apply:
i. Quantcast may provide individuals authorized by Company (“
Authorized Users
”) with view only access to the Platform. Quantcast will set up the initial Authorized Users requested by Company. Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials. Company is required to maintain at least one Authorized User, and access credentials for that user, during the Services. Each Authorized User will have the ability to add new Authorized Users and terminate access for existing Authorized Users. Company may also request that Quantcast add additional Authorized Users (email being sufficient for such requests). Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including maintaining the confidentiality of its account logins and passwords and shall immediately notify Quantcast in writing of any loss or involuntary disclosure thereof. Company shall ensure that all Authorized Users (a) use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, as Company is authorized to access and use the Services under these IO Terms, and (b) are aware of, and comply with, all requirements and restrictions described in these IO Terms. For the avoidance of doubt, Company shall be liable for any breach of these IO Terms by any Authorized User.
ii. Subject to these IO Terms, during the term of the IO and for any additional period permitted by Quantcast, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, revocable and non-sublicensable license to access and use the Platform solely to (a) view campaigns set-up in the Platform as part of the Services, and/or (b) view reports generated by the Services.
iii. Company will ensure that its account information is accurate and current. Quantcast reserves the right to review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
iv. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of Company, if applicable), (d) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate,
and data made available on the Platform, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform, or (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than Company’s own Clients who are obligated to treat such reports confidentially, if applicable).
v.For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing and improving the Services.
n.
Client Data
:
Upon written request from an advertiser client (“
Client
”), Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in accordance with their written request (including, without limitation, sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Platform). For clarity, “
Client Data
” means the (i) data Quantcast receives from campaign tag(s) placed by or on behalf of Company or its Clients on websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments that Company may have created using the tag data or any campaign performance data generated from campaigns delivered by Company using such Client Data.
o.
Jurisdiction and Venue.
i.
If signed by Quantcast Corp.:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of the state of California. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
ii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
International
Limited:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Ireland. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Dublin, Ireland, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
iii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
Australia
Pty
Ltd:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Australia. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Sydney, Australia, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
p.
Taxes
:
All charges under these IO Terms are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of these IO Terms for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
q.
System of Record:
Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating and reporting metrics related to inventory purchases, impressions and all amounts owed under these IO Terms.
r.
Promotion:
Section IX(g) of the 4As Terms is hereby amended by adding the following after the last sentence in Section IX(g): “Notwithstanding all the foregoing, Quantcast may include Agency’s and Advertiser’s names and logos in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, and in promotional materials.”
s
. Breach by Company:
Without limiting any of Quantcast’s other remedies hereunder, Quantcast may, in its sole discretion, immediately suspend or terminate any individual campaign if Quantcast reasonably suspects that such campaign is in breach or violation of any of Company’s obligations, representations, or warranties set forth in these IO Terms (including, without limitation, any failure to comply with the Campaign Policy).
t.INDEMNIFICATION
: Section X of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
X. MUTUAL
INDEMNITY
a. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents (and their respective successors, heirs and assigns) (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including, for clarity, any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast and its directors, officers, employees and agents, its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) violation of these IO Terms (including the 4As Terms and Policies); (b) Company- provided or Client-provided data or ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of subsection j. (Additional Company Representation and Warranty) above.
b.The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
c. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or data, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast which would have cured the cause of action, provided that following such instructions would not have caused Company substantial additional cost, or (e) use of the Services or data other than as described herein. In the case of any of the foregoing, Company will indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
d. In the event that Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s reasonable opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing, or, if such remedies are not reasonably available,
above, Quantcast shall provide Company with as much written notice as reasonably practicable prior to the effective date of such termination. Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section X are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability to Company and Company’s sole remedies as to infringement of intellectual property rights.”
u. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY: Section XI of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the            following:
“
XI. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS TO COMPANY FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE QUANTCAST PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED BY INVENTORY PARTNERS WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION XI LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE, AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE
(12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE. The parties acknowledge that the limitations and exclusions contained in these IO Terms have been the subject of negotiation between the parties and represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with their respective obligations under these IO Terms and the payments made hereunder.”
v.
Third-Party Services:
To the extent Company receives any services or products of a third party in conjunction with the Services, including without limitation any third-party data provider (each service, a “
Third- Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply. For the avoidance of doubt, these terms are supplementary: they do not replace or limit any other terms and conditions of these IO Terms.
i. Third-Party Services Terms.
Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third party terms and conditions of such Third-Party Service in addition to the terms of these IO Terms. Any such third party terms and conditions are as provided to Company in writing by Quantcast or by the relevant third party.
ii. Limitations.
Quantcast does not endorse, is not responsible or liable for, and makes no representations as to any Third-Party Services, including, without limitation, their content or the manner in which they handle, protect, manage or process data, or any interaction between Company and the provider of such Third-Party Service. Quantcast cannot guarantee the continued availability or pricing of such Third-Party Services, or any features thereof, and may cease enabling access to them without liability to Company, if, for example and without limitation, the provider of a Third-Party Service ceases to make the Third-Party Service available for interoperation with the corresponding Service in a manner acceptable to Quantcast. Company irrevocably waives any claim against Quantcast with respect to such Third-Party Services.
Quantcast is not liable for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with Company’s receipt, enablement, access or use of any such Third-Party Services, or Company’s reliance on the privacy practices, data security processes or other policies of such Third-Party Services. Company may be required to register for or log into such Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company-provided or Client-provided data or ads with such Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
iii. LiveRamp Usage Restrictions.
To the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “LiveRamp”) in connection with the Services outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to these IO Terms, and Company agrees : (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Service to Company, including to access and download Company’s CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp’s SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Service to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) reverse engineer, aggregate, or disambiguate any data or technology received from LiveRamp or its services (except as expressly agreed by LiveRamp in writing), (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are sexually- oriented or related to tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to an individual’s health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), (iii) with attributes that correlate to unique records or individuals, or (iv) for which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent to provide to LiveRamp; and (e) Company additionally warrants that: (y) it will not direct data to any other destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such destination, and (z) obtained and maintained all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder.
w.
Conflicts, Responsibility, Terminology
:
To the extent of any conflict with the 4As Terms, these IO Terms govern. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is responsible for the actions/inactions of its Clients in connection with this IO and the Services and for ensuring compliance with these IO Terms by its Clients.
i. Any references to “
Customer
” in an IO shall mean Company.
ii.Any references to “
Media Company
” in the 4As Terms and/or an IO shall mean Quantcast.
iii. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), then all references to “
Agency
” shall mean Company and all references to “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company’s Clients.
iv. If Company is an Advertiser (as defined in the 4As Terms), then references to both “
Agency
” and “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company. For clarity, if there is no Agency then Advertiser takes on all obligations of Agency under the IO and these IO Terms.
Effective January 23rd 2024
to
January 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Last Updated: September 28, 2023
These Quantcast Advertise Insertion Order Terms & Conditions (“
IO Terms
”) govern the Insertion Orders (“IOs”) that reference these IO Terms. In these IO Terms, the party entering into the IO will be called “
Company
” and the Quantcast entity identified on the relevant Insertion Order will be called “
Quantcast
”. Quantcast will provide the services set forth in the IO and these IO Terms (“
Services
”).
These IO Terms are comprised of the following:
(1) 4A’s/IAB Standard Terms and Conditions for Internet Advertising for Media Buys One Year or Less, Version 3 (“4As Term”)
, located
here
are incorporated herein by reference; and
(2) The
following additional and controlling terms:
a
.Services
: The Services include Quantcast’s campaign management services, including campaign strategy and campaign execution and any other data services, products, features and/or tools provided by Quantcast under an IO or selected via the Platform (as defined below). Quantcast may use the Platform on Company’s behalf to provide the Services, including to (i) purchase inventory, (ii) run campaigns, (iii) build audiences (iv) select additional Services, including Third-Party Services (as defined below). Any selection made by  Quantcast in the Platform on Company’s behalf shall be deemed a selection made by Company for purposes of the IO Terms.
b. Geo-targeting
: Geo-targeting will be agreed to by the parties.
c. Cross-Platform
: All campaigns are served with blended devices (desktop, mobile web, tablet) targeting unless otherwise agreed to by the parties.
d. Payment and
Invoicing
:
i. Payment to be made in the currency identified in the
Campaign Total Budget
(as shown in the IO).
ii. Quantcast will provide monthly invoices electronically.
iii. In the case of non-US placements, the Campaign Total Budget is exclusive of VAT.
iv.Section III(c) of the 4As Terms shall not apply. Company will pay invoices within 30 days of the invoice date. Quantcast reserves the right to charge interest of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company will be responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect any unpaid invoices.
v. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is solely responsible for all amounts payable for Third-Party Services (defined below) and the cost of placing the AdChoices or similar icon (“
Third-Party Costs
”), whether Quantcast includes such Third-Party Costs on its invoices or Company pays such Third-Party Costs directly. Quantcast reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon. Company acknowledges that any Third-Party Costs shown in the Platform
are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
e
.Budget Fluidity for Performance Optimization
:
Quantcast may shift budgets among placements across the entire date range of a campaign in order to optimize performance; provided, that Quantcast stays within the Campaign Total Budget.
f.
Privacy Requirements and Campaign Policy
i. Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services). Without limiting the foregoing, throughout the term of the IO, the parties agree to adhere to Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self- regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). If a change in Applicable Privacy Laws or self- regulatory principles necessitates a change to these IO Terms, the parties will work together in good faith to agree to appropriate revisions. “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means all applicable international, federal, state, or local laws and regulations relating to personal data or personal information, as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, such as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) and any EU Member State laws implementing the GDPR, the UK GDPR and the UK Data Protection Act 2018 (collectively, “
GDPR
”), the e-Privacy Directive (Directive 2002/58/EC) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (collectively, “
ePD
”) and the California Consumer Privacy Act (Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 – 1798.199), as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CCPA”).
ii. Each party will (a) prominently display a user-friendly, easily-accessible, clear, and comprehensive privacy policy on its website or mobile application that complies with all applicable laws (including Applicable Privacy Laws) and applicable self- regulatory principles; and (b) if and as applicable, provide website or application visitors in its privacy policy (i) notice that its website, application, or service permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the data collected and the means of collection, and (iii) a link to an industry-standard opt- out mechanism, such as the
NAI
or
DAA
opt out page.
iii. Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of a user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties directed at children. “Direct Identifier” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID or other digital identifiers. For purposes of these IO Terms, “children” refers to anyone age 16 or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
iv. These IO Terms incorporate the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing personal information that is subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing European Economic Area, the UK or Switzerland, these IO Terms incorporate the
International Data
Privacy Addendum
.
In addition, Company will comply with Quantcast’s then-current
Campaign and Data Policy
and
Privacy Requirements
(collectively the “
Campaign Policy
”). All of the foregoing linked adden
da and policies constitute “Policies” under the 4As Terms.
g.
Viewability
i.
Viewability Calculation
:
Viewability is calculated as the number of in-view impressions divided by the number of vendor-measured, delivered impressions served across the entire campaign. The percentage viewability for measured impressions will be imputed to unmeasured impressions.
ii.
Viewability Goal
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will optimize delivery towards the applicable Viewability Goal.
iii.
Viewability Guarantee
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will provide the Viewability Guarantee. Such guarantee will only be offered for video placements, Search Powered Audiences, Demographic Audiences, and Data Partner Audiences.
a.
Makegood
. If the Viewability Guarantee is not met, Company’s sole remedy will be Quantcast’s delivery, for a brand campaign, of a number of impressions equal to double the difference between the Viewability Guarantee and the actual viewability delivered. This double makegood will fulfill the stated guarantee, and is not itself subject to a viewability requirement.
b.
Conditions
.
1.Viewability Vendor must be MRC accredited. Other than for MOAT, Company will provide Quantcast with the Viewability Vendor’s daily reporting.
2. Company must raise any viewability dispute within 30 days of the campaign end date.
3. Lowering the viewability requirement during a campaign voids the guarantee.
4. Makegood impressions expire 90 days from the campaign end date.
5. At its discretion, Quantcast may issue a credit memo for the value of makegood impressions.
iv.
vCPM
:
If a placement uses a vCPM pricing model, Company will only be billed for viewable (or “in-view”) impressions (regardless of the percentage of viewability) as reported by the Viewability Vendor (specified in the placement on the IO).
h
.Third-Party Ad Server
:
If Company is using a third-party ad server, Company will provide Quantcast log-in access to each Ad Server listed in the placements above within 24 hours of campaign start date for reporting access (including conversions, if applicable).
j.
Additional Company Representation and Warranty
.
i. Company represents and warrants that it will comply with all applicable laws and has obtained all necessary licensure for performance hereunder, and that Ads will not infringe or violate any applicable laws, ordinances, rules, codes, or regulations (including, without limitation, any industry-specific ethical, professional, or self-regulatory requirements or guidelines, and Applicable Privacy Laws) or the rights of any third party. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), Company also represents and warrants that it has the authority to bind its Clients to these IO Terms and each IO, and that all of Company’s actions related to these IO Terms and each IO will be within the scope of such agency.
k.
For Placements Priced on a CPA basis.
i.
Company agrees to pay Quantcast for the conversions and click-thru conversions as stated within the applicable placement. The conversion is defined as from both click-thru and view-thru conversions.
I.
IAB Ads.txt Principles
:
Quantcast supports the principles of IAB initiative ads.txt and recommends all publishers adopt ads.txt as soon as possible. For inventory where we crawl a non-empty ads.txt file, Quantcast will only consider buying inventory from authorized sellers.
m.
Advertise Platform Access
:
If Quantcast provides Company with access to Quantcast’s platform (“
Platform
”), the following terms apply:
i. Quantcast may provide individuals authorized by Company (“
Authorized Users
”) with view only access to the Platform. Quantcast will set up the initial Authorized Users requested by Company. Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials. Company is required to maintain at least one Authorized User, and access credentials for that user, during the Services. Each Authorized User will have the ability to add new Authorized Users and terminate access for existing Authorized Users. Company may also request that Quantcast add additional Authorized Users (email being sufficient for such requests). Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including maintaining the confidentiality of its account logins and passwords and shall immediately notify Quantcast in writing of any loss or involuntary disclosure thereof. Company shall ensure that all Authorized Users (a) use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, as Company is authorized to access and use the Services under these IO Terms, and (b) are aware of, and comply with, all requirements and restrictions described in these IO Terms. For the avoidance of doubt, Company shall be liable for any breach of these IO Terms by any Authorized User.
ii. Subject to these IO Terms, during the term of the IO and for any additional period permitted by Quantcast, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, revocable and non-sublicensable license to access and use the Platform solely to (a) view campaigns set-up in the Platform as part of the Services, and/or (b) view reports generated by the Services.
iii. Company will ensure that its account information is accurate and current. Quantcast reserves the right to review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
iv. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of Company, if applicable), (d) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate,
and data made available on the Platform, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform, or (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than Company’s own Clients who are obligated to treat such reports confidentially, if applicable).
v.For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing and improving the Services.
n.
Client Data
:
Upon written request from an advertiser client (“
Client
”), Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in accordance with their written request (including, without limitation, sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Platform). For clarity, “
Client Data
” means the (i) data Quantcast receives from campaign tag(s) placed by or on behalf of Company or its Clients on websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments that Company may have created using the tag data or any campaign performance data generated from campaigns delivered by Company using such Client Data.
o.
Jurisdiction and Venue.
i.
If signed by Quantcast Corp.:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of the state of California. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
ii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
International
Limited:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Ireland. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Dublin, Ireland, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
iii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
Australia
Pty
Ltd:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Australia. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Sydney, Australia, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
p.
Taxes
:
All charges under these IO Terms are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of these IO Terms for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
q.
System of Record:
Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating and reporting metrics related to inventory purchases, impressions and all amounts owed under these IO Terms.
r.
Promotion:
Section IX(g) of the 4As Terms is hereby amended by adding the following after the last sentence in Section IX(g): “Notwithstanding all the foregoing, Quantcast may include Agency’s and Advertiser’s names and logos in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, and in promotional materials.”
s
. Breach by Company:
Without limiting any of Quantcast’s other remedies hereunder, Quantcast may, in its sole discretion, immediately suspend or terminate any individual campaign if Quantcast reasonably suspects that such campaign is in breach or violation of any of Company’s obligations, representations, or warranties set forth in these IO Terms (including, without limitation, any failure to comply with the Campaign Policy).
t. INDEMNIFICATION
: Section X of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
X. MUTUAL
INDEMNITY
a. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents (and their respective successors, heirs and assigns) (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including, for clarity, any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast and its directors, officers, employees and agents, its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) violation of these IO Terms (including the 4As Terms and Policies); (b) Company- provided or Client-provided data or ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of subsection j. (Additional Company Representation and Warranty) above.
b.The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
c. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or data, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast which would have cured the cause of action, provided that following such instructions would not have caused Company substantial additional cost, or (e) use of the Services or data other than as described herein. In the case of any of the foregoing, Company will indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
d. In the event that Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s reasonable opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing, or, if such remedies are not reasonably available,
above, Quantcast shall provide Company with as much written notice as reasonably practicable prior to the effective date of such termination. Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section X are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability to Company and Company’s sole remedies as to infringement of intellectual property rights.”
u. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY: Section XI of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the            following:
“
XI. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS TO COMPANY FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE QUANTCAST PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED BY INVENTORY PARTNERS WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION XI LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE, AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE
(12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE. The parties acknowledge that the limitations and exclusions contained in these IO Terms have been the subject of negotiation between the parties and represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with their respective obligations under these IO Terms and the payments made hereunder.”
v.
Third-Party Services:
To the extent Company receives any services or products of a third party in conjunction with the Services, including without limitation any third-party data provider (each service, a “
Third- Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply. For the avoidance of doubt, these terms are supplementary: they do not replace or limit any other terms and conditions of these IO Terms.
i. Third-Party Services Terms.
Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third party terms and conditions of such Third-Party Service in addition to the terms of these IO Terms. Any such third party terms and conditions are as provided to Company in writing by Quantcast or by the relevant third party.
ii. Limitations.
Quantcast does not endorse, is not responsible or liable for, and makes no representations as to any Third-Party Services, including, without limitation, their content or the manner in which they handle, protect, manage or process data, or any interaction between Company and the provider of such Third-Party Service. Quantcast cannot guarantee the continued availability or pricing of such Third-Party Services, or any features thereof, and may cease enabling access to them without liability to Company, if, for example and without limitation, the provider of a Third-Party Service ceases to make the Third-Party Service available for interoperation with the corresponding Service in a manner acceptable to Quantcast. Company irrevocably waives any claim against Quantcast with respect to such Third-Party Services.
Quantcast is not liable for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with Company’s receipt, enablement, access or use of any such Third-Party Services, or Company’s reliance on the privacy practices, data security processes or other policies of such Third-Party Services. Company may be required to register for or log into such Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company-provided or Client-provided data or ads with such Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
iii. LiveRamp Usage Restrictions.
To the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “LiveRamp”) in connection with the Services outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to these IO Terms, and Company agrees : (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Service to Company, including to access and download Company’s CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp’s SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Service to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) reverse engineer, aggregate, or disambiguate any data or technology received from LiveRamp or its services (except as expressly agreed by LiveRamp in writing), (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are sexually- oriented or related to tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to an individual’s health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), (iii) with attributes that correlate to unique records or individuals, or (iv) for which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent to provide to LiveRamp; and (e) Company additionally warrants that: (y) it will not direct data to any other destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such destination, and (z) obtained and maintained all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder.
w.
Conflicts, Responsibility, Terminology
:
To the extent of any conflict with the 4As Terms, these IO Terms govern. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is responsible for the actions/inactions of its Clients in connection with this IO and the Services and for ensuring compliance with these IO Terms by its Clients.
i. Any references to “
Customer
” in an IO shall mean Company.
ii.Any references to “
Media Company
” in the 4As Terms and/or an IO shall mean Quantcast.
iii. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), then all references to “
Agency
” shall mean Company and all references to “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company’s Clients.
iv. If Company is an Advertiser (as defined in the 4As Terms), then references to both “
Agency
” and “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company. For clarity, if there is no Agency then Advertiser takes on all obligations of Agency under the IO and these IO Terms.
Effective September 11th 2023
to
January 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Last Updated: August 25, 2023
These Quantcast Advertise Insertion Order Terms & Conditions (“
IO Terms
”) govern the Insertion Orders (“IOs”) that reference these IO Terms. In these IO Terms, the party entering into the IO will be called “
Company
” and the Quantcast entity identified on the relevant Insertion Order will be called “
Quantcast
”. Quantcast will provide the services set forth in the IO and these IO Terms (“
Services
”).
These IO Terms are comprised of the following:
(1) 4A’s/IAB Standard Terms and Conditions for Internet Advertising for Media Buys One Year or Less, Version 3 (“4As Term”)
, located
here
are incorporated herein by reference; and
(2) The
following additional and controlling terms:
a
.Services
: The Services include Quantcast’s campaign management services, including campaign strategy and campaign execution and any other data services, products, features and/or tools provided by Quantcast under an IO or selected via the Platform (as defined below). Quantcast may use the Platform on Company’s behalf to provide the Services, including to (i) purchase inventory, (ii) run campaigns, (iii) build audiences (iv) select additional Services, including Third-Party Services (as defined below). Any selection made by  Quantcast in the Platform on Company’s behalf shall be deemed a selection made by Company for purposes of the IO Terms.
b. Geo-targeting
: Geo-targeting will be agreed to by the parties.
c. Cross-Platform
: All campaigns are served with blended devices (desktop, mobile web, tablet) targeting unless otherwise agreed to by the parties.
d. Payment and
Invoicing
:
i. Payment to be made in the currency identified in the
Campaign Total Budget
(as shown in the IO).
ii. Quantcast will provide monthly invoices electronically.
iii. In the case of non-US placements, the Campaign Total Budget is exclusive of VAT.
iv.Section III(c) of the 4As Terms shall not apply. Company will pay invoices within 30 days of the invoice date. Quantcast reserves the right to charge interest of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company will be responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect any unpaid invoices.
v. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is solely responsible for all amounts payable for Third-Party Services (defined below) and the cost of placing the AdChoices or similar icon (“
Third-Party Costs
”), whether Quantcast includes such Third-Party Costs on its invoices or Company pays such Third-Party Costs directly. Quantcast reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon. Company acknowledges that any Third-Party Costs shown in the Platform
are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
e
.Budget Fluidity for Performance Optimization
:
Quantcast may shift budgets among placements across the entire date range of a campaign in order to optimize performance; provided, that Quantcast stays within the Campaign Total Budget.
f.
Privacy Requirements and Campaign Policy
i. Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services). Without limiting the foregoing, throughout the term of the IO, the parties agree to adhere to Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self- regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). If a change in Applicable Privacy Laws or self- regulatory principles necessitates a change to these IO Terms, the parties will work together in good faith to agree to appropriate revisions. “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means all applicable international, federal, state, or local laws and regulations relating to personal data or personal information, as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, such as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) and any EU Member State laws implementing the GDPR, the UK GDPR and the UK Data Protection Act 2018 (collectively, “
GDPR
”), the e-Privacy Directive (Directive 2002/58/EC) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (collectively, “
ePD
”) and the California Consumer Privacy Act (Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 – 1798.199), as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CCPA”).
ii. Each party will (a) prominently display a user-friendly, easily-accessible, clear, and comprehensive privacy policy on its website or mobile application that complies with all applicable laws (including Applicable Privacy Laws) and applicable self- regulatory principles; and (b) if and as applicable, provide website or application visitors in its privacy policy (i) notice that its website, application, or service permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the data collected and the means of collection, and (iii) a link to an industry-standard opt- out mechanism, such as the
NAI
or
DAA
opt out page.
iii. Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of a user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties directed at children. “Direct Identifier” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID or other digital identifiers. For purposes of these IO Terms, “children” refers to anyone age 16 or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
iv. These IO Terms incorporate the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing personal information that is subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing
European Economic Area, the UK or Switzerland, these IO Terms incorporate the
EEA/UK/Swiss Data
Privacy Addendum
. In addition, Company will comply with Quantcast’s then-current
Campaign and Data Policy
and
Privacy Requirements
(collectively the “
Campaign Policy
”). All of the foregoing linked adden
da and policies constitute “Policies” under the 4As Terms.
g.
Viewability
i.
Viewability Calculation
:
Viewability is calculated as the number of in-view impressions divided by the number of vendor-measured, delivered impressions served across the entire campaign. The percentage viewability for measured impressions will be imputed to unmeasured impressions.
ii.
Viewability Goal
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will optimize delivery towards the applicable Viewability Goal.
iii.
Viewability Guarantee
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will provide the Viewability Guarantee. Such guarantee will only be offered for video placements, Search Powered Audiences, Demographic Audiences, and Data Partner Audiences.
a.
Makegood
. If the Viewability Guarantee is not met, Company’s sole remedy will be Quantcast’s delivery, for a brand campaign, of a number of impressions equal to double the difference between the Viewability Guarantee and the actual viewability delivered. This double makegood will fulfill the stated guarantee, and is not itself subject to a viewability requirement.
b.
Conditions
.
1.Viewability Vendor must be MRC accredited. Other than for MOAT, Company will provide Quantcast with the Viewability Vendor’s daily reporting.
2. Company must raise any viewability dispute within 30 days of the campaign end date.
3. Lowering the viewability requirement during a campaign voids the guarantee.
4. Makegood impressions expire 90 days from the campaign end date.
5. At its discretion, Quantcast may issue a credit memo for the value of makegood impressions.
iv.
vCPM
:
If a placement uses a vCPM pricing model, Company will only be billed for viewable (or “in-view”) impressions (regardless of the percentage of viewability) as reported by the Viewability Vendor (specified in the placement on the IO).
h
.Third-Party Ad Server
:
If Company is using a third-party ad server, Company will provide Quantcast log-in access to each Ad Server listed in the placements above within 24 hours of campaign start date for reporting access (including conversions, if applicable).
j.
Additional Company Representation and Warranty
.
i. Company represents and warrants that it will comply with all applicable laws and has obtained all necessary licensure for performance hereunder, and that Ads will not infringe or violate any applicable laws, ordinances, rules, codes, or regulations (including, without limitation, any industry-specific ethical, professional, or self-regulatory requirements or guidelines, and Applicable Privacy Laws) or the rights of any third party. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), Company also represents and warrants that it has the authority to bind its Clients to these IO Terms and each IO, and that all of Company’s actions related to these IO Terms and each IO will be within the scope of such agency.
k.
For Placements Priced on a CPA basis.
i.
Company agrees to pay Quantcast for the conversions and click-thru conversions as stated within the applicable placement. The conversion is defined as from both click-thru and view-thru conversions.
I.
IAB Ads.txt Principles
:
Quantcast supports the principles of IAB initiative ads.txt and recommends all publishers adopt ads.txt as soon as possible. For inventory where we crawl a non-empty ads.txt file, Quantcast will only consider buying inventory from authorized sellers.
m.
Advertise Platform Access
:
If Quantcast provides Company with access to Quantcast’s platform (“
Platform
”), the following terms apply:
i. Quantcast may provide individuals authorized by Company (“
Authorized Users
”) with view only access to the Platform. Quantcast will set up the initial Authorized Users requested by Company. Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials. Company is required to maintain at least one Authorized User, and access credentials for that user, during the Services. Each Authorized User will have the ability to add new Authorized Users and terminate access for existing Authorized Users. Company may also request that Quantcast add additional Authorized Users (email being sufficient for such requests). Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including maintaining the confidentiality of its account logins and passwords and shall immediately notify Quantcast in writing of any loss or involuntary disclosure thereof. Company shall ensure that all Authorized Users (a) use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, as Company is authorized to access and use the Services under these IO Terms, and (b) are aware of, and comply with, all requirements and restrictions described in these IO Terms. For the avoidance of doubt, Company shall be liable for any breach of these IO Terms by any Authorized User.
ii. Subject to these IO Terms, during the term of the IO and for any additional period permitted by Quantcast, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, revocable and non-sublicensable license to access and use the Platform solely to (a) view campaigns set-up in the Platform as part of the Services, and/or (b) view reports generated by the Services.
iii. Company will ensure that its account information is accurate and current. Quantcast reserves the right to review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
iv. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of Company, if applicable), (d) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate,
and data made available on the Platform, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform, or (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than Company’s own Clients who are obligated to treat such reports confidentially, if applicable).
v.For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing and improving the Services.
n.
Client Data
:
Upon written request from an advertiser client (“
Client
”), Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in accordance with their written request (including, without limitation, sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Platform). For clarity, “
Client Data
” means the (i) data Quantcast receives from campaign tag(s) placed by or on behalf of Company or its Clients on websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments that Company may have created using the tag data or any campaign performance data generated from campaigns delivered by Company using such Client Data.
o.
Jurisdiction and Venue.
i.
If signed by Quantcast Corp.:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of the state of California. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
ii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
International
Limited:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Ireland. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Dublin, Ireland, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
iii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
Australia
Pty
Ltd:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Australia. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Sydney, Australia, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
p.
Taxes
:
All charges under these IO Terms are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of these IO Terms for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
q.
System of Record:
Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating and reporting metrics related to inventory purchases, impressions and all amounts owed under these IO Terms.
r.
Promotion:
Section IX(g) of the 4As Terms is hereby amended by adding the following after the last sentence in Section IX(g): “Notwithstanding all the foregoing, Quantcast may include Agency’s and Advertiser’s names and logos in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, and in promotional materials.”
s
. Breach by Company:
Without limiting any of Quantcast’s other remedies hereunder, Quantcast may, in its sole discretion, immediately suspend or terminate any individual campaign if Quantcast reasonably suspects that such campaign is in breach or violation of any of Company’s obligations, representations, or warranties set forth in these IO Terms (including, without limitation, any failure to comply with the Campaign Policy).
t. INDEMNIFICATION
: Section X of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
X. MUTUAL
INDEMNITY
a. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents (and their respective successors, heirs and assigns) (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including, for clarity, any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast and its directors, officers, employees and agents, its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) violation of these IO Terms (including the 4As Terms and Policies); (b) Company- provided or Client-provided data or ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of subsection j. (Additional Company Representation and Warranty) above.
b.The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
c. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or data, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast which would have cured the cause of action, provided that following such instructions would not have caused Company substantial additional cost, or (e) use of the Services or data other than as described herein. In the case of any of the foregoing, Company will indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
d. In the event that Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s reasonable opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing, or, if such remedies are not reasonably available,
above, Quantcast shall provide Company with as much written notice as reasonably practicable prior to the effective date of such termination. Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section X are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability to Company and Company’s sole remedies as to infringement of intellectual property rights.”
u. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY: Section XI of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the            following:
“
XI. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS TO COMPANY FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE QUANTCAST PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED BY INVENTORY PARTNERS WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION XI LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE, AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE
(12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE. The parties acknowledge that the limitations and exclusions contained in these IO Terms have been the subject of negotiation between the parties and represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with their respective obligations under these IO Terms and the payments made hereunder.”
v.
Third-Party Services:
To the extent Company receives any services or products of a third party in conjunction with the Services, including without limitation any third-party data provider (each service, a “
Third- Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply. For the avoidance of doubt, these terms are supplementary: they do not replace or limit any other terms and conditions of these IO Terms.
i. Third-Party Services Terms.
Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third party terms and conditions of such Third-Party Service in addition to the terms of these IO Terms. Any such third party terms and conditions are as provided to Company in writing by Quantcast or by the relevant third party.
ii. Limitations.
Quantcast does not endorse, is not responsible or liable for, and makes no representations as to any Third-Party Services, including, without limitation, their content or the manner in which they handle, protect, manage or process data, or any interaction between Company and the provider of such Third-Party Service. Quantcast cannot guarantee the continued availability or pricing of such Third-Party Services, or any features thereof, and may cease enabling access to them without liability to Company, if, for example and without limitation, the provider of a Third-Party Service ceases to make the Third-Party Service available for interoperation with the corresponding Service in a manner acceptable to Quantcast. Company irrevocably waives any claim against Quantcast with respect to such Third-Party Services.
Quantcast is not liable for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with Company’s receipt, enablement, access or use of any such Third-Party Services, or Company’s reliance on the privacy practices, data security processes or other policies of such Third-Party Services. Company may be required to register for or log into such Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company-provided or Client-provided data or ads with such Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
iii. LiveRamp Usage Restrictions.
To the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “LiveRamp”) in connection with the Services outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to these IO Terms, and Company agrees : (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Service to Company, including to access and download Company’s CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp’s SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Service to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) reverse engineer, aggregate, or disambiguate any data or technology received from LiveRamp or its services (except as expressly agreed by LiveRamp in writing), (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are sexually- oriented or related to tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to an individual’s health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), (iii) with attributes that correlate to unique records or individuals, or (iv) for which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent to provide to LiveRamp; and (e) Company additionally warrants that: (y) it will not direct data to any other destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such destination, and (z) obtained and maintained all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder.
w.
Conflicts, Responsibility, Terminology
:
To the extent of any conflict with the 4As Terms, these IO Terms govern. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is responsible for the actions/inactions of its Clients in connection with this IO and the Services and for ensuring compliance with these IO Terms by its Clients.
i. Any references to “
Customer
” in an IO shall mean Company.
ii.Any references to “
Media Company
” in the 4As Terms and/or an IO shall mean Quantcast.
iii. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), then all references to “
Agency
” shall mean Company and all references to “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company’s Clients.
iv. If Company is an Advertiser (as defined in the 4As Terms), then references to both “
Agency
” and “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company. For clarity, if there is no Agency then Advertiser takes on all obligations of Agency under the IO and these IO Terms.
Effective September 11th 2023
to
September 11th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
Last Updated: August 25, 2023
These Quantcast Advertise Insertion Order Terms & Conditions (“
IO Terms
”) govern the Insertion Orders (“IOs”) that reference these IO Terms. In these IO Terms, the party entering into the IO will be called “
Company
” and the Quantcast entity identified on the relevant Insertion Order will be called “
Quantcast
”. Quantcast will provide the services set forth in the IO and these IO Terms (“
Services
”).
These IO Terms are comprised of the following:
(1) 4A’s/IAB Standard Terms and Conditions for Internet Advertising for Media Buys One Year or Less, Version 3 (“4As Term”)
, located
here
are incorporated herein by reference; and
(2) The
following additional and controlling terms:
a
.Services
: The Services include Quantcast’s campaign management services, including campaign strategy and campaign execution and any other data services, products, features and/or tools provided by Quantcast under an IO or selected via the Platform (as defined below). Quantcast may use the Platform on Company’s behalf to provide the Services, including to (i) purchase inventory, (ii) run campaigns, (iii) build audiences (iv) select additional Services, including Third-Party Services (as defined below). Any selection made by  Quantcast in the Platform on Company’s behalf shall be deemed a selection made by Company for purposes of the IO Terms.
b. Geo-targeting
: Geo-targeting will be agreed to by the parties.
c. Cross-Platform
: All campaigns are served with blended devices (desktop, mobile web, tablet) targeting unless otherwise agreed to by the parties.
d. Payment and
Invoicing
:
i. Payment to be made in the currency identified in the
Campaign Total Budget
(as shown in the IO).
ii. Quantcast will provide monthly invoices electronically.
iii. In the case of non-US placements, the Campaign Total Budget is exclusive of VAT.
iv.Section III(c) of the 4As Terms shall not apply. Company will pay invoices within 30 days of the invoice date. Quantcast reserves the right to charge interest of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company will be responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect any unpaid invoices.
v. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is solely responsible for all amounts payable for Third-Party Services (defined below) and the cost of placing the AdChoices or similar icon (“
Third-Party Costs
”), whether Quantcast includes such Third-Party Costs on its invoices or Company pays such Third-Party Costs directly. Quantcast reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon. Company acknowledges that any Third-Party Costs shown in the Platform
are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
e
.Budget Fluidity for Performance Optimization
:
Quantcast may shift budgets among placements across the entire date range of a campaign in order to optimize performance; provided, that Quantcast stays within the Campaign Total Budget.
f.
Privacy Requirements and Campaign Policy
i. Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services). Without limiting the foregoing, throughout the term of the IO, the parties agree to adhere to Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self- regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). If a change in Applicable Privacy Laws or self- regulatory principles necessitates a change to these IO Terms, the parties will work together in good faith to agree to appropriate revisions. “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means all applicable international, federal, state, or local laws and regulations relating to personal data or personal information, as may be amended, extended or re-enacted from time to time, such as the EU General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) and any EU Member State laws implementing the GDPR, the UK GDPR and the UK Data Protection Act 2018 (collectively, “
GDPR
”), the e-Privacy Directive (Directive 2002/58/EC) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003 (collectively, “
ePD
”) and the California Consumer Privacy Act (Cal. Civ. Code §§ 1798.100 – 1798.199), as amended, including by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CCPA”).
ii. Each party will (a) prominently display a user-friendly, easily-accessible, clear, and comprehensive privacy policy on its website or mobile application that complies with all applicable laws (including Applicable Privacy Laws) and applicable self- regulatory principles; and (b) if and as applicable, provide website or application visitors in its privacy policy (i) notice that its website, application, or service permits data collection for interest-based advertising, (ii) a description of the data collected and the means of collection, and (iii) a link to an industry-standard opt- out mechanism, such as the
NAI
or
DAA
opt out page.
iii. Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of a user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing campaign tags on websites, apps and/or other digital properties directed at children. “Direct Identifier” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID or other digital identifiers. For purposes of these IO Terms, “children” refers to anyone age 16 or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
iv. These IO Terms incorporate the
US State Data Privacy Addendum
to the extent that the Services include processing personal information that is subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in the foregoing
European Economic Area, the UK or Switzerland, these IO Terms incorporate the
EEA/UK/Swiss Data
Privacy Addendum
. In addition, Company will comply with Quantcast’s then-current
Campaign and Data Policy
and
Privacy Requirements
(collectively the “
Campaign Policy
”). All of the foregoing linked adden
da and policies constitute “Policies” under the 4As Terms.
g.
Viewability
i.
Viewability Calculation
:
Viewability is calculated as the number of in-view impressions divided by the number of vendor-measured, delivered impressions served across the entire campaign. The percentage viewability for measured impressions will be imputed to unmeasured impressions.
ii.
Viewability Goal
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will optimize delivery towards the applicable Viewability Goal.
iii.
Viewability Guarantee
:
If specified in the placement(s) on the insertion order, Quantcast will provide the Viewability Guarantee. Such guarantee will only be offered for video placements, Search Powered Audiences, Demographic Audiences, and Data Partner Audiences.
a.
Makegood
. If the Viewability Guarantee is not met, Company’s sole remedy will be Quantcast’s delivery, for a brand campaign, of a number of impressions equal to double the difference between the Viewability Guarantee and the actual viewability delivered. This double makegood will fulfill the stated guarantee, and is not itself subject to a viewability requirement.
b.
Conditions
.
1.Viewability Vendor must be MRC accredited. Other than for MOAT, Company will provide Quantcast with the Viewability Vendor’s daily reporting.
2. Company must raise any viewability dispute within 30 days of the campaign end date.
3. Lowering the viewability requirement during a campaign voids the guarantee.
4. Makegood impressions expire 90 days from the campaign end date.
5. At its discretion, Quantcast may issue a credit memo for the value of makegood impressions.
iv.
vCPM
:
If a placement uses a vCPM pricing model, Company will only be billed for viewable (or “in-view”) impressions (regardless of the percentage of viewability) as reported by the Viewability Vendor (specified in the placement on the IO).
h
.Third-Party Ad Server
:
If Company is using a third-party ad server, Company will provide Quantcast log-in access to each Ad Server listed in the placements above within 24 hours of campaign start date for reporting access (including conversions, if applicable).
j.
Additional Company Representation and Warranty
.
i. Company represents and warrants that it will comply with all applicable laws and has obtained all necessary licensure for performance hereunder, and that Ads will not infringe or violate any applicable laws, ordinances, rules, codes, or regulations (including, without limitation, any industry-specific ethical, professional, or self-regulatory requirements or guidelines, and Applicable Privacy Laws) or the rights of any third party. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), Company also represents and warrants that it has the authority to bind its Clients to these IO Terms and each IO, and that all of Company’s actions related to these IO Terms and each IO will be within the scope of such agency.
k.
For Placements Priced on a CPA basis.
i.
Company agrees to pay Quantcast for the conversions and click-thru conversions as stated within the applicable placement. The conversion is defined as from both click-thru and view-thru conversions.
I.
IAB Ads.txt Principles
:
Quantcast supports the principles of IAB initiative ads.txt and recommends all publishers adopt ads.txt as soon as possible. For inventory where we crawl a non-empty ads.txt file, Quantcast will only consider buying inventory from authorized sellers.
m.
Advertise Platform Access
:
If Quantcast provides Company with access to Quantcast’s platform (“
Platform
”), the following terms apply:
i. Quantcast may provide individuals authorized by Company (“
Authorized Users
”) with view only access to the Platform. Quantcast will set up the initial Authorized Users requested by Company. Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials. Company is required to maintain at least one Authorized User, and access credentials for that user, during the Services. Each Authorized User will have the ability to add new Authorized Users and terminate access for existing Authorized Users. Company may also request that Quantcast add additional Authorized Users (email being sufficient for such requests). Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including maintaining the confidentiality of its account logins and passwords and shall immediately notify Quantcast in writing of any loss or involuntary disclosure thereof. Company shall ensure that all Authorized Users (a) use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, as Company is authorized to access and use the Services under these IO Terms, and (b) are aware of, and comply with, all requirements and restrictions described in these IO Terms. For the avoidance of doubt, Company shall be liable for any breach of these IO Terms by any Authorized User.
ii. Subject to these IO Terms, during the term of the IO and for any additional period permitted by Quantcast, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, revocable and non-sublicensable license to access and use the Platform solely to (a) view campaigns set-up in the Platform as part of the Services, and/or (b) view reports generated by the Services.
iii. Company will ensure that its account information is accurate and current. Quantcast reserves the right to review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
iv. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of Company, if applicable), (d) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate,
and data made available on the Platform, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform, or (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than Company’s own Clients who are obligated to treat such reports confidentially, if applicable).
v.For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing and improving the Services.
n.
Client Data
:
Upon written request from an advertiser client (“
Client
”), Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in accordance with their written request (including, without limitation, sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Platform). For clarity, “
Client Data
” means the (i) data Quantcast receives from campaign tag(s) placed by or on behalf of Company or its Clients on websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments that Company may have created using the tag data or any campaign performance data generated from campaigns delivered by Company using such Client Data.
o.
Jurisdiction and Venue.
i.
If signed by Quantcast Corp.:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of the state of California. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in the state or federal courts located in the Northern District of California, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
ii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
International
Limited:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Ireland. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Dublin, Ireland, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
iii.
If
signed
by
Quantcast
Australia
Pty
Ltd:
All IOs will be governed by the laws of Australia. Quantcast and Company (on behalf of itself and its Clients) agree that any claims, legal proceedings, or litigation arising in connection with the IO (including the Terms) will be brought solely and exclusively in Sydney, Australia, and the parties consent to the jurisdiction of such courts.
p.
Taxes
:
All charges under these IO Terms are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of these IO Terms for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
q.
System of Record:
Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating and reporting metrics related to inventory purchases, impressions and all amounts owed under these IO Terms.
r.
Promotion:
Section IX(g) of the 4As Terms is hereby amended by adding the following after the last sentence in Section IX(g): “Notwithstanding all the foregoing, Quantcast may include Agency’s and Advertiser’s names and logos in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, and in promotional materials.”
s
. Breach by Company:
Without limiting any of Quantcast’s other remedies hereunder, Quantcast may, in its sole discretion, immediately suspend or terminate any individual campaign if Quantcast reasonably suspects that such campaign is in breach or violation of any of Company’s obligations, representations, or warranties set forth in these IO Terms (including, without limitation, any failure to comply with the Campaign Policy).
t. INDEMNIFICATION
: Section X of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the following:
X. MUTUAL
INDEMNITY
a. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents (and their respective successors, heirs and assigns) (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including, for clarity, any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast and its directors, officers, employees and agents, its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) violation of these IO Terms (including the 4As Terms and Policies); (b) Company- provided or Client-provided data or ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of subsection j. (Additional Company Representation and Warranty) above.
b.The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
c. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or data, if the cause of action would not have arisen otherwise, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast which would have cured the cause of action, provided that following such instructions would not have caused Company substantial additional cost, or (e) use of the Services or data other than as described herein. In the case of any of the foregoing, Company will indemnify, defend and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
d. In the event that Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s reasonable opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing, or, if such remedies are not reasonably available,
above, Quantcast shall provide Company with as much written notice as reasonably practicable prior to the effective date of such termination. Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section X are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability to Company and Company’s sole remedies as to infringement of intellectual property rights.”
u. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY: Section XI of the 4As Terms is deleted in its entirety and replaced with the            following:
“
XI. LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS TO COMPANY FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE QUANTCAST PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION PROVIDED BY INVENTORY PARTNERS WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION, NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION XI LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE, AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION, IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THESE IO TERMS EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE
(12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE. The parties acknowledge that the limitations and exclusions contained in these IO Terms have been the subject of negotiation between the parties and represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with their respective obligations under these IO Terms and the payments made hereunder.”
v.
Third-Party Services:
To the extent Company receives any services or products of a third party in conjunction with the Services, including without limitation any third-party data provider (each service, a “
Third- Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply. For the avoidance of doubt, these terms are supplementary: they do not replace or limit any other terms and conditions of these IO Terms.
i. Third-Party Services Terms.
Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third party terms and conditions of such Third-Party Service in addition to the terms of these IO Terms. Any such third party terms and conditions are as provided to Company in writing by Quantcast or by the relevant third party.
ii. Limitations.
Quantcast does not endorse, is not responsible or liable for, and makes no representations as to any Third-Party Services, including, without limitation, their content or the manner in which they handle, protect, manage or process data, or any interaction between Company and the provider of such Third-Party Service. Quantcast cannot guarantee the continued availability or pricing of such Third-Party Services, or any features thereof, and may cease enabling access to them without liability to Company, if, for example and without limitation, the provider of a Third-Party Service ceases to make the Third-Party Service available for interoperation with the corresponding Service in a manner acceptable to Quantcast. Company irrevocably waives any claim against Quantcast with respect to such Third-Party Services.
Quantcast is not liable for any damage or loss caused or alleged to be caused by or in connection with Company’s receipt, enablement, access or use of any such Third-Party Services, or Company’s reliance on the privacy practices, data security processes or other policies of such Third-Party Services. Company may be required to register for or log into such Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company-provided or Client-provided data or ads with such Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
iii. LiveRamp Usage Restrictions.
To the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “LiveRamp”) in connection with the Services outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to these IO Terms, and Company agrees : (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Service to Company, including to access and download Company’s CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp’s SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Service to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) reverse engineer, aggregate, or disambiguate any data or technology received from LiveRamp or its services (except as expressly agreed by LiveRamp in writing), (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are sexually- oriented or related to tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to an individual’s health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), (iii) with attributes that correlate to unique records or individuals, or (iv) for which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent to provide to LiveRamp; and (e) Company additionally warrants that: (y) it will not direct data to any other destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such destination, and (z) obtained and maintained all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder.
w.
Conflicts, Responsibility, Terminology
:
To the extent of any conflict with the 4As Terms, these IO Terms govern. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is responsible for the actions/inactions of its Clients in connection with this IO and the Services and for ensuring compliance with these IO Terms by its Clients.
i. Any references to “
Customer
” in an IO shall mean Company.
ii.Any references to “
Media Company
” in the 4As Terms and/or an IO shall mean Quantcast.
iii. If Company is an Agency (as defined in the 4As Terms), then all references to “
Agency
” shall mean Company and all references to “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company’s Clients.
iv. If Company is an Advertiser (as defined in the 4As Terms), then references to both “
Agency
” and “
Advertiser
” shall mean Company. For clarity, if there is no Agency then Advertiser takes on all obligations of Agency under the IO and these IO Terms.
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Campaign Policy
Quantcast requires its Customers, Authorized Users, Clients, and Affiliates (“Clients”) using Quantcast products and/or services, including the Quantcast Platform (also, “Platform”), to comply with the standards and requirements outlined in Quantcast policies, including this Campaign Policy and, for Platform Clients, the Implementation Guide for Restricted Advertising Categories and Restricted Data, available in the Platform Help Center, to configure their campaigns and ad sets to comply with this Policy. In addition to this Campaign Policy, all users must also comply with all applicable laws, rules, ordinances, codes, and regulations, including, without limitation, applicable industry-specific ethical, professional, and/or self-regulatory requirements. In the US, Clients and advertisers must comply with the NAI Code of Conduct in effect at the time of campaign launch. By using Quantcast advertising services or technology, Client agrees to the privacy requirements posted
here
.
Quantcast reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to (1) review accounts, campaigns, ads, and/or usage of Quantcast products and services, including but not limited to those campaigns planned, launched, and delivered through the Platform for compliance with this Campaign Policy; and (2) suspend, require revisions to, and/or terminate accounts, campaigns, and/or creatives as a result of such review. Where possible, Quantcast will attempt to notify Clients when a violation of the policy occurs. In such cases, Clients may contact their Account Manager for assistance, but remain responsible for all actions initiated using Quantcast products and/or services, whether or not Quantcast was also involved in the selection and/or provision of campaign services and/or strategies.
Note that Quantcast classifies Clients at the Advertiser level into industry categories consistent with the Interactive Advertising Bureau (“IAB”) advertising industry categories. Accounts for advertisers operating in industries that may implicate Restricted Advertising Categories (see below) are subject to periodic review, and campaigns may be held prior to launch.
Quantcast may provide functionalities such as location and demographic targeting. Quantcast makes no representation that such functionalities are sufficient to ensure Company’s compliance with applicable laws regarding restrictions on advertising, including minimum age or other requirements. Company is solely responsible for ensuring that its ads and campaigns comply with all applicable laws.
Prohibited Content and Practices
A given campaign or ad set may implicate one or more Prohibited Content and Practice and/or Restricted Data types: all campaigns and ad sets must comply with all implicated restrictions
.
Campaigns that promote and/or contain the following content are prohibited:
Products, services, or activities that are
illegal or of questionable legality
, such as sites that sell fake identification cards or academic cheating services;
Use of Quantcast products or services to
discriminate
against specific groups of people through affirmative targeting or exclusion; or use of discriminatory content/creatives;
Use of Quantcast products or services to
exploit vulnerable populations
;
Sexually explicit or pornographic content
(excluding campaigns for undergarments, adult products, and other products that meet certain restrictions);
Outside of North America, campaigns for
healthcare products and services
(excluding personal hygiene, cosmetic, first aid, and wellness products);
Hate speech
, which is defined as abusive or threatening speech or writing that expresses prejudice against a protected class, e.g., race, religion, or sexual orientation;
intolerance, discrimination, profanity, or inciting violence
;
False advertising
and/or content that is unfair, misleading, deceptive, abusive, or false, through claims, imagery, or suggestion;
Illegal drugs, recreational drugs
,
and/or or products that facilitate their use, even in geographies where such substances or products may be legal; content that promotes or glamorizes the consumption of illegal drugs;
Tobacco, nicotine
, and/or products that facilitate their use, including e-cigarettes;
Personal weapons and ammunition
(excluding cooking equipment, kitchen and hunting knives, hunting equipment other than guns, airsoft guns, non-functioning antique and replica guns, decorative swords, paintball guns and accessories, gun ranges, and publications related to guns unless prohibited by law);
Content that
infringes on intellectual property rights
of others;
Content that includes or disseminates
malware, spyware, and/or computer viruses
; and/or
Content or advertising that is
designed to reach children
under 16.
Restricted Data Types
In connection with the use of any Quantcast product or service, where prohibited by applicable law (or where enhanced/heightened consent is required), Clients may not collect, use, or provide to Quantcast personal data revealing a restricted attribute or characteristic (Restricted Characteristics) explicitly, by inference, or otherwise, including in creatives and/or strategies like targeting and/or tagging. Restricted Characteristics are defined by applicable law and include but are not limited to:
Race or ethnicity/ethnic origin, color, and national origin, including citizenship or immigration status
Religious and/or philosophical beliefs
Political opinions or affiliations
Health or concerning health (including mental health, genetic, and biometric data/information)
Sexual life and/or sexual orientation
Marital and/or familial status
Disability or handicap
Trade union membership
Criminal convictions or offenses
Restricted Advertising Categories
Accounts and campaigns in the following categories are subject to periodic review; campaigns may be held prior to launch.
Quantcast permits the use of its products and services for the following categories, which may be updated from time to time at Quantcast’s sole discretion. For the avoidance of doubt, Clients remain responsible for compliance with all laws, regulations, and reasonable industry customs, including but not limited to campaign content and strategy.
In certain geographies, the collection of information about certain user attributes or characteristics, or the inference thereof, is not permitted by law. For all Quantcast Campaigns, Clients are prohibited from targeting audiences, tagging pages, or otherwise using Quantcast products or services in a way that would collect information from users, or would allow inferences about users to be made, relating to attributes or characteristics prohibited by law or self-regulatory codes (
see Restricted Data Types)
. Similarly, Platform clients are prohibited from inputting Interests while creating an audience that could lead to reaching users based on one or several Restricted Characteristic(s).
Alcohol
Advertising is supported for Alcohol campaigns, including alcohol products such as beer, wine, spirits, non-alcoholic drinks used as mixers, alcohol-related destinations such as vineyards, bars, and distilleries, and to a limited extent, alcohol delivery services, where available and permitted by law. Campaign restrictions vary by geography, and Clients remain responsible for compliance with all laws, regulations, and industry standards, including procuring and maintaining valid licensure, where required.
Creatives must contain a responsible drinking disclosure as required by laws of the geography where the ads are displayed and/or self-regulatory codes, such as:
“Please drink responsibly
”;
"For legal drinking age: 21+" [or other age as required]
.
Where required by law, landing pages must include age self-verification for visitors (age varies by geography).
Ad delivery must be tailored to a permissible age group. For example, in the United States, site delivery locations must meet a minimum visitor composition of 21+ (other variations by geography). Additionally, some geographies may have display time prohibitions, such as requiring that ad timing avoids placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming.
Campaigns must not: appeal to minors; include athletes or portray characters who appear under the age of 25; make health, therapeutic, or social status claims (e.g., by claiming to reduce stress levels or improve sex life); and/or depict irresponsible or dangerous consumption or irresponsible activities while drinking (e.g., driving, operating machinery).
Cannabis and Products Related to its Use
Campaigns for Cannabis and Products related to its use are limited to audiences in Canada. Clients remain responsible for compliance with all applicable regulations.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Clients must undertake reasonable steps to ensure that the ad cannot be viewed or accessed by young persons;
Only information or brand preference campaigns are permitted.
Cannabis and related products ad campaigns must not: contain any direct or implied health, curative, drug, or other therapeutic claims (including claims of physical, mental health benefits or cosmetic benefits); be directed to, attract or appeal to minors (such as with cartoons, child-friendly public figures, showing CBD as toys, marketing CBD as candy, etc.); be by means of a testimonial or endorsement; associate the promotion with an alcoholic beverage, tobacco or vaping product.
Cannabidiol (“CBD”)
Cannabidiol campaigns are limited to certain geographies within the United States and Canada. Clients remain responsible for compliance with all applicable regulations.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Some geographies may have display time prohibitions, such as requiring that ad timing avoids placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming.
For any permitted CBD product campaigns, Clients must confirm: the CBD product is derived solely from hemp and
not
from cannabis plants; and the CBD has a THC composition below the locally mandated requirement (0.3% or less* in most geographies, but lower elsewhere, e.g., in Idaho, 0%).
All campaigns related to vaping or vapable CBD are prohibited, including vapable CBD oil, cartridges, and products related to their use (including vaporizers, pens, pipes, etc.). Campaigns for Delta-8 are also prohibited.
Landing pages for permitted CBD campaigns may not include sale of prohibited products, even if the campaign is promoting a permitted product. For example, a campaign advertising CBD gummy bears with a landing page that also sells smokable CBD cartridges and e-cigarettes is not permitted.
CBD ad campaigns must not: contain any direct or implied health, curative, drug, or other therapeutic claims (including claims of physical or mental health benefits); or attract or appeal to minors (such as with cartoons, child-friendly public figures, showing CBD as toys, marketing CBD as candy, etc.).
Casinos and Gambling
Where permitted by law, campaigns for casinos and gambling services are supported, including for sports betting, fantasy sports betting, online casinos, state lotteries, online horse race betting, and brick and mortar casinos.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Creatives must contain a responsible gambling message, such as:
“If you or someone you know has a gambling problem, help is available”
; as well as other disclosures as required, for example, providing information about the addictive risks of the advertised games of chance, the prohibition of participation by minors, and the availability of counseling and therapy.
Landing pages must include age self-verification for visitors (age requirement varies by geography).
Ad delivery must be generally tailored to a permissible age group (which varies by geography).
Some geographies and publishers may have display time prohibitions, such as avoiding placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming and/or live sporting events, sexual, religious, and/or political media.
Campaigns must not: appeal to minors, portray characters who appear under the age of 25; advertise casinos or gambling activities for which the Client is not licensed in each geography in which the ads shall be displayed; target individuals self-identifying as gambling addicts on “self-exclusion lists” or seeking help for gambling addictions; encourage problem gambling, promise to fix problems (social, educational, professional, or personal), or suggest gambling is an alternative to employment; and/or suggest that skill can influence games of chance.
Charitable Organizations
Advertising campaigns for Charitable Organizations are supported at Quantcast for advocacy campaigns
(to create support for specific policies, like legal reform),
awareness campaigns
(which focus on education about causes to raise support)
,
and fundraising campaigns.
Campaigns may only be run on behalf of charities that have been formally registered as nonprofit organizations in the geographies within which the Clients wish to run their campaign(s).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request, (such as
proof of 501(c)(3) nonprofit status with the IRS
in the United States or
registration on the Charity Register
in the United Kingdom).
Cryptocurrency
Where permitted by law, cryptocurrency campaigns are supported for Clients with required licensure for cryptocurrencies, cryptocurrency exchanges, and products and services associated with cryptocurrency mining, including facilitating use of computing resources (such as hardware products designed for cryptocurrency mining, cloud-based cryptocurrency mining services, and guides for mining cryptocurrency).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Campaigns for initial coin offerings and new token sales are prohibited.
Defense Industry
Advertising for the Defense Industry is permitted in certain circumstances.
Campaigns must not: depict firearms.
Employment
Advertising is supported for Employment campaigns, including campaigns for recruiting, hiring, job sites, job fairs and events, and internships.
Campaigns must not: engage in or have the effect of discrimination of legally-protected class demographics as set forth in applicable civil rights, privacy, or other laws and self-regulatory codes. The prohibition also applies to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender or gender affiliation/identity, or sexual orientation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
An applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program);
An applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Healthcare Products & Services (North America Only)
Advertising for certain healthcare products and services is permitted in North America.
Note that globally, campaigns for first aid, personal hygiene, beauty products, wellness, and over-the-counter products for general consumption are not considered healthcare and are supported, so long as products are not offered as a treatment for any specific condition or diagnosis.
Example
: Band-aids are considered a first-aid product.
Example
: Toothpaste for general consumption is considered personal hygiene, i.e., not for the treatment of gingivitis or other conditions or diagnosis.
Example
: Shampoo for general consumption, i.e., not for the treatment of alopecia, dandruff, or other conditions or diagnosis.
Example
: Beauty creams and serums, i.e., not for the treatment of eczema.
Example
: Tylenol for general household use.
Where permitted:
Clients may not provide to Quantcast any Sensitive Personal Information of consumers or users;
Campaigns must not involve any sensitive health condition (as defined by the NAI Code of Conduct);
Campaigns must include required disclaimers; adhere to applicable content restrictions (limitations on creatives); adhere to audience targeting requirements and restrictions.
Clients must have and maintain pre-clearance; authorization and/or licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Campaigns must not: seek to target audiences based on condition diagnosis, or other Sensitive Personal Information; make false treatment claims; and/or promote products subject to recalls or significant government actions (e.g., OxyContin).
Hunting Equipment
Advertising for limited hunting equipment is supported unless prohibited by applicable law. Advertising for firearms, even if solely for hunting, is
not
permitted, regardless of whether permitted by law.
Housing
Advertising is supported for Housing campaigns, including campaigns selling residential and commercial real estate, purchasing residential and commercial real estate, residential commercial real estate services (agents, transactions, listings), residential real estate mortgage loans (APR < 36%), residential real estate home improvement loans (APR < 36%), residential real estate insurance (homeowners’, renters’), residential and commercial real estate development, retirement and disability housing opportunities, and home improvement services.
Non-discrimination: campaigns must not engage in or have the effect of discrimination of legally-protected classes. The prohibition extends to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender, or gender affiliation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
The applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program);
The applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Financial products and services
Advertising is supported for Financial Services campaigns, including for credit cards (with APR < 36%), personal loans (with terms of at least 90 days and APR < 36%), loans for homes, RVs, and boats (with terms of at least 90 days and APR < 36%), nonprofit debt services (where the Client is an approved nonprofit budget and credit counseling agency or a national nonprofit association representing nonprofit credit counseling agencies), banking, financial planning and annuities, insurance (including car, home, RV, boat, and life), tax planning services, and credit monitoring services (excluding credit repair services).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Clients must include specific disclosures required by local law.
Campaigns must not promote: short-term loans with a repayment schedule of less than 90 days; high-interest loans or credit cards (i.e., with an APR of 36% or higher); credit repair services; payday loans or for-profit debt services.
Non-discrimination: campaigns must not engage in or have the effect of improper discrimination of legally-protected class demographics as set forth in applicable civil rights, privacy, or other laws and self-regulatory codes. The prohibition also applies to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender, or gender affiliation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
The applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program)
The applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Candidate and Issue Campaigns
Responsible advertising for Political Campaigns may be permitted in limited circumstances in the United States only on a case-by-case basis.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available.
Campaign content must include disclosures and disclaimers as required by applicable law, including a “paid for” disclaimer to show the entity or the person responsible for the ad.
Campaigns must not be funded by or otherwise involve foreign national interference; incite violence; encourage lawlessness or insurrection; include hate speech; constitute the distribution of “fake news”; or discriminate or suggest discrimination based on any protected class characteristics or otherwise.
Restricted Characteristics
Regardless of the industry or product category, ad sets and creatives that could reveal or reasonably allow making an inference about a Restricted Characteristic of a user who showed an interest in said creative (i.e., clicking the ad) are not permitted.
Where prohibited by law or self-regulatory code, targeting users based on a known and/or inferred Restricted Characteristic is not permitted.
Tagging or placing pixels on websites and pages featuring content that could reasonably allow making an inference about the Restricted Characteristic of a visitor is not permitted.
This policy is not and should not be construed as legal advice and solely reflects Quantcast’s policy. Clients of Quantcast products and services must seek independent advice from their own counsel regarding compliance with applicable laws, regulations, codes, and industry standards. Quantcast reserves the right to update, modify, and change these policies at any time, at its sole discretion. For the avoidance of doubt, Clients always remain liable for their campaign content and strategies, and for all activities they undertake with the use of Quantcast’s products and/or services.
Effective February 10th 2025
to
March 6th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Campaign Policy
Quantcast requires its Customers, Authorized Users, Clients, and Affiliates (“Clients”) using Quantcast products and/or services, including the Quantcast Platform (also, “Platform”), to comply with the standards and requirements outlined in Quantcast policies, including this Campaign Policy and, for Platform Clients, the Implementation Guide for Restricted Advertising Categories and Restricted Data, available in the Platform Help Center, to configure their campaigns and ad sets to comply with this Policy. In addition to this Campaign Policy, all users must also comply with all applicable laws, rules, ordinances, codes, and regulations, including, without limitation, applicable industry-specific ethical, professional, and/or self-regulatory requirements. In the US, Clients and advertisers must comply with the NAI Code of Conduct in effect at the time of campaign launch. By using Quantcast advertising services or technology, Client agrees to the privacy requirements posted
here
.
Quantcast reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to (1) review accounts, campaigns, ads, and/or usage of Quantcast products and services, including but not limited to those campaigns planned, launched, and delivered through the Platform for compliance with this Campaign Policy; and (2) suspend, require revisions to, and/or terminate accounts, campaigns, and/or creatives as a result of such review. Where possible, Quantcast will attempt to notify Clients when a violation of the policy occurs. In such cases, Clients may contact their Account Manager for assistance, but remain responsible for all actions initiated using Quantcast products and/or services, whether or not Quantcast was also involved in the selection and/or provision of campaign services and/or strategies.
Note that Quantcast classifies Clients at the Advertiser level into industry categories consistent with the Interactive Advertising Bureau (“IAB”) advertising industry categories. Accounts for advertisers operating in industries that may implicate Restricted Advertising Categories (see below) are subject to periodic review, and campaigns may be held prior to launch.
Prohibited Content and Practices
A given campaign or ad set may implicate one or more Prohibited Content and Practice and/or Restricted Data types: all campaigns
and ad sets must comply with all implicated restrictions
.
Campaigns that promote and/or contain the following content are prohibited:
Products, services, or activities that are
illegal or of questionable legality
, such as sites that sell fake identification cards or academic cheating services;
Use of Quantcast products or services to
discriminate
against specific groups of people through affirmative targeting or exclusion; or use of discriminatory content/creatives;
Use of Quantcast products or services to
exploit vulnerable populations
;
Sexually explicit or pornographic content
(excluding campaigns for undergarments, adult products, and other products that meet certain restrictions);
Outside of North America, campaigns for
healthcare products and services
(excluding personal hygiene, cosmetic, first aid, and wellness products) without prior Quantcast approval;
Hate speech
, which is defined as abusive or threatening speech or writing that expresses prejudice against a protected class, e.g., race, religion, or sexual orientation;
intolerance, discrimination, profanity, or inciting violence
;
False advertising
and/or content that is unfair, misleading, deceptive, abusive, or false, through claims, imagery, or suggestion;
Illegal drugs, recreational drugs
, and/or or products that facilitate their use, even in geographies where such substances or products may be legal; content that promotes or glamorizes the consumption of illegal drugs;
Tobacco, nicotine
, and/or products that facilitate their use, including e-cigarettes;
Personal weapons and ammunition
(excluding cooking equipment, kitchen and hunting knives, hunting equipment other than guns, airsoft guns, non-functioning antique and replica guns, decorative swords, paintball guns and accessories, gun ranges, and publications related to guns unless prohibited by law);
Content that
infringes on intellectual property rights
of others;
Content that includes or disseminates
malware, spyware, and/or computer viruses
; and/or
Content or advertising that is
designed to reach children
under 16.
Restricted Data Types
In connection with the use of any Quantcast product or service, where prohibited by applicable law (or where enhanced/heightened consent is required), Clients may not collect, use, or provide to Quantcast personal data revealing a restricted attribute or characteristic (Restricted Characteristics) explicitly, by inference, or otherwise, including in creatives and/or strategies like targeting and/or tagging. Restricted Characteristics are defined by applicable law and include but are not limited to:
Race or ethnicity/ethnic origin, color, and national origin, including citizenship or immigration status
Religious and/or philosophical beliefs
Political opinions or affiliations
Health or concerning health (including mental health, genetic, and biometric data/information)
Sexual life and/or sexual orientation
Marital and/or familial status
Disability or handicap
Trade union membership
Criminal convictions or offenses
Restricted Advertising Categories
Accounts and campaigns in the following categories are subject to periodic review; campaigns may be held prior to launch.
Quantcast permits the use of its products and services for the following categories, which may be updated from time to time at Quantcast’s sole discretion. For the avoidance of doubt, Clients remain responsible for compliance with all laws, regulations, and reasonable industry customs, including but not limited to campaign content and strategy.
In certain geographies, the collection of information about certain user attributes or characteristics, or the inference thereof, is not permitted by law. For all Quantcast Campaigns, Clients are prohibited from targeting audiences, tagging pages, or otherwise using Quantcast products or services in a way that would collect information from users, or would allow inferences about users to be made, relating to attributes or characteristics prohibited by law or self-regulatory codes (
see Restricted Data Types)
. Similarly, Platform clients are prohibited from inputting Interests while creating an audience that could lead to reaching users based on one or several Restricted Characteristic(s).
Alcohol
Advertising is supported for Alcohol campaigns, including alcohol products such as beer, wine, spirits, non-alcoholic drinks used as mixers, alcohol-related destinations such as vineyards, bars, and distilleries, and to a limited extent, alcohol delivery services, where available and permitted by law. Campaign restrictions vary by geography, and Clients remain responsible for compliance with all laws, regulations, and industry standards, including procuring and maintaining valid licensure, where required.
Creatives must contain a responsible drinking disclosure as required by laws of the geography where the ads are displayed and/or self-regulatory codes, such as:
“Please drink responsibly
”;
"For legal drinking age: 21+" [or other age as required]
.
Where required by law, landing pages must include age self-verification for visitors (age varies by geography).
Ad delivery must be tailored to a permissible age group. For example, in the United States, site delivery locations must meet a minimum visitor composition of 21+ (other variations by geography). Additionally, some geographies may have display time prohibitions, such as requiring that ad timing avoids placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming.
Campaigns must not: appeal to minors; include athletes or portray characters who appear under the age of 25; make health, therapeutic, or social status claims (e.g., by claiming to reduce stress levels or improve sex life); and/or depict irresponsible or dangerous consumption or irresponsible activities while drinking (e.g., driving, operating machinery).
Cannabis and Products Related to its Use
Campaigns for Cannabis and Products related to its use are limited to audiences in Canada. Clients remain responsible for compliance with all applicable regulations.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Clients must undertake reasonable steps to ensure that the ad cannot be viewed or accessed by young persons;
Only information or brand preference campaigns are permitted.
Cannabis and related products ad campaigns must not: contain any direct or implied health, curative, drug, or other therapeutic claims (including claims of physical, mental health benefits or cosmetic benefits); be directed to, attract or appeal to minors (such as with cartoons, child-friendly public figures, showing CBD as toys, marketing CBD as candy, etc.); be by means of a testimonial or endorsement; associate the promotion with an alcoholic beverage, tobacco or vaping product.
Cannabidiol (“CBD”)
Cannabidiol campaigns are limited to certain geographies within the United States and Canada. Clients remain responsible for compliance with all applicable regulations.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Some geographies may have display time prohibitions, such as requiring that ad timing avoids placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming.
For any permitted CBD product campaigns, Clients must confirm: the CBD product is derived solely from hemp and
no
t from cannabis plants; and the CBD has a THC composition below the locally mandated requirement (0.3% or less* in most geographies, but lower elsewhere, e.g., in Idaho, 0%).
All campaigns related to vaping or vapable CBD are prohibited, including vapable CBD oil, cartridges, and products related to their use (including vaporizers, pens, pipes, etc.). Campaigns for Delta-8 are also prohibited.
Landing pages for permitted CBD campaigns may not include sale of prohibited products, even if the campaign is promoting a permitted product. For example, a campaign advertising CBD gummy bears with a landing page that also sells smokable CBD cartridges and e-cigarettes is not permitted.
CBD ad campaigns must not: contain any direct or implied health, curative, drug, or other therapeutic claims (including claims of physical or mental health benefits); or attract or appeal to minors (such as with cartoons, child-friendly public figures, showing CBD as toys, marketing CBD as candy, etc.).
Casinos and Gambling
Where permitted by law, campaigns for casinos and gambling services are supported, including for sports betting, fantasy sports betting, online casinos, state lotteries, online horse race betting, and brick and mortar casinos.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Creatives must contain a responsible gambling message, such as:
“If you or someone you know has a gambling problem, help is available”
; as well as other disclosures as required, for example, providing information about the addictive risks of the advertised games of chance, the prohibition of participation by minors, and the availability of counseling and therapy.
Landing pages must include age self-verification for visitors (age requirement varies by geography).
Ad delivery must be generally tailored to a permissible age group (which varies by geography).
Some geographies and publishers may have display time prohibitions, such as avoiding placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming and/or live sporting events, sexual, religious, and/or political media.
Campaigns must not: appeal to minors, portray characters who appear under the age of 25; advertise casinos or gambling activities for which the Client is not licensed in each geography in which the ads shall be displayed; target individuals self- identifying as gambling addicts on “self-exclusion lists” or seeking help for gambling addictions; encourage problem gambling, promise to fix problems (social, educational, professional, or personal), or suggest gambling is an alternative to employment; and/or suggest that skill can influence games of chance.
Charitable Organizations
Advertising campaigns for Charitable Organizations are supported at Quantcast for advocacy campaigns
(to create support for specific policies, like legal reform),
awareness campaigns
(which focus on education about causes to raise support)
, and fundraising campaigns.
Campaigns may only be run on behalf of charities that have been formally registered as nonprofit organizations in the geographies within which the Clients wish to run their campaign(s).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon
request, (such as proof of 501(c)(3) nonprofit status with the IRS in the United States or registration on the Charity Register in the United Kingdom).
Cryptocurrency
Where permitted by law, cryptocurrency campaigns are supported for Clients with required licensure for cryptocurrencies, cryptocurrency exchanges, and products and services associated with cryptocurrency mining, including facilitating use of computing resources (such as hardware products designed for cryptocurrency mining, cloud-based cryptocurrency mining services, and guides for mining cryptocurrency).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Campaigns for initial coin offerings and new token sales are prohibited.
Defense Industry
Advertising for the Defense Industry is permitted in certain circumstances.
Campaigns must not: depict firearms.
Employment
Advertising is supported for Employment campaigns, including campaigns for recruiting, hiring, job sites, job fairs and events, and internships.
Campaigns must not: engage in or have the effect of discrimination of legally-protected class demographics as set forth in applicable civil rights, privacy, or other laws and self-regulatory codes. The prohibition also applies to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender or gender affiliation/identity, or sexual orientation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
An applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program);
An applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Healthcare Products & Services (North America Only)
Advertising for certain healthcare products and services is permitted in North America.
Note that globally, campaigns for first aid, personal hygiene, beauty products, wellness, and over-the-counter products for general consumption are not considered healthcare and are supported, so long as products are not offered as a treatment for any specific condition or diagnosis.
Example
: Band-aids are considered a first-aid product.
Example
: Toothpaste for general consumption is considered personal hygiene, i.e., not for the treatment of gingivitis or other conditions or diagnosis.
Example
: Shampoo for general consumption, i.e., not for the treatment of alopecia, dandruff, or other conditions or diagnosis.
Example
: Beauty creams and serums, i.e., not for the treatment of eczema.
Example
: Tylenol for general household use.
Where permitted:
Clients may not provide to Quantcast any Sensitive Personal Information of consumers or users;
Campaigns must not involve any sensitive health condition (as defined by the NAI Code of Conduct)
Campaigns must include required disclaimers; adhere to applicable content restrictions (limitations on creatives); adhere to audience targeting requirements and restrictions.
Clients must have and maintain pre-clearance; authorization and/or licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Campaigns must not: seek to target audiences based on condition diagnosis, or other Sensitive Personal Information; make false treatment claims; and/or promote products subject to recalls or significant government actions (e.g., OxyContin).
Hunting Equipment
Advertising for limited hunting equipment is supported unless prohibited by applicable law. Advertising for firearms, even if solely for hunting, is
no
t permitted, regardless of whether permitted by law.
Housing
Advertising is supported for Housing campaigns, including campaigns selling residential and commercial real estate, purchasing residential and commercial real estate, residential commercial real estate services (agents, transactions, listings), residential real estate mortgage loans (APR < 36%), residential real estate home improvement loans (APR < 36%), residential real estate insurance (homeowners’, renters’), residential and commercial real estate development, retirement and disability housing opportunities, and home improvement services.
Non-discrimination: campaigns must not engage in or have the effect of discrimination of legally-protected classes. The prohibition extends to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender, or gender affiliation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
The applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program);
The applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Financial products and services
Advertising is supported for Financial Services campaigns, including for credit cards (with APR < 36%), personal loans (with terms of at least 90 days and APR < 36%), loans for homes, RVs, and boats (with terms of at least 90 days and APR < 36%), nonprofit debt services (where the Client is an approved nonprofit budget and credit counseling agency or a national nonprofit association representing nonprofit credit counseling agencies), banking, financial planning and annuities, insurance (including car, home, RV, boat, and life), tax planning services, and credit monitoring services (excluding credit repair services).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Clients must include specific disclosures required by local law.
Campaigns must not promote: short-term loans with a repayment schedule of less than 90 days; high-interest loans or credit cards (i.e., with an APR of 36% or higher); credit repair services; payday loans or for-profit debt services.
Non-discrimination: campaigns must not engage in or have the effect of improper discrimination of legally-protected class demographics as set forth in applicable civil rights, privacy, or other laws and self-regulatory codes. The prohibition also applies to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender, or gender affiliation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
The applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program)
The applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Candidate and Issue Campaigns
Responsible advertising for Political Campaigns may be permitted in limited circumstances in the United States only on a case- by-case basis.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available.
Campaign content must include disclosures and disclaimers as required by applicable law, including a “paid for” disclaimer to show the entity or the person responsible for the ad.
Campaigns must not be funded by or otherwise involve foreign national interference; incite violence; encourage lawlessness or insurrection; include hate speech; constitute the distribution of “fake news”; or discriminate or suggest discrimination based on any protected class characteristics or otherwise.
Restricted Characteristics
Regardless of the industry or product category, ad sets and creatives that could reveal or reasonably allow making an inference about a Restricted Characteristic of a user who showed an interest in said creative (i.e., clicking the ad) are not permitted.
Where prohibited by law or self-regulatory code, targeting users based on a known and/or inferred Restricted Characteristic is not permitted.
Tagging or placing pixels on websites and pages featuring content that could reasonably allow making an inference about the Restricted Characteristic of a visitor is not permitted.
This policy is not and should not be construed as legal advice and solely reflects Quantcast’s policy. Clients of Quantcast products and services must seek independent advice from their own counsel regarding compliance with applicable laws, regulations, codes, and industry standards. Quantcast reserves the right to update, modify, and change these policies at any time, at its sole discretion. For the avoidance of doubt, Clients always remain liable for their campaign content and strategies, and for all activities they undertake with the use of Quantcast’s products and/or services.
Effective September 11th 2023
to
February 10th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
Campaign Policy
Quantcast requires its Customers, Authorized Users, Clients, and Affiliates (“Clients”) using Quantcast products and/or services, including the Quantcast Platform (also, “Platform”), to comply with the standards and requirements outlined in Quantcast policies, including this Campaign Policy and, for Platform Clients, the Implementation Guide for Restricted Advertising Categories and Restricted Data, available in the Platform Help Center, to configure their campaigns and ad sets to comply with this Policy. In addition to this Campaign Policy, all users must also comply with all applicable laws, rules, ordinances, codes, and regulations, including, without limitation, applicable industry-specific ethical, professional, and/or self-regulatory requirements. In the US, Clients and advertisers must comply with the NAI Code of Conduct in effect at the time of campaign launch. By using Quantcast advertising services or technology, Client agrees to the privacy requirements posted
here
.
Quantcast reserves the right, in its sole discretion, to (1) review accounts, campaigns, ads, and/or usage of Quantcast products and services, including but not limited to those campaigns planned, launched, and delivered through the Platform for compliance with this Campaign Policy; and (2) suspend, require revisions to, and/or terminate accounts, campaigns, and/or creatives as a result of such review. Where possible, Quantcast will attempt to notify Clients when a violation of the policy occurs. In such cases, Clients may contact their Account Manager for assistance, but remain responsible for all actions initiated using Quantcast products and/or services, whether or not Quantcast was also involved in the selection and/or provision of campaign services and/or strategies.
Note that Quantcast classifies Clients at the Advertiser level into industry categories consistent with the Interactive Advertising Bureau (“IAB”) advertising industry categories. Accounts for advertisers operating in industries that may implicate Restricted Advertising Categories (see below) are subject to periodic review, and campaigns may be held prior to launch.
Prohibited Content and Practices
A given campaign or ad set may implicate one or more Prohibited Content and Practice and/or Restricted Data types: all campaigns and ad sets must comply with all implicated restrictions
.
Campaigns that promote and/or contain the following content are prohibited:
Products, services, or activities that are
illegal or of questionable legality
, such as sites that sell fake identification cards or academic cheating services;
Use of Quantcast products or services to
discriminate
against specific groups of people through affirmative targeting or exclusion; or use of discriminatory content/creatives;
Use of Quantcast products or services to
exploit vulnerable populations
;
Sexually explicit or pornographic content
(excluding campaigns for undergarments, adult products, and other products that meet certain restrictions);
Outside of North America, campaigns for
healthcare products and services
(excluding personal hygiene, cosmetic, first aid, and wellness products);
Hate speech
, which is defined as abusive or threatening speech or writing that expresses prejudice against a protected class, e.g., race, religion, or sexual orientation;
intolerance, discrimination, profanity, or inciting violence
;
False advertising
and/or content that is unfair, misleading, deceptive, abusive, or false, through claims, imagery, or suggestion;
Illegal drugs, recreational drugs
,
and/or or products that facilitate their use, even in geographies where such substances or products may be legal; content that promotes or glamorizes the consumption of illegal drugs;
Tobacco, nicotine
, and/or products that facilitate their use, including e-cigarettes;
Personal weapons and ammunition
(excluding cooking equipment, kitchen and hunting knives, hunting equipment other than guns, airsoft guns, non-functioning antique and replica guns, decorative swords, paintball guns and accessories, gun ranges, and publications related to guns unless prohibited by law);
Content that
infringes on intellectual property rights
of others;
Content that includes or disseminates
malware, spyware, and/or computer viruses
; and/or
Content or advertising that is
designed to reach children
under 16.
Restricted Data Types
In connection with the use of any Quantcast product or service, where prohibited by applicable law (or where enhanced/heightened consent is required), Clients may not collect, use, or provide to Quantcast personal data revealing a restricted attribute or characteristic (Restricted Characteristics) explicitly, by inference, or otherwise, including in creatives and/or strategies like targeting and/or tagging. Restricted Characteristics are defined by applicable law and include but are not limited to:
Race or ethnicity/ethnic origin, color, and national origin, including citizenship or immigration status
Religious and/or philosophical beliefs
Political opinions or affiliations
Health or concerning health (including mental health, genetic, and biometric data/information)
Sexual life and/or sexual orientation
Marital and/or familial status
Disability or handicap
Trade union membership
Criminal convictions or offenses
Restricted Advertising Categories
Accounts and campaigns in the following categories are subject to periodic review; campaigns may be held prior to launch.
Quantcast permits the use of its products and services for the following categories, which may be updated from time to time at Quantcast’s sole discretion. For the avoidance of doubt, Clients remain responsible for compliance with all laws, regulations, and reasonable industry customs, including but not limited to campaign content and strategy.
In certain geographies, the collection of information about certain user attributes or characteristics, or the inference thereof, is not permitted by law. For all Quantcast Campaigns, Clients are prohibited from targeting audiences, tagging pages, or otherwise using Quantcast products or services in a way that would collect information from users, or would allow inferences about users to be made, relating to attributes or characteristics prohibited by law or self-regulatory codes (
see Restricted Data Types)
. Similarly, Platform clients are prohibited from inputting Interests while creating an audience that could lead to reaching users based on one or several Restricted Characteristic(s).
Alcohol
Advertising is supported for Alcohol campaigns, including alcohol products such as beer, wine, spirits, non-alcoholic drinks used as mixers, alcohol-related destinations such as vineyards, bars, and distilleries, and to a limited extent, alcohol delivery services, where available and permitted by law. Campaign restrictions vary by geography, and Clients remain responsible for compliance with all laws, regulations, and industry standards, including procuring and maintaining valid licensure, where required.
Creatives must contain a responsible drinking disclosure as required by laws of the geography where the ads are displayed and/or self-regulatory codes, such as:
“Please drink responsibly
”;
"For legal drinking age: 21+" [or other age as required]
.
Where required by law, landing pages must include age self-verification for visitors (age varies by geography).
Ad delivery must be tailored to a permissible age group. For example, in the United States, site delivery locations must meet a minimum visitor composition of 21+ (other variations by geography). Additionally, some geographies may have display time prohibitions, such as requiring that ad timing avoids placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming.
Campaigns must not: appeal to minors; include athletes or portray characters who appear under the age of 25; make health, therapeutic, or social status claims (e.g., by claiming to reduce stress levels or improve sex life); and/or depict irresponsible or dangerous consumption or irresponsible activities while drinking (e.g., driving, operating machinery).
Cannabis and Products Related to its Use
Campaigns for Cannabis and Products related to its use are limited to audiences in Canada. Clients remain responsible for compliance with all applicable regulations.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Clients must undertake reasonable steps to ensure that the ad cannot be viewed or accessed by young persons;
Only information or brand preference campaigns are permitted.
Cannabis and related products ad campaigns must not: contain any direct or implied health, curative, drug, or other therapeutic claims (including claims of physical, mental health benefits or cosmetic benefits); be directed to, attract or appeal to minors (such as with cartoons, child-friendly public figures, showing CBD as toys, marketing CBD as candy, etc.); be by means of a testimonial or endorsement; associate the promotion with an alcoholic beverage, tobacco or vaping product.
Cannabidiol (“CBD”)
Cannabidiol campaigns are limited to certain geographies within the United States and Canada. Clients remain responsible for compliance with all applicable regulations.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Some geographies may have display time prohibitions, such as requiring that ad timing avoids placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming.
For any permitted CBD product campaigns, Clients must confirm: the CBD product is derived solely from hemp and
not
from cannabis plants; and the CBD has a THC composition below the locally mandated requirement (0.3% or less* in most geographies, but lower elsewhere, e.g., in Idaho, 0%).
All campaigns related to vaping or vapable CBD are prohibited, including vapable CBD oil, cartridges, and products related to their use (including vaporizers, pens, pipes, etc.). Campaigns for Delta-8 are also prohibited.
Landing pages for permitted CBD campaigns may not include sale of prohibited products, even if the campaign is promoting a permitted product. For example, a campaign advertising CBD gummy bears with a landing page that also sells smokable CBD cartridges and e-cigarettes is not permitted.
CBD ad campaigns must not: contain any direct or implied health, curative, drug, or other therapeutic claims (including claims of physical or mental health benefits); or attract or appeal to minors (such as with cartoons, child-friendly public figures, showing CBD as toys, marketing CBD as candy, etc.).
Casinos and Gambling
Where permitted by law, campaigns for casinos and gambling services are supported, including for sports betting, fantasy sports betting, online casinos, state lotteries, online horse race betting, and brick and mortar casinos.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Creatives must contain a responsible gambling message, such as:
“If you or someone you know has a gambling problem, help is available”
; as well as other disclosures as required, for example, providing information about the addictive risks of the advertised games of chance, the prohibition of participation by minors, and the availability of counseling and therapy.
Landing pages must include age self-verification for visitors (age requirement varies by geography).
Ad delivery must be generally tailored to a permissible age group (which varies by geography).
Some geographies and publishers may have display time prohibitions, such as avoiding placement during, before, or after childrens’ programming and/or live sporting events, sexual, religious, and/or political media.
Campaigns must not: appeal to minors, portray characters who appear under the age of 25; advertise casinos or gambling activities for which the Client is not licensed in each geography in which the ads shall be displayed; target individuals self-identifying as gambling addicts on “self-exclusion lists” or seeking help for gambling addictions; encourage problem gambling, promise to fix problems (social, educational, professional, or personal), or suggest gambling is an alternative to employment; and/or suggest that skill can influence games of chance.
Charitable Organizations
Advertising campaigns for Charitable Organizations are supported at Quantcast for advocacy campaigns
(to create support for specific policies, like legal reform),
awareness campaigns
(which focus on education about causes to raise support)
,
and fundraising campaigns.
Campaigns may only be run on behalf of charities that have been formally registered as nonprofit organizations in the geographies within which the Clients wish to run their campaign(s).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request, (such as
proof of 501(c)(3) nonprofit status with the IRS
in the United States or
registration on the Charity Register
in the United Kingdom).
Cryptocurrency
Where permitted by law, cryptocurrency campaigns are supported for Clients with required licensure for cryptocurrencies, cryptocurrency exchanges, and products and services associated with cryptocurrency mining, including facilitating use of computing resources (such as hardware products designed for cryptocurrency mining, cloud-based cryptocurrency mining services, and guides for mining cryptocurrency).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Campaigns for initial coin offerings and new token sales are prohibited.
Defense Industry
Advertising for the Defense Industry is permitted in certain circumstances.
Campaigns must not: depict firearms.
Employment
Advertising is supported for Employment campaigns, including campaigns for recruiting, hiring, job sites, job fairs and events, and internships.
Campaigns must not: engage in or have the effect of discrimination of legally-protected class demographics as set forth in applicable civil rights, privacy, or other laws and self-regulatory codes. The prohibition also applies to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender or gender affiliation/identity, or sexual orientation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
An applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program);
An applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Healthcare Products & Services (North America Only)
Advertising for certain healthcare products and services is permitted in North America.
Note that globally, campaigns for first aid, personal hygiene, beauty products, wellness, and over-the-counter products for general consumption are not considered healthcare and are supported, so long as products are not offered as a treatment for any specific condition or diagnosis.
Example
: Band-aids are considered a first-aid product.
Example
: Toothpaste for general consumption is considered personal hygiene, i.e., not for the treatment of gingivitis or other conditions or diagnosis.
Example
: Shampoo for general consumption, i.e., not for the treatment of alopecia, dandruff, or other conditions or diagnosis.
Example
: Beauty creams and serums, i.e., not for the treatment of eczema.
Example
: Tylenol for general household use.
Where permitted:
Clients may not provide to Quantcast any Sensitive Personal Information of consumers or users;
Campaigns must not involve any sensitive health condition (as defined by the NAI Code of Conduct);
Campaigns must include required disclaimers; adhere to applicable content restrictions (limitations on creatives); adhere to audience targeting requirements and restrictions.
Clients must have and maintain pre-clearance; authorization and/or licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Campaigns must not: seek to target audiences based on condition diagnosis, or other Sensitive Personal Information; make false treatment claims; and/or promote products subject to recalls or significant government actions (e.g., OxyContin).
Hunting Equipment
Advertising for limited hunting equipment is supported unless prohibited by applicable law. Advertising for firearms, even if solely for hunting, is
not
permitted, regardless of whether permitted by law.
Housing
Advertising is supported for Housing campaigns, including campaigns selling residential and commercial real estate, purchasing residential and commercial real estate, residential commercial real estate services (agents, transactions, listings), residential real estate mortgage loans (APR < 36%), residential real estate home improvement loans (APR < 36%), residential real estate insurance (homeowners’, renters’), residential and commercial real estate development, retirement and disability housing opportunities, and home improvement services.
Non-discrimination: campaigns must not engage in or have the effect of discrimination of legally-protected classes. The prohibition extends to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender, or gender affiliation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
The applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program);
The applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Financial products and services
Advertising is supported for Financial Services campaigns, including for credit cards (with APR < 36%), personal loans (with terms of at least 90 days and APR < 36%), loans for homes, RVs, and boats (with terms of at least 90 days and APR < 36%), nonprofit debt services (where the Client is an approved nonprofit budget and credit counseling agency or a national nonprofit association representing nonprofit credit counseling agencies), banking, financial planning and annuities, insurance (including car, home, RV, boat, and life), tax planning services, and credit monitoring services (excluding credit repair services).
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available to Quantcast upon request.
Clients must include specific disclosures required by local law.
Campaigns must not promote: short-term loans with a repayment schedule of less than 90 days; high-interest loans or credit cards (i.e., with an APR of 36% or higher); credit repair services; payday loans or for-profit debt services.
Non-discrimination: campaigns must not engage in or have the effect of improper discrimination of legally-protected class demographics as set forth in applicable civil rights, privacy, or other laws and self-regulatory codes. The prohibition also applies to targeting criteria that may be a proxy for protected classes, sometimes including zip codes. Protected classes vary by geography but generally include:
Race, color, ethnicity, or national origin;
Religion and/or political or philosophical belief;
Sex, gender, or gender affiliation;
Marital status and/or familial status;
Age (provided the applicant has the capacity to contract);
The applicant’s receipt of income (if derived from any public assistance program)
The applicant’s exercise, in good faith, of any right under a consumer protection law.
Candidate and Issue Campaigns
Responsible advertising for Political Campaigns may be permitted in limited circumstances in the United States only on a case-by-case basis.
Clients must have and maintain licensure where required by law, and make such licensure available.
Campaign content must include disclosures and disclaimers as required by applicable law, including a “paid for” disclaimer to show the entity or the person responsible for the ad.
Campaigns must not be funded by or otherwise involve foreign national interference; incite violence; encourage lawlessness or insurrection; include hate speech; constitute the distribution of “fake news”; or discriminate or suggest discrimination based on any protected class characteristics or otherwise.
Restricted Characteristics
Regardless of the industry or product category, ad sets and creatives that could reveal or reasonably allow making an inference about a Restricted Characteristic of a user who showed an interest in said creative (i.e., clicking the ad) are not permitted.
Where prohibited by law or self-regulatory code, targeting users based on a known and/or inferred Restricted Characteristic is not permitted.
Tagging or placing pixels on websites and pages featuring content that could reasonably allow making an inference about the Restricted Characteristic of a visitor is not permitted.
This policy is not and should not be construed as legal advice and solely reflects Quantcast’s policy. Clients of Quantcast products and services must seek independent advice from their own counsel regarding compliance with applicable laws, regulations, codes, and industry standards. Quantcast reserves the right to update, modify, and change these policies at any time, at its sole discretion. For the avoidance of doubt, Clients always remain liable for their campaign content and strategies, and for all activities they undertake with the use of Quantcast’s products and/or services.
Effective September 11th 2023
Download
Table of Contents
What this policy covers
We care about your privacy and want you to be informed about what we do. This Privacy Policy explains how we collect personal information from our owned and operated corporate website(s), such as quantcast.com, client-facing portals and other sources, including through your contact with us, and how we use and disclose that information in relation to our corporate activities, such as marketing and recruiting. This document also describes the choices available to you regarding this information.
This policy does not cover information that is collected, used or disclosed in our digital advertising-related technology products and services. For more information on privacy as it relates to the products and services, please go
here
. Additionally, this policy does not apply to the privacy practices of any third parties or other websites that are linked to from our websites. We are not responsible for the privacy practices of these other parties and websites.
Sometimes we will make disclosures at the time of collection – for example on a sign-up form for an email list or webinar. To the extent that those disclosures may be different from the terms of this policy, those disclosures will apply.
We’ll try to make this all as clear and as simple as possible, but if you have questions, you can contact us, and we’ll be happy to help. (See the “Contact Us” section below.)
What we do
Quantcast operates and provides services related to digital marketing. We have products for both advertisers and publishers, and our clients and partners are generally businesses. Our Measure products help website owners to understand the interests and demographics of the people who visit their sites. For companies that want to advertise online, our Advertise products help get their ads in front of the people that are more likely to find them interesting. For consumers, we provide ads that are more useful and relevant to their interests. And for websites, our Advertise products help drive advertising revenue, without which the free Internet we all use every day would not exist. In short, we try to make online advertising more efficient and pleasant for everyone. In order to do all this, we collect and analyze data about individual consumer interests and demographics.
We also offer
Quantcast Choice
, a consent management tool for publishers and advertisers built on the
IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework
that helps website operators provide consumers with information and choices about data. From time to time, we may offer additional products.
You can read more about privacy in relation to our services here.
.
Quantcast is an active member or participant of industry associations that govern the policies around online consumer privacy in the context of internet-based advertising, including: the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI), the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA), and the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA). Quantcast complies with the
NAI Code of Conduct
, the
DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
, and the
EDAA Self-Regulatory Principles
. We believe that these codes and principles help protect consumer privacy.
We also use, and adhere to the policies of, the IAB EU Transparency & Consent Framework (TCF) as part of our compliance with EU data protection law. See
https://iabeurope.eu/transparency-consent-framework/
for more information.
Information we collect
The information we collect includes personal information (also called  personal data). What type of personal information depends on the particular circumstances.
When you visit our website(s) we collect information about your visit, including IP address, cookie or other identifiers, geolocation, your browsing history and other activity on the site, and how you got to our site.
We collect your contact information when you provide it to us, including name, email address, address, phone, and any other information you provide.
If you are a client or partner we may receive your business contact information from you or your employer as part of the business relationship.
We may collect information from marketing or other informational emails that we send you, using cookies and/or pixels to measure, for example, open rates.
We collect information for recruiting and business-to-business marketing from third-party sources where it is made available for these purposes, including social media sites like LinkedIn or marketing lead lists.
When you apply for a job at Quantcast we might collect a variety of personal information about you, your qualifications and experience, and your eligibility to work for us, including information like degrees, licenses and certifications, references, and more.
We may match information across different sources in order to advance the purposes described in this policy, including that we may match information like your email to information about your activity on our website.
We may work with partners who collect information from our website(s) or other sources, for the purposes described  here.
When we collect or receive information from a third-party, such as from a job recruiting site, your provision of and our access to information will be governed by those parties’ own policies and applicable laws.
Quantcast does not knowingly collect or use personal information from children under 16. If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with personal information, that parent or guardian should contact us. If we become aware that a child has provided us with personal information, we will delete such information from our files.
How we use your information
We use website activity to better understand and improve the usability and effectiveness of our site and for fraud or crime prevention or debugging.
We also use website activity to enhance our marketing to existing and potential customers, including by matching it with other personal information to improve our marketing.
We and partners we work with may collect information from your visits to our website or from other information we have collected from or about you for marketing and advertising purposes, and we may use automated processes to make inferences about you in order to make our marketing more relevant and effective.
We use information about you to respond to queries and requests, and if you are a customer, send you administrative emails and product updates.
We or our vendors may use information for event planning and management, recruiting, marketing and advertising.
We use information for recruiting and hiring purposes, such as to find, contact, and evaluate potential employees, or to respond to your applications for employment; however, this policy does not cover personal information in the context of current or former employment relationships.
We may use information as reasonably needed to protect our business interests or as required by law.
We may use information for other corporate administrative functions consistent with the purposes above.
Sharing and disclosure of personal information
We will share or disclose personal information to the extent legally permissible for these purposes:
We may use and disclose information about you to government or law enforcement officials or private parties as we believe necessary: (i) to comply with any applicable laws, regulations, and valid subpoenas, warrants, and court orders; (ii) to protect the rights, property, and safety of ourselves, third parties, or the public in general; and (iii) to prevent or stop activity we consider to be illegal, harmful, or unethical.
We may sell, transfer, or otherwise share some or all of our assets, including information we collect about you, in connection with a merger, acquisition, reorganization, or sale of assets or in the event of bankruptcy. We may also make certain information available to a potential investor or purchaser (and their advisers) in advance of any such transaction completion.
If you are a customer, we may share the information as needed to provide and operate our products and services.
We may share information among our affiliated companies.
We share information with vendors, service providers, and partners for the purposes described in this policy, including that we may share information with partners who help us advertise our products and services on other websites, apps, or other locations.
We may share information with other third parties at your request or with your permission, or when we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights, protect your safety or the safety of others, investigate fraud, or to any other third party with your prior consent to do so.
We do not sell the personal information described in this policy, as that term (sell) is defined by the California Consumer Protection Act.
Our websites may include third party content like video players or social media features, such as YouTube videos or the Facebook “like” button. These features may allow the social media provider, like Facebook, to collect certain information, such as your IP address, cookies and the page you are visiting. We may also communicate information to you about our products and services using social media platforms. Your interactions with social media, these features and data collection enabled by such social media features are governed by the privacy policy of the social media provider offering them. Please note that links to social media platforms or content from our website does not mean that we endorse the linked social media platform and/or content.
Cookies on our websites
We use cookies and similar technology on our websites for the purposes described here.
“Cookies” are data files that are stored on your browser or device and are used to recognize browsers over time, as well as for other purposes. Cookies allow us to recognize your device and remember information, such as your preferred language and other general settings, and allows us to track your activity across web pages.
Cookies set in the domain of the website you are visiting, i.e. quantcast.com, are called “first party cookies”. Cookies set on other domains are called “third party cookies”. Our websites use both first party and third-party cookies.
For more information about cookies, including how to see what cookies have been set on your device and how to manage and delete them, visit
www.allaboutcookies.org
and
www.youronlinechoices.eu
.
Your choices and rights
If you are a customer you may be able to access, change, or delete your personal information by logging into the customer portal.
Industry opt-out pages.
The online advertising industry provides websites from which you may opt out of interest-based advertising that participate in self-regulatory programs. The US-based opt out pages are
www.aboutads.info/choices
and
www.networkadvertising.org/choices
. The European based page is
www.youronlinechoices.com
. In Canada, use
youradchoices.ca/choices
.
For mobile apps.
You can opt out of certain data collection and use on most mobile devices by using your device settings. We are not able to directly access the Mobile App Opt Out on devices that offer it. To learn how to use the mobile app opt out, consult your device instructions. To find information on Opting out on Mobile Devices please visit
http://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice
.
If you would like to request that we stop using information about you, you can contact us using the information below under Contact Us.
You may submit a verifiable request through Quantcast’s Data Subject Rights page, which can be found
here
. California residents may also submit verifiable requests by contacting Quantcast via email privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com.
When you visit our website, you may be presented with information about cookies and data collection on our website by us and other parties, and may be given the opportunity to make choices about that collection and subsequent use.
If you are in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, or the UK, you may have rights under the European or UK General Data Protection Regulation. These rights include the right to access, deletion, rectification, portability. You may also be able to revoke your consent to, object to, or request to restrict our processing of your information. And you may have the right to be informed of international transfers of your information. If you would like to exercise any of your rights, you may contact us using the information below under Contact Us. If you have a concern or complaint, you may contact us or our Data Protection Officer or you have the right to complain to a data protection regulator. Again, see Contact Us for information.
If you reside in California, you may have rights under the California Consumer Protection Act. These rights include the right to be informed about general categories and specific information we collect about you, the right to know categories of sources of information, the right to know about information about you that is sold or shared, including the categories of third parties with whom the information is shared, the right to have information about you deleted, the right to opt out of selling or certain sharing of information. Additionally, you have the right not to be discriminated against for exercising any of these rights. You may submit a request using the information in Contact Us. Consistent with California law and to provide for the security of Personal information, Quantcast will verify requests from California residents, as well as requests received from authorized agents acting on behalf of California residents.
Quantcast Information Control
The Quantcast Site and Services are made available and provided to persons residing within the United States by Quantcast Corporation, located at 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107. Information or data relating to persons within the United States provided to or gathered by the Quantcast Site or Services is controlled by Quantcast Corporation.
The Quantcast Site and Services are made available to persons resident outside the United States by Quantcast International Limited, located at Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, 1st Floor, Dublin 2, Ireland. Information or data relating to persons resident outside the United States provided to or gathered by the Quantcast Site or Services is controlled by Quantcast International Limited.
Our Legal Basis for Processing Personal information
In order to deliver our Services, we use the information described in this Privacy Policy as necessary for our legitimate interests, unless those interests are overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms that require protection of Personal information. Our legitimate interests include providing, improving, and customizing our websites, marketing our products and services to current and potential customers, finding and hiring employees, and preventing fraud and other nefarious or harmful activities. We may share your information (as described in this Privacy Policy) where necessary to pursue our legitimate interests. You have the right to object to our use of your Personal information to pursue our legitimate interests, which is described in the How To Object and Opt Out section below.
In addition, where you have given us consent to use your information in certain ways, we will rely on your consent to process the information. You may revoke that consent at any time. Please see the Your Choices and Rights section for information as to how you may withdraw your consent.
International transfers
Quantcast operates a global service. Your information is transferred internationally between Quantcast affiliate companies and our Partners to countries around the world including the United States, where the privacy and data protection laws may be different than those in your jurisdiction. We use standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission, and may rely on the European Commission’s adequacy decisions about certain countries, as applicable, for data transfers from the EEA to the United States and other countries. You can contact us to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
Security and retention
We employ administrative, physical, and technical measures designed to protect the confidentiality and integrity of Personal information that we store. These measures may include encryption and employment of information storage security technologies to restrict access to our network. Please be aware that no method of transmitting information over the Internet or storing information is completely secure. We have procedures and security features in place to help keep your data secure once we receive it. Additionally, in some instances our Partners or others may provide information to us in unencrypted form.
We retain the information described in this policy for the purposes described in this policy, and or including:
As business records reasonably retained in the normal course of business;
To respond to any questions, complaints or claims that may be made by you or on your behalf; or
To keep records required by law.
We will retain the information for as long as it is reasonably needed for the purposes or as is otherwise legally required.
Changes to this policy
Any information that we collect is subject to the Privacy Policy in effect at the time that information is collected. Changes to our Privacy Policy will be reflected here or on some successor or replacement page on our website.
Contact us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please let us know.
If you are a customer, please contact us through your account representative.
For others:
Persons in the United States, please contact:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Email: privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
Persons outside of the United States, please contact:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street, 1st Floor
Dublin 2, Ireland
Email: privacy.qil [at] quantcast [dot] com
The Data Protection Officer for Quantcast International Limited can be contacted at dpo [at] quantcast [dot] com.
If you have contacted us or our Data Protection Officer about a privacy or data use concern and feel that we have not addressed it satisfactorily, you may contact our US-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you are a resident of the EEA, you also have the right to lodge a complaint against us with our lead supervisory authority, the
Irish Data Protection Commission
, or your
local supervisory authority
in the country in which you reside.
Effective December 16th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Products and Services Privacy Policy
This Policy takes effect on December 15 2024.
Products and Services Privacy Policy
Who we are and what we do
Scope of this Privacy Policy
Self-regulatory standards
Information collection
Information use and legal basis
Information sharing
Information security
Information retention
International transfers
Your choices and legal rights
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
Additional information for residents of certain U.S. states
Contact us
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Capitalised terms used in this Products and Services Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) are defined in
Key Terms
unless otherwise defined herein.
To exercise your Data Subject Rights (described in the
Your choices and legal rights
below), please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page.
Who we are and what we do
Quantcast (“we”, “our”, or “us”) is a global digital advertising technology group of companies. Quantcast offers Solutions that help digital advertisers and publishers (collectively, “Clients”) understand and grow their client base. Through Quantcast Advertise Solutions, advertiser Clients can plan, activate, and measure the performance of their advertising campaigns seamlessly in a single audience platform, which helps them to place their ads to maximise results. Through Quantcast Measure Solutions, digital publisher Clients leverage insights to better understand the makeup of their audiences, how audiences spend their time across their digital properties, and what audiences care about, all of which help these digital businesses better connect their content and Audiences with the right advertising. We will refer to all of these services as “Solutions.”
To provide the Solutions, Quantcast collects and uses Personal Information for various purposes, such as measuring and understanding audiences, targeting and delivering ads, measuring ad performance, and similar related purposes. As described in the
Information Collection
section below, we may join or match Personal Information about you, which may include your Online Data from your visits across different digital properties, like websites,mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”)), that have implemented Quantcast Pixels, Tags or SDKs (which is sometimes called “tracking” in the industry) or Offline Data . This allows us, for example, to enrich our existing data sets and provide meaningful reports for our Clients regarding the effectiveness of their ads or content. We may also combine Personal Information that we collect in order to probabilistically link media consumption to a single user, which is sometimes called Cross-Media Matching/Linking. To the extent that we combine Personal Information that we collect from and about you in connection with our performance of the Solutions, we will use such combined information only as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy describes in more detail how we collect, use, disclose, and protect Personal Information, otherwise obtain and Process it in connection with the delivery of the Solutions, and the controls we provide you to manage such information and exercise your choices and legal rights. As noted in the
Information use and legal basis
section below, we use the
Transparency and Consent Framework
(“TCF”) standard to facilitate compliance with applicable laws in Europe, primarily in accordance with the EU and UK General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”). Because the TCF is one means of explaining Processing activities, and because our Processing activities are consistent globally, the TCF Purposes are applicable to all Personal Information that we Process (regardless of the information’s country of origin).
In the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast Corporation, located at 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107. Personal Information relating to individuals located within the United States provided to or gathered by us in connection with the delivery of the Solutions is controlled by Quantcast Corporation.
Outside of the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast International Limited, located at Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland. In so far as Quantcast acts as a “controller” (as defined under applicable law), Quantcast International Limited is the controller of your Personal Information if you reside in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), Switzerland, or any other jurisdiction outside of the United States.
Scope of this Privacy Policy
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
This Privacy Policy covers Quantcast’s use of Personal Information for the Solutions only. This Privacy Policy does not cover:
Personal Information collected from our website, www.quantcast.com, except to the extent that we use our own Solutions on our website. It also does not pertain to the collection and use of Personal Information in connection with our corporate functions, such as marketing, recruiting, people management, business-to-business communications, and so forth. For our privacy policy relating to our website and our corporate functions, please click
here
.
Any third parties’ handling of Personal Information, unless explicitly stated otherwise. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any other companies that you engage or interact with to understand their information handling and privacy practices.
We use some phrases in this Privacy Policy that are unique to our business and/or the digital advertising industry. For a list of defined terms that you should familiarise yourself with to make it easier to review this Privacy Policy, please review the
Key Terms
.
For clarity, we want to note that in some circumstances, Quantcast may also process certain Personal Information described in this Privacy Policy as a processor/service provider.
California Notice at Collection: We collect the categories of Personal Information listed in the
Additional information for residents of certain U.S. states
section below. As further described in the
Information use and legal basis
section below, we collect this information in order to deliver the Solutions and conduct our business. To learn more, please see the
Additional information for residents of certain U.S. states
section.
Self-regulatory standards
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
Quantcast supports and participates in several digital advertising self-regulatory organisations, as further described below.
We are members of the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
.
We participate in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and adhere to the
DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
.
We participate in the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) and are certified under the
EDAA Principles
.
We participate in, and comply with, the policies and technical specifications of the
IAB Transparency and Consent Framework (TCF)
as a vendor. Quantcast’s IAB Europe-assigned identification number is Vendor ID #11.
Please see the
Your choices and legal rights
section of this Privacy Policy for more information about the opt-out tools offered by the NAI, DAA, and EDAA.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We do not honor DNT at this time, due to the lack of a clear industry standard. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for your opt-out options.
Information collection
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
We collect or receive Personal Information about or relating to you in various ways, including from digital properties, like websites, mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”), and other sources of digital content. Details about the categories of Personal Information we collect and receive, the source or manner in which we obtain each category of Personal Information, the purpose(s) for which we Process each category of Personal Information, and the retention period for each category of Personal Information we Process can be found in the table below. As described in the
Who we are and what we do
section, where applicable the Processing purposes identified in the table below are tied to the TCF Purposes outlined in the
Information use and legal bases
section.
Category and Description of Personal Information
Source of Personal Information
Purpose for Processing (including where relevant the TCF Purpose) and Retention Period
Pseudonymous Identifiers: unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s).
Examples include a Cookie ID, device IP Address, hashed email addresses, 3rd party identifiers, or other Device Identifiers or Device Configuration/ Information.
Usually generated when Pixels, Tags, or SDKs are loaded by a Client on its digital property (i.e., website, mobile app, or device) and sends information to us. Different kinds of Pixels, Tags, or SDKs are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Such information may also be received through a server- to- server connection, such as when receiving a Bid Request.
.
Pseudonymous Identifiers will be retained for up to 13 months for the following purposes
(NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset)
:
Store and/or access information on a device (TCF Purpose 1)
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Create profiles for personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve services (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1 )
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Save and communicate privacy choices (Special Purpose 3)
Match and combine data from other data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Recording consent choices made by users
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information: The time zone and approximate geolocation (e.g., postal code or city) of your device.
Inferred or derived by Quantcast from your device’s IP Address or included in Bid Requests.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information will be retained for up to Up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Save and communicate privacy choices (Special Purpose 3)
Match and combine data from other data Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Event Data: Information relating to your Online Data, which may include Pseudonymous Identifiers, Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, HTTP Request Header Information, Device Information, and Browsing Data.
Generated when Pixels, Tags or SDKs, installed by a Client on its digital property, loads and sends information to us.
Different kinds of Pixels, Tags or SDKs are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Event Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Save and communicate privacy choices (Special Purpose 3)
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Bid Request Data: A bid request is an offer from a digital inventory provider (e.g., a publisher or Exchange),, to show an ad on a digital property. Bid Request Data includes information about your visit to the digital property, which helps us understand where an ad will be displayed, Device Information, and who might see it.
Bid Request Data also commonly includes a Pseudonymous Identifier (if available), the content that the ad would serve into, the type of device the ad would be served on, the Imprecise / Approximate Location Information of the device, the size of the ad, and consent information. Because Bid Requests include information about the content you are visiting, over time, accumulated Bid Requests may show your browsing behavior.
Received from a digital inventory provider.
Bid Request Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Save and communicate privacy choices (Special Purpose 3)
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Imported Data (Client): Pseudonymised Information, which may include Online Data, and/or Offline Data that may be apportioned by Browsing Data, Attributes, Segments, Label Data and Interests.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”) by a particular Client for use on its behalf.
Imported Data (client) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud (TCF Special Purpose 1)
(For clarity, Quantcast may retain data for a different period if instructed by a Client for which Quantcast is acting as a service provider/processor.)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment): Pseudonymised Information, which may include Online Data, and/or Offline Data that may be apportioned by Browsing Data, Attributes, Segments, Label Data and Interests.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by third-party Data Management Platforms or Data Providers.
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
TUnderstand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
(For clarity, Quantcast may retain data for a different period if instructed by a Client for which Quantcast is acting as a service provider/processor.)
Inferences/Inferred Data: Information drawn from the above-listed categories of information (i.e., Event Data, Bid Request Data, Imported Data (Client), and Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)).
We may, for example, use information that we have collected to infer your interests, age, gender, marital status, or income range. These Inferences may include Interests and Attributes.
Derived by Quantcast from previously collected Event Data, Bid Request Data, Imported Data (Client), and/or Imported Data (Third Party/Segment).
Inferences/Inferred Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 83)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Training Data: Pseudonymous Information used to improve Quantcast’s algorithms and measure how well they are working.
Received from third-party data providers and matched to Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Training Data will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Information you provide: This may include your contact details, (e.g., name, email address, or phone number) and any commentary or other information you provide when you contact Quantcast.
Provided by you when you contact Quantcast.
Carrying out our legitimate business purposes.
Retention Period: up to 18 months
Additionally, any of the categories of Personal Information described above may be Processed and retained for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Retained as needed for these purposes, including as required by applicable law. Otherwise, categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Hosting of Personal Information for above-listed purposes
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Sensitive information
We generally do not seek or permit sensitive Personal Information (e.g., information revealing an individual’s racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership; genetic or biometric data that is Processed for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual; information concerning an individual’s health, sex life, or sexual orientation; and information relating to criminal convictions and offenses) to be used in the Solutions. Outside of the EEA, UK, and Switzerland, to the extent that applicable laws and regulations recognize and allow collection of non-sensitive health information, we may collect and Process such information. If we were to Process sensitive Personal Information, we would seek and obtain your consent and/or otherwise Process such information in accordance with applicable laws and rules.
Children’s information
We do not knowingly process Personal Information about data subjects considered to be children under applicable law. If a parent or guardian becomes aware that Quantcast has received Personal Information about his or her child, the parent or guardian should contact us at privacy[at]quantcast[dot com. If we become aware that we have received Personal Information about data subjects considered to be children under applicable law, we will take all reasonable steps to delete such information from our files.
Contractual commitments from our Clients and third-party Data Providers:
We contractually require other companies that provide or make available to us Personal Information to take steps to ensure that we can lawfully Process such information, which include: (i) posting complete and accurate privacy policies that comply with applicable laws and rules and describe their Personal Information collection, use, and sharing practices; (ii) obtaining all legally-required consents and necessary permissions; and (iii) providing individuals with appropriate choices and the ability to opt out of the Processing of their Personal Information, where necessary or appropriate.
Information use and legal basis
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
As described in the
Who we are and what we do
section, we generally use the TCF as the mechanism for describing our Processing activities, and in Europe specifically for establishing our legal basis for Processing and managing users’ preferences for online personalised advertising and related activities. The TCF is designed to allow a digital business to present information and choices to users on its website relating to the Processing of their Personal Information.
We Process Personal Information for the purposes for which it was collected or provided to us. The table below describes the specific purposes for which we Process the Personal Information we collect or otherwise obtain about you. This table includes:
the purposes for which Quantcast Processes Personal Information ,which are tied to the defined purposes for Processing, special purposes, and features set forth in the
TCF Policies
and official technical documentation disseminated by IAB Europe where applicable(see Appendix A of the
TCF Policies
for examples and illustrations of the purposes, special purposes and features)
a description of each Processing activity using TCF-specific terminology (to the extent applicable), and
the legal basis that we rely on to perform each of our Processing activities.
Please note that in Europe, where we indicate that “Legitimate Interests” in accordance with the GDPR is the legal basis for Processing, we carry out the Processing in reliance on our legitimate interests or those of a third party (e.g., our Clients), provided that such interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Processing Purpose / TCF Purpose (where TCF is applicable)
Description of Processing Activity (using TCF Purpose terms)
Legal Basis for Processing for EU/UK
Storing and/or accessing information on a device (TCF Purpose 1)
Cookies, Device Identifiers, or other information more fully described in association with the purposes below and in the tables above can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes presented to you.
Consent
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Ads can be shown to you based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, or your device type.
When selecting “Use limited data to select advertising”, Quantcast will:
Use real-time information about the context in which the ad will be shown, including information about the content and your device, such as: device type and capabilities, User Agent, URL, and IP Address
Use your device’s Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Control the frequency of ads shown to you
Sequence the order in which ads are shown to you
Prevent an ad from serving in an unsuitable editorial (brand-unsafe) context
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads.
Creating profiles for personalised ads (TCF Purpose 3)
A profile can be built about you and your Interests to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you.
To create or edit a profile for use in personalised advertising, Quantcast will:
Collect information about you, including your activity, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, or Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Aggregate Attributes and Interests and Panel-based demographic information,
Combine information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent
Using profiles to select personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
When serving personalised ads, Quantcast will select personalised ads based on Personal Information collected from or about you, such as your prior activity, Interests, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, demographic information or Inferences.
Consent
Measuring advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Quantcast will measure the performance and effectiveness of ads that you see or interact with.
In particular, to measure whether and how ads were delivered to you and how you interacted with them, Quantcast will:
Provide reporting to Clients about ads, including their effectiveness and performance
Provide reporting to Clients about your interactions with ads using data observed during your interaction with the ad
Provide reporting to Clients about the ads displayed on their properties
Measure whether an ad is serving in a suitable editorial environment (brand-safe) context
Determine the percentage of the ad that had the opportunity to be seen and the duration of that opportunity
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
In the provision of the Solutions to some Clients, Quantcast may correlate information between entries within its own datasets that have the same Pseudonymous Identifier or with information obtained from Ad Serving, Ad Verification, or Data Management Platforms/Data Providers. We do this to provide aggregated reporting to Clients about the number of visitors to their digital properties.
Quantcast does not apply Panel or similarly derived Audience Insights data to ad measurement data without a separate legal basis to apply market research to generate Audience Insights.
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective of ascertaining, measuring, and improving the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Measuring content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
The performance and effectiveness of content that you see or interact with can be measured.
To measure content performance, Quantcast will:
Measure and report to Clients on how content was delivered to and interacted with by you
Provide reporting to Clients, using directly measurable or known information about your interactions with the content
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our Clients meet their objective of executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Understanding audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources i.e., applying market research to generate Audience Insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Market research can be used to learn more about the Audiences who visit websites, mobile apps, or streaming media, and view ads.
To generate Audience Insights, Quantcast will:
Provide aggregate reporting to advertisers or their representatives (such as advertising agencies) about the Audiences reached by their ads, through Panel-based and similarly derived insights
Provide aggregate reporting to Clients about the Audiences that were served or interacted with content and/or ads on their properties by applying Panel-based and similarly derived insights
Associate Offline Data with you for the purposes of market research to generate Audience Insights (if we have declared that we will match and combine Offline Data sources)
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Developing and improving services (TCF Purpose 10 )
Your information can be used to improve Quantcast’s existing systems and software and to develop new products.
To develop and improve its products, Quantcast will:
Use information to improve its existing products with new features and to develop new products
Create new models and algorithms through machine learning
Quantcast primarily uses Training Data to train its algorithms how to infer individuals’ Attributes and Interests in the context of the Solutions.
Consent or Legitimate Interest, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Your information can be used to monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity and ensure our systems and processes work properly and securely.
To ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug, Quantcast will:
Ensure information is securely transmitted
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, invalid, or illegal activity
Ensure correct and efficient operation of systems and processes, including monitoring and enhancing the performance of systems and processes engaged in permitted purposes
Legitimate Interests
We conduct the Processing to meet organisational objectives such as to maintain our IT systems; to ensure the electronic security of our business; and to detect and prevent against malicious, fraudulent, invalid, and illegal activity.
Technically deliver ads or content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Your device can receive and send information that allows you to see and interact with ads and content.
To deliver information and respond to technical requests, Quantcast will:
Use your device’s IP Address to deliver an ad or content over the internet
Respond to your interactions with an ad or content by sending you to a landing page
Use information about your device type and capabilities for delivering ads or content (e.g., to deliver the right size ad creative or video file in a format supported by your device)
Quantcast may also match Pseudonymous Identifiers with third parties in order to deliver ads to Audiences.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective to ascertain, measure, and improve the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Save and communicate privacy choices (Special Purpose 3)
The consent choices you make on a digital property regarding the use of your information and profiles for the purposes listed above are saved and made available to Quantcast. This is necessary to allow Quantcast to respect your choices.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our requirements to respect your consent choices.
Matching and combining data from other sources i.e. offline data (TCF Feature 1)
Offline Data can be combined with your online activity in support of one or more purposes or special purposes outlined in this table.
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Different devices can be determined as belonging to you or your household in support of one or more purposes.
Through Cross-Media Matching/Linking, Quantcast will:
Deterministically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
Probabilistically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
Your device will be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP Address or browser type.
In particular, Quantcast will:
Create an identifier using information collected automatically from your device for specific characteristics (e.g., IP Address or User Agent information)
Use such an identifier to attempt to re-identify your device
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
We Process, preserve, and share Personal Information when we seek legal advice or seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation and other disputes.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations, litigation, and regulatory inquiries.
Responding to legal requests
We preserve and share Personal Information in response to legal requests from law enforcement and other government officials, to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process, and when we believe in good faith that disclosure of such information is necessary to comply with a judicial proceeding or court order.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations and regulatory inquiries.
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
We Process Personal Information to comply with our legal obligations under applicable law.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to Process Personal Information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006 or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law, such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014 (e.g., where the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Commission requests information)
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations under company legislation and tax law, such as the Companies Act 2014 or where the Irish Revenue requests information
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations under data protection laws, including to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018
See
https://legal.quantcast.com/#laws
for the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Quantcast which results in the Processing of Personal Information. As new laws may be enacted or other obligations may require us to Process your Personal Information, we will update this list from time to time.
Compliance with a legal obligation.
Conducting research
We use Personal Information to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of delivering and continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Hosting information
We Process Personal Information to manage our business, which includes hosting Personal Information in our on-premise data centers and/or cloud computing services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of delivering the Solutions to our Clients.
Information sharing
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
In connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the
Information use and legal basis
section above, we may share your Personal Information with the categories of third parties described below.
Category of Recipient
Description and Purpose of Sharing
Categories of Personal Information Shared
Quantcast-affiliated companies
We share your Personal Information with Quantcast-affiliated companies in order to provide the Solutions.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our vendors (including service providers/data processors)
Visit the
Quantcast Partner Page
for a list of some of our vendors.
We share your Personal Information with vendors who act on our behalf and are subject to binding contractual obligations and restrictions on the Processing of Personal Information we share with them. For example, these companies assist with information hosting, information Processing, database management, and administrative tasks.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our partners, such as Data Management Platforms and Data Providers and Advertising Exchanges
Visit the
Quantcast Partner Page
for a list of some of our partners
We share Pseudonymous Identifiers with companies that we partner with to support the operation of the Solutions. Specifically, Quantcast shares Pseudonymous Identifiers with 1) data providers via Data Management Platforms for the purpose of performing Cookie Syncing/Matches with Imported Data (Client) and Third Party/Segment Data, and 2) and Advertising Exchanges for the purpose of serving ads.
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction
In the event of a reorganisation, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may share your Personal Information with (or transfer your Personal Information to) certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisors. We may also make certain information available to a potential investor or purchaser (and their advisers) in advance of any such transaction’s completion.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Competent governmental and public authorities
We may share your Personal Information with governmental and law enforcement authorities, in each case to comply with legal or regulatory obligations or requests.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Other third parties
We will share your Personal Information with other third parties at your direction or with your consent.
Additionally, we may share your Personal Information as necessary or appropriate or where otherwise permitted by law to:
Enforce our agreements
Protect our operations
Protect our rights, privacy, safety, property, and/or those of other persons
Allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
We also create and share with our Clients insights or reports regarding the makeup of the Audiences that visit their digital properties or the performance of their advertising campaigns.
Information security
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
We employ appropriate organisational and technical security safeguards designed to keep Personal Information secure when it is transmitted to us and once we receive it. These measures may include encryption and employment of information storage security technologies to restrict access to our network. However, please be aware that no method of transmitting information over the internet or storing information is completely secure.
Information retention
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
We retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, as described in the
Information Collection
section above and in the tables below, except where we are required to retain the information for a longer period of time. Once Personal Information has reached its retention period, as applicable, we may either de-identify it (for State Privacy Law purposes, defined below), anonymise it (for GDPR purposes), or permanently delete it.
Category of Personal Information
Maximum retention period for all TCF Purposes as a Controller
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Up to 13 months (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset)
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Up to 13 months
Event Data
Up to 13 months
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Imported Data (Client)
Up to 30 days
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Up to 30 days
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Information you provide
Up to 18 months
Processing Purpose / TCF Purpose
Categories of Personal Information used for this purpose
Maximum retention period for the TCF Purpose as a Controller
Individual categories of data may have a shorter retention period as shown above
.
Store and/or access information on a device (TCF Purpose 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Cookie life span is up to 13 months each time it’s reset
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Create profiles for personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve services (TCF Purpose 10 )
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Save and communicate privacy choices (Special Purpose 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Match and combine data from other data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Additionally, any of the categories of Personal Information described above may be Processed and retained for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Retained as needed for these purposes, including as required by applicable law. Otherwise, categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Hosting information
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
International transfers
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
Quantcast operates a global service, and we engage vendors located around the world to help us deliver the Solutions. Accordingly, your Personal Information may be transferred outside of the country or region in which you reside, including to the United States and other countries where either our data centers, vendors, affiliates, or other partners are located. Where we transfer your Personal Information internationally, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that we may need to transfer your Personal Information to countries that have not been recognised by the
European Commision
and/or the
UK government
as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Information. We generally use EU Standard Contractual Clauses (to facilitate both controller-to-controller and controller-to-processor transfers) or other government-approved contracts that provide appropriate safeguards for Personal Information that is transferred to countries that have not been recognised as providing an adequate level of protection. You can contact us at privacy[at]quantcast[dot]com to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
In certain limited circumstances, we rely on other lawful mechanisms for international transfers of Personal Information or rely on derogations, such as the contractual necessity derogation.
Your choices and legal rights
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your Personal Information. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found below.
Right of access
:
The right to request access to your Personal Information and receive certain information, including the categories of your Personal Information we collect and disclose. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
.
Right of rectification/correction
: The right to request that we rectify (or correct) inaccurate Personal Information about you. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right of rectification/correction, due to the limited Personal Information we Process, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to request deletion of your Personal Information. To request the deletion of your Personal Information, see our
Data Subject Request Form
.
Right of erasure/deletion
: The right, in certain cases, to request that we delete your Personal Information, provided there are valid grounds for doing so and subject to applicable law and exceptions. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
.
Right to data portability
: The right, in certain cases, to receive a copy of your Personal Information in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and transmit such information to another controller. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
.
Right to object (marketing)
: The right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information for direct marketing purposes. In practice, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to opt out of our Processing of your Personal Information for advertising purposes. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices Page
.
Right to object (legitimate interests)
: The right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information where we Process it on the basis of our legitimate interests, as described in the
Information Use and Legal Bases
section above. Unless we have compelling legitimate grounds or the information is needed for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, we will cease Processing your Personal Information when you object. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices Page
.
Right to restrict Processing
: The right, in certain cases, to temporarily restrict our Processing of your Personal Information, provided there are valid grounds for doing so. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right to restrict the Processing of your Personal Information, we will treat it as an exercise of the right on an ongoing, rather than temporary, basis (i.e., the request will be treated as you exercising the right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information). To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices Pag
e
.
Right to withdraw your consent
: The right to withdraw the consent you have provided at any time, where we Process your Personal Information on the basis of your consent. Please note that the lawfulness of any Processing undertaken prior to your withdrawal of consent shall not be affected by the withdrawal. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices Page
.
Right to lodge a complaint
: The right to complain to the relevant authority regarding the Processing of your Personal Information by us or on our behalf. In the EU, the lead supervisory authority is the
Irish Data Protection Commissioner.
See the section
Contact Us
below.
Please note that the rights listed above may not be exercised in certain circumstances, such as when the Processing of your Personal Information is necessary to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject or for the exercise or defense of legal claims. Additionally, in order to protect your privacy, we may require proof of your identity before we can act on your request but only where it is necessary and proportionate to request this information.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo [at] quantcast [dot] com
.
If certain jurisdictions, including the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated Processing (i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated Processing that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights.
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that the Solutions are provided by our European entity, Quantcast International Limited. In Processing Personal Information in the context of providing the Solutions to our Clients, Quantcast Internal Limited generally acts as a data controller. More specifically, Quantcast International Limited is a joint controller along with its Client when we jointly determine the purposes for which your Personal Information will be Processed. For example, we are joint controllers with Clients for Personal Information that is collected as Quantcast Cookies, or using Pixels, Tags and SDKs deployed by our Clients on their digital properties, and for the Processing of other Personal Information introduced into the Solutions directly by the Client. This is because both Quantcast and the Client have influence over whether and how we collect and Process the Personal Information. In limited situations, Quantcast is the sole data controller of Personal Information when we are Processing it for our own independent purposes, for instance when we use a Quantcast Pseudonymous Identifier or we derive aggregated analytics for modeling, developing our algorithms, or improving the Solutions.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your Personal Information. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found in the
Your choices and legal rights
section above.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo [at] quantcast [dot] com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated Processing (i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated Processing that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for residents of certain U.S. states
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
Certain U.S. states* have enacted consumer privacy laws that grant their residents certain rights and require additional disclosures (“State Privacy Laws”). If you are a resident of one of these states, this section applies to you.
*California, Colorado, Connecticut, Florida, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Additional Disclosures
Above, in the
Information Collection
,
Information Use and Legal Basis
,
Information Sharing
, and
Information Retention
sections, we explain how we collect, use, disclose, and retain information about you. As required by certain State Privacy Laws, below, we use a table to explain this same information, including the categories of personal information we collect, the types of entities to which we disclose it, and the ways we use each category of information. The table explains our practices today and over the preceding 12 months.
Collection, Use, and Disclosure of Personal Information for Business Purposes
Category of Personal Information
We collect….
Categories of Recipients
We may disclose personal data to….
Use of Personal Information
We use personal data…
Identifiers
, such as IP Address and other similar Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
,
including browsing history and information regarding your interactions with websites or mobile apps or streaming media.
Geolocation data
, such as Imprecise/Approximate Location Information derived from device IP Addresses.
Inferences
, which refers to inferences drawn from any of the information in these categories of Personal Information to predict the individual’s characteristics.
Our affiliates and vendors
Our partners
To provide the Solutions which
help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively, including showing ads targeted to your interests, understanding the effectiveness of the ads we show, and reporting our findings to our Clients.
Other Details About Our Information Practices
We do not “sell” the personal information of any individuals as those terms are defined in State Privacy Laws.
We do not knowingly collect personal information about consumers considered to be children under applicable laws.
Your Privacy Rights
Opting Out of Targeted Advertising and Sharing
Some of the activities described in the
Information Sharing
section may be considered processing of your information for “targeted advertising” purposes under the State Law that applies to you. You can opt out of Quantcast identifier/cookie-based ad targeting by following the prompts at our
Privacy Choices Page
. You may also opt out of web-based ad targeting by enabling legally-recognized opt-out preference signal, such as the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”), a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity sold or used for targeted advertising as such terms are defined under State Privacy Laws. Please visit our
Privacy Choices Page
for more information about GPC.
Access, Deletion, Correction
Depending on your state of residence, you may have the right to request access to, or deletion or correction of, your personal information. If you are interested in exercising one or more of the rights outlined above, please click the relevant link in the
Your choices and legal rights
section above. You may also submit requests by contacting us via email at
privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
. We will attempt to verify your identity and respond to your request consistent with the State Privacy Laws.
Appeals
If we deny your request, you may have the right to appeal our decision by contacting us at
privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
. If you have concerns about the result of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
Authorized Agents
Depending upon where you reside, you may work with a natural person or business entity (an “Authorized Agent”) to submit rights requests on your behalf. If you are submitting a rights request as an Authorized Agent, you are required to submit proof of your authorization to make the request, such as a valid power of attorney or signed permission from the individual who is the subject of the request. We may also require you to verify your identity directly with us.
Nondiscrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights.
CCPA Annual Report
The California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) Regulations require businesses such as Quantcast to disclose metrics regarding the number of requests to know, delete, and opt-out. Information about annual data requests is available in the
CCPA Annual Report
.
Contact us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or our information handling practices, please feel free to contact us.
Individuals located in the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Email: privacy[at]quantcast[dot]com
Individuals located outside of the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street
Dublin 2, Ireland
Email: privacy.qil [at] quantcast [dot] com
The Data Protection Officer (DPO) for Quantcast International Limited can be contacted at
dpo [at] quantcast [dot] com
.
If you are a resident of the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint against us with our lead supervisory authority, the
Irish Data Protection Commission
, or the
supervisory authority
in your country of residence.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes in our practices with respect to the collection, use, and/or disclosure of
Personal Information
or changes in applicable law. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this page indicates when this Privacy Policy was last updated. Any changes will become effective when we post a revised version of this Privacy Policy unless otherwise specified.
Some of our changes will be minor, but if we make significant changes to how we use or share your
Personal Information
, we will:
inform you in advance by posting a notice on our website
wait for a period of time before implementing the changes
We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed about our information handling and privacy practices.
Effective June 11th 2024
to
December 16th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Products and Services Privacy Policy
This Policy takes effect on June 6 2024.
Products and Services Privacy Policy
Who we are and what we do
Scope of this Privacy Policy
Self-regulatory standards
Information collection
Information use and legal basis
Information sharing
Information security
Information retention
International transfers
Your choices and legal rights
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
Additional information for residents of certain U.S. states
Contact us
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Capitalised terms used in this Products and Services Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) are defined in
Key Terms
unless otherwise defined herein.
To exercise your Data Subject Rights (described in the
Your choices and legal rights
below), please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page.
Who we are and what we do
Quantcast (“we”, “our”, or “us”) is a global digital advertising technology group of companies. Quantcast offers products and services that help digital advertisers and publishers (collectively, “Clients”) understand and grow their client base. Through Quantcast Advertise Solutions, advertiser Clients can plan, activate, and measure the performance of their advertising campaigns seamlessly in a single audience platform, which helps them to place their ads to maximise results. Through Quantcast Measure Solutions, digital publisher Clients leverage insights to better understand the makeup of their audiences, how audiences spend their time across their digital properties, and what audiences care about, all of which help these digital businesses better connect their content and Audiences with the right advertising. We will refer to all of these services as “Solutions.”
To provide the Solutions, Quantcast collects and uses Personal Information for various purposes, such as measuring and understanding audiences, targeting and delivering ads, measuring ad performance, and similar related purposes. As described in the
Information Collection
section below, we may join or match Personal Information about you, which may include your Online Data from your visits across different digital properties, like websites,mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”)), that have implemented Quantcast Pixels, Tags or SDKs (which is sometimes called “tracking” in the industry) or Offline Data . This allows us, for example, to enrich our existing data sets and provide meaningful reports for our Clients regarding the effectiveness of their ads or content. We may also combine Personal Information that we collect in order to probabilistically link media consumption to a single user, which is sometimes called Cross-Media Matching/Linking. To the extent that we combine Personal Information that we collect from and about you in connection with our performance of the Solutions, we will use such combined information only as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy describes in more detail how we collect, use, disclose, and protect Personal Information, otherwise obtain and Process it in connection with the delivery of the Solutions, and the controls we provide you to manage such information and exercise your choices and legal rights. As noted in the
Information use and legal basis
section below, we use the
Transparency and Consent Framework
(“TCF”) standard to facilitate compliance with applicable laws in Europe, primarily in accordance with the EU and UK General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”). Because the TCF is one means of explaining Processing activities, and because our Processing activities are consistent globally, the TCF Purposes are applicable to all Personal Information that we Process (regardless of the information’s country of origin).
In the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast Corporation, located at 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107. Personal Information relating to individuals located within the United States provided to or gathered by us in connection with the delivery of the Solutions is controlled by Quantcast Corporation.
Outside of the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast International Limited, located at Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland. In so far as Quantcast acts as a “controller” (as defined under applicable law), Quantcast International Limited is the controller of your Personal Information if you reside in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), Switzerland, or any other jurisdiction outside of the United States.
Scope of this Privacy Policy
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
This Privacy Policy covers Quantcast’s use of Personal Information for the Solutions only. This Privacy Policy does not cover:
Personal Information collected from our website, www.quantcast.com, except to the extent that we use our own Solutions on our website. It also does not pertain to the collection and use of Personal Information in connection with our corporate functions, such as marketing, recruiting, people management, business-to-business communications, and so forth. For our privacy policy relating to our website and our corporate functions, please click
here
.
Any third parties’ handling of Personal Information, unless explicitly stated otherwise. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any other companies that you engage or interact with to understand their information handling and privacy practices.
We use some phrases in this Privacy Policy that are unique to our business and/or the digital advertising industry. For a list of defined terms that you should familiarise yourself with to make it easier to review this Privacy Policy, please review the
Key Terms
.
California Notice at Collection: We collect the categories of Personal Information listed in the
Additional information for residents of certain U.S. states
section below. As further described in the
Information use and legal basis
section below, we collect this information in order to deliver the Solutions and conduct our business. To learn more, please see the
Additional information for residents of certain U.S. states
section.
Self-regulatory standards
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
Quantcast supports and participates in several digital advertising self-regulatory organisations, as further described below.
We are members of the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
.
We participate in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and adhere to the
DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
.
We participate in the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) and are certified under the
EDAA Principles
.
We participate in, and comply with, the policies and technical specifications of the
IAB Transparency and Consent Framework (TCF)
as a vendor. Quantcast’s IAB Europe-assigned identification number is Vendor ID #11.
Please see the
Your choices and legal rights
section of this Privacy Policy for more information about the opt-out tools offered by the NAI, DAA, and EDAA.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We do not honor DNT at this time, due to the lack of a clear industry standard. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for your opt-out options.
Information collection
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
We collect or receive Personal Information about or relating to you in various ways, including from digital properties, like websites, mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”), and other sources of digital content. Details about the categories of Personal Information we collect and receive, the source or manner in which we obtain each category of Personal Information, the purpose(s) for which we Process each category of Personal Information, and the retention period for each category of Personal Information we Process can be found in the table below. As described in the
Who we are and what we do
section, where applicable the Processing purposes identified in the table below are tied to the TCF Purposes outlined in the
Information use and legal bases
section.
Category and Description of Personal Information
Source of Personal Information
Purpose for Processing (including where relevant the TCF Purpose) and Retention Period
Pseudonymous Identifiers: unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s).
Examples include a Cookie ID, device IP Address, hashed email addresses, 3rd party identifiers, or other Device Identifiers or Device Configuration/ Information.
Usually generated when Pixels, Tags, or SDKs are loaded by a Client on its digital property (i.e., website, mobile app, or device) and sends information to us. Different kinds of Pixels, Tags, or SDKs are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Such information may also be received through a server- to- server connection, such as when receiving a Bid Request.
Pseudonymous Identifiers will be retained for up to 13 months for the following purposes
(NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset)
:
Store and/or access information on a device (TCF Purpose 1)
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Create profiles for personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve services (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose )
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Match and combine data from other data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Recording consent choices made by users
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information: The time zone and approximate geolocation (e.g., postal code or city) of your device.
Inferred or derived by Quantcast from your device’s IP Address or included in Bid Requests.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Match and combine data from other data Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Event Data: Information relating to your Online Data, which may include Pseudonymous Identifiers, Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, HTTP Request Header Information, Device Information, and Browsing Data.
Generated when Pixels, Tags or SDKs, installed by a Client on its digital property, loads and sends information to us.
Different kinds of Pixels, Tags or SDKs are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Event Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Bid Request Data: A bid request is an offer from a digital publisher, like a website, mobile app, or streaming media owner, to show an ad on their property. Bid Request Data includes information about your visit to the publisher’s digital property, which helps us understand where an ad will be displayed, Device Information, and who might see it.
Bid Request Data also commonly includes a Pseudonymous Identifier (if available), the content that the ad would serve into, the type of device the ad would be served on, the Imprecise / Approximate Location Information of the device, the size of the ad, and consent information. Because Bid Requests include information about the content you are visiting, over time, accumulated Bid Requests may show your browsing behavior.
Received from a digital publisher.
Bid Request Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Imported Data (Client): Pseudonymised Information, which may include Online Data, and/or Offline Data that may be apportioned by Browsing Data, Attributes, Segments, Label Data and Interests.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”) by a particular Client for use on its behalf.
Imported Data (client) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment): Pseudonymised Information, which may include Online Data, and/or Offline Data that may be apportioned by Browsing Data, Attributes, Segments, Label Data and Interests.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by third-party Data Management Platforms or Data Providers.
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
TUnderstand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Inferences/Inferred Data: Information drawn from the above-listed categories of information (i.e., Event Data, Bid Request Data, Imported Data (Client), and Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)).
We may, for example, use information that we have collected to infer your interests, age, gender, marital status, or income range. These Inferences may include Interests and Attributes.
Derived by Quantcast from previously collected Event Data, Bid Request Data, Imported Data (Client), and/or Imported Data (Third Party/Segment).
Inferences/Inferred Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 83)
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Training Data: Pseudonymous Information used to improve Quantcast’s algorithms and measure how well they are working.
Received from third-party data providers and matched to Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Training Data will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Information you provide: This may include your contact details, (e.g., name, email address, or phone number) and any commentary or other information you provide when you contact Quantcast.
Provided by you when you contact Quantcast.
Carrying out our legitimate business purposes.
Retention Period: up to 18 months
Additionally, any of the categories of Personal Information described above may be Processed and retained for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Retained as needed for these purposes, including as required by applicable law. Otherwise, categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Hosting of Personal Information for above-listed purposes
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Sensitive information
We generally do not seek or permit sensitive Personal Information (e.g., information revealing an individual’s racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership; genetic or biometric data that is Processed for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual; information concerning an individual’s health, sex life, or sexual orientation; and information relating to criminal convictions and offenses) to be used in the Solutions. Outside of the EEA, UK, and Switzerland, to the extent that applicable laws and regulations recognize and allow collection of non-sensitive health information, we may collect and Process such information. If we were to Process sensitive Personal Information, we would seek and obtain your consent and/or otherwise Process such information in accordance with applicable laws and rules.
Children’s information
We do not knowingly process Personal Information about data subjects considered to be children under applicable law. If a parent or guardian becomes aware that Quantcast has received Personal Information about his or her child, the parent or guardian should contact us at privacy[at]quantcast[dot com. If we become aware that we have received Personal Information about data subjects considered to be children under applicable law, we will take all reasonable steps to delete such information from our files.
Contractual commitments from our Clients and third-party Data Providers:
We contractually require other companies that provide or make available to us Personal Information to take steps to ensure that we can lawfully Process such information, which include: (i) posting complete and accurate privacy policies that comply with applicable laws and rules and describe their Personal Information collection, use, and sharing practices; (ii) obtaining all legally-required consents and necessary permissions; and (iii) providing individuals with appropriate choices and the ability to opt out of the Processing of their Personal Information, where necessary or appropriate.
Information use and legal basis
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
As described in the
Who we are and what we do
section, we generally use the TCF as the mechanism for describing our Processing activities, and in Europe specifically for establishing our legal basis for Processing and managing users’ preferences for online personalised advertising and related activities. The TCF is designed to allow a digital business to present information and choices to users on its website relating to the Processing of their Personal Information.
We Process Personal Information for the purposes for which it was collected or provided to us. The table below describes the specific purposes for which we Process the Personal Information we collect or otherwise obtain about you. This table includes:
the purposes for which Quantcast Processes Personal Information ,which are tied to the defined purposes for Processing, special purposes, and features set forth in the
TCF Policies
and official technical documentation disseminated by IAB Europe where applicable(see Appendix A of the
TCF Policies
for examples and illustrations of the purposes, special purposes and features)
a description of each Processing activity using TCF-specific terminology (to the extent applicable), and
the legal basis that we rely on to perform each of our Processing activities.
Please note that in Europe, where we indicate that “Legitimate Interests” in accordance with the GDPR is the legal basis for Processing, we carry out the Processing in reliance on our legitimate interests or those of a third party (e.g., our Clients), provided that such interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Processing Purpose / TCF Purpose (where TCF is applicable)
Description of Processing Activity (using TCF Purpose terms)
Legal Basis for Processing for EU/UK
Storing and/or accessing information on a device (TCF Purpose 1)
Cookies, Device Identifiers, or other information more fully described in association with the purposes below and in the tables above can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes presented to you.
Consent
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Ads can be shown to you based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, or your device type.
When selecting “Use limited data to select advertising”, Quantcast will:
Use real-time information about the context in which the ad will be shown, including information about the content and your device, such as: device type and capabilities, User Agent, URL, and IP Address
Use your device’s Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Control the frequency of ads shown to you
Sequence the order in which ads are shown to you
Prevent an ad from serving in an unsuitable editorial (brand-unsafe) context
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads.
Creating profiles for personalised ads (TCF Purpose 3)
A profile can be built about you and your Interests to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you.
To create or edit a profile for use in personalised advertising, Quantcast will:
Collect information about you, including your activity, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, or Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Aggregate Attributes and Interests and Panel-based demographic information,
Combine information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent
Using profiles to select personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
When serving personalised ads, Quantcast will select personalised ads based on Personal Information collected from or about you, such as your prior activity, Interests, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, demographic information or Inferences.
Consent
Measuring advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Quantcast will measure the performance and effectiveness of ads that you see or interact with.
In particular, to measure whether and how ads were delivered to you and how you interacted with them, Quantcast will:
Provide reporting to Clients about ads, including their effectiveness and performance
Provide reporting to Clients about your interactions with ads using data observed during your interaction with the ad
Provide reporting to Clients about the ads displayed on their properties
Measure whether an ad is serving in a suitable editorial environment (brand-safe) context
Determine the percentage of the ad that had the opportunity to be seen and the duration of that opportunity
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
In the provision of the Solutions to some Clients, Quantcast may correlate information between entries within its own datasets that have the same Pseudonymous Identifier or with information obtained from Ad Serving, Ad Verification, or Data Management Platforms/Data Providers. We do this to provide aggregated reporting to Clients about the number of visitors to their digital properties.
Quantcast does not apply Panel or similarly derived Audience Insights data to ad measurement data without a separate legal basis to apply market research to generate Audience Insights.
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective of ascertaining, measuring, and improving the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Measuring content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
The performance and effectiveness of content that you see or interact with can be measured.
To measure content performance, Quantcast will:
Measure and report to Clients on how content was delivered to and interacted with by you
Provide reporting to Clients, using directly measurable or known information about your interactions with the content
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our Clients meet their objective of executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Understanding audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources i.e., applying market research to generate Audience Insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Market research can be used to learn more about the Audiences who visit websites, mobile apps, or streaming media, and view ads.
To generate Audience Insights, Quantcast will:
Provide aggregate reporting to advertisers or their representatives (such as advertising agencies) about the Audiences reached by their ads, through Panel-based and similarly derived insights
Provide aggregate reporting to Clients about the Audiences that were served or interacted with content and/or ads on their properties by applying Panel-based and similarly derived insights
Associate Offline Data with you for the purposes of market research to generate Audience Insights (if we have declared that we will match and combine Offline Data sources)
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Developing and improving services (TCF Purpose 10 )
Your information can be used to improve Quantcast’s existing systems and software and to develop new products.
To develop and improve its products, Quantcast will:
Use information to improve its existing products with new features and to develop new products
Create new models and algorithms through machine learning
For example, Quantcast matches its datasets with Training Data, which usually includes Event Data, Bid Request Data, Imported Data (Client), and/or Imported Data (Third Party/Segment). Quantcast primarily uses Training Data to train its algorithms how to infer individuals’ Attributes and Interests in the context of the Solutions.
Consent or Legitimate Interest, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Your information can be used to monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity and ensure our systems and processes work properly and securely.
To ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug, Quantcast will:
Ensure information is securely transmitted
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, invalid, or illegal activity
Ensure correct and efficient operation of systems and processes, including monitoring and enhancing the performance of systems and processes engaged in permitted purposes
Legitimate Interests
We conduct the Processing to meet organisational objectives such as to maintain our IT systems; to ensure the electronic security of our business; and to detect and prevent against malicious, fraudulent, invalid, and illegal activity.
Technically deliver ads or content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Your device can receive and send information that allows you to see and interact with ads and content.
To deliver information and respond to technical requests, Quantcast will:
Use your device’s IP Address to deliver an ad or content over the internet
Respond to your interactions with an ad or content by sending you to a landing page
Use information about your device type and capabilities for delivering ads or content (e.g., to deliver the right size ad creative or video file in a format supported by your device)
Quantcast may also match Pseudonymous Identifiers with third parties in order to deliver ads to Audiences.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective to ascertain, measure, and improve the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Matching and combining data from other sources i.e. offline data (TCF Feature 1)
Offline Data can be combined with your online activity in support of one or more purposes or special purposes outlined in this table.
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Different devices can be determined as belonging to you or your household in support of one or more purposes.
Through Cross-Media Matching/Linking, Quantcast will:
Deterministically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
Probabilistically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
Your device will be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP Address or browser type.
In particular, Quantcast will:
Create an identifier using information collected automatically from your device for specific characteristics (e.g., IP Address or User Agent information)
Use such an identifier to attempt to re-identify your device
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
We Process, preserve, and share Personal Information when we seek legal advice or seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation and other disputes.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations, litigation, and regulatory inquiries.
Responding to legal requests
We preserve and share Personal Information in response to legal requests from law enforcement and other government officials, to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process, and when we believe in good faith that disclosure of such information is necessary to comply with a judicial proceeding or court order.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations and regulatory inquiries.
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
We Process Personal Information to comply with our legal obligations under applicable law.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to Process Personal Information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006 or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law, such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014 (e.g., where the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Commission requests information)
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations under company legislation and tax law, such as the Companies Act 2014 or where the Irish Revenue requests information
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations under data protection laws, including to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018
See
https://legal.quantcast.com/#laws
for the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Quantcast which results in the Processing of Personal Information. As new laws may be enacted or other obligations may require us to Process your Personal Information, we will update this list from time to time.
Compliance with a legal obligation.
Conducting research
We use Personal Information to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of delivering and continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Hosting information
We Process Personal Information to manage our business, which includes hosting Personal Information in our on-premise data centers and/or cloud computing services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of delivering the Solutions to our Clients.
Information sharing
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
In connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the
Information use and legal basis
section above, we may share your Personal Information with the categories of third parties described below.
Category of Recipient
Description and Purpose of Sharing
Categories of Personal Information Shared
Quantcast-affiliated companies
We share your Personal Information with Quantcast-affiliated companies in order to provide the Solutions.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our vendors (including service providers/data processors)
Visit the
Quantcast Partner Page
for a list of some of our vendors.
We share your Personal Information with vendors who act on our behalf and are subject to binding contractual obligations and restrictions on the Processing of Personal Information we share with them. For example, these companies assist with information hosting, information Processing, database management, and administrative tasks.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our partners, such as Data Management Platforms and Data Providers and Advertising Exchanges
Visit the
Quantcast Partner Page
for a list of some of our partners
We share Pseudonymous Identifiers with companies that we partner with to support the operation of the Solutions. Specifically, Quantcast shares Pseudonymous Identifiers with 1) data providers via Data Management Platforms for the purpose of performing Cookie Syncing/Matches with Imported Data (Client) and Third Party/Segment Data, and 2) and Advertising Exchanges for the purpose of serving ads.
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction
In the event of a reorganisation, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may share your Personal Information with (or transfer your Personal Information to) certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisors. We may also make certain information available to a potential investor or purchaser (and their advisers) in advance of any such transaction’s completion.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Competent governmental and public authorities
We may share your Personal Information with governmental and law enforcement authorities, in each case to comply with legal or regulatory obligations or requests.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Other third parties
We will share your Personal Information with other third parties at your direction or with your consent.
Additionally, we may share your Personal Information as necessary or appropriate or where otherwise permitted by law to:
Enforce our agreements
Protect our operations
Protect our rights, privacy, safety, property, and/or those of other persons
Allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
We also create and share with our Clients insights or reports regarding the makeup of the Audiences that visit their digital properties or the performance of their advertising campaigns. These insights and reports may contain aggregated data from which individual users cannot be uniquely identified or data from which Quantcast has removed Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Information security
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
We employ appropriate organisational and technical security safeguards designed to keep Personal Information secure when it is transmitted to us and once we receive it. These measures may include encryption and employment of information storage security technologies to restrict access to our network. However, please be aware that no method of transmitting information over the internet or storing information is completely secure.
Information retention
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
We retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, as described in the
Information Collection
section above and in the tables below, except where we are required to retain the information for a longer period of time. Once Personal Information has reached its retention period, as applicable, we may either de-identify it (for State Privacy Law purposes, defined below), anonymise it (for GDPR purposes), or permanently delete it.
Category of Personal Information
Maximum retention period for all TCF Purposes
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Up to 13 months (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset)
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Up to 30 days
Event Data
Up to 13 months
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Imported Data (Client)
Up to 30 days
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Up to 30 days
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Information you provide
Up to 18 months
Processing Purpose / TCF Purpose
Categories of Personal Information used for this purpose
Maximum retention period for the TCF Purpose
Individual categories of data may have a shorter retention period as shown above
.
Store and/or access information on a device (TCF Purpose 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Cookie life span is up to 13 months each time it’s reset
Use limited data to select advertising (TCF Purpose 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Create profiles for personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (TCF Purpose 4)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure advertising performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (TCF Purpose 9)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve services (TCF Purpose 10 )
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment) Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Deliver and present advertising and content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Match and combine data from other data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Additionally, any of the categories of Personal Information described above may be Processed and retained for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Retained as needed for these purposes, including as required by applicable law. Otherwise, categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Hosting information
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
International transfers
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
Quantcast operates a global service, and we engage vendors located around the world to help us deliver the Solutions. Accordingly, your Personal Information may be transferred outside of the country or region in which you reside, including to the United States and other countries where either our data centers, vendors, affiliates, or other partners are located. Where we transfer your Personal Information internationally, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that we may need to transfer your Personal Information to countries that have not been recognised by the
European Commision
and/or the
UK government
as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Information. We generally use EU Standard Contractual Clauses (to facilitate both controller-to-controller and controller-to-processor transfers) or other government-approved contracts that provide appropriate safeguards for Personal Information that is transferred to countries that have not been recognised as providing an adequate level of protection. You can contact us at privacy[at]quantcast[dot]com to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
In certain limited circumstances, we rely on other lawful mechanisms for international transfers of Personal Information or rely on derogations, such as the contractual necessity derogation.
Your choices and legal rights
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your Personal Information. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found below.
Right of access
:
The right to request access to your Personal Information and receive certain information, including the categories of your Personal Information we collect and disclose. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
.
Right of rectification/correction
: The right to request that we rectify (or correct) inaccurate Personal Information about you. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right of rectification/correction, due to the limited Personal Information we Process, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to request deletion of your Personal Information. To request the deletion of your Personal Information, see our
Data Subject Request Form
.
Right of erasure/deletion
: The right, in certain cases, to request that we delete your Personal Information, provided there are valid grounds for doing so and subject to applicable law and exceptions. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
.
Right to data portability
: The right, in certain cases, to receive a copy of your Personal Information in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and transmit such information to another controller. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
.
Right to object (marketing)
: The right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information for direct marketing purposes. In practice, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to opt out of our Processing of your Personal Information for advertising purposes. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices Page
.
Right to object (legitimate interests)
: The right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information where we Process it on the basis of our legitimate interests, as described in the
Information Use and Legal Bases
section above. Unless we have compelling legitimate grounds or the information is needed for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, we will cease Processing your Personal Information when you object. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices Page
.
Right to restrict Processing
: The right, in certain cases, to temporarily restrict our Processing of your Personal Information, provided there are valid grounds for doing so. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right to restrict the Processing of your Personal Information, we will treat it as an exercise of the right on an ongoing, rather than temporary, basis (i.e., the request will be treated as you exercising the right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information). To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices Pag
e
.
Right to withdraw your consent
: The right to withdraw the consent you have provided at any time, where we Process your Personal Information on the basis of your consent. Please note that the lawfulness of any Processing undertaken prior to your withdrawal of consent shall not be affected by the withdrawal. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices Page
.
Right to lodge a complaint
: The right to complain to the relevant authority regarding the Processing of your Personal Information by us or on our behalf. In the EU, the lead supervisory authority is the
Irish Data Protection Commissioner.
See the section
Contact Us
below.
Please note that the rights listed above may not be exercised in certain circumstances, such as when the Processing of your Personal Information is necessary to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject or for the exercise or defense of legal claims. Additionally, in order to protect your privacy, we may require proof of your identity before we can act on your request but only where it is necessary and proportionate to request this information.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo [at] quantcast [dot] com
.
If certain jurisdictions, including the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated Processing (i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated Processing that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights.
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that the Solutions are provided by our European entity, Quantcast International Limited. In Processing Personal Information in the context of providing the Solutions to our Clients, Quantcast Internal Limited generally acts as a data controller. More specifically, Quantcast International Limited is a joint controller along with its Client when we jointly determine the purposes for which your Personal Information will be Processed. For example, we are joint controllers with Advertisers and Publishers for Personal Information that is collected as Quantcast Cookies, or using Pixels, Tags and SDKs deployed by our Clients on their digital properties, and for the Processing of other Personal Information introduced into the Solutions directly by the Client. This is because both Quantcast and the Client have influence over whether and how we collect and Process the Personal Information. In limited situations, Quantcast is the sole data controller of Personal Information when we are Processing it for our own independent purposes, for instance when we use a Quantcast Pseudonymous Identifier or we derive aggregated analytics for modeling, developing our algorithms, or improving the Solutions.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your Personal Information. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found in the
Your choices and legal rights
section above.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo [at] quantcast [dot] com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated Processing (i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated Processing that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for residents of certain U.S. states
See
Key Terms
for definitions of capitalized terms.
Certain U.S. states* have enacted consumer privacy laws that grant their residents certain rights and require additional disclosures (“State Privacy Laws”). If you are a resident of one of these states, this section applies to you.
*California, Colorado, Connecticut, Florida, Montana, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia
Additional Disclosures
Above, in the
Information Collection
,
Information Use and Legal Basis
,
Information Sharing
, and
Information Retention
sections, we explain how we collect, use, disclose, and retain information about you. As required by certain State Privacy Laws, below, we use a table to explain this same information, including the categories of personal information we collect, the types of entities to which we disclose it, and the ways we use each category of information. The table explains our practices today and over the preceding 12 months.
Collection, Use, and Disclosure of Personal Information for Business Purposes
Category of Personal Information
We collect….
Categories of Recipients
We may disclose personal data to….
Use of Personal Information
We use personal data…
Identifiers
, such as IP Address and other similar Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
,
including browsing history and information regarding your interactions with websites or mobile apps or streaming media.
Geolocation data
, such as Imprecise/Approximate Location Information derived from device IP Addresses.
Inferences
, which refers to inferences drawn from any of the information in these categories of Personal Information to predict the individual’s characteristics.
Our affiliates and vendors
Our partners
To provide the Solutions which
help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively, including showing ads targeted to your interests, understanding the effectiveness of the ads we show, and reporting our findings to our clients.
Other Details About Our Information Practices
We do not “sell” the personal information of any individuals as those terms are defined in State Privacy Laws.
We do not knowingly collect personal information about consumers considered to be children under applicable laws.
Your Privacy Rights
Opting Out of Targeted Advertising and Sharing
Some of the activities described in the
Information Sharing
section may be considered processing of your information for “targeted advertising” purposes under the State Law that applies to you. You can opt out of Quantcast identifier/cookie-based ad targeting by following the prompts at our
Privacy Choices Page
. You may also opt out of web-based ad targeting by enabling legally-recognized opt-out preference signal, such as the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”), a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity sold or used for targeted advertising as such terms are defined under State Privacy Laws. Please visit our
Privacy Choices Page
for more information about GPC.
Access, Deletion, Correction
Depending on your state of residence, you may have the right to request access to, or deletion or correction of, your personal information. If you are interested in exercising one or more of the rights outlined above, please click the relevant link in the
Your choices and legal rights
section above. You may also submit requests by contacting us via email at
privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
. We will attempt to verify your identity and respond to your request consistent with the State Privacy Laws.
Appeals
If we deny your request, you may have the right to appeal our decision by contacting us at
privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
. If you have concerns about the result of an appeal, you may contact the attorney general in the state where you reside.
Authorized Agents
Depending upon where you reside, you may work with a natural person or business entity (an “Authorized Agent”) to submit rights requests on your behalf. If you are submitting a rights request as an Authorized Agent, you are required to submit proof of your authorization to make the request, such as a valid power of attorney or signed permission from the individual who is the subject of the request. We may also require you to verify your identity directly with us.
Nondiscrimination
We will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights.
CCPA Annual Report
The California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA) Regulations require businesses such as Quantcast to disclose metrics regarding the number of requests to know, delete, and opt-out. Information about annual data requests is available in the
CCPA Annual Report
.
Contact us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or our information handling practices, please feel free to contact us.
Individuals located in the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Email: privacy[at]quantcast[dot]com
Individuals located outside of the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street
Dublin 2, Ireland
Email: privacy.qil [at] quantcast [dot] com
The Data Protection Officer (DPO) for Quantcast International Limited can be contacted at
dpo [at] quantcast [dot] com
.
If you have contacted us or our DPO about a privacy or information use concern and feel that we have not addressed it satisfactorily, you may contact our US-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you are a resident of the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint against us with our lead supervisory authority, the
Irish Data Protection Commission
, or the
supervisory authority
in your country of residence.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes in our practices with respect to the collection, use, and/or disclosure of
Personal Information
or changes in applicable law. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this page indicates when this Privacy Policy was last updated. Any changes will become effective when we post a revised version of this Privacy Policy unless otherwise specified.
Some of our changes will be minor, but if we make significant changes to how we use or share your
Personal Information
, we will:
inform you in advance by posting a notice on our website
wait for a period of time before implementing the changes
We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed about our information handling and privacy practices.
Effective February 14th 2024
to
June 11th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Products and Services Privacy Policy
This Policy takes effect on March 1 2024. See Policy effective September 11 2023 until that date.
Products and Services Privacy Policy
Who we are and what we do
Scope of this Privacy Policy
Self-regulatory standards
Information collection
Information use and legal basis
Information sharing
Information security
Information retention
International transfers
Your choices and legal rights
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
Additional information for California residents
Contact us
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Capitalised terms used in this Products and Services Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) are defined in
Key Terms
unless otherwise defined herein.
To exercise your Data Subject Rights (described in the
Your choices and legal rights
below), please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page.
Who we are and what we do
Quantcast (“we”, “our”, or “us”) is a global digital advertising technology group of companies. Quantcast offers products and services that help digital advertisers and publishers (collectively, “Clients”) understand and grow their audiences (the “Solutions”). Through Quantcast Advertise Solutions, advertiser Clients can plan, activate, and measure the performance of their advertising campaigns seamlessly in a single audience platform, which helps them to place their ads to maximise results. Through Quantcast Measure Solutions, digital publisher Clients leverage insights to better understand the makeup of their audiences, how audiences spend their time across their digital properties, and what audiences care about, all of which help these  digital businesses better connect their content and
Audiences
with the right advertising.
To provide the Solutions, Quantcast collects and uses
Personal Information
for various purposes, such as measuring and understanding audiences, targeting and delivering ads, measuring ad performance, and similar related purposes.  As described in the “
Information Collection
” section below, we may join or match
Personal Information
about you, which may include your
Online Data
from your visits across different digital properties, like websites,mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”)), that have implemented Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
(which is sometimes called “tracking” in the industry) or
Offline Data
. This allows us, for example, to enrich our existing data sets and provide meaningful reports for our Clients regarding the effectiveness of their ads or content. We may also combine
Personal Information
that we collect in order to probabilistically link media consumption to a single user, which is sometimes called
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
. To the extent that we combine
Personal Information
that we collect from and about you in connection with our performance of the Solutions, we will use such combined information only as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy describes in more detail how we collect, use, disclose, and protect
Personal Information
, otherwise obtain and
Process
it in connection with the delivery of the Solutions, and the controls we provide you to manage such information and exercise your choices and legal rights.  As noted in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section below, we use the
Transparency and Consent Framework
(“
TCF
”) standard to facilitate compliance with applicable laws in Europe, primarily in accordance with the EU General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”). Because the
TCF
is one means of explaining
Processing
activities, and because our
Processing
activities are consistent globally, the
TCF Purposes
are applicable to all
Personal Information
that we
Process
(regardless of the information’s country of origin).
In the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast Corporation, located at 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107.
Personal Information
relating to individuals located within the United States provided to or gathered by us in connection with the delivery of the Solutions is controlled by Quantcast Corporation.
Outside of the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast International Limited, located at Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland.  In so far as Quantcast acts as a “controller” (as defined under applicable law), Quantcast International  Limited is the controller of your
Personal Information
if you reside in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), Switzerland, or any other jurisdiction outside of the United States.
Scope of this Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy covers Quantcast’s use of
Personal Information
for the Solutions only.  This Privacy Policy does not cover:
Personal Information
collected from our website, www.quantcast.com, except to the extent that we use our own Solutions on our website. It also does not pertain to the collection and use of
Personal Information
in connection with our corporate functions, such as marketing, recruiting, people management, business-to-business communications, and so forth. For our privacy policy relating to our website and our corporate functions, please click
here
.
Any third parties’ handling of
Personal Information,
unless explicitly stated otherwise. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any other companies that you engage or interact with to understand their information handling and privacy practices.
We use some phrases in this Privacy Policy that are unique to our business and/or the digital advertising industry. For a list of defined terms that you should familiarise yourself with to make it easier to review this Privacy Policy, please review the
Key Terms
.
California Notice at Collection: We collect the categories of
Personal Information
listed in the “
Categories of personal information collected
” subsection of the “
California privacy rights
” section below. As further described in the
“Information use and legal basis”
section below, we collect this information in order to deliver the Solutions and conduct our business. To learn more, please see the “
California privacy rights
” section.
Self-regulatory standards
Quantcast supports and participates in several digital advertising self-regulatory organisations, as further described below.
We are members in good standing of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and adhere to the
NAI 2020 Code of Conduct
.
We participate in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and adhere to the
DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
.
We participate in the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) and are certified under the
EDAA Principles
.
We participate in, and comply with, the policies and technical specifications of the
TCF
, as a vendor. Quantcast’s IAB Europe-assigned identification number ia Vendor ID #11.
Please see the “
Your choices and legal rights
” section of this Privacy Policy for more information about the opt-out tools offered by the NAI, DAA, and EDAA.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We do not honor DNT or other similar signals at this time, due to the lack of a clear industry standard. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for your opt-out options.
Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We honor GPC for all data subjects in the United States. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for more information about GPC.
Information collection
We collect or receive
Personal Information
about or relating to you in various ways, including from digital properties, like websites, mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”), and other sources of digital content. Details about the categories of
Personal Information
we collect and receive, the source or manner in which we obtain each category of
Personal Information,
the purpose(s) for which we
Process
each category of
Personal Information
, and the retention period for each category of
Personal Information
we
Process
can be found in the table below. As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, where applicable the
Processing
purposes identified in the table below are tied to the
TCF Purposes
outlined in the “
Information use and legal bases
” section.
Category and Description of
Personal Information
Source of
Personal Information
Purpose for
Processing
(including where relevant the
TCF Purpose
) and Retention Period
Pseudonymous Identifiers:
unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s).
Examples include a
Cookie ID
, device
IP Address
, hashed email addresses, 3rd party identifiers, or other
Device Identifiers
or
Device Configuration/ Information.
Usually  generated when
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
are loaded by a Client on its digital property (i.e., website, mobile app, or device) and sends information to us. Different kinds of
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Such information may also be received through a server- to- server connection, such as when receiving a
Bid Request
.
.
Pseudonymous Identifiers will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset):
TCF Purpose 1: Store and/or access information on a device
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve services
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 1: Match and combine data from other data sources
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Recording consent choices made by users
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information:
The time zone and approximate geolocation (e.g., postal code or city) of your device.
Inferred or derived by Quantcast from your device’s
IP Address
or included in
Bid Requests
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF Feature 1: Match and combine data from other data sources
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Event Data
: Information relating to your
Online Data,
which may include
Pseudonymous Identifiers,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
, and
Browsing Data.
Generated when
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
, installed by a Client on its digital property, loads and sends information to us.
Different kinds of
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Event Data  will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Bid Request Data
: A bid request is an offer from a digital publisher, like a website, mobile app, or streaming media owner, to show an ad on their property.
Bid Request Data
includes information about your visit to the publisher’s digital property, which helps us understand where an ad will be displayed,
Device Information
, and who might see it.
Bid Request Data
also commonly includes a
Pseudonymous Identifier
(if available), the content that the ad would serve into, the type of device the ad would be served on, the
Imprecise / Approximate Location Information
of the device, the size of the ad, and consent information. Because
Bid Requests
include information about the content you are visiting, over time, accumulated
Bid Requests
may show your browsing behavior.
Received from a digital publisher.
Bid RequestData  will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Imported Data (Client):
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
, and/or
Offline Data
that may be apportioned by
Browsing Data,
Attributes
,
Segments
,
Label Data
and
Interests
.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”) by a particular Client for use on its behalf.
Imported Data (client) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud,
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment):
Pseudonymised Information,
which may include
Online Data,
and/or
Offline Data
that may be apportioned by
Browsing Data
,
Attributes
,
Segments
,
Label Data
and
Interests
.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by third-party
Data Management Platforms or Data Providers
.
Imported  Data (Third Party/Segment) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Inferences/Inferred Data
: Information drawn from the above-listed categories of information (i.e.,
Event Data,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client),
and
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
).
We may, for example, use information that we have collected to infer your interests, age, gender, marital status, or income range. These
Inferences
may include
Interests
and
Attributes
.
Derived by Quantcast from previously collected
Event Data,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client),
and/or
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment).
Inferences/Inferred Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Training Data:
Pseudonymous Information
used to improve Quantcast’s algorithms and measure how well they are working.
Received from third-party data providers and matched to
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Training Data  will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Information you provide: This may include your contact details, (e.g., name, email address, or phone number) and any commentary or other information you provide when you contact Quantcast.
Provided by you when you contact Quantcast.
Carrying out our legitimate business purposes.
Retention Period: up to 18 months
Additionally, any of the categories of
Personal Information
described above may be
Processed
for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of
Personal Information
and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the
Personal Information
is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting of
Personal Information
for above-listed purposes
Technically, all
Personal Information
is
Processed
in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of
Personal Information
Processed
are disclosed above.
Sensitive information: We generally do not seek or permit sensitive
Personal Information
(e.g., information revealing an individual’s racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership; genetic or biometric data that is
Processed
for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual; information concerning an individual’s health, sex life, or sexual orientation; and information relating to criminal convictions and offenses) to be used in the Solutions. However, as allowed by applicable laws and rules, we may collect and
Process
non-sensitive health-related information (outside of the EEA, UK, and Switzerland) in connection with the delivery of the Solutions. We provide a list of standard health segments and a representative sample of custom health segments that we use for targeted advertising
here
. Please note that where we
Process
any of your sensitive
Personal Information
, we seek and obtain your consent and/or otherwise
Process
such information in accordance with applicable laws and rules.
Children’s information: We do not seek or permit
Personal Information
from children under the age of 16. If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with
Personal Information
, that parent or guardian should contact us at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. If we become aware that a child has provided us with
Personal Information
, we will take all reasonable steps to delete such information from our files.
Contractual commitments from our Clients and third-party Data Providers: We contractually require other companies that provide or make available to us
Personal Information
to take steps to ensure that we can lawfully
Process
such information, which include: (i) posting complete and accurate privacy policies that comply with applicable laws and rules and describe their
Personal Information
collection, use, and sharing practices; (ii) obtaining all legally-required consents and necessary permissions; and (iii) providing individuals with appropriate choices and the ability to opt out of the
Processing
of their
Personal Information
, where necessary or appropriate.
Information use and legal basis
As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, we generally use the
TCF
as the mechanism for describing our
Processing
activities, and in Europe specifically for establishing our legal basis for
Processing
and managing users’ preferences for online personalised advertising and related activities. The
TCF
is designed to allow a digital business to present information and choices to users on its website relating to the
Processing
of their
Personal Information
.
We
Process
Personal Information
for the purposes for which it was collected or provided to us. The table below describes the specific purposes for which we
Process
the
Personal Information
we collect or otherwise obtain about you. This table includes:
the purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
,which are tied to the defined purposes for
Processing
, special purposes, and features set forth in the
TCF Policies
and official technical documentation disseminated by IAB Europe where applicable(see Appendix A of the
TCF Policies
for examples and illustrations of the purposes, special purposes and features,
a description of each
Processing
activity using
TCF
-specific terminology (to the extent applicable), and
the legal basis that we rely on to perform each of our
Processing
activities.
Please note that in Europe, where we indicate that “Legitimate Interests” in accordance with the GDPR is the legal basis for
Processing
, we carry out the
Processing
in reliance on our legitimate interests or those of a third party (e.g., our Clients), provided that such interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Processing Purpose /  TCF Purpose
(where
TCF
is applicable)
Description of
Processing
Activity (using
TCF Purpose
terms)
Legal Basis
for
Processing
Storing and/or accessing information on a device (
TCF Purpose
1)
Cookies
,
Device Identifiers
, or other information more fully described in association with the purposes below can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes presented to you.
Consent
Use limited data to select advertising (
TCF Purpose
2)
Ads can be shown to you based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information,
or your device type.
When selecting “Use limited data to select advertising”, Quantcast will:
Use real-time information about the context in which the ad will be shown, including information about the content and your device, such as: device type and capabilities,
User Agent
,
URL
, and
IP Address
Use your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Control the frequency of ads shown to you
Sequence the order in which ads are shown to you
Prevent an ad from serving in an unsuitable editorial (brand-unsafe) context
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads.
Creating profiles for personalised ads (
TCF Purpose
3)
A profile can be built about you and your
Interests
to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you.
To create or edit a profile for use in personalised advertising, Quantcast will:
Collect information about you, including your activity, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, or
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Aggregate
Attributes
and
Interests
and
Panel
-based demographic information,
Combine information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent
Using profiles to select  personalised ads (
TCF Purpose
4)
When serving personalised ads, Quantcast will select personalised ads based on
Personal Information
collected from or about you, such as your prior activity,
Interests
, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information,
demographic information or
Inferences
.
Consent
Measuring advertising performance (
TCF Purpose
7)
Quantcast will measure the performance and effectiveness of ads that you see or interact with.
In particular, to measure whether and how ads were delivered to you and how you interacted with them, Quantcast will:
Provide reporting to Clients about ads, including their effectiveness and performance
Provide reporting to Clients about your interactions with ads using data observed during your interaction with the ad
Provide reporting to Clients about the ads displayed on their properties
Measure whether an ad is serving in a suitable editorial environment (brand-safe) context
Determine the percentage of the ad that had the opportunity to be seen and the duration of that opportunity
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
In the provision of the Solutions to some Clients, Quantcast may correlate information between entries within its own datasets that have the same
Pseudonymous Identifier
or with information obtained from Ad Serving, Ad Verification, or
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers.
We do this to provide aggregated reporting to Clients about the number of visitors to their digital properties.
Quantcast does not apply
Panel
or similarly derived
Audience Insights
data to ad measurement data without a separate legal basis to apply market research to generate
Audience Insights.
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective of ascertaining, measuring, and improving the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Measuring content performance (
TCF Purpose
8)
The performance and effectiveness of content that you see or interact with can be measured.
To measure content performance, Quantcast will:
Measure and report to Clients on how content was delivered to and interacted with by you
Provide reporting to Clients, using directly measurable or known information about your interactions with the content
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our Clients meet their objective of executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Understanding audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources i.e.  applying market research to generate
Audience Insights
(
TCF Purpose
9)
Market research can be used to learn more about the
Audiences
who visit websites, mobile apps, or streaming media, and view ads.
To generate
Audience Insights
, Quantcast will:
Provide aggregate reporting to advertisers or their representatives (such as advertising agencies) about the
Audiences
reached by their ads, through
Panel
-based and similarly derived insights
Provide aggregate reporting to Clients about the
Audiences
that were served or interacted with content and/or ads on their properties by applying
Panel
-based and similarly derived insights
Associate
Offline Data
with you for the purposes of market research to generate
Audience Insights
(if we have declared that we will match and combine
Offline Data
sources)
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Developing and improving services (
TCF Purpose
10 )
Your information can be used to improve Quantcast’s existing systems and software and to develop new products.
To develop and improve its products, Quantcast will:
Use information to improve its existing products with new features and to develop new products
Create new models and algorithms through machine learning
For example, Quantcast matches its datasets with
Training Data
, which usually includes
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client)
, and/or
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
. Quantcast primarily uses
Training Data
to train its algorithms how to infer individuals’
Attributes
and
Interests
in the context of the Solutions.
Consent or Legitimate Interest, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors  (
TCF Special Purpose
1)
Your information can be used to monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity and ensure our systems and processes work properly and securely.
To ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug, Quantcast will:
Ensure information is securely transmitted
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, invalid, or illegal activity
Ensure correct and efficient operation of systems and processes, including monitoring and enhancing the performance of systems and processes engaged in permitted purposes
Legitimate Interests
We conduct the
Processing
to meet organisational objectives such as to maintain our IT systems; to ensure the electronic security of our business; and to detect and prevent against malicious, fraudulent, invalid, and illegal activity.
Technically deliver ads or content (
TCF Special Purpose
2)
Your device can receive and send information that allows you to see and interact with ads and content.
To deliver information and respond to technical requests, Quantcast will:
Use your device’s
IP Address
to deliver an ad or content over the internet
Respond to your interactions with an ad or content by sending you to a landing page
Use information about your device type and capabilities for delivering ads or content (e.g., to deliver the right size ad creative or video file in a format supported by your device)
Quantcast may also match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with third parties in order to deliver ads to
Audiences
.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective to ascertain, measure, and improve the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Matching and combining data from other  sources i.e.  offline data (TCF Feature 1)
Offline Data
can be combined with your online activity in support of one or more purposes or special purposes outlined in this table.
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Different devices can be determined as belonging to you or your household in support of one or more purposes.
Through
Cross-Media Matching/Linking,
Quantcast will:
Deterministically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
Probabilistically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
Your device will be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as
IP Address
or browser type.
In particular, Quantcast will:
Create an identifier using information collected automatically from your device for specific characteristics (e.g.,
IP Address
or User Agent information)
Use such an identifier to attempt to re-identify your device
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
We
Process
, preserve, and share
Personal Information
when we seek legal advice or seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation and other disputes.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations, litigation, and regulatory inquiries.
Responding to legal requests
We preserve and share
Personal Information
in response to legal requests from law enforcement and other government officials, to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process, and when we believe in good faith that disclosure of such information is necessary to comply with a judicial proceeding or court order.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations and regulatory inquiries.
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
We
Process
Personal Information
to comply with our legal obligations under applicable law.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to
Process
Personal Information
we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006 or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law, such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014 (e.g., where the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Commission requests information)
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations under company legislation and tax law, such as the Companies Act 2014 or where the Irish Revenue requests information
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations under data protection laws, including to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018
See
quantcast.com/privacy/laws
for the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Quantcast which results in the
Processing
of
Personal Information
. As new laws may be enacted or other obligations may require us to
Process
your
Personal Information
, we will update this list from time to time.
Compliance with a legal obligation.
Conducting research
We use
Personal Information
to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of delivering and continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Hosting information
We
Process
Personal Information
to manage our business, which includes hosting
Personal Information
in our on-premise data centers and/or cloud computing services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of delivering the Solutions to our Clients.
Information sharing
In connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section above, we may share your
Personal Information
with the categories of third parties described below.
Category of Recipient
Description and Purpose of Sharing
Categories of
Personal Information
Shared
Quantcast-affiliated companies
We share your
Personal Information
with Quantcast-affiliated companies in order to provide the Solutions.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our vendors (including service providers/data processors)
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our vendors.
We share your
Personal Information
with vendors who act on our behalf and are subject to binding contractual obligations and restrictions on the
Processing
of
Personal Information
we share with them. For example, these companies assist with information hosting, information
Processing
, database management, and administrative tasks.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our partners, such as
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
and
Advertising Exchanges
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our Partners
We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with companies that we partner with to support the operation of the Solutions. Specifically, Quantcast shares
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with 1) data providers via
Data Management Platforms
for the purpose of performing
Cookie Syncing/Matches
with
Imported Data (Client)
and Third Party/Segment Data, and 2) and
Advertising Exchanges
for the purpose of serving ads.
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction
In the event of a reorganisation, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may share your
Personal Information
with (or transfer your
Personal Information
to) certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisors. We may also make certain information available to a potential investor or purchaser (and their advisers) in advance of any such transaction’s completion.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Competent governmental and public authorities
We may share your
Personal Information
with governmental and law enforcement authorities, in each case to comply with legal or regulatory obligations or requests.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Other third parties
We will share your
Personal Information
with other third parties at your direction or with your consent.
Additionally, we may share your
Personal Information
as necessary or appropriate or where otherwise permitted by law to:
Enforce our agreements
Protect our operations
Protect our rights, privacy, safety, property, and/or those of other persons
Allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
We also create and share with our Clients insights or reports regarding the makeup of the
Audiences
that visit their digital properties or the performance of their advertising campaigns. These insights and reports may contain aggregated data from which individual users cannot be uniquely identified or data from which Quantcast has removed
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Information security
We employ appropriate organisational and technical security safeguards designed to keep
Personal Information
secure when it is transmitted to us and once we receive it. These measures may include encryption and  employment of information storage security technologies to restrict access to our network.  However, please be aware that no method of transmitting information over the internet or storing information is completely secure.
Information retention
We retain your
Personal Information
for as long as necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, as described in the “
Information Collection
” section above and in the tables below, except where we are required to retain the information for a longer period of time. Once
Personal Information
has reached its retention period, as applicable, we may either de-identify it (for CCPA purposes), anonymise it (for GDPR purposes), or permanently delete it.
Category of Personal Information
Maximum retention period for all purposes
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Up to 13 months (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset)
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Up to 30 days
Event Data
Up to 13 months
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Imported Data (Client)
Up to 30 days
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Up to 30 days
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Information you provide
Up to 18 months
Processing Purpose /  TCF Purpose
Categories of
Personal Information
used for this purpose
Maximum retention period
Store and/or access information on a device (
TCF Purpose
1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Cookie life span is up to 13 months each time it’s reset
Use limited data to select advertising (
TCF Purpose
2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Create profiles for personalised advertising (
TCF Purpose
3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (
TCF Purpose
4)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure advertising performance (
TCF Purpose
7)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (
TCF Purpose
8)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (
TCF Purpose
9)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve services  (
TCF Purpose
10 )
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (
TCF Special Purpose
1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Deliver and present advertising and content (
TCF Special Purpose
2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Match and combine data from other data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of
Personal Information
and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the
Personal Information
is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting information
Technically, all
Personal Information
is
Processed
in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of
Personal Information
Processed
are disclosed above.
International transfers
Quantcast operates a global service, and we engage vendors located around the world to help us deliver the Solutions. Accordingly, your
Personal Information
may be transferred outside of the country or region in which you reside, including to the United States and other countries where either our data centers, vendors, affiliates, or Partners are located. Where we transfer your
Personal Information
internationally, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that we may need to transfer your
Personal Information
to countries that have not been recognised by the
European Commision
and/or the
UK government
as providing an adequate level of protection for
Personal Information
. We generally use EU Standard Contractual Clauses (to facilitate both controller-to-controller and controller-to-processor transfers) or other government-approved contracts that provide appropriate safeguards for
Personal Information
that is transferred to countries that have not been recognised as providing an adequate level of protection.  You can contact us at privacy@quantcast.com to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
In certain limited circumstances, we rely on other lawful mechanisms for international transfers of
Personal Information
or rely on derogations, such as the contractual necessity derogation.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your
Personal Information
. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found below.
Right of access: The right to request access to your
Personal Information
and receive certain information, including the categories of your
Personal Information
we collect and disclose.  To exercise this right, see our
Data Subjcet Request Form
request form
here
.
Right of rectification/correction: The right to request that we rectify (or correct) inaccurate
Personal Information
about you. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right of rectification/correction, due to the limited
Personal Information
we
Process
, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to request deletion of your
Personal Information
. To request the deletion of your
Personal Information
, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right of erasure/deletion: The right, in certain cases, to request that we delete your
Personal Information
, provided there are valid grounds for doing so and subject to applicable law and exceptions. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right to data portability: The right, in certain cases, to receive a copy of your
Personal Information
in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and transmit such information to another controller. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right to object (marketing): The right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
for direct marketing purposes. In practice, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to opt out of our
Processing
of your
Personal Information
for advertising purposes. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.  Additionally, as noted in the “
Self Regulatory Standards
” section above, we are a member of the NAI and a DAA and EDAA participating company. Each of these self-regulatory bodies offers a tool that allows individuals to opt out of receiving targeted advertising from Quantcast and other participating companies. These links will take you to the
NAI opt-out
page and the
DAA opt-out
page. If you are located in Europe, you may prefer to visit the
EDAA opt-out
page.
Right to object (legitimate interests): The right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
where we
Process
it on the basis of our legitimate interests, as described in the “
Information Use and Legal Bases
” section above.  Unless we have compelling legitimate grounds or the information is needed for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, we will cease
Processing
your
Personal Information
when you object.  To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to restrict
Processing
: The right, in certain cases, to temporarily restrict our
Processing
of your
Personal Information
, provided there are valid grounds for doing so. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right to restrict the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
, we will treat it as an exercise of the right on an ongoing, rather than temporary, basis (i.e., the request will be treated as you exercising the right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
). To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to withdraw your consent: The right to withdraw the consent you have provided at any time, where we
Process
your
Personal Information
on the basis of your consent. Please note that the lawfulness of any
Processing
undertaken prior to your withdrawal of consent shall not be affected by the withdrawal. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to lodge a complaint: The right to complain to the relevant authority regarding the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
by us or on our behalf.  In the EU, the lead supervisory authority is the
Irish Data Protection Commissioner.
See the section “
Contact Us
” below.
Please note that the rights listed above may not be exercised in certain circumstances, such as when the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
is necessary to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject or for the exercise or defense of legal claims. Additionally, in order to protect your privacy, we may require proof of your identity before we can act on your request but only where it is necessary and proportionate to request this information.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated
Processing
(i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated
Processing
that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that the Solutions are provided by our European entity, Quantcast International Limited. In
Processing
Personal Information
in the context of providing the Solutions to our Clients, Quantcast Internal Limited generally acts as a data controller. More specifically, Quantcast International Limited is a joint controller along with its Client when we jointly determine the purposes for which your
Personal Information
will be
Processed
. For example, we are joint controllers with Advertisers and Publishers for
Personal Information
that is collected as Quantcast
Cookies
, or using
Pixels, Tags and SDKs
deployed by our Clients on their digital properties, and for the
Processing
of other
Personal Information
introduced into the Solutions directly by the Client. This is because both Quantcast and the Client have influence over whether and how we collect and
Process
the
Personal Information
.  In limited situations, Quantcast is the sole data controller of
Personal Information
when we are
Processing
it for our own independent purposes, for instance when we use a Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifier
or we derive aggregated analytics for modeling, developing our algorithms, or improving the Solutions.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your
Personal Information
. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found in the
Your choices and legal rights
section above.  .
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated
Processing
(i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated
Processing
that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for California residents
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) provides California residents with certain rights. Pursuant to the CCPA, we are providing the following additional details regarding the categories of
Personal Information
about California residents that we collect, use, and disclose.
Categories of personal information collected: We have collected the following categories of
Personal Information
from California residents within the last twelve (12) months:
Identifiers, such as
IP Address
and other similar
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including browsing history and information regarding individuals’ interactions with websites or mobile apps or streaming media.
Geolocation data, such as
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
derived from device
IP Addresses.
Inferences
, which refers to inferences drawn from any of the information in these categories of
Personal Information
to predict the individual’s characteristics.
Categories of sources of personal information: As described in the “
Information collection
” section above, we collect the above-listed categories of
Personal Information
directly from individuals; through automated means (e.g.
Pixels, Tags and SDKs
,
Cookies
or
Bid Requests
); and from third parties (e.g., our Clients).
Disclosures of personal information: As described in the “
Information sharing
” section above, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed
Personal Information
about California residents in all of the above-listed categories of
Personal Information
to our affiliates and vendors. Additionally, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed
Identifiers
to our partners.
Sale of personal information: Quantcast does not “sell” (as defined in the CCPA)
Personal Information
and has not “sold”
Personal Information
in the preceding twelve (12) months in relation to operating the Solutions.
Individual rights and requests: If you are a California resident, you have the right to request that we:
Disclose to you the following information covering the 12 months preceding your request:
the categories of
Personal Information
we have collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such information;
the specific pieces of
Personal Information
we have collected about you;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting
Personal Information
about you;
the categories of third parties with whom we shared or to whom we disclosed such
Personal Information
; and
if we sold or disclosed your
Personal Information
for a business purpose, two separate lists disclosing:
sales, identifying the
Personal Information
categories that each category of recipient received; and
disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the
Personal Information
categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Delete the
Personal Information
we have collected from you.
If you are interested in exercising one or more of the rights outlined above, please click the relevant link in the
“Your choices and legal rights”
section above. You may also submit requests by contacting us via email at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. We will attempt to verify your identity and respond to your request consistent with the CCPA.
If you authorise a natural person or business entity to submit a request on your behalf (an “Authorised Agent”), the Authorised Agent may use the submission methods noted above. As part of our verification process, we will require proof concerning their status as an Authorised Agent, which may include proof of their registration with the California Secretary of State to conduct business in California and/or proof that they have power of attorney in accordance with California probate law. We may also require you to verify your identity directly with us or directly confirm with us that you provided the agent with permission to submit the request.
Information about annual data requests is available in the
CCPA Annual Report
..
We will not discriminate against you if you decide to exercise your rights under the CCPA.
Global Privacy Control (“ GPC ”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We honor GPC for all data subjects in the United States. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for more information about GPC.
Contact us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or our information handling practices, please feel free to contact us.
Individuals located in the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Email: privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
Individuals located outside of the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street
Dublin 2, Ireland
Email: privacy.qil [at] quantcast [dot] com
The Data Protection Officer (DPO) for Quantcast International Limited can be contacted at
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you have contacted us or our DPO about a privacy or information use concern and feel that we have not addressed it satisfactorily, you may contact our US-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you are a resident of the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint against us with our lead supervisory authority, the
Irish Data Protection Commission
, or the
supervisory authority
in your country of residence.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes in our practices with respect to the collection, use, and/or disclosure of
Personal Information
or changes in applicable law. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this page indicates when this Privacy Policy was last updated.  Any changes will become effective when we post a revised version of this Privacy Policy unless otherwise specified.
Some of our changes will be minor, but if we make significant changes to how we use or share your
Personal Information
, we will:
inform you in advance by posting a notice on our website
wait for a period of time before implementing the changes
We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed about our information handling and privacy practices.
Effective February 13th 2024
to
February 14th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Products and Services Privacy Policy
This Policy takes effect on March 1 2024. See Policy effective September 11 2023 until that date.
Products and Services Privacy Policy
Who we are and what we do
Scope of this Privacy Policy
Self-regulatory standards
Information collection
Information use and legal basis
Information sharing
Information security
Information retention
International transfers
Your choices and legal rights
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
Additional information for California residents
Contact us
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Capitalised terms used in this Products and Services Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) are defined in
Key Terms
unless otherwise defined herein.
To exercise your Data Subject Rights (described in the
Your choices and legal rights
below), please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page.
Who we are and what we do
Quantcast (“we”, “our”, or “us”) is a global digital advertising technology group of companies. Quantcast offers products and services that help digital advertisers and publishers (collectively, “Clients”) understand and grow their audiences (the “Solutions”). Through Quantcast Advertise Solutions, advertiser Clients can plan, activate, and measure the performance of their advertising campaigns seamlessly in a single audience platform, which helps them to place their ads to maximise results. Through Quantcast Measure Solutions, digital publisher Clients leverage insights to better understand the makeup of their audiences, how audiences spend their time across their digital properties, and what audiences care about, all of which help these  digital businesses better connect their content and
Audiences
with the right advertising.
To provide the Solutions, Quantcast collects and uses
Personal Information
for various purposes, such as measuring and understanding audiences, targeting and delivering ads, measuring ad performance, and similar related purposes.  As described in the “
Information Collection
” section below, we may join or match
Personal Information
about you, which may include your
Online Data
from your visits across different digital properties, like websites,mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”)), that have implemented Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
(which is sometimes called “tracking” in the industry) or
Offline Data
. This allows us, for example, to enrich our existing data sets and provide meaningful reports for our Clients regarding the effectiveness of their ads or content. We may also combine
Personal Information
that we collect in order to probabilistically link media consumption to a single user, which is sometimes called
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
. To the extent that we combine
Personal Information
that we collect from and about you in connection with our performance of the Solutions, we will use such combined information only as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy describes in more detail how we collect, use, disclose, and protect
Personal Information
, otherwise obtain and
Process
it in connection with the delivery of the Solutions, and the controls we provide you to manage such information and exercise your choices and legal rights.  As noted in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section below, we use the
Transparency and Consent Framework
(“
TCF
”) standard to facilitate compliance with applicable laws in Europe, primarily in accordance with the EU General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”). Because the
TCF
is one means of explaining
Processing
activities, and because our
Processing
activities are consistent globally, the
TCF Purposes
are applicable to all
Personal Information
that we
Process
(regardless of the information’s country of origin).
In the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast Corporation, located at 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107.
Personal Information
relating to individuals located within the United States provided to or gathered by us in connection with the delivery of the Solutions is controlled by Quantcast Corporation.
Outside of the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast International Limited, located at Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland.  In so far as Quantcast acts as a “controller” (as defined under applicable law), Quantcast International  Limited is the controller of your
Personal Information
if you reside in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), Switzerland, or any other jurisdiction outside of the United States.
Scope of this Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy covers Quantcast’s use of
Personal Information
for the Solutions only.  This Privacy Policy does not cover:
Personal Information
collected from our website, www.quantcast.com, except to the extent that we use our own Solutions on our website. It also does not pertain to the collection and use of
Personal Information
in connection with our corporate functions, such as marketing, recruiting, people management, business-to-business communications, and so forth. For our privacy policy relating to our website and our corporate functions, please click
here
.
Any third parties’ handling of
Personal Information,
unless explicitly stated otherwise. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any other companies that you engage or interact with to understand their information handling and privacy practices.
We use some phrases in this Privacy Policy that are unique to our business and/or the digital advertising industry. For a list of defined terms that you should familiarise yourself with to make it easier to review this Privacy Policy, please review the
Key Terms
.
California Notice at Collection: We collect the categories of
Personal Information
listed in the “
Categories of personal information collected
” subsection of the “
California privacy rights
” section below. As further described in the
“Information use and legal basis”
section below, we collect this information in order to deliver the Solutions and conduct our business. To learn more, please see the “
California privacy rights
” section.
Self-regulatory standards
Quantcast supports and participates in several digital advertising self-regulatory organisations, as further described below.
We are members in good standing of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and adhere to the
NAI 2020 Code of Conduct
.
We participate in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and adhere to the
DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
.
We participate in the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) and are certified under the
EDAA Principles
.
We participate in, and comply with, the policies and technical specifications of the
TCF
, as a vendor. Quantcast’s IAB Europe-assigned identification number ia Vendor ID #11.
Please see the “
Your choices and legal rights
” section of this Privacy Policy for more information about the opt-out tools offered by the NAI, DAA, and EDAA.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We do not honor DNT or other similar signals at this time, due to the lack of a clear industry standard. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for your opt-out options.
Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We honor GPC for all data subjects in the United States. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for more information about GPC.
Information collection
We collect or receive
Personal Information
about or relating to you in various ways, including from digital properties, like websites, mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”), and other sources of digital content. Details about the categories of
Personal Information
we collect and receive, the source or manner in which we obtain each category of
Personal Information,
the purpose(s) for which we
Process
each category of
Personal Information
, and the retention period for each category of
Personal Information
we
Process
can be found in the table below. As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, where applicable the
Processing
purposes identified in the table below are tied to the
TCF Purposes
outlined in the “
Information use and legal bases
” section.
Category and Description of
Personal Information
Source of
Personal Information
Purpose for
Processing
(including where relevant the
TCF Purpose
) and Retention Period
Pseudonymous Identifiers:
unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s).
Examples include a
Cookie ID
, device
IP Address
, hashed email addresses, 3rd party identifiers, or other
Device Identifiers
or
Device Configuration/ Information.
Usually  generated when
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
are loaded by a Client on its digital property (i.e., website, mobile app, or device) and sends information to us. Different kinds of
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Such information may also be received through a server- to- server connection, such as when receiving a
Bid Request
.
.
Pseudonymous Identifiers will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset):
TCF Purpose 1: Store and/or access information on a device
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve services
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 1: Match and combine data from other data sources
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Recording consent choices made by users
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information:
The time zone and approximate geolocation (e.g., postal code or city) of your device.
Inferred or derived by Quantcast from your device’s
IP Address
or included in
Bid Requests
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF Feature 1: Match and combine data from other data sources
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Event Data
: Information relating to your
Online Data,
which may include
Pseudonymous Identifiers,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
, and
Browsing Data.
Generated when
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
, installed by a Client on its digital property, loads and sends information to us.
Different kinds of
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Event Data  will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Bid Request Data
: A bid request is an offer from a digital publisher, like a website, mobile app, or streaming media owner, to show an ad on their property.
Bid Request Data
includes information about your visit to the publisher’s digital property, which helps us understand where an ad will be displayed,
Device Information
, and who might see it.
Bid Request Data
also commonly includes a
Pseudonymous Identifier
(if available), the content that the ad would serve into, the type of device the ad would be served on, the
Imprecise / Approximate Location Information
of the device, the size of the ad, and consent information. Because
Bid Requests
include information about the content you are visiting, over time, accumulated
Bid Requests
may show your browsing behavior.
Received from a digital publisher.
Bid RequestData  will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Imported Data (Client):
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
, and/or
Offline Data
that may be apportioned by
Browsing Data,
Attributes
,
Segments
,
Label Data
and
Interests
.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”) by a particular Client for use on its behalf.
Imported Data (client) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud,
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment):
Pseudonymised Information,
which may include
Online Data,
and/or
Offline Data
that may be apportioned by
Browsing Data
,
Attributes
,
Segments
,
Label Data
and
Interests
.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by third-party
Data Management Platforms or Data Providers
.
Imported  Data (Third Party/Segment) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Inferences/Inferred Data
: Information drawn from the above-listed categories of information (i.e.,
Event Data,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client),
and
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
).
We may, for example, use information that we have collected to infer your interests, age, gender, marital status, or income range. These
Inferences
may include
Interests
and
Attributes
.
Derived by Quantcast from previously collected
Event Data,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client),
and/or
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment).
Inferences/Inferred Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Training Data:
Pseudonymous Information
used to improve Quantcast’s algorithms and measure how well they are working.
Received from third-party data providers and matched to
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Training Data  will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Information you provide: This may include your contact details, (e.g., name, email address, or phone number) and any commentary or other information you provide when you contact Quantcast.
Provided by you when you contact Quantcast.
Carrying out our legitimate business purposes.
Retention Period: up to 18 months
Additionally, any of the categories of
Personal Information
described above may be
Processed
for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of
Personal Information
and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the
Personal Information
is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting of
Personal Information
for above-listed purposes
Technically, all
Personal Information
is
Processed
in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of
Personal Information
Processed
are disclosed above.
Sensitive information: We generally do not seek or permit sensitive
Personal Information
(e.g., information revealing an individual’s racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership; genetic or biometric data that is
Processed
for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual; information concerning an individual’s health, sex life, or sexual orientation; and information relating to criminal convictions and offenses) to be used in the Solutions. However, as allowed by applicable laws and rules, we may collect and
Process
non-sensitive health-related information (outside of the EEA, UK, and Switzerland) in connection with the delivery of the Solutions. We provide a list of standard health segments and a representative sample of custom health segments that we use for targeted advertising
here
. Please note that where we
Process
any of your sensitive
Personal Information
, we seek and obtain your consent and/or otherwise
Process
such information in accordance with applicable laws and rules.
Children’s information: We do not seek or permit
Personal Information
from children under the age of 16. If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with
Personal Information
, that parent or guardian should contact us at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. If we become aware that a child has provided us with
Personal Information
, we will take all reasonable steps to delete such information from our files.
Contractual commitments from our Clients and third-party Data Providers: We contractually require other companies that provide or make available to us
Personal Information
to take steps to ensure that we can lawfully
Process
such information, which include: (i) posting complete and accurate privacy policies that comply with applicable laws and rules and describe their
Personal Information
collection, use, and sharing practices; (ii) obtaining all legally-required consents and necessary permissions; and (iii) providing individuals with appropriate choices and the ability to opt out of the
Processing
of their
Personal Information
, where necessary or appropriate.
Information use and legal basis
As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, we generally use the
TCF
as the mechanism for describing our
Processing
activities, and in Europe specifically for establishing our legal basis for
Processing
and managing users’ preferences for online personalised advertising and related activities. The
TCF
is designed to allow a digital business to present information and choices to users on its website relating to the
Processing
of their
Personal Information
.
We
Process
Personal Information
for the purposes for which it was collected or provided to us. The table below describes the specific purposes for which we
Process
the
Personal Information
we collect or otherwise obtain about you. This table includes:
the purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
,which are tied to the defined purposes for
Processing
, special purposes, and features set forth in the
TCF Policies
and official technical documentation disseminated by IAB Europe where applicable(see Appendix A of the
TCF Policies
for examples and illustrations of the purposes, special purposes and features,
a description of each
Processing
activity using
TCF
-specific terminology (to the extent applicable), and
the legal basis that we rely on to perform each of our
Processing
activities.
Please note that in Europe, where we indicate that “Legitimate Interests” in accordance with the GDPR is the legal basis for
Processing
, we carry out the
Processing
in reliance on our legitimate interests or those of a third party (e.g., our Clients), provided that such interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Processing Purpose /  TCF Purpose
(where
TCF
is applicable)
Description of
Processing
Activity (using
TCF Purpose
terms)
Legal Basis
for
Processing
Storing and/or accessing information on a device (
TCF Purpose
1)
Cookies
,
Device Identifiers
, or other information more fully described in association with the purposes below can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes presented to you.
Consent
Use limited data to select advertising (
TCF Purpose
2)
Ads can be shown to you based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information,
or your device type.
When selecting “Use limited data to select advertising”, Quantcast will:
Use real-time information about the context in which the ad will be shown, including information about the content and your device, such as: device type and capabilities,
User Agent
,
URL
, and
IP Address
Use your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Control the frequency of ads shown to you
Sequence the order in which ads are shown to you
Prevent an ad from serving in an unsuitable editorial (brand-unsafe) context
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads.
Creating profiles for personalised ads (
TCF Purpose
3)
A profile can be built about you and your
Interests
to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you.
To create or edit a profile for use in personalised advertising, Quantcast will:
Collect information about you, including your activity, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, or
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Aggregate
Attributes
and
Interests
and
Panel
-based demographic information,
Combine information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent
Using profiles to select  personalised ads (
TCF Purpose
4)
When serving personalised ads, Quantcast will select personalised ads based on
Personal Information
collected from or about you, such as your prior activity,
Interests
, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information,
demographic information or
Inferences
.
Consent
Measuring advertising performance (
TCF Purpose
7)
Quantcast will measure the performance and effectiveness of ads that you see or interact with.
In particular, to measure whether and how ads were delivered to you and how you interacted with them, Quantcast will:
Provide reporting to Clients about ads, including their effectiveness and performance
Provide reporting to Clients about your interactions with ads using data observed during your interaction with the ad
Provide reporting to Clients about the ads displayed on their properties
Measure whether an ad is serving in a suitable editorial environment (brand-safe) context
Determine the percentage of the ad that had the opportunity to be seen and the duration of that opportunity
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
In the provision of the Solutions to some Clients, Quantcast may correlate information between entries within its own datasets that have the same
Pseudonymous Identifier
or with information obtained from Ad Serving, Ad Verification, or
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers.
We do this to provide aggregated reporting to Clients about the number of visitors to their digital properties.
Quantcast does not apply
Panel
or similarly derived
Audience Insights
data to ad measurement data without a separate legal basis to apply market research to generate
Audience Insights.
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective of ascertaining, measuring, and improving the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Measuring content performance (
TCF Purpose
8)
The performance and effectiveness of content that you see or interact with can be measured.
To measure content performance, Quantcast will:
Measure and report to Clients on how content was delivered to and interacted with by you
Provide reporting to Clients, using directly measurable or known information about your interactions with the content
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our Clients meet their objective of executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Understanding audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources i.e.  applying market research to generate
Audience Insights
(
TCF Purpose
9)
Market research can be used to learn more about the
Audiences
who visit websites, mobile apps, or streaming media, and view ads.
To generate
Audience Insights
, Quantcast will:
Provide aggregate reporting to advertisers or their representatives (such as advertising agencies) about the
Audiences
reached by their ads, through
Panel
-based and similarly derived insights
Provide aggregate reporting to Clients about the
Audiences
that were served or interacted with content and/or ads on their properties by applying
Panel
-based and similarly derived insights
Associate
Offline Data
with you for the purposes of market research to generate
Audience Insights
(if we have declared that we will match and combine
Offline Data
sources)
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Developing and improving services (
TCF Purpose
10 )
Your information can be used to improve Quantcast’s existing systems and software and to develop new products.
To develop and improve its products, Quantcast will:
Use information to improve its existing products with new features and to develop new products
Create new models and algorithms through machine learning
For example, Quantcast matches its datasets with
Training Data
, which usually includes
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client)
, and/or
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
. Quantcast primarily uses
Training Data
to train its algorithms how to infer individuals’
Attributes
and
Interests
in the context of the Solutions.
Consent or Legitimate Interest, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors  (
TCF Special Purpose
1)
Your information can be used to monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity and ensure our systems and processes work properly and securely.
To ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug, Quantcast will:
Ensure information is securely transmitted
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, invalid, or illegal activity
Ensure correct and efficient operation of systems and processes, including monitoring and enhancing the performance of systems and processes engaged in permitted purposes
Legitimate Interests
We conduct the
Processing
to meet organisational objectives such as to maintain our IT systems; to ensure the electronic security of our business; and to detect and prevent against malicious, fraudulent, invalid, and illegal activity.
Technically deliver ads or content (
TCF Special Purpose
2)
Your device can receive and send information that allows you to see and interact with ads and content.
To deliver information and respond to technical requests, Quantcast will:
Use your device’s
IP Address
to deliver an ad or content over the internet
Respond to your interactions with an ad or content by sending you to a landing page
Use information about your device type and capabilities for delivering ads or content (e.g., to deliver the right size ad creative or video file in a format supported by your device)
Quantcast may also match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with third parties in order to deliver ads to
Audiences
.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective to ascertain, measure, and improve the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Matching and combining data from other  sources i.e.  offline data (TCF Feature 1)
Offline Data
can be combined with your online activity in support of one or more purposes or special purposes outlined in this table.
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Different devices can be determined as belonging to you or your household in support of one or more purposes.
Through
Cross-Media Matching/Linking,
Quantcast will:
Deterministically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
Probabilistically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
Your device will be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as
IP Address
or browser type.
In particular, Quantcast will:
Create an identifier using information collected automatically from your device for specific characteristics (e.g.,
IP Address
or User Agent information)
Use such an identifier to attempt to re-identify your device
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
We
Process
, preserve, and share
Personal Information
when we seek legal advice or seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation and other disputes.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations, litigation, and regulatory inquiries.
Responding to legal requests
We preserve and share
Personal Information
in response to legal requests from law enforcement and other government officials, to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process, and when we believe in good faith that disclosure of such information is necessary to comply with a judicial proceeding or court order.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations and regulatory inquiries.
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
We
Process
Personal Information
to comply with our legal obligations under applicable law.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to
Process
Personal Information
we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006 or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law, such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014 (e.g., where the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Commission requests information)
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations under company legislation and tax law, such as the Companies Act 2014 or where the Irish Revenue requests information
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations under data protection laws, including to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018
See
quantcast.com/privacy/laws
for the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Quantcast which results in the
Processing
of
Personal Information
. As new laws may be enacted or other obligations may require us to
Process
your
Personal Information
, we will update this list from time to time.
Compliance with a legal obligation.
Conducting research
We use
Personal Information
to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of delivering and continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Hosting information
We
Process
Personal Information
to manage our business, which includes hosting
Personal Information
in our on-premise data centers and/or cloud computing services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of delivering the Solutions to our Clients.
Information sharing
In connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section above, we may share your
Personal Information
with the categories of third parties described below.
Category of Recipient
Description and Purpose of Sharing
Categories of
Personal Information
Shared
Quantcast-affiliated companies
We share your
Personal Information
with Quantcast-affiliated companies in order to provide the Solutions.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our vendors (including service providers/data processors)
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our vendors.
We share your
Personal Information
with vendors who act on our behalf and are subject to binding contractual obligations and restrictions on the
Processing
of
Personal Information
we share with them. For example, these companies assist with information hosting, information
Processing
, database management, and administrative tasks.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our partners, such as
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
and
Advertising Exchanges
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our Partners
We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with companies that we partner with to support the operation of the Solutions. Specifically, Quantcast shares
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with 1) data providers via
Data Management Platforms
for the purpose of performing
Cookie Syncing/Matches
with
Imported Data (Client)
and Third Party/Segment Data, and 2) and
Advertising Exchanges
for the purpose of serving ads.
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction
In the event of a reorganisation, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may share your
Personal Information
with (or transfer your
Personal Information
to) certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisors. We may also make certain information available to a potential investor or purchaser (and their advisers) in advance of any such transaction’s completion.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Competent governmental and public authorities
We may share your
Personal Information
with governmental and law enforcement authorities, in each case to comply with legal or regulatory obligations or requests.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Other third parties
We will share your
Personal Information
with other third parties at your direction or with your consent.
Additionally, we may share your
Personal Information
as necessary or appropriate or where otherwise permitted by law to:
Enforce our agreements
Protect our operations
Protect our rights, privacy, safety, property, and/or those of other persons
Allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
We also create and share with our Clients insights or reports regarding the makeup of the
Audiences
that visit their digital properties or the performance of their advertising campaigns. These insights and reports may contain aggregated data from which individual users cannot be uniquely identified or data from which Quantcast has removed
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Information security
We employ appropriate organisational and technical security safeguards designed to keep
Personal Information
secure when it is transmitted to us and once we receive it. These measures may include encryption and  employment of information storage security technologies to restrict access to our network.  However, please be aware that no method of transmitting information over the internet or storing information is completely secure.
Information retention
We retain your
Personal Information
for as long as necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, as described in the “
Information Collection
” section above and in the tables below, except where we are required to retain the information for a longer period of time. Once
Personal Information
has reached its retention period, as applicable, we may either de-identify it (for CCPA purposes), anonymise it (for GDPR purposes), or permanently delete it.
Category of Personal Information
Maximum retention period for all purposes
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Up to 13 months (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset)
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Up to 30 days
Event Data
Up to 13 months
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Imported Data (Client)
Up to 30 days
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Up to 30 days
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Information you provide
Up to 18 months
Processing Purpose /  TCF Purpose
Categories of
Personal Information
used for this purpose
Maximum retention period
Store and/or access information on a device (
TCF Purpose
1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Cookie life span is up to 13 months each time it’s reset
Use limited data to select advertising (
TCF Purpose
2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Create profiles for personalised advertising (
TCF Purpose
3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (
TCF Purpose
4)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure advertising performance (
TCF Purpose
7)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (
TCF Purpose
8)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (
TCF Purpose
9)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve services  (
TCF Purpose
10 )
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (
TCF Special Purpose
1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Deliver and present advertising and content (
TCF Special Purpose
2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Match and combine data from other data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of
Personal Information
and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the
Personal Information
is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting information
Technically, all
Personal Information
is
Processed
in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of
Personal Information
Processed
are disclosed above.
International transfers
Quantcast operates a global service, and we engage vendors located around the world to help us deliver the Solutions. Accordingly, your
Personal Information
may be transferred outside of the country or region in which you reside, including to the United States and other countries where either our data centers, vendors, affiliates, or Partners are located. Where we transfer your
Personal Information
internationally, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that we may need to transfer your
Personal Information
to countries that have not been recognised by the
European Commision
and/or the
UK government
as providing an adequate level of protection for
Personal Information
. We generally use EU Standard Contractual Clauses (to facilitate both controller-to-controller and controller-to-processor transfers) or other government-approved contracts that provide appropriate safeguards for
Personal Information
that is transferred to countries that have not been recognised as providing an adequate level of protection.  You can contact us at privacy@quantcast.com to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
In certain limited circumstances, we rely on other lawful mechanisms for international transfers of
Personal Information
or rely on derogations, such as the contractual necessity derogation.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your
Personal Information
. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found below.
Right of access: The right to request access to your
Personal Information
and receive certain information, including the categories of your
Personal Information
we collect and disclose.  To exercise this right, see our
Data Subjcet Request Form
request form
here
.
Right of rectification/correction: The right to request that we rectify (or correct) inaccurate
Personal Information
about you. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right of rectification/correction, due to the limited
Personal Information
we
Process
, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to request deletion of your
Personal Information
. To request the deletion of your
Personal Information
, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right of erasure/deletion: The right, in certain cases, to request that we delete your
Personal Information
, provided there are valid grounds for doing so and subject to applicable law and exceptions. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right to data portability: The right, in certain cases, to receive a copy of your
Personal Information
in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and transmit such information to another controller. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right to object (marketing): The right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
for direct marketing purposes. In practice, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to opt out of our
Processing
of your
Personal Information
for advertising purposes. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.  Additionally, as noted in the “
Self Regulatory Standards
” section above, we are a member of the NAI and a DAA and EDAA participating company. Each of these self-regulatory bodies offers a tool that allows individuals to opt out of receiving targeted advertising from Quantcast and other participating companies. These links will take you to the
NAI opt-out
page and the
DAA opt-out
page. If you are located in Europe, you may prefer to visit the
EDAA opt-out
page.
Right to object (legitimate interests): The right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
where we
Process
it on the basis of our legitimate interests, as described in the “
Information Use and Legal Bases
” section above.  Unless we have compelling legitimate grounds or the information is needed for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, we will cease
Processing
your
Personal Information
when you object.  To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to restrict
Processing
: The right, in certain cases, to temporarily restrict our
Processing
of your
Personal Information
, provided there are valid grounds for doing so. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right to restrict the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
, we will treat it as an exercise of the right on an ongoing, rather than temporary, basis (i.e., the request will be treated as you exercising the right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
). To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to withdraw your consent: The right to withdraw the consent you have provided at any time, where we
Process
your
Personal Information
on the basis of your consent. Please note that the lawfulness of any
Processing
undertaken prior to your withdrawal of consent shall not be affected by the withdrawal. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to lodge a complaint: The right to complain to the relevant authority regarding the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
by us or on our behalf.  In the EU, the lead supervisory authority is the
Irish Data Protection Commissioner.
See the section “
Contact Us
” below.
Please note that the rights listed above may not be exercised in certain circumstances, such as when the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
is necessary to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject or for the exercise or defense of legal claims. Additionally, in order to protect your privacy, we may require proof of your identity before we can act on your request but only where it is necessary and proportionate to request this information.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated
Processing
(i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated
Processing
that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that the Solutions are provided by our European entity, Quantcast International Limited. In
Processing
Personal Information
in the context of providing the Solutions to our Clients, Quantcast Internal Limited generally acts as a data controller. More specifically, Quantcast International Limited is a joint controller along with its Client when we jointly determine the purposes for which your
Personal Information
will be
Processed
. For example, we are joint controllers with Advertisers and Publishers for
Personal Information
that is collected as Quantcast
Cookies
, or using
Pixels, Tags and SDKs
deployed by our Clients on their digital properties, and for the
Processing
of other
Personal Information
introduced into the Solutions directly by the Client. This is because both Quantcast and the Client have influence over whether and how we collect and
Process
the
Personal Information
.  In limited situations, Quantcast is the sole data controller of
Personal Information
when we are
Processing
it for our own independent purposes, for instance when we use a Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifier
or we derive aggregated analytics for modeling, developing our algorithms, or improving the Solutions.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your
Personal Information
. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found in the
Your choices and legal rights
section above.  .
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated
Processing
(i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated
Processing
that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for California residents
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) provides California residents with certain rights. Pursuant to the CCPA, we are providing the following additional details regarding the categories of
Personal Information
about California residents that we collect, use, and disclose.
Categories of personal information collected: We have collected the following categories of
Personal Information
from California residents within the last twelve (12) months:
Identifiers, such as
IP Address
and other similar
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including browsing history and information regarding individuals’ interactions with websites or mobile apps or streaming media.
Geolocation data, such as
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
derived from device
IP Addresses.
Inferences
, which refers to inferences drawn from any of the information in these categories of
Personal Information
to predict the individual’s characteristics.
Categories of sources of personal information: As described in the “
Information collection
” section above, we collect the above-listed categories of
Personal Information
directly from individuals; through automated means (e.g.
Pixels, Tags and SDKs
,
Cookies
or
Bid Requests
); and from third parties (e.g., our Clients).
Disclosures of personal information: As described in the “
Information sharing
” section above, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed
Personal Information
about California residents in all of the above-listed categories of
Personal Information
to our affiliates and vendors. Additionally, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed
Identifiers
to our partners.
Sale of personal information: Quantcast does not “sell” (as defined in the CCPA)
Personal Information
and has not “sold”
Personal Information
in the preceding twelve (12) months in relation to operating the Solutions.
Individual rights and requests: If you are a California resident, you have the right to request that we:
Disclose to you the following information covering the 12 months preceding your request:
the categories of
Personal Information
we have collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such information;
the specific pieces of
Personal Information
we have collected about you;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting
Personal Information
about you;
the categories of third parties with whom we shared or to whom we disclosed such
Personal Information
; and
if we sold or disclosed your
Personal Information
for a business purpose, two separate lists disclosing:
sales, identifying the
Personal Information
categories that each category of recipient received; and
disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the
Personal Information
categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Delete the
Personal Information
we have collected from you.
If you are interested in exercising one or more of the rights outlined above, please click the relevant link in the
“Your choices and legal rights”
section above. You may also submit requests by contacting us via email at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. We will attempt to verify your identity and respond to your request consistent with the CCPA.
If you authorise a natural person or business entity to submit a request on your behalf (an “Authorised Agent”), the Authorised Agent may use the submission methods noted above. As part of our verification process, we will require proof concerning their status as an Authorised Agent, which may include proof of their registration with the California Secretary of State to conduct business in California and/or proof that they have power of attorney in accordance with California probate law. We may also require you to verify your identity directly with us or directly confirm with us that you provided the agent with permission to submit the request.
Information about annual data requests is available in the
CCPA Annual Report
..
We will not discriminate against you if you decide to exercise your rights under the CCPA.
Global Privacy Control (“ GPC ”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We honor GPC for all data subjects in the United States. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for more information about GPC.
Contact us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or our information handling practices, please feel free to contact us.
Individuals located in the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Email: privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
Individuals located outside of the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street
Dublin 2, Ireland
Email: privacy.qil [at] quantcast [dot] com
The Data Protection Officer (DPO) for Quantcast International Limited can be contacted at
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you have contacted us or our DPO about a privacy or information use concern and feel that we have not addressed it satisfactorily, you may contact our US-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you are a resident of the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint against us with our lead supervisory authority, the
Irish Data Protection Commission
, or the
supervisory authority
in your country of residence.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes in our practices with respect to the collection, use, and/or disclosure of
Personal Information
or changes in applicable law. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this page indicates when this Privacy Policy was last updated.  Any changes will become effective when we post a revised version of this Privacy Policy unless otherwise specified.
Some of our changes will be minor, but if we make significant changes to how we use or share your
Personal Information
, we will:
inform you in advance by posting a notice on our website
wait for a period of time before implementing the changes
We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed about our information handling and privacy practices.
Effective February 13th 2024
to
February 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Products and Services Privacy Policy
This Policy takes effect on March 1 2024. See Policy effective September 11 2023 until that date.
Products and Services Privacy Policy
Who we are and what we do
Scope of this Privacy Policy
Self-regulatory standards
Information collection
Information use and legal basis
Information sharing
Information security
Information retention
International transfers
Your choices and legal rights
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
Additional information for California residents
Contact us
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Capitalised terms used in this Products and Services Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) are defined in
Key Terms
unless otherwise defined herein.
To exercise your Data Subject Rights (described in the
Your choices and legal rights
below), please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page.
Who we are and what we do
Quantcast (“we”, “our”, or “us”) is a global digital advertising technology group of companies. Quantcast offers products and services that help digital advertisers and publishers (collectively, “Clients”) understand and grow their audiences (the “Solutions”). Through Quantcast Advertise Solutions, advertiser Clients can plan, activate, and measure the performance of their advertising campaigns seamlessly in a single audience platform, which helps them to place their ads to maximise results. Through Quantcast Measure Solutions, digital publisher Clients leverage insights to better understand the makeup of their audiences, how audiences spend their time across their digital properties, and what audiences care about, all of which help these  digital businesses better connect their content and
Audiences
with the right advertising.
To provide the Solutions, Quantcast collects and uses
Personal Information
for various purposes, such as measuring and understanding audiences, targeting and delivering ads, measuring ad performance, and similar related purposes.  As described in the “
Information Collection
” section below, we may join or match
Personal Information
about you, which may include your
Online Data
from your visits across different digital properties, like websites,mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”)), that have implemented Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
(which is sometimes called “tracking” in the industry) or
Offline Data
. This allows us, for example, to enrich our existing data sets and provide meaningful reports for our Clients regarding the effectiveness of their ads or content. We may also combine
Personal Information
that we collect in order to probabilistically link media consumption to a single user, which is sometimes called
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
. To the extent that we combine
Personal Information
that we collect from and about you in connection with our performance of the Solutions, we will use such combined information only as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy describes in more detail how we collect, use, disclose, and protect
Personal Information
, otherwise obtain and
Process
it in connection with the delivery of the Solutions, and the controls we provide you to manage such information and exercise your choices and legal rights.  As noted in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section below, we use the
Transparency and Consent Framework
(“
TCF
”) standard to facilitate compliance with applicable laws in Europe, primarily in accordance with the EU General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”). Because the
TCF
is one means of explaining
Processing
activities, and because our
Processing
activities are consistent globally, the
TCF Purposes
are applicable to all
Personal Information
that we
Process
(regardless of the information’s country of origin).
In the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast Corporation, located at 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107.
Personal Information
relating to individuals located within the United States provided to or gathered by us in connection with the delivery of the Solutions is controlled by Quantcast Corporation.
Outside of the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast International Limited, located at Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland.  In so far as Quantcast acts as a “controller” (as defined under applicable law), Quantcast International  Limited is the controller of your
Personal Information
if you reside in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), Switzerland, or any other jurisdiction outside of the United States.
Scope of this Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy covers Quantcast’s use of
Personal Information
for the Solutions only.  This Privacy Policy does not cover:
Personal Information
collected from our website, www.quantcast.com, except to the extent that we use our own Solutions on our website. It also does not pertain to the collection and use of
Personal Information
in connection with our corporate functions, such as marketing, recruiting, people management, business-to-business communications, and so forth. For our privacy policy relating to our website and our corporate functions, please click
here
.
Any third parties’ handling of
Personal Information,
unless explicitly stated otherwise. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any other companies that you engage or interact with to understand their information handling and privacy practices.
We use some phrases in this Privacy Policy that are unique to our business and/or the digital advertising industry. For a list of defined terms that you should familiarise yourself with to make it easier to review this Privacy Policy, please review the
Key Terms
.
California Notice at Collection: We collect the categories of
Personal Information
listed in the “
Categories of personal information collected
” subsection of the “
California privacy rights
” section below. As further described in the
“Information use and legal basis”
section below, we collect this information in order to deliver the Solutions and conduct our business. To learn more, please see the “
California privacy rights
” section.
Self-regulatory standards
Quantcast supports and participates in several digital advertising self-regulatory organisations, as further described below.
We are members in good standing of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and adhere to the
NAI 2020 Code of Conduct
.
We participate in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and adhere to the
DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
.
We participate in the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) and are certified under the
EDAA Principles
.
We participate in, and comply with, the policies and technical specifications of the
TCF
, as a vendor. Quantcast’s IAB Europe-assigned identification number ia Vendor ID #11.
Please see the “
Your choices and legal rights
” section of this Privacy Policy for more information about the opt-out tools offered by the NAI, DAA, and EDAA.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We do not honor DNT or other similar signals at this time, due to the lack of a clear industry standard. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for your opt-out options.
Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We honor GPC for all data subjects in the United States. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for more information about GPC.
Information collection
We collect or receive
Personal Information
about or relating to you in various ways, including from digital properties, like websites, mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”), and other sources of digital content. Details about the categories of
Personal Information
we collect and receive, the source or manner in which we obtain each category of
Personal Information,
the purpose(s) for which we
Process
each category of
Personal Information
, and the retention period for each category of
Personal Information
we
Process
can be found in the table below. As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, where applicable the
Processing
purposes identified in the table below are tied to the
TCF Purposes
outlined in the “
Information use and legal bases
” section.
Category and Description of
Personal Information
Source of
Personal Information
Purpose for
Processing
(including where relevant the
TCF Purpose
) and Retention Period
Pseudonymous Identifiers:
unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s).
Examples include a
Cookie ID
, device
IP Address
, hashed email addresses, 3rd party identifiers, or other
Device Identifiers
or
Device Configuration/ Information.
Usually  generated when
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
are loaded by a Client on its digital property (i.e., website, mobile app, or device) and sends information to us. Different kinds of
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Such information may also be received through a server- to- server connection, such as when receiving a
Bid Request
.
.
Pseudonymous Identifiers will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset):
TCF Purpose 1: Store and/or access information on a device
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve services
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 1: Match and combine data from other data sources
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Recording consent choices made by users
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information:
The time zone and approximate geolocation (e.g., postal code or city) of your device.
Inferred or derived by Quantcast from your device’s
IP Address
or included in
Bid Requests
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF Feature 1: Match and combine data from other data sources
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Event Data
: Information relating to your
Online Data,
which may include
Pseudonymous Identifiers,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
, and
Browsing Data.
Generated when
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
, installed by a Client on its digital property, loads and sends information to us.
Different kinds of
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Event Data  will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Bid Request Data
: A bid request is an offer from a digital publisher, like a website, mobile app, or streaming media owner, to show an ad on their property.
Bid Request Data
includes information about your visit to the publisher’s digital property, which helps us understand where an ad will be displayed,
Device Information
, and who might see it.
Bid Request Data
also commonly includes a
Pseudonymous Identifier
(if available), the content that the ad would serve into, the type of device the ad would be served on, the
Imprecise / Approximate Location Information
of the device, the size of the ad, and consent information. Because
Bid Requests
include information about the content you are visiting, over time, accumulated
Bid Requests
may show your browsing behavior.
Received from a digital publisher.
Bid RequestData  will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Imported Data (Client):
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
, and/or
Offline Data
that may be apportioned by
Browsing Data,
Attributes
,
Segments
,
Label Data
and
Interests
.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”) by a particular Client for use on its behalf.
Imported Data (client) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud,
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment):
Pseudonymised Information,
which may include
Online Data,
and/or
Offline Data
that may be apportioned by
Browsing Data
,
Attributes
,
Segments
,
Label Data
and
Interests
.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by third-party
Data Management Platforms or Data Providers
.
Imported  Data (Third Party/Segment) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Inferences/Inferred Data
: Information drawn from the above-listed categories of information (i.e.,
Event Data,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client),
and
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
).
We may, for example, use information that we have collected to infer your interests, age, gender, marital status, or income range. These
Inferences
may include
Interests
and
Attributes
.
Derived by Quantcast from previously collected
Event Data,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client),
and/or
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment).
Inferences/Inferred Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Training Data:
Pseudonymous Information
used to improve Quantcast’s algorithms and measure how well they are working.
Received from third-party data providers and matched to
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Training Data  will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Information you provide: This may include your contact details, (e.g., name, email address, or phone number) and any commentary or other information you provide when you contact Quantcast.
Provided by you when you contact Quantcast.
Carrying out our legitimate business purposes.
Retention Period: up to 18 months
Additionally, any of the categories of
Personal Information
described above may be
Processed
for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of
Personal Information
and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the
Personal Information
is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting of
Personal Information
for above-listed purposes
Technically, all
Personal Information
is
Processed
in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of
Personal Information
Processed
are disclosed above.
Sensitive information: We generally do not seek or permit sensitive
Personal Information
(e.g., information revealing an individual’s racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership; genetic or biometric data that is
Processed
for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual; information concerning an individual’s health, sex life, or sexual orientation; and information relating to criminal convictions and offenses) to be used in the Solutions. However, as allowed by applicable laws and rules, we may collect and
Process
non-sensitive health-related information (outside of the EEA, UK, and Switzerland) in connection with the delivery of the Solutions. We provide a list of standard health segments and a representative sample of custom health segments that we use for targeted advertising
here
. Please note that where we
Process
any of your sensitive
Personal Information
, we seek and obtain your consent and/or otherwise
Process
such information in accordance with applicable laws and rules.
Children’s information: We do not seek or permit
Personal Information
from children under the age of 16. If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with
Personal Information
, that parent or guardian should contact us at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. If we become aware that a child has provided us with
Personal Information
, we will take all reasonable steps to delete such information from our files.
Contractual commitments from our Clients and third-party Data Providers: We contractually require other companies that provide or make available to us
Personal Information
to take steps to ensure that we can lawfully
Process
such information, which include: (i) posting complete and accurate privacy policies that comply with applicable laws and rules and describe their
Personal Information
collection, use, and sharing practices; (ii) obtaining all legally-required consents and necessary permissions; and (iii) providing individuals with appropriate choices and the ability to opt out of the
Processing
of their
Personal Information
, where necessary or appropriate.
Information use and legal basis
As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, we generally use the
TCF
as the mechanism for describing our
Processing
activities, and in Europe specifically for establishing our legal basis for
Processing
and managing users’ preferences for online personalised advertising and related activities. The
TCF
is designed to allow a digital business to present information and choices to users on its website relating to the
Processing
of their
Personal Information
.
We
Process
Personal Information
for the purposes for which it was collected or provided to us. The table below describes the specific purposes for which we
Process
the
Personal Information
we collect or otherwise obtain about you. This table includes:
the purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
,which are tied to the defined purposes for
Processing
, special purposes, and features set forth in the
TCF Policies
and official technical documentation disseminated by IAB Europe where applicable(see Appendix A of the
TCF Policies
for examples and illustrations of the purposes, special purposes and features,
a description of each
Processing
activity using
TCF
-specific terminology (to the extent applicable), and
the legal basis that we rely on to perform each of our
Processing
activities.
Please note that in Europe, where we indicate that “Legitimate Interests” in accordance with the GDPR is the legal basis for
Processing
, we carry out the
Processing
in reliance on our legitimate interests or those of a third party (e.g., our Clients), provided that such interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Processing Purpose /  TCF Purpose
(where
TCF
is applicable)
Description of
Processing
Activity (using
TCF Purpose
terms)
Legal Basis
for
Processing
Storing and/or accessing information on a device (
TCF Purpose
1)
Cookies
,
Device Identifiers
, or other information more fully described in association with the purposes below can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes presented to you.
Consent
Use limited data to select advertising (
TCF Purpose
2)
Ads can be shown to you based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information,
or your device type.
When selecting “Use limited data to select advertising”, Quantcast will:
Use real-time information about the context in which the ad will be shown, including information about the content and your device, such as: device type and capabilities,
User Agent
,
URL
, and
IP Address
Use your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Control the frequency of ads shown to you
Sequence the order in which ads are shown to you
Prevent an ad from serving in an unsuitable editorial (brand-unsafe) context
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads.
Creating profiles for personalised ads (
TCF Purpose
3)
A profile can be built about you and your
Interests
to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you.
To create or edit a profile for use in personalised advertising, Quantcast will:
Collect information about you, including your activity, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, or
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Aggregate
Attributes
and
Interests
and
Panel
-based demographic information,
Combine information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent
Using profiles to select  personalised ads (
TCF Purpose
4)
When serving personalised ads, Quantcast will select personalised ads based on
Personal Information
collected from or about you, such as your prior activity,
Interests
, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information,
demographic information or
Inferences
.
Consent
Measuring advertising performance (
TCF Purpose
7)
Quantcast will measure the performance and effectiveness of ads that you see or interact with.
In particular, to measure whether and how ads were delivered to you and how you interacted with them, Quantcast will:
Provide reporting to Clients about ads, including their effectiveness and performance
Provide reporting to Clients about your interactions with ads using data observed during your interaction with the ad
Provide reporting to Clients about the ads displayed on their properties
Measure whether an ad is serving in a suitable editorial environment (brand-safe) context
Determine the percentage of the ad that had the opportunity to be seen and the duration of that opportunity
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
In the provision of the Solutions to some Clients, Quantcast may correlate information between entries within its own datasets that have the same
Pseudonymous Identifier
or with information obtained from Ad Serving, Ad Verification, or
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers.
We do this to provide aggregated reporting to Clients about the number of visitors to their digital properties.
Quantcast does not apply
Panel
or similarly derived
Audience Insights
data to ad measurement data without a separate legal basis to apply market research to generate
Audience Insights.
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective of ascertaining, measuring, and improving the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Measuring content performance (
TCF Purpose
8)
The performance and effectiveness of content that you see or interact with can be measured.
To measure content performance, Quantcast will:
Measure and report to Clients on how content was delivered to and interacted with by you
Provide reporting to Clients, using directly measurable or known information about your interactions with the content
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our Clients meet their objective of executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Understanding audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources i.e.  applying market research to generate
Audience Insights
(
TCF Purpose
9)
Market research can be used to learn more about the
Audiences
who visit websites, mobile apps, or streaming media, and view ads.
To generate
Audience Insights
, Quantcast will:
Provide aggregate reporting to advertisers or their representatives (such as advertising agencies) about the
Audiences
reached by their ads, through
Panel
-based and similarly derived insights
Provide aggregate reporting to Clients about the
Audiences
that were served or interacted with content and/or ads on their properties by applying
Panel
-based and similarly derived insights
Associate
Offline Data
with you for the purposes of market research to generate
Audience Insights
(if we have declared that we will match and combine
Offline Data
sources)
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Developing and improving services (
TCF Purpose
10 )
Your information can be used to improve Quantcast’s existing systems and software and to develop new products.
To develop and improve its products, Quantcast will:
Use information to improve its existing products with new features and to develop new products
Create new models and algorithms through machine learning
For example, Quantcast matches its datasets with
Training Data
, which usually includes
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client)
, and/or
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
. Quantcast primarily uses
Training Data
to train its algorithms how to infer individuals’
Attributes
and
Interests
in the context of the Solutions.
Consent or Legitimate Interest, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors  (
TCF Special Purpose
1)
Your information can be used to monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity and ensure our systems and processes work properly and securely.
To ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug, Quantcast will:
Ensure information is securely transmitted
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, invalid, or illegal activity
Ensure correct and efficient operation of systems and processes, including monitoring and enhancing the performance of systems and processes engaged in permitted purposes
Legitimate Interests
We conduct the
Processing
to meet organisational objectives such as to maintain our IT systems; to ensure the electronic security of our business; and to detect and prevent against malicious, fraudulent, invalid, and illegal activity.
Technically deliver ads or content (
TCF Special Purpose
2)
Your device can receive and send information that allows you to see and interact with ads and content.
To deliver information and respond to technical requests, Quantcast will:
Use your device’s
IP Address
to deliver an ad or content over the internet
Respond to your interactions with an ad or content by sending you to a landing page
Use information about your device type and capabilities for delivering ads or content (e.g., to deliver the right size ad creative or video file in a format supported by your device)
Quantcast may also match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with third parties in order to deliver ads to
Audiences
.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective to ascertain, measure, and improve the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Matching and combining data from other  sources i.e.  offline data (TCF Feature 1)
Offline Data
can be combined with your online activity in support of one or more purposes or special purposes outlined in this table.
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Different devices can be determined as belonging to you or your household in support of one or more purposes.
Through
Cross-Media Matching/Linking,
Quantcast will:
Deterministically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
Probabilistically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
Your device will be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as
IP Address
or browser type.
In particular, Quantcast will:
Create an identifier using information collected automatically from your device for specific characteristics (e.g.,
IP Address
or User Agent information)
Use such an identifier to attempt to re-identify your device
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
We
Process
, preserve, and share
Personal Information
when we seek legal advice or seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation and other disputes.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations, litigation, and regulatory inquiries.
Responding to legal requests
We preserve and share
Personal Information
in response to legal requests from law enforcement and other government officials, to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process, and when we believe in good faith that disclosure of such information is necessary to comply with a judicial proceeding or court order.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations and regulatory inquiries.
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
We
Process
Personal Information
to comply with our legal obligations under applicable law.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to
Process
Personal Information
we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006 or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law, such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014 (e.g., where the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Commission requests information)
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations under company legislation and tax law, such as the Companies Act 2014 or where the Irish Revenue requests information
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations under data protection laws, including to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018
See
quantcast.com/privacy/laws
for the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Quantcast which results in the
Processing
of
Personal Information
. As new laws may be enacted or other obligations may require us to
Process
your
Personal Information
, we will update this list from time to time.
Compliance with a legal obligation.
Conducting research
We use
Personal Information
to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of delivering and continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Hosting information
We
Process
Personal Information
to manage our business, which includes hosting
Personal Information
in our on-premise data centers and/or cloud computing services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of delivering the Solutions to our Clients.
Information sharing
In connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section above, we may share your
Personal Information
with the categories of third parties described below.
Category of Recipient
Description and Purpose of Sharing
Categories of
Personal Information
Shared
Quantcast-affiliated companies
We share your
Personal Information
with Quantcast-affiliated companies in order to provide the Solutions.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our vendors (including service providers/data processors)
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our vendors.
We share your
Personal Information
with vendors who act on our behalf and are subject to binding contractual obligations and restrictions on the
Processing
of
Personal Information
we share with them. For example, these companies assist with information hosting, information
Processing
, database management, and administrative tasks.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our partners, such as
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
and
Advertising Exchanges
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our Partners
We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with companies that we partner with to support the operation of the Solutions. Specifically, Quantcast shares
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with 1) data providers via
Data Management Platforms
for the purpose of performing
Cookie Syncing/Matches
with
Imported Data (Client)
and Third Party/Segment Data, and 2) and
Advertising Exchanges
for the purpose of serving ads.
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction
In the event of a reorganisation, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may share your
Personal Information
with (or transfer your
Personal Information
to) certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisors. We may also make certain information available to a potential investor or purchaser (and their advisers) in advance of any such transaction’s completion.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Competent governmental and public authorities
We may share your
Personal Information
with governmental and law enforcement authorities, in each case to comply with legal or regulatory obligations or requests.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Other third parties
We will share your
Personal Information
with other third parties at your direction or with your consent.
Additionally, we may share your
Personal Information
as necessary or appropriate or where otherwise permitted by law to:
Enforce our agreements
Protect our operations
Protect our rights, privacy, safety, property, and/or those of other persons
Allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
We also create and share with our Clients insights or reports regarding the makeup of the
Audiences
that visit their digital properties or the performance of their advertising campaigns. These insights and reports may contain aggregated data from which individual users cannot be uniquely identified or data from which Quantcast has removed
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Information security
We employ appropriate organisational and technical security safeguards designed to keep
Personal Information
secure when it is transmitted to us and once we receive it. These measures may include encryption and  employment of information storage security technologies to restrict access to our network.  However, please be aware that no method of transmitting information over the internet or storing information is completely secure.
Information retention
We retain your
Personal Information
for as long as necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, as described in the “
Information Collection
” section above and in the tables below, except where we are required to retain the information for a longer period of time. Once
Personal Information
has reached its retention period, as applicable, we may either de-identify it (for CCPA purposes), anonymise it (for GDPR purposes), or permanently delete it.
Category of Personal Information
Maximum retention period for all purposes
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Up to 13 months (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset)
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Up to 30 days
Event Data
Up to 13 months
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Imported Data (Client)
Up to 30 days
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Up to 30 days
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Information you provide
Up to 18 months
Processing Purpose /  TCF Purpose
Categories of
Personal Information
used for this purpose
Maximum retention period
Store and/or access information on a device (
TCF Purpose
1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Cookie life span is up to 13 months each time it’s reset
Use limited data to select advertising (
TCF Purpose
2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Create profiles for personalised advertising (
TCF Purpose
3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (
TCF Purpose
4)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure advertising performance (
TCF Purpose
7)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (
TCF Purpose
8)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (
TCF Purpose
9)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve services  (
TCF Purpose
10 )
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (
TCF Special Purpose
1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Deliver and present advertising and content (
TCF Special Purpose
2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Match and combine data from other data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of
Personal Information
and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the
Personal Information
is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting information
Technically, all
Personal Information
is
Processed
in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of
Personal Information
Processed
are disclosed above.
International transfers
Quantcast operates a global service, and we engage vendors located around the world to help us deliver the Solutions. Accordingly, your
Personal Information
may be transferred outside of the country or region in which you reside, including to the United States and other countries where either our data centers, vendors, affiliates, or Partners are located. Where we transfer your
Personal Information
internationally, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that we may need to transfer your
Personal Information
to countries that have not been recognised by the
European Commision
and/or the
UK government
as providing an adequate level of protection for
Personal Information
. We generally use EU Standard Contractual Clauses (to facilitate both controller-to-controller and controller-to-processor transfers) or other government-approved contracts that provide appropriate safeguards for
Personal Information
that is transferred to countries that have not been recognised as providing an adequate level of protection.  You can contact us at privacy@quantcast.com to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
In certain limited circumstances, we rely on other lawful mechanisms for international transfers of
Personal Information
or rely on derogations, such as the contractual necessity derogation.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your
Personal Information
. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found below.
Right of access: The right to request access to your
Personal Information
and receive certain information, including the categories of your
Personal Information
we collect and disclose.  To exercise this right, see our
Data Subjcet Request Form
request form
here
.
Right of rectification/correction: The right to request that we rectify (or correct) inaccurate
Personal Information
about you. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right of rectification/correction, due to the limited
Personal Information
we
Process
, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to request deletion of your
Personal Information
. To request the deletion of your
Personal Information
, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right of erasure/deletion: The right, in certain cases, to request that we delete your
Personal Information
, provided there are valid grounds for doing so and subject to applicable law and exceptions. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right to data portability: The right, in certain cases, to receive a copy of your
Personal Information
in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and transmit such information to another controller. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right to object (marketing): The right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
for direct marketing purposes. In practice, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to opt out of our
Processing
of your
Personal Information
for advertising purposes. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.  Additionally, as noted in the “
Self Regulatory Standards
” section above, we are a member of the NAI and a DAA and EDAA participating company. Each of these self-regulatory bodies offers a tool that allows individuals to opt out of receiving targeted advertising from Quantcast and other participating companies. These links will take you to the
NAI opt-out
page and the
DAA opt-out
page. If you are located in Europe, you may prefer to visit the
EDAA opt-out
page.
Right to object (legitimate interests): The right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
where we
Process
it on the basis of our legitimate interests, as described in the “
Information Use and Legal Bases
” section above.  Unless we have compelling legitimate grounds or the information is needed for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, we will cease
Processing
your
Personal Information
when you object.  To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to restrict
Processing
: The right, in certain cases, to temporarily restrict our
Processing
of your
Personal Information
, provided there are valid grounds for doing so. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right to restrict the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
, we will treat it as an exercise of the right on an ongoing, rather than temporary, basis (i.e., the request will be treated as you exercising the right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
). To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to withdraw your consent: The right to withdraw the consent you have provided at any time, where we
Process
your
Personal Information
on the basis of your consent. Please note that the lawfulness of any
Processing
undertaken prior to your withdrawal of consent shall not be affected by the withdrawal. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to lodge a complaint: The right to complain to the relevant authority regarding the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
by us or on our behalf.  In the EU, the lead supervisory authority is the
Irish Data Protection Commissioner.
See the section “
Contact Us
” below.
Please note that the rights listed above may not be exercised in certain circumstances, such as when the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
is necessary to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject or for the exercise or defense of legal claims. Additionally, in order to protect your privacy, we may require proof of your identity before we can act on your request but only where it is necessary and proportionate to request this information.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated
Processing
(i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated
Processing
that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that the Solutions are provided by our European entity, Quantcast International Limited. In
Processing
Personal Information
in the context of providing the Solutions to our Clients, Quantcast Internal Limited generally acts as a data controller. More specifically, Quantcast International Limited is a joint controller along with its Client when we jointly determine the purposes for which your
Personal Information
will be
Processed
. For example, we are joint controllers with Advertisers and Publishers for
Personal Information
that is collected as Quantcast
Cookies
, or using
Pixels, Tags and SDKs
deployed by our Clients on their digital properties, and for the
Processing
of other
Personal Information
introduced into the Solutions directly by the Client. This is because both Quantcast and the Client have influence over whether and how we collect and
Process
the
Personal Information
.  In limited situations, Quantcast is the sole data controller of
Personal Information
when we are
Processing
it for our own independent purposes, for instance when we use a Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifier
or we derive aggregated analytics for modeling, developing our algorithms, or improving the Solutions.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your
Personal Information
. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found in the
Your choices and legal rights
section above.  .
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated
Processing
(i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated
Processing
that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for California residents
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) provides California residents with certain rights. Pursuant to the CCPA, we are providing the following additional details regarding the categories of
Personal Information
about California residents that we collect, use, and disclose.
Categories of personal information collected: We have collected the following categories of
Personal Information
from California residents within the last twelve (12) months:
Identifiers, such as
IP Address
and other similar
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including browsing history and information regarding individuals’ interactions with websites or mobile apps or streaming media.
Geolocation data, such as
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
derived from device
IP Addresses.
Inferences
, which refers to inferences drawn from any of the information in these categories of
Personal Information
to predict the individual’s characteristics.
Categories of sources of personal information: As described in the “
Information collection
” section above, we collect the above-listed categories of
Personal Information
directly from individuals; through automated means (e.g.
Pixels, Tags and SDKs
,
Cookies
or
Bid Requests
); and from third parties (e.g., our Clients).
Disclosures of personal information: As described in the “
Information sharing
” section above, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed
Personal Information
about California residents in all of the above-listed categories of
Personal Information
to our affiliates and vendors. Additionally, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed
Identifiers
to our partners.
Sale of personal information: Quantcast does not “sell” (as defined in the CCPA)
Personal Information
and has not “sold”
Personal Information
in the preceding twelve (12) months in relation to operating the Solutions.
Individual rights and requests: If you are a California resident, you have the right to request that we:
Disclose to you the following information covering the 12 months preceding your request:
the categories of
Personal Information
we have collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such information;
the specific pieces of
Personal Information
we have collected about you;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting
Personal Information
about you;
the categories of third parties with whom we shared or to whom we disclosed such
Personal Information
; and
if we sold or disclosed your
Personal Information
for a business purpose, two separate lists disclosing:
sales, identifying the
Personal Information
categories that each category of recipient received; and
disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the
Personal Information
categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Delete the
Personal Information
we have collected from you.
If you are interested in exercising one or more of the rights outlined above, please click the relevant link in the
“Your choices and legal rights”
section above. You may also submit requests by contacting us via email at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. We will attempt to verify your identity and respond to your request consistent with the CCPA.
If you authorise a natural person or business entity to submit a request on your behalf (an “Authorised Agent”), the Authorised Agent may use the submission methods noted above. As part of our verification process, we will require proof concerning their status as an Authorised Agent, which may include proof of their registration with the California Secretary of State to conduct business in California and/or proof that they have power of attorney in accordance with California probate law. We may also require you to verify your identity directly with us or directly confirm with us that you provided the agent with permission to submit the request.
Information about annual data requests is available in the
CCPA Annual Report
..
We will not discriminate against you if you decide to exercise your rights under the CCPA.
Global Privacy Control (“ GPC ”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We honor GPC for all data subjects in the United States. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for more information about GPC.
Contact us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or our information handling practices, please feel free to contact us.
Individuals located in the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Email: privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
Individuals located outside of the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street
Dublin 2, Ireland
Email: privacy.qil [at] quantcast [dot] com
The Data Protection Officer (DPO) for Quantcast International Limited can be contacted at
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you have contacted us or our DPO about a privacy or information use concern and feel that we have not addressed it satisfactorily, you may contact our US-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you are a resident of the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint against us with our lead supervisory authority, the
Irish Data Protection Commission
, or the
supervisory authority
in your country of residence.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes in our practices with respect to the collection, use, and/or disclosure of
Personal Information
or changes in applicable law. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this page indicates when this Privacy Policy was last updated.  Any changes will become effective when we post a revised version of this Privacy Policy unless otherwise specified.
Some of our changes will be minor, but if we make significant changes to how we use or share your
Personal Information
, we will:
inform you in advance by posting a notice on our website
wait for a period of time before implementing the changes
We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed about our information handling and privacy practices.
Effective February 12th 2024
to
February 13th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Products and Services Privacy Policy
This Policy takes effect on March 1 2024. See Policy effective September 11 2023 until that date.
Products and Services Privacy Policy
Who we are and what we do
Scope of this Privacy Policy
Self-regulatory standards
Information collection
Information use and legal basis
Information sharing
Information security
Information retention
International transfers
Your choices and legal rights
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
Additional information for California residents
Contact us
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Capitalised terms used in this Products and Services Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) are defined in
Key Terms
unless otherwise defined herein.
To exercise your Data Subject Rights (described in the
Your choices and legal rights
below), please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page.
Who we are and what we do
Quantcast (“we”, “our”, or “us”) is a global digital advertising technology group of companies. Quantcast offers products and services that help digital advertisers and publishers (collectively, “Clients”) understand and grow their audiences (the “Solutions”). Through Quantcast Advertise Solutions, advertiser Clients can plan, activate, and measure the performance of their advertising campaigns seamlessly in a single audience platform, which helps them to place their ads to maximise results. Through Quantcast Measure Solutions, digital publisher Clients leverage insights to better understand the makeup of their audiences, how audiences spend their time across their digital properties, and what audiences care about, all of which help these  digital businesses better connect their content and
Audiences
with the right advertising.
To provide the Solutions, Quantcast collects and uses
Personal Information
for various purposes, such as measuring and understanding audiences, targeting and delivering ads, measuring ad performance, and similar related purposes.  As described in the “
Information Collection
” section below, we may join or match
Personal Information
about you, which may include your
Online Data
from your visits across different digital properties, like websites,mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”)), that have implemented Quantcast
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
(which is sometimes called “tracking” in the industry) or
Offline Data
. This allows us, for example, to enrich our existing data sets and provide meaningful reports for our Clients regarding the effectiveness of their ads or content. We may also combine
Personal Information
that we collect in order to probabilistically link media consumption to a single user, which is sometimes called
Cross-Media Matching/Linking
. To the extent that we combine
Personal Information
that we collect from and about you in connection with our performance of the Solutions, we will use such combined information only as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy describes in more detail how we collect, use, disclose, and protect
Personal Information
, otherwise obtain and
Process
it in connection with the delivery of the Solutions, and the controls we provide you to manage such information and exercise your choices and legal rights.  As noted in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section below, we use the
Transparency and Consent Framework
(“
TCF
”) standard to facilitate compliance with applicable laws in Europe, primarily in accordance with the EU General Data Protection Regulation (“GDPR”). Because the
TCF
is one means of explaining
Processing
activities, and because our
Processing
activities are consistent globally, the
TCF Purposes
are applicable to all
Personal Information
that we
Process
(regardless of the information’s country of origin).
In the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast Corporation, located at 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107.
Personal Information
relating to individuals located within the United States provided to or gathered by us in connection with the delivery of the Solutions is controlled by Quantcast Corporation.
Outside of the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast International Limited, located at Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland.  In so far as Quantcast acts as a “controller” (as defined under applicable law), Quantcast International  Limited is the controller of your
Personal Information
if you reside in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), Switzerland, or any other jurisdiction outside of the United States.
Scope of this Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy covers Quantcast’s use of
Personal Information
for the Solutions only.  This Privacy Policy does not cover:
Personal Information
collected from our website, www.quantcast.com, except to the extent that we use our own Solutions on our website. It also does not pertain to the collection and use of
Personal Information
in connection with our corporate functions, such as marketing, recruiting, people management, business-to-business communications, and so forth. For our privacy policy relating to our website and our corporate functions, please click
here
.
Any third parties’ handling of
Personal Information,
unless explicitly stated otherwise. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any other companies that you engage or interact with to understand their information handling and privacy practices.
We use some phrases in this Privacy Policy that are unique to our business and/or the digital advertising industry. For a list of defined terms that you should familiarise yourself with to make it easier to review this Privacy Policy, please review the
Key Terms
.
California Notice at Collection: We collect the categories of
Personal Information
listed in the “
Categories of personal information collected
” subsection of the “
California privacy rights
” section below. As further described in the
“Information use and legal basis”
section below, we collect this information in order to deliver the Solutions and conduct our business. To learn more, please see the “
California privacy rights
” section.
Self-regulatory standards
Quantcast supports and participates in several digital advertising self-regulatory organisations, as further described below.
We are members in good standing of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and adhere to the
NAI 2020 Code of Conduct
.
We participate in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and adhere to the
DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
.
We participate in the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) and are certified under the
EDAA Principles
.
We participate in, and comply with, the policies and technical specifications of the
TCF
, as a vendor. Quantcast’s IAB Europe-assigned identification number ia Vendor ID #11.
Please see the “
Your choices and legal rights
” section of this Privacy Policy for more information about the opt-out tools offered by the NAI, DAA, and EDAA.
Do Not Track (“DNT”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We do not honor DNT or other similar signals at this time, due to the lack of a clear industry standard. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for your opt-out options.
Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We honor GPC for all data subjects in the United States. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for more information about GPC.
Information collection
We collect or receive
Personal Information
about or relating to you in various ways, including from digital properties, like websites, mobile apps, or streaming media devices (such as connected TVs (“CTVs”), and other sources of digital content. Details about the categories of
Personal Information
we collect and receive, the source or manner in which we obtain each category of
Personal Information,
the purpose(s) for which we
Process
each category of
Personal Information
, and the retention period for each category of
Personal Information
we
Process
can be found in the table below. As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, where applicable the
Processing
purposes identified in the table below are tied to the
TCF Purposes
outlined in the “
Information use and legal bases
” section.
Category and Description of
Personal Information
Source of
Personal Information
Purpose for
Processing
(including where relevant the
TCF Purpose
) and Retention Period
Pseudonymous Identifiers:
unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s).
Examples include a
Cookie ID
, device
IP Address
, hashed email addresses, 3rd party identifiers, or other
Device Identifiers
or
Device Configuration/ Information.
Usually  generated when
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
are loaded by a Client on its digital property (i.e., website, mobile app, or device) and sends information to us. Different kinds of
Pixels, Tags, or SDKs
are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Such information may also be received through a server- to- server connection, such as when receiving a
Bid Request
.
.
Pseudonymous Identifiers will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset):
TCF Purpose 1: Store and/or access information on a device
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve services
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 1: Match and combine data from other data sources
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Recording consent choices made by users
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information:
The time zone and approximate geolocation (e.g., postal code or city) of your device.
Inferred or derived by Quantcast from your device’s
IP Address
or included in
Bid Requests
.
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF Feature 1: Match and combine data from other data sources
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Event Data
: Information relating to your
Online Data,
which may include
Pseudonymous Identifiers,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
,
HTTP Request Header Information
,
Device Information
, and
Browsing Data.
Generated when
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
, installed by a Client on its digital property, loads and sends information to us.
Different kinds of
Pixels, Tags or SDKs
are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Event Data  will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Bid Request Data
: A bid request is an offer from a digital publisher, like a website, mobile app, or streaming media owner, to show an ad on their property.
Bid Request Data
includes information about your visit to the publisher’s digital property, which helps us understand where an ad will be displayed,
Device Information
, and who might see it.
Bid Request Data
also commonly includes a
Pseudonymous Identifier
(if available), the content that the ad would serve into, the type of device the ad would be served on, the
Imprecise / Approximate Location Information
of the device, the size of the ad, and consent information. Because
Bid Requests
include information about the content you are visiting, over time, accumulated
Bid Requests
may show your browsing behavior.
Received from a digital publisher.
Bid RequestData  will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 2: Use limited data to select advertising
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
TCF SpecialPurpose 2: Deliver and present advertising and content
TCF Feature 2: Link different devices
TCF Feature 3: Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically
Imported Data (Client):
Pseudonymised Information
, which may include
Online Data
, and/or
Offline Data
that may be apportioned by
Browsing Data,
Attributes
,
Segments
,
Label Data
and
Interests
.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“API”) by a particular Client for use on its behalf.
Imported Data (client) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud,
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment):
Pseudonymised Information,
which may include
Online Data,
and/or
Offline Data
that may be apportioned by
Browsing Data
,
Attributes
,
Segments
,
Label Data
and
Interests
.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by third-party
Data Management Platforms or Data Providers
.
Imported  Data (Third Party/Segment) will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Inferences/Inferred Data
: Information drawn from the above-listed categories of information (i.e.,
Event Data,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client),
and
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
).
We may, for example, use information that we have collected to infer your interests, age, gender, marital status, or income range. These
Inferences
may include
Interests
and
Attributes
.
Derived by Quantcast from previously collected
Event Data,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client),
and/or
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment).
Inferences/Inferred Data will be retained for up to 13 months for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 4: Use profiles to select personalised advertising
TCF Purpose 7: Measure advertising performance
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Training Data:
Pseudonymous Information
used to improve Quantcast’s algorithms and measure how well they are working.
Received from third-party data providers and matched to
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Training Data  will be retained for up to 30 days for the following Purposes:
TCF Purpose 3: Create profiles for advertising
TCF Purpose 8: Measure content performance
TCF Purpose 9: Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
TCF Purpose 10: Develop and improve products
TCF Special Purpose 1: Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors
Information you provide: This may include your contact details, (e.g., name, email address, or phone number) and any commentary or other information you provide when you contact Quantcast.
Provided by you when you contact Quantcast.
Carrying out our legitimate business purposes.
Retention Period: up to 18 months
Additionally, any of the categories of
Personal Information
described above may be
Processed
for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of
Personal Information
and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the
Personal Information
is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting of
Personal Information
for above-listed purposes
Technically, all
Personal Information
is
Processed
in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of
Personal Information
Processed
are disclosed above.
Sensitive information: We generally do not seek or permit sensitive
Personal Information
(e.g., information revealing an individual’s racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership; genetic or biometric data that is
Processed
for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual; information concerning an individual’s health, sex life, or sexual orientation; and information relating to criminal convictions and offenses) to be used in the Solutions. However, as allowed by applicable laws and rules, we may collect and
Process
non-sensitive health-related information (outside of the EEA, UK, and Switzerland) in connection with the delivery of the Solutions. We provide a list of standard health segments and a representative sample of custom health segments that we use for targeted advertising
here
. Please note that where we
Process
any of your sensitive
Personal Information
, we seek and obtain your consent and/or otherwise
Process
such information in accordance with applicable laws and rules.
Children’s information: We do not seek or permit
Personal Information
from children under the age of 16. If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with
Personal Information
, that parent or guardian should contact us at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. If we become aware that a child has provided us with
Personal Information
, we will take all reasonable steps to delete such information from our files.
Contractual commitments from our Clients and third-party Data Providers: We contractually require other companies that provide or make available to us
Personal Information
to take steps to ensure that we can lawfully
Process
such information, which include: (i) posting complete and accurate privacy policies that comply with applicable laws and rules and describe their
Personal Information
collection, use, and sharing practices; (ii) obtaining all legally-required consents and necessary permissions; and (iii) providing individuals with appropriate choices and the ability to opt out of the
Processing
of their
Personal Information
, where necessary or appropriate.
Information use and legal basis
As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, we generally use the
TCF
as the mechanism for describing our
Processing
activities, and in Europe specifically for establishing our legal basis for
Processing
and managing users’ preferences for online personalised advertising and related activities. The
TCF
is designed to allow a digital business to present information and choices to users on its website relating to the
Processing
of their
Personal Information
.
We
Process
Personal Information
for the purposes for which it was collected or provided to us. The table below describes the specific purposes for which we
Process
the
Personal Information
we collect or otherwise obtain about you. This table includes:
the purposes for which Quantcast
Processes
Personal Information
,which are tied to the defined purposes for
Processing
, special purposes, and features set forth in the
TCF Policies
and official technical documentation disseminated by IAB Europe where applicable(see Appendix A of the
TCF Policies
for examples and illustrations of the purposes, special purposes and features,
a description of each
Processing
activity using
TCF
-specific terminology (to the extent applicable), and
the legal basis that we rely on to perform each of our
Processing
activities.
Please note that in Europe, where we indicate that “Legitimate Interests” in accordance with the GDPR is the legal basis for
Processing
, we carry out the
Processing
in reliance on our legitimate interests or those of a third party (e.g., our Clients), provided that such interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Processing Purpose /  TCF Purpose
(where
TCF
is applicable)
Description of
Processing
Activity (using
TCF Purpose
terms)
Legal Basis
for
Processing
Storing and/or accessing information on a device (
TCF Purpose
1)
Cookies
,
Device Identifiers
, or other information more fully described in association with the purposes below can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes presented to you.
Consent
Use limited data to select advertising (
TCF Purpose
2)
Ads can be shown to you based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information,
or your device type.
When selecting “Use limited data to select advertising”, Quantcast will:
Use real-time information about the context in which the ad will be shown, including information about the content and your device, such as: device type and capabilities,
User Agent
,
URL
, and
IP Address
Use your device’s
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Control the frequency of ads shown to you
Sequence the order in which ads are shown to you
Prevent an ad from serving in an unsuitable editorial (brand-unsafe) context
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads.
Creating profiles for personalised ads (
TCF Purpose
3)
A profile can be built about you and your
Interests
to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you.
To create or edit a profile for use in personalised advertising, Quantcast will:
Collect information about you, including your activity, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, or
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Aggregate
Attributes
and
Interests
and
Panel
-based demographic information,
Combine information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent
Using profiles to select  personalised ads (
TCF Purpose
4)
When serving personalised ads, Quantcast will select personalised ads based on
Personal Information
collected from or about you, such as your prior activity,
Interests
, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media,
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information,
demographic information or
Inferences
.
Consent
Measuring advertising performance (
TCF Purpose
7)
Quantcast will measure the performance and effectiveness of ads that you see or interact with.
In particular, to measure whether and how ads were delivered to you and how you interacted with them, Quantcast will:
Provide reporting to Clients about ads, including their effectiveness and performance
Provide reporting to Clients about your interactions with ads using data observed during your interaction with the ad
Provide reporting to Clients about the ads displayed on their properties
Measure whether an ad is serving in a suitable editorial environment (brand-safe) context
Determine the percentage of the ad that had the opportunity to be seen and the duration of that opportunity
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
In the provision of the Solutions to some Clients, Quantcast may correlate information between entries within its own datasets that have the same
Pseudonymous Identifier
or with information obtained from Ad Serving, Ad Verification, or
Data Management Platforms/Data Providers.
We do this to provide aggregated reporting to Clients about the number of visitors to their digital properties.
Quantcast does not apply
Panel
or similarly derived
Audience Insights
data to ad measurement data without a separate legal basis to apply market research to generate
Audience Insights.
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective of ascertaining, measuring, and improving the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Measuring content performance (
TCF Purpose
8)
The performance and effectiveness of content that you see or interact with can be measured.
To measure content performance, Quantcast will:
Measure and report to Clients on how content was delivered to and interacted with by you
Provide reporting to Clients, using directly measurable or known information about your interactions with the content
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our Clients meet their objective of executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Understanding audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources i.e.  applying market research to generate
Audience Insights
(
TCF Purpose
9)
Market research can be used to learn more about the
Audiences
who visit websites, mobile apps, or streaming media, and view ads.
To generate
Audience Insights
, Quantcast will:
Provide aggregate reporting to advertisers or their representatives (such as advertising agencies) about the
Audiences
reached by their ads, through
Panel
-based and similarly derived insights
Provide aggregate reporting to Clients about the
Audiences
that were served or interacted with content and/or ads on their properties by applying
Panel
-based and similarly derived insights
Associate
Offline Data
with you for the purposes of market research to generate
Audience Insights
(if we have declared that we will match and combine
Offline Data
sources)
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Developing and improving services (
TCF Purpose
10 )
Your information can be used to improve Quantcast’s existing systems and software and to develop new products.
To develop and improve its products, Quantcast will:
Use information to improve its existing products with new features and to develop new products
Create new models and algorithms through machine learning
For example, Quantcast matches its datasets with
Training Data
, which usually includes
Event Data
,
Bid Request Data
,
Imported Data (Client)
, and/or
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
. Quantcast primarily uses
Training Data
to train its algorithms how to infer individuals’
Attributes
and
Interests
in the context of the Solutions.
Consent or Legitimate Interest, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the
TCF
.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Ensuring security, preventing and detecting fraud, and fixing errors  (
TCF Special Purpose
1)
Your information can be used to monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity and ensure our systems and processes work properly and securely.
To ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug, Quantcast will:
Ensure information is securely transmitted
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, invalid, or illegal activity
Ensure correct and efficient operation of systems and processes, including monitoring and enhancing the performance of systems and processes engaged in permitted purposes
Legitimate Interests
We conduct the
Processing
to meet organisational objectives such as to maintain our IT systems; to ensure the electronic security of our business; and to detect and prevent against malicious, fraudulent, invalid, and illegal activity.
Technically deliver ads or content (
TCF Special Purpose
2)
Your device can receive and send information that allows you to see and interact with ads and content.
To deliver information and respond to technical requests, Quantcast will:
Use your device’s
IP Address
to deliver an ad or content over the internet
Respond to your interactions with an ad or content by sending you to a landing page
Use information about your device type and capabilities for delivering ads or content (e.g., to deliver the right size ad creative or video file in a format supported by your device)
Quantcast may also match
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with third parties in order to deliver ads to
Audiences
.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective to ascertain, measure, and improve the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Matching and combining data from other  sources i.e.  offline data (TCF Feature 1)
Offline Data
can be combined with your online activity in support of one or more purposes or special purposes outlined in this table.
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Different devices can be determined as belonging to you or your household in support of one or more purposes.
Through
Cross-Media Matching/Linking,
Quantcast will:
Deterministically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
Probabilistically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
Your device will be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as
IP Address
or browser type.
In particular, Quantcast will:
Create an identifier using information collected automatically from your device for specific characteristics (e.g.,
IP Address
or User Agent information)
Use such an identifier to attempt to re-identify your device
The legal basis will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
We
Process
, preserve, and share
Personal Information
when we seek legal advice or seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation and other disputes.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations, litigation, and regulatory inquiries.
Responding to legal requests
We preserve and share
Personal Information
in response to legal requests from law enforcement and other government officials, to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process, and when we believe in good faith that disclosure of such information is necessary to comply with a judicial proceeding or court order.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations and regulatory inquiries.
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
We
Process
Personal Information
to comply with our legal obligations under applicable law.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to
Process
Personal Information
we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters: where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters
Criminal matters: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006 or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required
Consumer matters: to comply with our obligations under consumer law, such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014 (e.g., where the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Commission requests information)
Corporate and taxation matters: to comply with our obligations under company legislation and tax law, such as the Companies Act 2014 or where the Irish Revenue requests information
Regulatory matters: to comply with our obligations under data protection laws, including to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018
See
quantcast.com/privacy/laws
for the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Quantcast which results in the
Processing
of
Personal Information
. As new laws may be enacted or other obligations may require us to
Process
your
Personal Information
, we will update this list from time to time.
Compliance with a legal obligation.
Conducting research
We use
Personal Information
to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of delivering and continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Hosting information
We
Process
Personal Information
to manage our business, which includes hosting
Personal Information
in our on-premise data centers and/or cloud computing services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the
Processing
to meet our organisational objective of delivering the Solutions to our Clients.
Information sharing
In connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section above, we may share your
Personal Information
with the categories of third parties described below.
Category of Recipient
Description and Purpose of Sharing
Categories of
Personal Information
Shared
Quantcast-affiliated companies
We share your
Personal Information
with Quantcast-affiliated companies in order to provide the Solutions.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our vendors (including service providers/data processors)
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our vendors.
We share your
Personal Information
with vendors who act on our behalf and are subject to binding contractual obligations and restrictions on the
Processing
of
Personal Information
we share with them. For example, these companies assist with information hosting, information
Processing
, database management, and administrative tasks.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our partners, such as
Data Management Platforms and Data Providers
and
Advertising Exchanges
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our Partners
We share
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with companies that we partner with to support the operation of the Solutions. Specifically, Quantcast shares
Pseudonymous Identifiers
with 1) data providers via
Data Management Platforms
for the purpose of performing
Cookie Syncing/Matches
with
Imported Data (Client)
and Third Party/Segment Data, and 2) and
Advertising Exchanges
for the purpose of serving ads.
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction
In the event of a reorganisation, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may share your
Personal Information
with (or transfer your
Personal Information
to) certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisors. We may also make certain information available to a potential investor or purchaser (and their advisers) in advance of any such transaction’s completion.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Competent governmental and public authorities
We may share your
Personal Information
with governmental and law enforcement authorities, in each case to comply with legal or regulatory obligations or requests.
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Other third parties
We will share your
Personal Information
with other third parties at your direction or with your consent.
Additionally, we may share your
Personal Information
as necessary or appropriate or where otherwise permitted by law to:
Enforce our agreements
Protect our operations
Protect our rights, privacy, safety, property, and/or those of other persons
Allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain
All or certain categories of
Personal Information
are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
We also create and share with our Clients insights or reports regarding the makeup of the
Audiences
that visit their digital properties or the performance of their advertising campaigns. These insights and reports may contain aggregated data from which individual users cannot be uniquely identified or data from which Quantcast has removed
Pseudonymous Identifiers
.
Information security
We employ appropriate organisational and technical security safeguards designed to keep
Personal Information
secure when it is transmitted to us and once we receive it. These measures may include encryption and  employment of information storage security technologies to restrict access to our network.  However, please be aware that no method of transmitting information over the internet or storing information is completely secure.
Information retention
We retain your
Personal Information
for as long as necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, as described in the “
Information Collection
” section above and in the tables below, except where we are required to retain the information for a longer period of time. Once
Personal Information
has reached its retention period, as applicable, we may either de-identify it (for CCPA purposes), anonymise it (for GDPR purposes), or permanently delete it.
Category of Personal Information
Maximum retention period for all purposes
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Up to 13 months (NOTE: storing/accessing data on a device is the cookie lifespan - up to 13 months each time the cookie is reset)
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Up to 30 days
Event Data
Up to 13 months
Bid Request Data
Up to 13 months
Imported Data (Client)
Up to 30 days
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Up to 30 days
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Information you provide
Up to 18 months
Processing Purpose /  TCF Purpose
Categories of
Personal Information
used for this purpose
Maximum retention period
Store and/or access information on a device (
TCF Purpose
1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Cookie life span is up to 13 months each time it’s reset
Use limited data to select advertising (
TCF Purpose
2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Create profiles for personalised advertising (
TCF Purpose
3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 30 days
Use profiles to select personalised advertising (
TCF Purpose
4)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure advertising performance (
TCF Purpose
7)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (
TCF Purpose
8)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources (
TCF Purpose
9)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve services  (
TCF Purpose
10 )
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent and detect fraud, and fix errors (
TCF Special Purpose
1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate
Location Information
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Imported Data (Client)
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
Inferences/Inferred Data
Training Data
Up to 13 months
Deliver and present advertising and content (
TCF Special Purpose
2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Event Data
Bid Request Data
Up to 30 days
Match and combine data from other data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Link different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Identify devices based on information transmitted automatically (TCF Feature 3)
Pseudonymous Identifiers
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Bid Request Data
The retention period will depend on the
TCF Purpose
pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of
Personal Information
and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the
Personal Information
is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting information
Technically, all
Personal Information
is
Processed
in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of
Personal Information
Processed
are disclosed above.
International transfers
Quantcast operates a global service, and we engage vendors located around the world to help us deliver the Solutions. Accordingly, your
Personal Information
may be transferred outside of the country or region in which you reside, including to the United States and other countries where either our data centers, vendors, affiliates, or Partners are located. Where we transfer your
Personal Information
internationally, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that we may need to transfer your
Personal Information
to countries that have not been recognised by the
European Commision
and/or the
UK government
as providing an adequate level of protection for
Personal Information
. We generally use EU Standard Contractual Clauses (to facilitate both controller-to-controller and controller-to-processor transfers) or other government-approved contracts that provide appropriate safeguards for
Personal Information
that is transferred to countries that have not been recognised as providing an adequate level of protection.  You can contact us at privacy@quantcast.com to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
In certain limited circumstances, we rely on other lawful mechanisms for international transfers of
Personal Information
or rely on derogations, such as the contractual necessity derogation.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your
Personal Information
. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found below.
Right of access: The right to request access to your
Personal Information
and receive certain information, including the categories of your
Personal Information
we collect and disclose.  To exercise this right, see our
Data Subjcet Request Form
request form
here
.
Right of rectification/correction: The right to request that we rectify (or correct) inaccurate
Personal Information
about you. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right of rectification/correction, due to the limited
Personal Information
we
Process
, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to request deletion of your
Personal Information
. To request the deletion of your
Personal Information
, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right of erasure/deletion: The right, in certain cases, to request that we delete your
Personal Information
, provided there are valid grounds for doing so and subject to applicable law and exceptions. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right to data portability: The right, in certain cases, to receive a copy of your
Personal Information
in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and transmit such information to another controller. To exercise this right, see our
Data Subject Request Form
request form
here
.
Right to object (marketing): The right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
for direct marketing purposes. In practice, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to opt out of our
Processing
of your
Personal Information
for advertising purposes. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.  Additionally, as noted in the “
Self Regulatory Standards
” section above, we are a member of the NAI and a DAA and EDAA participating company. Each of these self-regulatory bodies offers a tool that allows individuals to opt out of receiving targeted advertising from Quantcast and other participating companies. These links will take you to the
NAI opt-out
page and the
DAA opt-out
page. If you are located in Europe, you may prefer to visit the
EDAA opt-out
page.
Right to object (legitimate interests): The right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
where we
Process
it on the basis of our legitimate interests, as described in the “
Information Use and Legal Bases
” section above.  Unless we have compelling legitimate grounds or the information is needed for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, we will cease
Processing
your
Personal Information
when you object.  To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to restrict
Processing
: The right, in certain cases, to temporarily restrict our
Processing
of your
Personal Information
, provided there are valid grounds for doing so. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right to restrict the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
, we will treat it as an exercise of the right on an ongoing, rather than temporary, basis (i.e., the request will be treated as you exercising the right to object to the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
). To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to withdraw your consent: The right to withdraw the consent you have provided at any time, where we
Process
your
Personal Information
on the basis of your consent. Please note that the lawfulness of any
Processing
undertaken prior to your withdrawal of consent shall not be affected by the withdrawal. To exercise this right, see our
Privacy Choices (opt-out) Page
opt-out page
here
.
Right to lodge a complaint: The right to complain to the relevant authority regarding the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
by us or on our behalf.  In the EU, the lead supervisory authority is the
Irish Data Protection Commissioner.
See the section “
Contact Us
” below.
Please note that the rights listed above may not be exercised in certain circumstances, such as when the
Processing
of your
Personal Information
is necessary to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject or for the exercise or defense of legal claims. Additionally, in order to protect your privacy, we may require proof of your identity before we can act on your request but only where it is necessary and proportionate to request this information.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated
Processing
(i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated
Processing
that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that the Solutions are provided by our European entity, Quantcast International Limited. In
Processing
Personal Information
in the context of providing the Solutions to our Clients, Quantcast Internal Limited generally acts as a data controller. More specifically, Quantcast International Limited is a joint controller along with its Client when we jointly determine the purposes for which your
Personal Information
will be
Processed
. For example, we are joint controllers with Advertisers and Publishers for
Personal Information
that is collected as Quantcast
Cookies
, or using
Pixels, Tags and SDKs
deployed by our Clients on their digital properties, and for the
Processing
of other
Personal Information
introduced into the Solutions directly by the Client. This is because both Quantcast and the Client have influence over whether and how we collect and
Process
the
Personal Information
.  In limited situations, Quantcast is the sole data controller of
Personal Information
when we are
Processing
it for our own independent purposes, for instance when we use a Quantcast
Pseudonymous Identifier
or we derive aggregated analytics for modeling, developing our algorithms, or improving the Solutions.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your
Personal Information
. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found in the
Your choices and legal rights
section above.  .
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated
Processing
(i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated
Processing
that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
Additional information for California residents
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) provides California residents with certain rights. Pursuant to the CCPA, we are providing the following additional details regarding the categories of
Personal Information
about California residents that we collect, use, and disclose.
Categories of personal information collected: We have collected the following categories of
Personal Information
from California residents within the last twelve (12) months:
Identifiers, such as
IP Address
and other similar
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, including browsing history and information regarding individuals’ interactions with websites or mobile apps or streaming media.
Geolocation data, such as
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
derived from device
IP Addresses.
Inferences
, which refers to inferences drawn from any of the information in these categories of
Personal Information
to predict the individual’s characteristics.
Categories of sources of personal information: As described in the “
Information collection
” section above, we collect the above-listed categories of
Personal Information
directly from individuals; through automated means (e.g.
Pixels, Tags and SDKs
,
Cookies
or
Bid Requests
); and from third parties (e.g., our Clients).
Disclosures of personal information: As described in the “
Information sharing
” section above, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed
Personal Information
about California residents in all of the above-listed categories of
Personal Information
to our affiliates and vendors. Additionally, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed
Identifiers
to our partners.
Sale of personal information: Quantcast does not “sell” (as defined in the CCPA)
Personal Information
and has not “sold”
Personal Information
in the preceding twelve (12) months in relation to operating the Solutions.
Individual rights and requests: If you are a California resident, you have the right to request that we:
Disclose to you the following information covering the 12 months preceding your request:
the categories of
Personal Information
we have collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such information;
the specific pieces of
Personal Information
we have collected about you;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting
Personal Information
about you;
the categories of third parties with whom we shared or to whom we disclosed such
Personal Information
; and
if we sold or disclosed your
Personal Information
for a business purpose, two separate lists disclosing:
sales, identifying the
Personal Information
categories that each category of recipient received; and
disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the
Personal Information
categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Delete the
Personal Information
we have collected from you.
If you are interested in exercising one or more of the rights outlined above, please click the relevant link in the
“Your choices and legal rights”
section above. You may also submit requests by contacting us via email at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. We will attempt to verify your identity and respond to your request consistent with the CCPA.
If you authorise a natural person or business entity to submit a request on your behalf (an “Authorised Agent”), the Authorised Agent may use the submission methods noted above. As part of our verification process, we will require proof concerning their status as an Authorised Agent, which may include proof of their registration with the California Secretary of State to conduct business in California and/or proof that they have power of attorney in accordance with California probate law. We may also require you to verify your identity directly with us or directly confirm with us that you provided the agent with permission to submit the request.
Information about annual data requests is available in the
CCPA Annual Report
..
We will not discriminate against you if you decide to exercise your rights under the CCPA.
Global Privacy Control (“ GPC ”) is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We honor GPC for all data subjects in the United States. Please visit the
Quantcast Privacy Choices
page for more information about GPC.
Contact us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or our information handling practices, please feel free to contact us.
Individuals located in the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Email: privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
Individuals located outside of the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street
Dublin 2, Ireland
Email: privacy.qil [at] quantcast [dot] com
The Data Protection Officer (DPO) for Quantcast International Limited can be contacted at
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you have contacted us or our DPO about a privacy or information use concern and feel that we have not addressed it satisfactorily, you may contact our US-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you are a resident of the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint against us with our lead supervisory authority, the
Irish Data Protection Commission
, or the
supervisory authority
in your country of residence.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes in our practices with respect to the collection, use, and/or disclosure of
Personal Information
or changes in applicable law. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this page indicates when this Privacy Policy was last updated.  Any changes will become effective when we post a revised version of this Privacy Policy unless otherwise specified.
Some of our changes will be minor, but if we make significant changes to how we use or share your
Personal Information
, we will:
inform you in advance by posting a notice on our website
wait for a period of time before implementing the changes
We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed about our information handling and privacy practices.
Effective September 11th 2023
to
February 12th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Products and Services Privacy Policy
Products and Services Privacy Policy
Who we are and what we do
Scope of this Privacy Policy
Self-regulatory standards
Information collection
Information use and legal basis
Information sharing
Information
security
Information
retention
International transfers
Additional disclosures for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
Your choices and legal rights
California privacy rights
Contact
us
Changes to this Privacy Policy
Capitalised terms used in this Products and Services Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) are defined in
Key Terms
unless otherwise defined herein. See German translation
here
.
Who we are and what we do
Quantcast (“
we
”, “
our
”, or “
us
”) is a global digital advertising technology group of companies. Quantcast offers products and services that help digital advertisers and publishers (collectively, “
Clients
”) understand and grow their audiences (the “
Solutions
”). Through Quantcast Advertise Solutions, advertiser Clients can plan, activate, and measure the performance of their advertising campaigns seamlessly in a single audience platform, which helps them to place their ads to maximise results. Through Quantcast Measure Solutions, digital publisher Clients leverage insights to better understand the makeup of their audiences, how audiences spend their time across their digital properties, and what audiences care about, all of which help these digital businesses better connect their content and
Audiences
with the right advertising.
To provide the Solutions, Quantcast collects and uses
Personal Information
for various purposes, such as measuring and understanding audiences, targeting and delivering ads, measuring ad performance, and similar related purposes. As described in the “
Information Collection
” section below, we may join or match Personal Information about you, which may include your
Online Data
from your visits across different digital properties, like websites or mobile apps, that have implemented Quantcast Pixels, Tags or SDKs (which is sometimes called “tracking” in the industry) or Offline Data . This allows us, for example, to enrich our existing data sets and provide meaningful reports for our Clients regarding the effectiveness of their ads or content. We may also combine Personal Information that we collect in order to probabilistically link media consumption to a single user, which is sometimes called Cross-Media Matching/Linking. To the extent that we combine Personal Information that we collect from and about you in connection with our performance of the Solutions, we will use such combined information only as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy describes in more detail how we collect, use, disclose, and protect Personal Information, otherwise obtain and Process it in connection with the delivery of the Solutions, and the controls we provide you to manage such information and exercise your choices and legal rights. As noted in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section below, we use the Transparency and Consent Framework (“
TCF
”) standard to facilitate compliance with applicable laws in Europe, primarily in accordance with the EU General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”). Because the TCF is one means of explaining Processing activities, and because our Processing activities are consistent globally, the TCF Purposes are applicable to all Personal Information that we Process (regardless of the information’s country of origin).
In the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast Corporation, located at 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107. Personal Information relating to individuals located within the United States provided to or gathered by us in connection with the delivery of the Solutions is controlled by Quantcast Corporation.
Outside of the United States, the Solutions are provided by Quantcast International Limited, located at Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland. In so far as Quantcast acts as a “controller” (as defined under applicable law), Quantcast International Limited is the controller of your Personal Information if you reside in the European Economic Area (EEA), United Kingdom (UK), Switzerland, or any other jurisdiction outside of the United States.
Scope of this Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy covers Quantcast’s use of Personal Information for the Solutions only. This Privacy Policy does not cover:
Quantcast’s privacy management products, which include our TCF consent management platform (“CMP”), Quantcast Choice. For more information about Quantcast Choice, please click here.
Personal Information collected from our website, www.quantcast.com, except to the extent that we use our own Solutions on our website. It also does not pertain to the collection and use of Personal Information in connection with our corporate functions, such as marketing, recruiting, people management, business-to-business communications, and so forth. For our privacy policy relating to our website and our corporate functions, please click
here
.
Any third parties’ handling of Personal Information, unless explicitly stated otherwise. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of any other companies that you engage or interact with to understand their information handling and privacy practices.
We use some phrases in this Privacy Policy that are unique to our business and/or the digital advertising industry. For a list of defined terms that you should familiarise yourself with to make it easier to review this Privacy Policy, please review the
Key Terms
.
California Notice at Collection
: We collect the categories of Personal Information listed in the “
Categories of personal information collected
” subsection of the “
California privacy rights
” section below. As further described in the
“
Information use and legal basis
”
section below, we collect this information in order to deliver the Solutions and conduct our business. To learn more, please see the “
California privacy rights
”
section.
Self-regulatory standards
Quantcast supports and participates in several digital advertising self-regulatory organisations, as further described below.
We are members in good standing of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI) and adhere to the
NAI 2020 Code of Conduct
.
We participate in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) and adhere to the
DAA Self-Regulatory Principles
.
We participate in the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) and are certified under the
EDAA Principles
.
We participate in, and comply with, the policies and technical specifications of the
TCF
, as a vendor. Quantcast’s IAB Europe-assigned identification numbers are CMP ID #10 (Quantcast Choice) and Vendor ID #11.
Please see the “
Your choices and legal rights
” section of this Privacy Policy for more information about the opt-out tools offered by the NAI, DAA, and EDAA.
Do Not Track (“
DNT
”)
is a preference that you can set in certain web browsers to inform the websites you visit that you do not want information about your online activity collected over time and across third-party websites or online services. We do not honor DNT or other similar signals at this time, due to the lack of a clear industry standard.
Information collection
We collect or receive Personal Information about or relating to you in various ways, including from digital properties, like websites, mobile apps, and other sources of digital content. Details about the categories of Personal Information we collect and receive, the source or manner in which we obtain each category of Personal Information, the purpose(s) for which we Process each category of Personal Information, and the retention period for each category of Personal Information we Process can be found in the table below. As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, where applicable the Processing purposes identified in the table below are tied to the TCF Purposes outlined in the “
Information use and legal bases
” section.
Category and Description of Personal Information
Source of Personal Information
Purpose for Processing (including where relevant the TCF Purpose) and Retention Period
Pseudonymous Identifiers:
unique values that distinguish your browser profile(s) or device(s).
Examples include a Cookie ID, device IP Address or other Device Identifiers or Device Configuration/ Information.
Usually generated when Pixels, Tags, or SDKs are loaded by a Client on its digital property (i.e., website, mobile app, or device) and sends information to us. Different kinds of Pixels, Tags, or SDKs are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Such information may also be received through a server- to- server connection, such as when receiving a Bid Request.
Store and/or access information on a device (TCF Purpose 1)
Cookie life span is up to 13 months each time it’s reset
Select basic ads (TCF Purpose 2)
Up to 30 days
Create personalised ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
Up to 30 days
Select personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
Up to 13 months
Measure ad performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Up to 13 months
Apply market research to generate audience insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Up to 13 months
Technically deliver ads or content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Up to 30 days
Matching and combining offline data sources (TCF Feature 1)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Recording consent choices made by users
Up to 30 days
Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
:
The time zone and approximate geolocation (e.g., postal code or city) of your device.
Inferred or derived by Quantcast from your device’s IP Address or included in Bid Requests.
Select basic ads (TCF Purpose 2)
Up to 30 days
Create personalised ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
Up to 30 days
Select personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
Up to 30 days
Measure ad performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Up to 30 days
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Up to 30 days
Apply market research to generate audience insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Up to 30 days
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Up to 30 days
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Up to 30 days
Matching and combining offline data sources (TCF Feature 1)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Event Data
: Information relating to your Online Data, which may include Pseudonymous Identifiers, Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, HTTP Request Header Information, Device Information, and Browsing Data.
Generated when Pixels, Tags or SDKs, installed by a Client on its digital property, loads and sends information to us.
Different kinds of Pixels, Tags or SDKs are used for different purposes, but the types of information generated are the same.
Create personali ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
Up to 30 days
Measure ad performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Up to 13 months
Apply market research to generate audience insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Up to 13 months
Technically deliver ads or content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Up to 30 days
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Bid Request Data:
An offer from a digital publisher, like a website or mobile app owner, to show an ad on their property.
Bid Request Data includes information about your visit to the publisher’s digital property, which helps us understand where an ad will be displayed, Device Information, and who might see it.
Bid Request Data also commonly includes a Pseudonymous Identifier (if available), the content that the ad would serve into, the type of device the ad would be served on, the Imprecise / Approximate Location Information of the device, the size of the ad, and consent information. Because Bid Requests include information about the content you are visiting, over time, accumulated Bid Requests may show your browsing behavior.
Received from a digital publisher.
Select basic ads (TCF Purpose 2)
Up to 30 days
Create personali ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
Up to 30 days
Select personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
Up to 13 months
Measure ad performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Up to 13 months
Apply market research to generate audience insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Up to 45 days
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Up to 45 days
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Up to 45 days
Technically deliver ads or content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Up to 30 days
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
The retention period will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued
Imported Data (Client)
:
Pseudonymised Information, which may include Online Data, and/or Offline Data that may be apportioned by Browsing Data, Attributes, Segments, Label Data and Interests.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an Application Programming Interface (“
API
”) by a particular Client for use on its behalf.
Create personalised ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
Up to 30 days
Select personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
Up to 30 days
Apply market research to generate audience insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Up to 30 days
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Up to 30 days
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Up to 30 days
Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)
:
Pseudonymised Information, which may include Online Data, and/or Offline Data that may be apportioned by Browsing Data, Attributes, Segments, Label Data and Interests.
Uploaded to the Quantcast platform or provided to us via an API by third-party Data Management Platforms or Data Providers.
Create personalised ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
Up to 30 days
Select personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
Up to 30 days
Apply market research to generate audience insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Up to 30 days
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Up to 30 days
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Up to 30 days
Inferences/Inferred Data
:
Information drawn from the above-listed categories of information (i.e., Event Data, Bid Request Data, Imported Data (Client), and Imported Data (Third Party/Segment)).
We may, for example, use information that we have collected to infer your interests, age, gender, marital status, or income range. These Inferences may include Interests and Attributes.
Derived by Quantcast from previously collected Event Data, Bid Request Data, Imported Data (Client), and/or Imported Data (Third Party/Segment).
Create personalised ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
Up to 30 days
Select personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
Up to 30 days
Measure ad performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Up to 13 months
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Up to 30 days
Apply market research to generate audience insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Up to 13 months
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Up to 13 months
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Up to 13 months
Training Data
:
Pseudonymous Information used to improve Quantcast’s algorithms and measure how well they are working.
Received from third-party data providers and matched to Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Create personalised ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
Up to 30 days
Measure content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
Up to 30 days
Apply market research to generate audience insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Up to 30 days
Develop and improve products (TCF Purpose 10)
Up to 30 days
Ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Up to 30 days
Information you provide
:
This may include your contact details, (e.g., name, email address, or phone number) and any commentary or other information you provide when you contact Quantcast.
Provided by you when you contact Quantcast.
Carrying out our legitimate business purposes.
Retention Period: 18 months
Additionally, any of the categories of Personal Information described above may be Processed for the following purposes.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
Categories of Personal Information and associated retention periods are determined by the underlying purpose for which the Personal Information is Processed.
Responding to legal requests
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
Conducting research
Hosting of Personal Information for above-listed purposes
Technically, all Personal Information is Processed in the course of being hosted on a server or in cloud computing service. Retention periods for each category of Personal Information Processed are disclosed above.
Sensitive information
: We generally do not seek or permit sensitive Personal Information (e.g., information revealing an individual’s racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership; genetic or biometric data that is Processed for the purpose of uniquely identifying an individual; information concerning an individual’s health, sex life, or sexual orientation; and information relating to criminal convictions and offenses) to be used in the Solutions. However, as allowed by applicable laws and rules, we may collect and Process non-sensitive health-related information (outside of the EEA, UK, and Switzerland) in connection with the delivery of the Solutions. We provide a list of standard health segments and a representative sample of custom health segments that we use for targeted advertising here. Please note that where we Process any of your sensitive Personal Information, we seek and obtain your consent and/or otherwise Process such information in accordance with applicable laws and rules.
Children’s information
: We do not seek or permit Personal Information from children under the age of 16. If a parent or guardian becomes aware that his or her child has provided us with Personal Information, that parent or guardian should contact us at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. If we become aware that a child has provided us with Personal Information, we will take all reasonable steps to delete such information from our files.
Contractual commitments from our Clients and third-party Data Providers
: We contractually require other companies that provide or make available to us Personal Information to take steps to ensure that we can lawfully Process such information, which include: (i) posting complete and accurate privacy policies that comply with applicable laws and rules and describe their Personal Information collection, use, and sharing practices; (ii) obtaining all legally-required consents and necessary permissions; and (iii) providing individuals with appropriate choices and the ability to opt out of the Processing of their Personal Information, where necessary or appropriate.
Information use and legal basis
As described in the “
Who we are and what we do
” section, we generally use the TCF as the mechanism for describing our Processing activities, and in Europe specifically for establishing our legal basis for Processing and managing users’ preferences for online personalised advertising and related activities. The TCF is designed to allow a digital business to present information and choices to users on its website relating to the Processing of their Personal Information.
We Process Personal Information for the purposes for which it was collected or provided to us. The table below describes the specific purposes for which we Process the Personal Information we collect or otherwise obtain about you. This table includes:
the purposes for which Quantcast Processes Personal Information (which are tied to the defined purposes for Processing, special purposes, and features set forth in the
TCF Policies
and official technical documentation disseminated by IAB Europe where applicable),
a description of each Processing activity using TCF-specific terminology (to the extent applicable), and
the legal basis that we rely on to perform each of our Processing activities.
Please note that in Europe, where we indicate that “
Legitimate Interests
” in accordance with the GDPR is the legal basis for Processing, we carry out the Processing in reliance on our legitimate interests or those of a third party (e.g., our Clients), provided that such interests are not outweighed by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Processing Purpose / TCF Purpose (where TCF is applicable)
Description of Processing Activity (using TCF Purpose terms)
Legal Basis
for Processing
Storing and/or accessing information on a device (TCF Purpose 1)
Cookies, Device Identifiers, or other information more fully described in association with the purposes below can be stored or accessed on your device for the purposes presented to you.
Consent
Selecting basic ads (TCF Purpose 2)
Ads can be shown to you based on the content you’re viewing, the app you’re using, your device’s Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, or your device type.
When selecting basic ads, Quantcast will:
Use real-time information about the context in which the ad will be shown, including information about the content and your device, such as: device type and capabilities, User Agent, URL, and IP Address
Use your device’s Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Control the frequency of ads shown to you
Sequence the order in which ads are shown to you
Prevent an ad from serving in an unsuitable editorial (brand-unsafe) context
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads.
Creating a personalised ads profile (TCF Purpose 3)
A profile can be built about you and your Interests to show you personalised ads that are relevant to you.
To create or edit a profile for use in personalised advertising, Quantcast will:
Collect information about you, including your activity, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, or Imprecise/Approximate Location Information
Aggregate Attributes and Interests and Panel-based demographic information,
Combine information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent
Selecting personalised ads (TCF Purpose 4)
When serving personalised ads, Quantcast will select personalised ads based on Personal Information collected from or about you, such as your prior activity, Interests, visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media, Imprecise/Approximate Location Information, demographic information or Inferences.
Consent
Measuring ad performance (TCF Purpose 7)
Quantcast will measure the performance and effectiveness of ads that you see or interact with.
In particular, to measure whether and how ads were delivered to you and how you interacted with them, Quantcast will:
Provide reporting to Clients about ads, including their effectiveness and performance
Provide reporting to Clients about your interactions with ads using data observed during your interaction with the ad
Provide reporting to Clients about the ads displayed on their properties
Measure whether an ad is serving in a suitable editorial environment (brand-safe) context
Determine the percentage of the ad that had the opportunity to be seen and the duration of that opportunity
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across websites or mobile apps or streaming media
In the provision of the Solutions to some Clients, Quantcast may correlate information between entries within its own datasets that have the same Pseudonymous Identifier or with information obtained from Ad Serving, Ad Verification, or Data Management Platforms/Data Providers. We do this to provide aggregated reporting to Clients about the number of visitors to their digital properties.
Quantcast does not apply Panel or similarly derived Audience Insights data to ad measurement data without a separate legal basis to apply market research to generate Audience Insights.
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective of ascertaining, measuring, and improving the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Measuring content performance (TCF Purpose 8)
The performance and effectiveness of content that you see or interact with can be measured.
To measure content performance, Quantcast will:
Measure and report to Clients on how content was delivered to and interacted with by you
Provide reporting to Clients, using directly measurable or known information about your interactions with the content
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from across visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our Clients meet their objective of executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Applying market research to generate Audience Insights (TCF Purpose 9)
Market research can be used to learn more about the Audiences who visit websites/mobile apps and view ads.
To generate Audience Insights, Quantcast will:
Provide aggregate reporting to advertisers or their representatives (such as advertising agencies) about the Audiences reached by their ads, through Panel-based and similarly derived insights
Provide aggregate reporting to Clients about the Audiences that were served or interacted with content and/or ads on their properties by applying Panel-based and similarly derived insights
Associate Offline Data with you for the purposes of market research to generate Audience Insights (if we have declared that we will match and combine Offline Data sources)
Combine this information with other information previously collected, including from visits to websites or mobile apps or streaming media
Consent or Legitimate Interests, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to help our Clients meet their objectives of finding new customers and growing their brands through the delivery of relevant ads and/or executing their digital content strategies more effectively.
Developing and improving products (TCF Purpose 10 )
Your information can be used to improve Quantcast’s existing systems and software and to develop new products.
To develop and improve its products, Quantcast will:
Use information to improve its existing products with new features and to develop new products
Create new models and algorithms through machine learning
For example, Quantcast matches its datasets with Training Data, which usually includes Event Data, Bid Request Data, Imported Data (Client), and/or Imported Data (Third Party/Segment). Quantcast primarily uses Training Data to train its algorithms how to infer individuals’ Attributes and
Interests
in the context of the Solutions.
Consent or Legitimate Interest, depending on the choice of the Client that is using the TCF.
Where we rely on Legitimate Interests, we carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Ensuring security, preventing fraud, and debugging (TCF Special Purpose 1)
Your information can be used to monitor for and prevent fraudulent activity and ensure our systems and processes work properly and securely.
To ensure security, prevent fraud, and debug, Quantcast will:
Ensure information is securely transmitted
Detect and prevent malicious, fraudulent, invalid, or illegal activity
Ensure correct and efficient operation of systems and processes, including monitoring and enhancing the performance of systems and processes engaged in permitted purposes
Legitimate Interests
We conduct the Processing to meet organizational objectives such as to maintain our IT systems; to ensure the electronic security of our business; and to detect and prevent against malicious, fraudulent, invalid, and illegal activity.
Technically deliver ads or content (TCF Special Purpose 2)
Your device can receive and send information that allows you to see and interact with ads and content.
To deliver information and respond to technical requests, Quantcast will:
Use your device’s IP Address to deliver an ad or content over the internet
Respond to your interactions with an ad or content by sending you to a landing page
Use information about your device type and capabilities for delivering ads or content (e.g., to deliver the right size ad creative or video file in a format supported by your device)
Quantcast may also match Pseudonymous Identifiers with third parties in order to deliver ads to Audiences.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to help our advertiser Clients meet their objective to ascertain, measure, and improve the effectiveness of their ad campaigns.
Matching and combining offline data sources (TCF Feature 1)
Offline Data can be combined with your online activity in support of one or more purposes or special purposes outlined in this table.
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Linking different devices (TCF Feature 2)
Different devices can be determined as belonging to you or your household in support of one or more purposes.
Through Cross-Media Matching/Linking, Quantcast will:
Deterministically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
Probabilistically determine that two or more devices belong to you or your household
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Receiving and using automatically sent device characteristics for identification (TCF Feature 3)
Your device will be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends, such as IP Address or browser type.
In particular, Quantcast will:
Create an identifier using information collected automatically from your device for specific characteristics (e.g., IP Address or User Agent information)
Use such an identifier to attempt to re-identify your device
The legal basis will depend on the TCF Purpose pursued.
Establishing, bringing, or defending against complaints, legal claims (including threatened or anticipated legal claims), and regulatory inquiries
We Process, preserve, and share Personal Information when we seek legal advice or seek to protect ourselves in the context of litigation and other disputes.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations, litigation, and regulatory inquiries.
Responding to legal requests
We preserve and share Personal Information in response to legal requests from law enforcement and other government officials, to comply with a subpoena or similar legal process, and when we believe in good faith that disclosure of such information is necessary to comply with a judicial proceeding or court order.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our objective of protecting ourselves and others, including in connection with investigations and regulatory inquiries.
Complying with relevant laws and regulations
We Process Personal Information to comply with our legal obligations under applicable law.
Examples of Irish and EU laws enforceable in Ireland that could give rise to an obligation requiring us to Process Personal Information we hold about you are:
Civil and commercial matters
: where we are in receipt of a court order to disclose information for the purposes of court proceedings, such as under Regulation (EU) No 1215/2012 on jurisdiction and the recognition and enforcement of judgments in civil and commercial matters
Criminal matters
: to comply with requests from Irish law enforcement to provide information in relation to an investigation, such as under Section 10 of the Criminal Justice (Miscellaneous Provisions) Act 1997 as amended by 6(1)(a) of the Criminal Justice Act 2006 or to take steps to report information to law enforcement where required
Consumer matters
: to comply with our obligations under consumer law, such as the Competition and Consumer Protection Act 2014 (e.g., where the Irish Competition and Consumer Protection Commission requests information)
Corporate and taxation matters
: to comply with our obligations under company legislation and tax law, such as the Companies Act 2014 or where the Irish Revenue requests information
Regulatory matters
: to comply with our obligations under data protection laws, including to engage with regulators, such as the Data Protection Commission under the GDPR and the Data Protection Act 2018
See
here
for the current list of laws which are enforceable in Ireland that give rise to a legal obligation for Quantcast which results in the Processing of Personal Information. As new laws may be enacted or other obligations may require us to Process your Personal Information, we will update this list from time to time.
Compliance with a legal obligation.
Conducting research
We use Personal Information to conduct research, surveys, product testing, and troubleshooting to help us operate and improve our products and services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of delivering and continuously improving the Solutions for our Clients.
Hosting information
We Process Personal Information to manage our business, which includes hosting Personal Information in our on-premise data centers and/or cloud computing services.
Legitimate Interests
We carry out the Processing to meet our organisational objective of delivering the Solutions to our Clients.
Information sharing
In connection with one or more of the purposes outlined in the “
Information use and legal basis
” section above, we may share your Personal Information with the categories of third parties described below.
Category of Recipient
Description and Purpose of Sharing
Categories of
Personal Information
Shared
Quantcast-affiliated companies
We share your Personal Information with Quantcast-affiliated companies in order to provide the Solutions.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our vendors (including service providers/data processors)
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our vendors.
We share your Personal Information with vendors who act on our behalf and are subject to binding contractual obligations and restrictions on the Processing of Personal Information we share with them. For example, these companies assist with information hosting, information Processing, database management, and administrative tasks.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Our partners, such as Data Management Platforms and Data Providers and Advertising Exchanges
Visit the
Quantcast Partners
page for a list of our Partners
We share Pseudonymous Identifiers with companies that we partner with to support the operation of the Solutions. Specifically, Quantcast shares Pseudonymous Identifiers with 1) data providers via Data Management Platforms for the purpose of performing Cookie Syncing/Matches with Imported Data (Client) and Third Party/Segment Data, and 2) and Advertising Exchanges for the purpose of serving ads.
Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Relevant third parties as part of a corporate transaction
In the event of a reorganisation, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, or other disposition of all or any portion of our business, assets, or stock (including in connection with a bankruptcy or similar proceeding), we may share your Personal Information with (or transfer your Personal Information to) certain third parties, such as the acquiring entity and its advisors. We may also make certain information available to a potential investor or purchaser (and their advisers) in advance of any such transaction’s completion.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Competent governmental and public authorities
We may share your Personal Information with governmental and law enforcement authorities, in each case to comply with legal or regulatory obligations or requests.
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
Other third parties
We will share your Personal Information with other third parties at your direction or with your consent.
Additionally, we may share your Personal Information as necessary or appropriate or where otherwise permitted by law to:
Enforce our agreements
Protect our operations
Protect our rights, privacy, safety, property, and/or those of other persons
Allow us to pursue available remedies or limit damages that we may sustain
All or certain categories of Personal Information are shared only as necessary or appropriate.
We also create and share with our Clients insights or reports regarding the makeup of the Audiences that visit their digital properties or the performance of their advertising campaigns. These insights and reports may contain aggregated data from which individual users cannot be uniquely identified or data from which Quantcast has removed Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Information security
We employ appropriate organisational and technical security safeguards designed to keep Personal Information secure when it is transmitted to us and once we receive it. These measures may include encryption and employment of information storage security technologies to restrict access to our network. However, please be aware that no method of transmitting information over the internet or storing information is completely secure.
Information retention
We retain your Personal Information for as long as necessary for the purposes for which it was collected, as described in the “
Information Collection
” section above, except where we are required to retain the information for a longer period of time. Once Personal Information has reached its retention period, as applicable, we may either de-identify it (for CCPA purposes), anonymise it (for GDPR purposes) or permanently delete it.
International transfers
Quantcast operates a global service, and we engage vendors located around the world to help us deliver the Solutions. Accordingly, your Personal Information may be transferred outside of the country or region in which you reside, including to the United States and other countries where either our data centers, vendors, affiliates, or Partners are located. Where we transfer your Personal Information internationally, we do so in accordance with applicable law.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that we may need to transfer your Personal Information to countries that have not been recognised by the
European Commision
and/or the
UK government
as providing an adequate level of protection for Personal Information. We generally use EU Standard Contractual Clauses (to facilitate both controller-to-controller and controller-to-processor transfers) or other government-approved contracts that provide appropriate safeguards for Personal Information that is transferred to countries that have not been recognised as providing an adequate level of protection. You can contact us at privacy@quantcast.com to request a copy of our Standard Contractual Clauses.
In certain limited circumstances, we rely on other lawful mechanisms for international transfers of Personal Information or rely on derogations, such as the contractual necessity derogation.
Additional disclosures for EEA, UK, and Switzerland residents
If you are located in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, please note that the Solutions are provided by our European entity, Quantcast International Limited. In Processing Personal Information in the context of providing the Solutions to our Clients, Quantcast Internal Limited generally acts as a data controller. More specifically, Quantcast International Limited is a joint controller along with its Client when we jointly determine the purposes for which your Personal Information will be Processed. For example, we are joint controllers with Advertisers and Publishers for Personal Information that is collected as Quantcast Cookies, or using Pixels, Tags and SDKs deployed by our Clients on their digital properties, and for the Processing of other Personal Information introduced into the Solutions directly by the Client. This is because both Quantcast and the Client have influence over whether and how we collect and Process the Personal Information. In limited situations, Quantcast is the sole data controller of Personal Information when we are Processing it for our own independent purposes, for instance when we use a Quantcast Pseudonymous Identifier or we derive aggregated analytics for modeling, developing our algorithms, or improving the Solutions.
Your choices and legal rights
Under applicable law, you may have certain rights in relation to your Personal Information. Additional details about the rights that you may have and how to exercise such rights can be found below.
Right of access
:
The right to request access to your Personal Information and receive certain information, including the categories of your Personal Information we collect and disclose. To exercise this right, see our request form
here
.
Right of rectification/correction
: The right to request that we rectify (or correct) inaccurate Personal Information about you. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right of rectification/correction, due to the limited Personal Information we Process, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to request deletion of your Personal Information. To request the deletion of your Personal Information, see our request form
here
.
Right of erasure/deletion
: The right, in certain cases, to request that we delete your Personal Information, provided there are valid grounds for doing so and subject to applicable law and exceptions. To exercise this right, see our request form
here
.
Right to data portability
: The right, in certain cases, to receive a copy of your Personal Information in a structured, commonly used, and machine-readable format and transmit such information to another controller. To exercise this right, see our request form
here
.
Right to object (marketing)
: The right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information for direct marketing purposes. In practice, we satisfy this right by providing you with the option to opt out of our Processing of your Personal Information for advertising purposes. To exercise this right, see our opt-out page
here
. Additionally, as noted in the “
Self Regulatory Standards
” section above, we are a member of the NAI and a DAA and EDAA participating company. Each of these self-regulatory bodies offers a tool that allows individuals to opt out of receiving targeted advertising from Quantcast and other participating companies. These links will take you to the
NAI opt-out
page and the
DAA opt-out
page. If you are located in Europe, you may prefer to visit the
EDAA opt-out
page.
Right to object (legitimate interests)
: The right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information where we Process it on the basis of our legitimate interests, as described in the “
Information Use and Legal Bases
” section above. Unless we have compelling legitimate grounds or the information is needed for the establishment, exercise or defense of legal claims, we will cease Processing your Personal Information when you object. To exercise this right, see our opt-out page
here
.
Right to restrict Processing
: The right, in certain cases, to temporarily restrict our Processing of your Personal Information, provided there are valid grounds for doing so. In practice, if you seek to exercise your right to restrict the Processing of your Personal Information, we will treat it as an exercise of the right on an ongoing, rather than temporary, basis (i.e., the request will be treated as you exercising the right to object to the Processing of your Personal Information). To exercise this right, see our opt-out page
here
.
Right to withdraw your consent
: The right to withdraw the consent you have provided at any time, where we Process your Personal Information on the basis of your consent. Please note that the lawfulness of any Processing undertaken prior to your withdrawal of consent shall not be affected by the withdrawal. To exercise this right, see our opt-out page
here
.
Right to lodge a complaint
:
The right to complain to the relevant authority regarding the Processing of your Personal Information by us or on our behalf. In the EU, the lead supervisory authority is the
Irish Data Protection Commissioner.
See the section “
Contact Us
” below.
Please note that the rights listed above may not be exercised in certain circumstances, such as when the Processing of your Personal Information is necessary to comply with a legal obligation to which we are subject or for the exercise or defense of legal claims. Additionally, in order to protect your privacy, we may require proof of your identity before we can act on your request but only where it is necessary and proportionate to request this information.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland and have issues or questions about the above-listed rights, you may contact our European Data Protection Officer via
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you are based in the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, under applicable law, you also generally have the right not to be subject to a decision when it is based on automated Processing (i.e., an operation that is performed without any human intervention), if it produces a legal effect (i.e., impacts your legal rights) or significantly affects you in a similar way (e.g., significantly affects your financial circumstances or ability to access essential goods or services). Please note, however, that Quantcast does not make decisions based solely on automated Processing that produce a legal effect or similarly significantly affect individuals.
California privacy rights
The California Consumer Privacy Act (“
CCPA
”) provides California residents with certain rights. Pursuant to the CCPA, we are providing the following additional details regarding the categories of Personal Information about California residents that we collect, use, and disclose.
Categories of personal information collected
: We have collected the following categories of Personal Information from California residents within the last twelve (12) months:
Identifiers
, such as IP Address and other similar Pseudonymous Identifiers.
Internet or other electronic network activity information
, including browsing history and information regarding individuals’ interactions with websites or mobile apps or streaming media.
Geolocation data
, such as Imprecise/Approximate Location Information derived from device IP Addresses.
Inferences
, which refers to inferences drawn from any of the information in these categories of Personal Information to predict the individual’s characteristics.
Categories of sources of personal information
: As described in the “
Information collection
”
section above, we collect the above-listed categories of Personal Information directly from individuals; through automated means (e.g. Pixels, Tags and SDKs, Cookies or Bid Requests); and from third parties (e.g., our Clients).
Disclosures of personal information
: As described in the “
Information sharing
” section above, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed Personal Information about California residents in all of the above-listed categories of Personal Information to our affiliates and vendors. Additionally, in the preceding twelve (12) months, we have disclosed Identifiers to our partners.
Sale of personal information
: Quantcast does not “sell” (as defined in the CCPA) Personal Information and has not “sold” Personal Information in the preceding twelve (12) months in relation to operating the Solutions.
Individual rights and requests
: If you are a California resident, you have the right to request that we:
Disclose to you the following information covering the 12 months preceding your request:
the categories of Personal Information we have collected about you and the categories of sources from which we collected such information;
the specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected about you;
the business or commercial purpose for collecting Personal Information about you;
the categories of third parties with whom we shared or to whom we disclosed such Personal Information; and
if we sold or disclosed your Personal Information for a business purpose, two separate lists disclosing:
sales, identifying the Personal Information categories that each category of recipient received; and
disclosures for a business purpose, identifying the Personal Information categories that each category of recipient obtained.
Delete the
Per
s
onal Information
we have collected from you.
We will not discriminate against you if you decide to exercise your rights under the CCPA.
If you are interested in exercising one or more of the rights outlined above, please click the relevant link in the
“Your choices and legal rights”
section above. You may also submit requests by contacting us via email at privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com. We will attempt to verify your identity and respond to your request consistent with the CCPA.
If you authorise a natural person or business entity to submit a request on your behalf (an “
Authorised Agent
”), the Authorised Agent may use the submission methods noted above. As part of our verification process, we will require proof concerning their status as an Authorised Agent, which may include proof of their registration with the California Secretary of State to conduct business in California and/or proof that they have power of attorney in accordance with California probate law. We may also require you to verify your identity directly with us or directly confirm with us that you provided the agent with permission to submit the request.
Information about annual data requests is available
here
.
Contact us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy or our information handling practices, please feel free to contact us.
Individuals located in the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast Corp.
795 Folsom Street
San Francisco, CA 94107
Email: privacy [at] quantcast [dot] com
Individuals located outside of the United States, please contact us at:
Quantcast International Limited
Beaux Lane House
Lower Mercer Street
Dublin 2, Ireland
Email: privacy.qil [at] quantcast [dot] com
The Data Protection Officer (DPO) for Quantcast International Limited can be contacted at
dpo@quantcast.com
.
If you have contacted us or our DPO about a privacy or information use concern and feel that we have not addressed it satisfactorily, you may contact our US-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
.
If you are a resident of the EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you also have the right to lodge a complaint against us with our lead supervisory authority, the
Irish Data Protection Commission
, or the
supervisory authority
in your country of residence.
Changes to this Privacy Policy
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time to reflect changes in our practices with respect to the collection, use, and/or disclosure of Personal Information or changes in applicable law. The “Last Updated” date at the top of this page indicates when this Privacy Policy was last updated. Any changes will become effective when we post a revised version of this Privacy Policy unless otherwise specified.
Some of our changes will be minor, but if we make significant changes to how we use or share your Personal Information, we will:
inform you in advance by posting a notice on our website
wait for a period of time before implementing the changes
We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy periodically to remain informed about our information handling and privacy practices.
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
QUANTCAST BUYER TERMS
Last Updated: March 6, 2025
If Company has an active, duly executed contract for one or more of the Services, that existing agreement will govern Company’s use of such Services within the scope of such agreement instead of these Quantcast Buyer Terms (“
Agreement
”).
This Agreement is a legally binding contract between Quantcast and Company. “
Company
” means (A) when an individual accepts this Agreement on his or her own behalf, such individual, or (B) when an individual accepts this Agreement on behalf of a company or other legal entity, that company or legal entity. “
Quantcast
” means (X) Quantcast Corp. if Company is domiciled in the United States, (Y) Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd. if Company is domiciled in any country or territory located in the Asia Pacific (APAC) region and (Z) Quantcast International Limited if Company is domiciled in any other country or territory.
Quantcast may modify this Agreement. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Services. Company’s continued use of the Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates.
1.
Incorporated Terms
This Agreement incorporates the following additional terms (“
Incorporated Terms
”), as updated from time to time:
Quantcast Campaign Policy
(“
Campaign Policy
”)
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Buyers
(“
Privacy Implementation
”)
US State Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent the Services include processing Personal Information subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (“
DPA
”)
International Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent that the Services include processing Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (also “
DPA
”)
Any applicable
Additional Terms
(defined below)
2.
Services
2.1. “
Services
” means the Quantcast platform (“
Platform
”) and, to the extent provided by Quantcast under this Agreement, Campaign Tags, Platform Data, and any other services provided by Quantcast. The Services may permit Company to purchase ad placements on third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video, and other content/properties) (“
Inventory
”) that are made available by third-party providers (“
Inventory Providers
”) and Third-Party Services (defined below). For clarity, the “Services” do not include Inventory or Third-Party Services.
2.2. Some Services may be subject to different or additional terms (“
Additional Terms
”) that are described on the Additional Terms page linked above, in the Platform or otherwise made available to Company in writing. Unless the parties agree in writing for Quantcast to provide campaign management services or professional services, the Services do not include those services.
3.
Accounts and Authorized Users
3.1. Company will ensure its account information is accurate and current. Company will promptly notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of Company access credentials. Quantcast
may review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users. Company must obtain Quantcast’s prior written consent before adding third-party Authorized Users (i.e., non-employees) and Quantcast may require such third-party Authorized Users to enter into separate terms with Quantcast.
3.2. “
Authorized User
” means an individual authorized by Company to use Company’s account on the Platform. Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials. Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users, the level of permissioning of each Authorized User, and all activity under its account, including the confidentiality of all access credentials. Without limiting the foregoing, Company will immediately notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of any access credentials. Company will ensure that all Authorized Users use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, and are aware of, and comply with, this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is liable for any breach of this Agreement by any Authorized User.
4.
Company Clients
If Company is using the Services on behalf of third-party clients (“
Clients
”), Company represents and warrants that it has all rights and authorizations needed to do so. Company will only use the Services for Clients with which Company has a direct written agency agreement and will obligate its Clients to comply with this Agreement, including the Incorporated Terms. Company is responsible for the actions and/or inactions of Clients and for ensuring their compliance.
5.
Fees and Payment
5.1. Fees will be provided in the Platform or by other written means.
5.2. Unless Quantcast approves a different payment arrangement in writing, Company authorizes Quantcast to charge amounts owed under this Agreement to Company’s credit card, via automatic ACH, or such other similar payment method, at Quantcast’s option. Company will provide its most current credit card and/or other information required to complete payment, and keep such information updated if it changes. For the avoidance of doubt, if Company makes credit card, wire transfer or ACH payments or such other similar payment method, Company agrees to the applicable third-party terms as set forth in the Additional Terms. If Quantcast authorizes Company to pay invoices in arrears, Company will pay invoices within thirty (30) days of the invoice date. Quantcast may revise Company’s credit limit or require prepayment at any time in its sole discretion. Quantcast may charge interest at a rate of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company is responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect unpaid invoices. All payment obligations are non-cancelable and all amounts paid for Services provided are non-refundable. If Company requires a purchase order to make payments, Company will include the corresponding purchase order number in the Platform. All amounts due must be paid without setoff or deduction.
5.3. Company is solely responsible for all amounts due for any Third-Party Services that Company opts to use. Company acknowledges that any charges for Third-Party Services shown in the Platform or otherwise provided by Quantcast are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
5.4. Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating all metrics related to the Services, including all amounts owed under this Agreement. Company acknowledges that all metrics, fees and other amounts shown in Platform are preliminary and final amounts will be as confirmed, invoiced or billed by Quantcast.
5.5. All charges under this Agreement are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of this Agreement for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
6.
Services License and Requirements
6.1. Company may use the Services solely as set forth in this Agreement. Subject to this Agreement, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable license to
(a) access and use the Services on a self-serve basis, and (b) use the Platform Data presented via the Services solely for the purpose of using the Services.
6.2. Company will obtain all rights necessary to perform tracking and analytics, and store and serve the advertisements (“
Ads
”) associated with Company’s campaigns (“
Campaigns
”). Company will not use the Services with Ads, Company Media, other content or products or services that violate any applicable laws, regulations, third-party rights, or this Agreement including the Incorporated Terms. If Company asks Quantcast to take actions on behalf of Company or otherwise assist with Company’s use of the Services, Company consents to the actions and/or inactions that Quantcast takes on its behalf and retains sole responsibility for such assisted use of the Services.
6.3. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Services security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Services to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of a Client, if applicable), (d) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile, or disassemble the Services, including Platform Data, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Services or to end users, (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than the relevant Client who is obligated to treat such reports confidentially) or (g) use information collected during the course of Campaigns (e.g., via Company’s own tag, third party tags, etc.) outside Company’s use of the Services, including to create or enrich profiles of individual end users, including regarding third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video and other content/properties) that the end users have visited or the content or general interest area of such media. For example, Company may not create an audience of a particular publisher’s end users based on information derived or obtained by using the Services.
6.4. For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing, and improving the Services.
6.5. Quantcast reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon.
6.6. Except as expressly set forth in this Agreement, neither party grants the other party any rights, express or implied, and each party reserves all rights. If Company provides Quantcast with feedback regarding the Services, Company hereby grants Quantcast a perpetual, irrevocable, fully paid up right and license to such feedback, without accounting, attribution, or compensation to Company.
7.
Data Issues
7.1. Data Definitions
:
7.1.1. “
Aggregated Data
” means generalized, combined data from numerous campaigns of multiple Quantcast customers, including Company, that concerns campaign parameters, goals, or performance results of such campaigns and that does not permit identification of Company or any other Quantcast customer of the Services.
7.1.2. “
Campaign Data
” means the campaign-related reporting data generated in the course of the Services and provided to Company under this Agreement, such as Campaign performance reports. For the avoidance of doubt, Campaign Data does not include Tag Data.
7.1.3. “
Campaign Tag
” means a tag, pixel or other element provided by Quantcast to Company for Company or Clients to place on Company Media to enable the collection of Tag Data under this Agreement. For clarity, the term “Campaign Tags” does not refer to any ad serving tags or Measure tags provided by Quantcast (i.e., if Company elects to use Quantcast ad serving or Quantcast Measure).
7.1.4. “
Company Data
” means all information and materials that are onboarded to Company’s account in the Platform, whether directly or via a third-party (e.g., an onboarding service provider).
Without limiting the foregoing, Company Data includes all Campaign parameters (the data entered into the Platform for a Campaign such as name, budget, targeting strategy, etc.), Tag Data and any data onboarded by or on behalf of Company (e.g., first and/or third-party audiences). Company Data is a subset of Company’s Confidential Information.
7.1.5. “
Company Media
” means the Ads, websites, apps and other digital properties and content on which Company or Clients place Campaign Tags.
7.1.6. “
Model
” means the predictive profile of shared attributes and characteristics of a group of end users that Company desires to reach in a Campaign, created algorithmically by deriving observations from Company Data and Platform Data. For the avoidance of doubt, Models do not include any data at individual end user level or any end user-level identifiers that may be used to distinguish one end user from another end user (such as an end user ID or IP address).
7.1.7. “
Platform Data
” means the data residing in the Platform or otherwise generated or used in connection with the Services that does not constitute Company Data or Campaign Data, including Aggregated Data, Models, and third-party data (“
Third-Party Data
”). Some Platform Data may be presented to Company in the Platform user interface while other Platform Data may be used by the Platform on the back end (i.e., behind the scenes) to provide the Services. Platform Data is a subset of Quantcast’s Confidential Information.
7.1.8. “
Tag Data
” means the data collected via Campaign Tags.
7.2.
Company Data
: As between the parties, Company Data is the exclusive property of Company and/or the applicable Client. As to all Company Data (whether provided by Company, Client or a third-party on Company’s or a Client’s behalf), Company represents and warrants that it has sufficient rights to provide Company Data for use by Quantcast in compliance with this Agreement. Quantcast may use Company Data solely in compliance with the DPAs (including to create Models for Company, deliver Campaigns and create audience insights, etc.). Quantcast will not share Company
Data with any third-party except to the extent that Company requests third-party services that utilize Company Data (e.g., third-party measurement), Company Data is included as a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company. In addition, Quantcast may use non- Company-identifiable inferences made from Tag Data to produce, and as contained in, the Aggregated Data.
7.3.
Platform Data
: As between the parties, Platform Data is the exclusive property of Quantcast (or its third-party partners). Company may use Platform Data (whether directly, to the extent presented to Company in the Platform, or indirectly, to the extent used by the Platform to enable the Services) solely internally and solely for the purpose of using the Services as described in this Agreement. As to any Platform Data that Company can access and export using the self-serve features of the Platform, Company will not share such Platform Data with any third-party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Platform Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement
.
If Quantcast provides Company with Platform Data outside the self-serve features of the Platform (e.g., further detail about available audiences, etc.), such Platform Data is subject to any applicable Additional Terms. Company will not attempt to extract or recreate any Third-Party Data or other Platform Data that is not readily accessible via the normal functionality presented in the Platform or assemble similar data or audience segments itself (directly or indirectly through a third-party) on the basis of Third-Party Data or other Platform Data or information derived from the use of such data under this Agreement.
7.4.
Campaign Data
: Company may use Campaign Data for its internal business purposes provided that (a) it complies with its privacy policy, (b) it complies with the terms of this Agreement, and (c) it does not disclose Campaign Data to any third-party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Campaign Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement. Quantcast may use Campaign Data (i) to provide the Services, and (ii) within a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company.
7.5.
Models
: Models reside solely within the Platform and are not directly accessible to Company. Company’s license above includes the ability to use Models as an integrated part of the Services, solely for the purpose of selecting and gaining insights about the end users that Company wishes to reach with its Campaigns. Quantcast will not share Models generated for the purpose of Company’s Campaigns with other customers.
7.6.
Client Data
: Upon request from a Client (or an authorized third party on Client’s behalf, including Company), Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in accordance with such request (including sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Quantcast Platform). For clarity, “
Client Data
” means the (i) Tag Data from Client websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments created using the Tag Data or any Campaign Data generated from Campaigns delivered using such Client Data.
7.7.
No Off-Platform Use
: Company will not use the Services, the Campaign Data, or any information derived from the Services, Models or Campaign Data to create or enrich profiles of individual end users or to retarget any end user except via the Services.
8.
Compliance and Privacy
8.1. Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services), including Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self-regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means US State Privacy Laws and International Privacy Laws (defined in the linked DPAs). Company will comply with the Incorporated Terms.
8.2. Company will not use the Service or any Third Party Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of an end user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or
(b) any data of children, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media directed at children; or (c) data related to any end user that has requested deletion or opted out (collectively, “
Prohibited Data
”). “
Direct Identifier
” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID and certain hashed identifiers (e.g., email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email). For purposes of this Agreement, “
children
” refers to anyone age 16 or under or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
8.3. Company represents and warrants that it is not a covered entity under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (“HIPAA”), and does not have equivalent status under comparable local or international laws and regulations. If Company is using the Services on behalf of Clients, Company represents and warrants that Clients are not covered entities under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (“HIPAA”), and do not have equivalent status under comparable local or international laws and regulations.
9.
Third-Party Services
9.1. If Company uses any third-party branded product or service in connection with the Services (including Third-Party Data made available for use via the Services) (“
Third-Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply.
9.2. Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third-party terms and requirements. For Third-Party Services offered via the Platform, such third-party terms and requirements may be provided in the Platform, the Additional Terms, otherwise by Quantcast or by the third-party.
9.3. Quantcast is not responsible for Third-Party Services and makes no representations as to such services, including their privacy practices. Quantcast cannot guarantee continued availability or pricing of Third-Party Services and may stop enabling access to them without liability. Company may be required to register for or log into Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company Data with Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
10.
Marketing, Publicity
Quantcast may include Company’s name and logo in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, in promotional materials, and in the Platform. Company will not use Quantcast’s name or logo without prior written permission. All goodwill from the use of Quantcast’s name or logo inures to Quantcast. Neither party will make a press release or any other public statement about this Agreement without the other party’s prior agreement.
11.
Confidentiality
“
Confidential Information
” means information that the disclosing party identifies as confidential or the receiving party should reasonably understand to be confidential given the circumstances of the disclosure and the nature of the information. Confidential Information does not include information that the receiving party can demonstrate: (a) it knew without restriction before receipt from the disclosing party, (b) is publicly available through no fault of the receiving party, (c) it rightfully received from a third-party without a duty of confidentiality, or (d) is independently developed without use of or reference to Confidential Information. The receiving party may use Confidential Information only to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and must use at least reasonable care to prevent any unauthorized use or disclosure of Confidential Information, but in any event no less stringent a standard than receiving party applies to its own Confidential Information. The receiving party may share Confidential Information with its employees, agents and contractors who need to know it, as long as they are bound to confidentiality obligations that are consistent with this Agreement, provided that the receiving party shall remain solely responsible for their compliance with this Agreement. If compelled to do so by law, the receiving party may disclose Confidential Information as long as it provides reasonable prior notice to the disclosing party (unless legally prohibited). For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement prohibits Quantcast from using and sharing high level data that is compiled and summarized from the combination of Campaign Data with equivalent data generated by campaigns of other Quantcast customers, that does not allow identification of Company or Clients. Company will delete all Quantcast Confidential Information promptly upon termination of this Agreement.
12.
Indemnity
12.1. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents, and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast, its affiliated entities, and its and their directors, officers, employees and agents, and its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) use of the Services or Third-Party Services in violation of this Agreement; (b) Company Data or Ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of Sections 6.2. 6.3, 7 or 8.
12.2. The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
12.3. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or Campaign Data, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast that would have cured the cause of action, (e) use of the Services or Campaign Data other than as described herein, or (f) Inventory or Third-Party Services selected and/or purchased by Company. In such cases, Company will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
12.4. If Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing or terminate this Agreement. Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section 12 are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability and Company’s sole remedy as to infringement.
13.
Account Closure, Termination and Suspension
13.1. Company may close its account at any time via the Platform. Quantcast may terminate this Agreement upon notice for any reason or no reason. Sections 5, 6.6, 7 and 11-15 will survive account closure or termination of this Agreement, in addition to any other sections that by their nature would be presumed to, will survive account closure or termination.
13.2. Without limiting any other remedies, Quantcast may immediately suspend or terminate any individual Campaign, Authorized User’s access, and/or Company or Client account, including if Quantcast in its sole discretion suspects that a Campaign, Authorized User, Client, or Company is in breach this Agreement (including, without limitation, any failure to comply with the Incorporated Terms. If Quantcast suspends or closes Company’s account, Company may not re-open an account without Quantcast’s prior written approval.
14.
DISCLAIMER, LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
14.1. QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING PERFORMANCE OR THE RESULTS AND BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. QUANTCAST HAS NO LIABILITY FOR THIRD-PARTY SERVICES. QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY OR DISCONTINUE ANY OR ALL SERVICES AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY OR NO REASON, WITH OR WITHOUT NOTICE.
14.2. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION 14.2 LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED.
14.3. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE (SECTION 5), AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE.
14.4. The limitations and exclusions contained in this Agreement represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with this Agreement and the payments made hereunder.
15.
General
.
15.1. This Agreement is the entire agreement of the parties relating to the Services and it supersedes all other commitments and understandings with respect to the Services. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement does not apply to or include Quantcast Measure. To the extent that Incorporated Terms conflict with the main body of this Agreement, the Incorporated Terms will control. Any other terms included in a purchase order or similar document will be of no force and effect.
15.2. Except for Quantcast’s right to make changes as described herein, no changes to this Agreement are effective unless such changes are in writing and signed by Quantcast.
15.3. This Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement will be governed by (i) the laws of the State of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the laws of New South Wales,
Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the laws of Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited, each without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
15.4. Any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement will be brought exclusively in (i) the state or federal courts in the Northern District of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the relevant courts in New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the relevant courts in Dublin, Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited. Quantcast and Company hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, these courts (as applicable). Actions arising under or related to this Agreement or the Services must be brought in the initiating party’s individual capacity, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class action or similar proceeding.
15.5. The Services may be subject to export and/or import control laws and regulations. Company is solely responsible for complying with all applicable export control laws and regulations.
15.6. Unless provided otherwise in the Additional Terms, there are no third-party beneficiaries to this Agreement.
15.7. All notices will be in writing. Notices to Company may be delivered via the Platform or sent to the address associated with Company’s account. Notices to Quantcast will be sent to the applicable physical and email addresses set forth below for Quantcast. Notice will be deemed to have been given upon: (a) the date delivered in person; (b) the day after the date sent by overnight courier; or (c) the date posted in the Platform by Quantcast. Notices may be confirmed by email.
Quantcast Corp
.: 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107, United States of America
Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd
.: The Executive Centre, Level 24, 300 Barangaroo Avenue, Sydney, NSW, 2000, Australia
Quantcast International Limited
: Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn
: Legal Department
Email
: legal@quantcast.com
15.8. Quantcast will not be liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder on account of events beyond Quantcast’s reasonable control.
15.9. This Agreement and the licenses granted herein are not transferable or assignable without prior written consent of the non-transferring or non-assigning party except that a party may upon written notice assign this Agreement to an acquirer of substantially all of that party’s assets, stock or business by sale, merger or otherwise or to an Affiliate. “
Affiliate
” means an entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a party. Any assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
15.10. The parties have been represented in execution of this Agreement by legal counsel or have voluntarily declined to seek such counsel. If any provision of this Agreement is unenforceable, the validity of the remaining provisions will not be affected.
15.11. Quantcast’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of this Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if made explicitly, in writing and signed by Quantcast.
Effective December 4th 2024
to
March 6th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
QUANTCAST BUYER TERMS
Last Updated: September 19, 2024
If Company has an active, duly executed contract for one or more of the Services, that existing agreement will govern Company’s use of such Services within the scope of such agreement instead of these Quantcast Buyer Terms (“
Agreement
”).
This Agreement is a legally binding contract between Quantcast and Company. “
Company
” means (A) when an individual accepts this Agreement on his or her own behalf, such individual, or (B) when an individual accepts this Agreement on behalf of a company or other legal entity, that company or legal entity. “
Quantcast
” means (X) Quantcast Corp. if Company is domiciled in the United States, (Y) Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd. if Company is domiciled in any country or territory located in the Asia Pacific (APAC) region and (Z) Quantcast International Limited if Company is domiciled in any other country or territory.
Quantcast may modify this Agreement. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Services. Company’s continued use of the Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates.
1.
Incorporated Terms
This Agreement incorporates the following additional terms (“
Incorporated Terms
”), as updated from time to time:
Quantcast Campaign Policy
(“
Campaign Policy
”)
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Buyers
(“
Privacy Implementation
”)
US State Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent the Services include processing Personal Information subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (“
DPA
”)
International Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent that the Services include processing Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (also “
DPA
”)
Any applicable
Additional Terms
(defined below)
2.
Services
2.1. “
Services
” means the Quantcast platform (“
Platform
”) and, to the extent provided by Quantcast under this Agreement, Campaign Tags, Platform Data, and any other services provided by Quantcast. The Services may permit Company to purchase ad placements on third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video, and other content/properties) (“
Inventory
”) that are made available by third-party providers (“
Inventory Providers
”) and Third-Party Services (defined below). For clarity, the “Services” do not include Inventory or Third-Party Services.
2.2. Some Services may be subject to different or additional terms (“
Additional Terms
”) that are described on the Additional Terms page linked above, in the Platform or otherwise made available to Company in writing. Unless the parties agree in writing for Quantcast to provide campaign management services or professional services, the Services do not include those services.
3.
Accounts and Authorized Users
3.1. Company will ensure its account information is accurate and current. Company will promptly notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of Company access credentials. Quantcast
may review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users. Company must obtain Quantcast’s prior written consent before adding third-party Authorized Users (i.e., non-employees) and Quantcast may require such third-party Authorized Users to enter into separate terms with Quantcast.
3.2. “
Authorized User
” means an individual authorized by Company to use Company’s account on the Platform. Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials. Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users, the level of permissioning of each Authorized User, and all activity under its account, including the confidentiality of all access credentials. Without limiting the foregoing, Company will immediately notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of any access credentials. Company will ensure that all Authorized Users use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, and are aware of, and comply with, this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is liable for any breach of this Agreement by any Authorized User.
4.
Company Clients
If Company is using the Services on behalf of third-party clients (“
Clients
”), Company represents and warrants that it has all rights and authorizations needed to do so. Company will only use the Services for Clients with which Company has a direct written agency agreement and will obligate its Clients to comply with this Agreement, including the Incorporated Terms. Company is responsible for the actions and/or inactions of Clients and for ensuring their compliance.
5.
Fees and Payment
5.1. Fees will be provided in the Platform or by other written means.
5.2. Unless Quantcast approves a different payment arrangement in writing, Company authorizes Quantcast to charge amounts owed under this Agreement after the end of each month to Company’s credit card, via automatic ACH, or such other similar payment method, at Quantcast’s option. Company will provide its most current credit card and/or other information required to complete payment, and keep such information updated if it changes. For the avoidance of doubt, if Company makes credit card, wire transfer or ACH payments or such other similar payment method, Company agrees to the applicable third-party terms as set forth in the Additional Terms. If Quantcast authorizes Company to pay invoices in arrears, Company will pay invoices within thirty (30) days of the invoice date. Quantcast may revise Company’s credit limit or require prepayment at any time in its sole discretion. Quantcast may charge interest at a rate of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company is responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect unpaid invoices. All payment obligations are non-cancelable and all amounts paid for Services provided are non-refundable. If Company requires a purchase order to make payments, Company will include the corresponding purchase order number in the Platform. All amounts due must be paid without setoff or deduction.
5.3. Company is solely responsible for all amounts due for any Third-Party Services that Company opts to use. Company acknowledges that any charges for Third-Party Services shown in the Platform or otherwise provided by Quantcast are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
5.4. Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating all metrics related to the Services, including all amounts owed under this Agreement. Company acknowledges that all metrics, fees and other amounts shown in Platform are preliminary and final amounts will be as confirmed, invoiced or billed by Quantcast.
5.5. All charges under this Agreement are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of this Agreement for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
6.
Services License and Requirements
6.1. Company may use the Services solely as set forth in this Agreement. Subject to this Agreement, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable license to
(a) access and use the Services on a self-serve basis, and (b) use the Platform Data presented via the Services solely for the purpose of using the Services.
6.2. Company will obtain all rights necessary to perform tracking and analytics, and store and serve the advertisements (“
Ads
”) associated with Company’s campaigns (“
Campaigns
”). Company will not use the Services with Ads, Company Media, other content or products or services that violate any applicable laws, regulations, third-party rights, or this Agreement including the Incorporated Terms. If Company asks Quantcast to take actions on behalf of Company or otherwise assist with Company’s use of the Services, Company consents to the actions and/or inactions that Quantcast takes on its behalf and retains sole responsibility for such assisted use of the Services.
6.3. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Services security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Services to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of a Client, if applicable), (d) reproduce, distribute, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile, or disassemble the Services, including Platform Data, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Services or to end users, (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than the relevant Client who is obligated to treat such reports confidentially) or (g) use information collected during the course of Campaigns (e.g., via Company’s own tag, third party tags, etc.) outside Company’s use of the Services, including to create or enrich profiles of individual end users, including regarding third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video and other content/properties) that the end users have visited or the content or general interest area of such media. For example, Company may not create an audience of a particular publisher’s end users based on information derived or obtained by using the Services.
6.4. For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing, and improving the Services.
6.5. Quantcast reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon.
6.6. Except as expressly set forth in this Agreement, neither party grants the other party any rights, express or implied, and each party reserves all rights. If Company provides Quantcast with feedback regarding the Services, Company hereby grants Quantcast a perpetual, irrevocable, fully paid up right and license to such feedback, without accounting, attribution, or compensation to Company.
7.
Data Issues
7.1. Data Definitions
:
7.1.1. “
Aggregated Data
” means generalized, combined data from numerous campaigns of multiple Quantcast customers, including Company, that concerns campaign parameters, goals, or performance results of such campaigns and that does not permit identification of Company or any other Quantcast customer of the Services.
7.1.2. “
Campaign Data
” means the campaign-related reporting data generated in the course of the Services and provided to Company under this Agreement, such as Campaign performance reports. For the avoidance of doubt, Campaign Data does not include Tag Data.
7.1.3. “
Campaign Tag
” means a tag, pixel or other element provided by Quantcast to Company for Company or Clients to place on Company Media to enable the collection of Tag Data under this Agreement. For clarity, the term “Campaign Tags” does not refer to any ad serving tags or Measure tags provided by Quantcast (i.e., if Company elects to use Quantcast ad serving or Quantcast Measure).
7.1.4. “
Company Data
” means all information and materials that are onboarded to Company’s account in the Platform, whether directly or via a third-party (e.g., an onboarding service provider).
Without limiting the foregoing, Company Data includes all Campaign parameters (the data entered into the Platform for a Campaign such as name, budget, targeting strategy, etc.), Tag Data and any data onboarded by or on behalf of Company (e.g., first and/or third-party audiences). Company Data is a subset of Company’s Confidential Information.
7.1.5. “
Company Media
” means the Ads, websites, apps and other digital properties and content on which Company or Clients place Campaign Tags.
7.1.6. “
Model
” means the predictive profile of shared attributes and characteristics of a group of end users that Company desires to reach in a Campaign, created algorithmically by deriving observations from Company Data and Platform Data. For the avoidance of doubt, Models do not include any data at individual end user level or any end user-level identifiers that may be used to distinguish one end user from another end user (such as an end user ID or IP address).
7.1.7. “
Platform Data
” means the data residing in the Platform or otherwise generated or used in connection with the Services that does not constitute Company Data or Campaign Data, including Aggregated Data, Models, and third-party data (“
Third-Party Data
”). Some Platform Data may be presented to Company in the Platform user interface while other Platform Data may be used by the Platform on the back end (i.e., behind the scenes) to provide the Services. Platform Data is a subset of Quantcast’s Confidential Information.
7.1.8. “
Tag Data
” means the data collected via Campaign Tags.
7.2.
Company Data
: As between the parties, Company Data is the exclusive property of Company and/or the applicable Client. As to all Company Data (whether provided by Company, Client or a third-party on Company’s or a Client’s behalf), Company represents and warrants that it has sufficient rights to provide Company Data for use by Quantcast in compliance with this Agreement. Quantcast may use Company Data solely in compliance with the DPAs (including to create Models for Company, deliver Campaigns and create audience insights, etc.). Quantcast will not share Company
Data with any third-party except to the extent that Company requests third-party services that utilize Company Data (e.g., third-party measurement), Company Data is included as a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company. In addition, Quantcast may use non- Company-identifiable inferences made from Tag Data to produce, and as contained in, the Aggregated Data.
7.3.
Platform Data
: As between the parties, Platform Data is the exclusive property of Quantcast (or its third-party partners). Company may use Platform Data (whether directly, to the extent presented to Company in the Platform, or indirectly, to the extent used by the Platform to enable the Services) solely internally and solely for the purpose of using the Services as described in this Agreement. As to any Platform Data that Company can access and export using the self-serve features of the Platform, Company will not share such Platform Data with any third-party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Platform Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement
.
If Quantcast provides Company with Platform Data outside the self-serve features of the Platform (e.g., further detail about available audiences, etc.), such Platform Data is subject to any applicable Additional Terms. Company will not attempt to extract or recreate any Third-Party Data or other Platform Data that is not readily accessible via the normal functionality presented in the Platform or assemble similar data or audience segments itself (directly or indirectly through a third-party) on the basis of Third-Party Data or other Platform Data or information derived from the use of such data under this Agreement.
7.4.
Campaign Data
: Company may use Campaign Data for its internal business purposes provided that (a) it complies with its privacy policy, (b) it complies with the terms of this Agreement, and (c) it does not disclose Campaign Data to any third-party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Campaign Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement. Quantcast may use Campaign Data (i) to provide the Services, and (ii) within a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company.
7.5.
Models
: Models reside solely within the Platform and are not directly accessible to Company. Company’s license above includes the ability to use Models as an integrated part of the Services, solely for the purpose of selecting and gaining insights about the end users that Company wishes to reach with its Campaigns. Quantcast will not share Models generated for the purpose of Company’s Campaigns with other customers.
7.6.
Client Data
: Upon request from a Client (or an authorized third party on Client’s behalf, including Company), Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in accordance with such request (including sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Quantcast Platform). For clarity, “
Client Data
” means the (i) Tag Data from Client websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments created using the Tag Data or any Campaign Data generated from Campaigns delivered using such Client Data.
7.7.
No Off-Platform Use
: Company will not use the Services, the Campaign Data, or any information derived from the Services, Models or Campaign Data to create or enrich profiles of individual end users or to retarget any end user except via the Services.
8.
Compliance and Privacy
8.1. Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services), including Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self-regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means US State Privacy Laws and International Privacy Laws (defined in the linked DPAs). Company will comply with the Incorporated Terms.
8.2. Company will not use the Service or any Third Party Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of an end user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or
(b) any data of children, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media directed at children; or (c) data related to any end user that has requested deletion or opted out (collectively, “
Prohibited Data
”). “
Direct Identifier
” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID and certain hashed identifiers (e.g., email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email). For purposes of this Agreement, “
children
” refers to anyone age 16 or under or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
8.3. Company represents and warrants that it is not a covered entity under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (“HIPAA”), and does not have equivalent status under comparable local or international laws and regulations. If Company is using the Services on behalf of Clients, Company represents and warrants that Clients are not covered entities under the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (“HIPAA”), and do not have equivalent status under comparable local or international laws and regulations.
9.
Third-Party Services
9.1. If Company uses any third-party branded product or service in connection with the Services (including Third-Party Data made available for use via the Services) (“
Third-Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply.
9.2. Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third-party terms and requirements. For Third-Party Services offered via the Platform, such third-party terms and requirements may be provided in the Platform, the Additional Terms, otherwise by Quantcast or by the third-party.
9.3. Quantcast is not responsible for Third-Party Services and makes no representations as to such services, including their privacy practices. Quantcast cannot guarantee continued availability or pricing of Third-Party Services and may stop enabling access to them without liability. Company may be required to register for or log into Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company Data with Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
10.
Marketing, Publicity
Quantcast may include Company’s name and logo in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, in promotional materials, and in the Platform. Company will not use Quantcast’s name or logo without prior written permission. All goodwill from the use of Quantcast’s name or logo inures to Quantcast. Neither party will make a press release or any other public statement about this Agreement without the other party’s prior agreement.
11.
Confidentiality
“
Confidential Information
” means information that the disclosing party identifies as confidential or the receiving party should reasonably understand to be confidential given the circumstances of the disclosure and the nature of the information. Confidential Information does not include information that the receiving party can demonstrate: (a) it knew without restriction before receipt from the disclosing party, (b) is publicly available through no fault of the receiving party, (c) it rightfully received from a third-party without a duty of confidentiality, or (d) is independently developed without use of or reference to Confidential Information. The receiving party may use Confidential Information only to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and must use at least reasonable care to prevent any unauthorized use or disclosure of Confidential Information, but in any event no less stringent a standard than receiving party applies to its own Confidential Information. The receiving party may share Confidential Information with its employees, agents and contractors who need to know it, as long as they are bound to confidentiality obligations that are consistent with this Agreement, provided that the receiving party shall remain solely responsible for their compliance with this Agreement. If compelled to do so by law, the receiving party may disclose Confidential Information as long as it provides reasonable prior notice to the disclosing party (unless legally prohibited). For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement prohibits Quantcast from using and sharing high level data that is compiled and summarized from the combination of Campaign Data with equivalent data generated by campaigns of other Quantcast customers, that does not allow identification of Company or Clients. Company will delete all Quantcast Confidential Information promptly upon termination of this Agreement.
12.
Indemnity
12.1. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents, and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast, its affiliated entities, and its and their directors, officers, employees and agents, and its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) use of the Services or Third-Party Services in violation of this Agreement; (b) Company Data or Ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of Sections 6.2. 6.3, 7 or 8.
12.2. The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
12.3. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or Campaign Data, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast that would have cured the cause of action, (e) use of the Services or Campaign Data other than as described herein, or (f) Inventory or Third-Party Services selected and/or purchased by Company. In such cases, Company will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
12.4. If Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing or terminate this Agreement. Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section 12 are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability and Company’s sole remedy as to infringement.
13.
Account Closure, Termination and Suspension
13.1. Company may close its account at any time via the Platform. Quantcast may terminate this Agreement upon notice for any reason or no reason. Sections 5, 6.6, 7 and 11-15 will survive account closure or termination of this Agreement, in addition to any other sections that by their nature would be presumed to, will survive account closure or termination.
13.2. Without limiting any other remedies, Quantcast may immediately suspend or terminate any individual Campaign, Authorized User’s access, and/or Company or Client account, including if Quantcast in its sole discretion suspects that a Campaign, Authorized User, Client, or Company is in breach this Agreement (including, without limitation, any failure to comply with the Incorporated Terms. If Quantcast suspends or closes Company’s account, Company may not re-open an account without Quantcast’s prior written approval.
14.
DISCLAIMER, LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
14.1. QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING PERFORMANCE OR THE RESULTS AND BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. QUANTCAST HAS NO LIABILITY FOR THIRD-PARTY SERVICES. QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY OR DISCONTINUE ANY OR ALL SERVICES AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY OR NO REASON, WITH OR WITHOUT NOTICE.
14.2. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION 14.2 LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED.
14.3. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE (SECTION 5), AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE.
14.4. The limitations and exclusions contained in this Agreement represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with this Agreement and the payments made hereunder.
15.
General
.
15.1. This Agreement is the entire agreement of the parties relating to the Services and it supersedes all other commitments and understandings with respect to the Services. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement does not apply to or include Quantcast Measure. To the extent that Incorporated Terms conflict with the main body of this Agreement, the Incorporated Terms will control. Any other terms included in a purchase order or similar document will be of no force and effect.
15.2. Except for Quantcast’s right to make changes as described herein, no changes to this Agreement are effective unless such changes are in writing and signed by Quantcast.
15.3. This Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement will be governed by (i) the laws of the State of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the laws of New South Wales,
Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the laws of Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited, each without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
15.4. Any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement will be brought exclusively in (i) the state or federal courts in the Northern District of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the relevant courts in New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the relevant courts in Dublin, Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited. Quantcast and Company hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, these courts (as applicable). Actions arising under or related to this Agreement or the Services must be brought in the initiating party’s individual capacity, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class action or similar proceeding.
15.5. The Services may be subject to export and/or import control laws and regulations. Company is solely responsible for complying with all applicable export control laws and regulations.
15.6. Unless provided otherwise in the Additional Terms, there are no third-party beneficiaries to this Agreement.
15.7. All notices will be in writing. Notices to Company may be delivered via the Platform or sent to the address associated with Company’s account. Notices to Quantcast will be sent to the applicable physical and email addresses set forth below for Quantcast. Notice will be deemed to have been given upon: (a) the date delivered in person; (b) the day after the date sent by overnight courier; or (c) the date posted in the Platform by Quantcast. Notices may be confirmed by email.
Quantcast Corp
.: 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107, United States of America
Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd
.: The Executive Centre, Level 24, 300 Barangaroo Avenue, Sydney, NSW, 2000, Australia
Quantcast International Limited
: Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn
: Legal Department
Email
: legal@quantcast.com
15.8. Quantcast will not be liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder on account of events beyond Quantcast’s reasonable control.
15.9. This Agreement and the licenses granted herein are not transferable or assignable without prior written consent of the non-transferring or non-assigning party except that a party may upon written notice assign this Agreement to an acquirer of substantially all of that party’s assets, stock or business by sale, merger or otherwise or to an Affiliate. “
Affiliate
” means an entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a party. Any assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
15.10. The parties have been represented in execution of this Agreement by legal counsel or have voluntarily declined to seek such counsel. If any provision of this Agreement is unenforceable, the validity of the remaining provisions will not be affected.
15.11. Quantcast’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of this Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if made explicitly, in writing and signed by Quantcast.
Effective May 23rd 2024
to
December 4th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
QUANTCAST BUYER TERMS
Last Updated: May 3, 2024
If Company has an active, duly executed contract for one or more of the Services, that existing agreement will govern Company’s use of such Services within the scope of such agreement instead of these Quantcast Buyer Terms (“
Agreement
”).
This Agreement is a legally binding contract between Quantcast and Company. “
Company
” means (A) when an individual accepts this Agreement on his or her own behalf, such individual, or (B) when an individual accepts this Agreement on behalf of a company or other legal entity, that company or legal entity.  “
Quantcast
” means (X) Quantcast Corp. if Company is domiciled in the United States, (Y) Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd. if Company is domiciled in any country or territory located in the Asia Pacific (APAC) region and (Z) Quantcast International Limited if Company is domiciled in any other country or territory.
Quantcast may modify this Agreement. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Services. Company’s continued use of the Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates.
1.  Incorporated Terms
This Agreement incorporates the following additional terms (“
Incorporated Terms
”), as updated from time to time:
Quantcast Campaign Policy
(“
Campaign Policy
”)
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Buyers
(“
Privacy Implementation
”)
US State Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent
the Services include processing Personal Information
subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (“
DPA
”)
International Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent that the Services include processing Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum)
(also “
DPA
”)
Any applicable
Additional Terms
(defined below)
2.  Services
2.1.  “
Services
”
means
the
Quantcast platform (“
Platform
”)
and, to the extent provided by Quantcast under this Agreement, Campaign Tags, Platform Data, and any other services provided by Quantcast. The Services may permit Company to purchase ad placements on third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video, and other content/properties) (“
Inventory
”) that are made available by third-party providers (“
Inventory Providers
”) and Third-Party Services (defined below). For clarity, the “Services” do not include Inventory or Third-Party Services.
2.2.  Some Services may be subject to different or additional terms (“
Additional Terms
”) that are
described on the Additional Terms page linked above, in the Platform or otherwise made available to Company in writing.
Unless the parties agree in writing for Quantcast to provide campaign management services or professional services, the Services do not include those services.
3.  Accounts and Authorized Users
3.1.  Company will ensure its account information is accurate and current. Company will promptly notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of Company access credentials. Quantcast may review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
Company must obtain Quantcast’s prior written consent before adding third-party Authorized Users (i.e., non-employees) and Quantcast may require such third-party Authorized Users to enter into separate terms with Quantcast.
3.2.  “
Authorized User
” means an individual authorized by Company to use Company’s account on the Platform.
Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials
.
Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users, the level of permissioning of each Authorized User, and all activity under its account, including the confidentiality of all access credentials. Without limiting the foregoing, Company will immediately notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of any access credentials. Company will ensure that all Authorized Users use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, and are aware of, and comply with, this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is liable for any breach of this Agreement by any Authorized User.
4.  Company
Clients
If Company is using the Services on behalf of third-party clients (“
Clients
”), Company represents and warrants that it has all rights and authorizations needed to do so. Company will only use the Services for Clients with which Company has a direct written agency agreement and will obligate its Clients to comply with this Agreement, including the Incorporated Terms. Company is responsible for the actions and/or inactions of Clients and for ensuring their compliance.
5.  Fees and Payment
5.1.  Fees will be provided in the Platform or by other written means.
5.2.  Unless Quantcast approves a different payment arrangement in writing, Company authorizes Quantcast to charge amounts owed under this Agreement after the end of each month to Company’s credit card, via automatic ACH, or such other similar payment method, at Quantcast’s option. Company will provide its most current credit card and/or other information required to complete payment, and keep such information updated if it changes. For the avoidance of doubt, if Company makes credit card, wire transfer or ACH payments or such other similar payment method, Company agrees to the applicable third-party terms as set forth in the Additional Terms. If Quantcast authorizes Company to pay invoices in arrears, Company will pay invoices within thirty (30) days of the invoice date.  Quantcast may revise Company’s credit limit or require prepayment at any time in its sole discretion. Quantcast may charge interest at a rate of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company is responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect unpaid invoices. All payment obligations are non-cancelable and all amounts paid for Services provided are non-refundable. If Company requires a purchase order to make payments, Company will include the corresponding purchase order number in the Platform. All amounts due must be paid without setoff or deduction.
5.3.  Company is solely responsible for all amounts due for any Third-Party Services that Company opts to use. Company acknowledges that any charges for Third-Party Services shown in the Platform or otherwise provided by Quantcast are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
5.4.  Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating all metrics related to the Services, including all amounts owed under this Agreement. Company acknowledges that all metrics, fees and other amounts shown in Platform are preliminary and final amounts will be as confirmed, invoiced or billed by Quantcast.
5.5.  All charges under this Agreement are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of this Agreement for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
6.
Services
License and Requirements
6.1.  Company may use the Services solely as set forth in this Agreement.
Subject
to this Agreement, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable license to (a) access and use the Services on a self-serve basis, and (b) use the Platform Data presented via the Services solely for the purpose of using the Services.
6.2.  Company will obtain all rights necessary to perform tracking and analytics, and store and serve the advertisements (“
Ads
”) associated with Company’s campaigns (“
Campaigns
”). Company will not use the Services with Ads, Company Media, other content or products or services that violate any applicable laws, regulations, third-party rights, or this Agreement including the Incorporated Terms. If Company asks Quantcast to take actions on behalf of Company or otherwise assist with Company’s use of the Services, Company consents to the actions and/or inactions that Quantcast takes on its behalf and retains sole responsibility for such assisted use of the Services.
6.3.  Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Services security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Services to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of a Client, if applicable), (d) reproduce,
distribute
, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile, or disassemble the Services, including Platform Data, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Services or to end users, (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than the relevant Client who is obligated to treat such reports confidentially) or (g) use information collected during the course of Campaigns (e.g., via Company’s own tag, third party tags, etc.) outside Company’s use of the Services, including to
create or enrich profiles of individual end users, including regarding third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video and other content/properties) that the end users have visited or the content or general interest area of such media. For example, Company may not create an audience of a particular publisher’s end users based on information derived or obtained by using the Services.
6.4.  For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing, and improving the Services.
6.5.  Quantcast
reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon.
6.6.  Except
as expressly set forth in this Agreement, neither party grants the other party any rights, express or implied, and each party reserves all rights. If Company
provides Quantcast with feedback regarding the Services, Company hereby grants Quantcast a perpetual, irrevocable, fully paid up right and license to such feedback, without accounting, attribution, or compensation to Company.
7.  Data
Issues
7.1.  Data
Definitions
:
7.1.1.  “
Aggregated Data
” means generalized, combined data from numerous campaigns of multiple Quantcast customers, including Company, that concerns campaign parameters, goals, or performance results of such campaigns and that does not permit identification of Company or any other Quantcast custom
er of the Services.
7.1.2.  “
Campaign Data
” means the campaign-related reporting data generated in the course of the Services and provided to Company under this Agreement, such as Campaign performance reports. For the avoidance of doubt, Campaign Data does not include Tag Data.
7.1.3.  “
Campaign Tag
” means a tag, pixel or other element provided by Quantcast to Company for Company or Clients to place on Company Media to enable the collection of Tag Data under this Agreement. For clarity, the term “Campaign Tags” does not refer to any ad serving tags or Measure tags provided by Quantcast (i.e., if Company elects to use Quantcast ad serving or Quantcast Measure).
7.1.4.  “
Company Data
” means all information and materials that are onboarded to Company’s account in the Platform, whether directly or via a third-party (e.g., an onboarding service provider). Without limiting the foregoing, Company Data includes all Campaign parameters (the data entered into the Platform for a Campaign such as name, budget, targeting strategy, etc.), Tag Data and any data onboarded by or on behalf of Company (e.g., first and/or third-party audiences). Company Data is a subset of Company’s Confidential Information.
7.1.5.  “
Company Media
”
means
the Ads, websites, apps and other digital properties and content on which Company or Clients place Campaign Tags
.
7.1.6.
“
Model
” means the predictive profile of shared attributes and characteristics of a group of end users that Company desires to reach in a Campaign, created algorithmically by deriving observations from Company Data and Platform Data. For the avoidance of doubt, Models do not include any data at individual end user level or any end user-level identifiers that may be used to distinguish one end user from another end user (such as an end user ID or IP address).
7.1.7.
“
Platform Data
” means the data residing in the Platform or otherwise generated or used in connection with the Servic
es that does not constitute Company Data or
Campaign
Data, including Aggregated Data, Models, and third-party data (“
Third-Party Data
”). Some Platform Data may be presented to Company in the Platform user interface while other Platform Data may be used by the Platform on the back end (i.e., behind the scenes) to provide the Services. Platform Data is a subset of Quantcast’s Confidential Information.
7.1.8.
“
Tag Data
” means the data collected via Campaign Tags.
7.2.
Company Data
: As between the parties, Company Data is the exclusive property of Company and/or the applicable Client. As to all Company Data (whether provided by Company, Client or a third-party on Company’s or a Client’s behalf), Company
represents
and warrants that it has sufficient rights to provide Company Data for use by Quantcast in compliance with this Agreement. Quantcast may use Company Data solely in compliance with the DPAs (including to create Models for Company, deliver Campaigns and create audience insights, etc.). Quantcast will not share Company Data with any third-party except to the extent that Company requests third-party services that utilize Company Data (e.g., third-party measurement), Company Data is included as a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company. In addition, Quantcast may use
non-Company-identifiable inferences made from Tag Data
to produce, and as contained in, the Aggregated Data.
7.3.
Platform Data
: As between the parties, Platform Data is the exclusive property of Quantcast (or its third-party partners). Company may use Platform Data (whether directly, to the extent presented to Company in the Platform, or indirectly, to the extent used by the Platform to enable the Services) solely internally and solely for the purpose of using the Services as described in this Agreement. As to any Platform Data that Company can access and export using the self-serve features of the Platform, Company will not share such Platform Data with any third-party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Platform Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement
.
If Quantcast provides Company with Platform Data outside the self-serve features of the Platform (e.g., further detail about available audien
ces, e
tc.), such Platform Data is subject to any applicable Additional Terms. Company will not attempt to extract or recreate any Third-Party Data or other Platform Data that is not readily accessible via the normal functionality presented in the Platform or assemble similar data or audience segments itself (directly or indirectly through a third-party) on the basis of Third-Party Data or other Platform Data or information derived from the use of such data under this Agreement.
7.4.
Campaign Data
: Company may use Campaign Data for its internal business purposes provided that (a) it complies with its privacy policy, (b) it complies with the terms of this Agreement, and (c) it does not disclose Campaign Data to any third-party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Campaign Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement. Quantcast may use Campaign Data (i) to provide the Services, and (ii) within a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company.
7.5.
Models
:
Models reside solely within the Platform and are not directly accessible to Company. Company’s license above
includes
the ability to use Models as an integrated part of the Services, solely for the purpose of selecting and gaining insights about the end users that Company wishes to reach with its Campaigns.  Quantcast will not share Models generated for the purpose of Company’s Campaigns with other customers.
7.6.
Client Data
: Upon request from a Client (or an authorized third party on Client’s behalf, including Company), Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in
accordance
with such request (including sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Quantcast Platform). For clarity, “
Client
Data
” means the (i) Tag Data from Client websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments created using the Tag Data or any Campaign Data generated from Campaigns delivered using such Client Data.
7.7.
No Off-Platform Use
: Company will not use the Services, the Campaign Data, or any information derived from the Services, Models or Campaign Data to create or enrich profiles of individual end users or to retarget any end user except via the Services.
8.
Compliance and Privacy
8.1.  Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services), including Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self-regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means US State Privacy Laws and International Privacy Laws (defined in the linked DPAs). Company will comply with the Incorporated Terms.
8.2.  Company will not use the Service or any Third Party Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of an end user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media directed at children; or (c) data related to any end user that has requested deletion or opted out (collectively, “
Prohibited Data
”). “
Direct Identifier
” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID and certain hashed identifiers (e.g., email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email). For purposes of this Agreement, “
children
” refers to anyone age 16 or under or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
9.
Third
-Party Services
9.1.  If Company uses any third-party branded product or service in connection with the Services (including Third-Party Data made available for use via the Services) (“
Third-Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply.
9.2.  Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third-party terms and requirements. For Third-Party Services offered via the Platform, such third-party terms and requirements may be provided in the Platform, the Additional Terms, otherwise by Quantcast or by the third-party.
9.3.  Quantcast is not responsible for Third-Party Services and makes no representations as to such services, including their privacy practices. Quantcast cannot guarantee continued availability or pricing of Third-Party Services and may stop enabling access to them without liability. Company may be required to register for or log into Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company Data with Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
10.
Marketing, Publicity
Quantcast may include Company’s name and logo in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, in promotional materials, and in the Platform. Company will not use Quantcast’s name or logo without prior written permission. All goodwill from the use of Quantcast’s name or logo inures to Quantcast. Neither party will make a press release or any other public statement about this Agreement without the other party’s prior agreement.
11.
Confidentiality
“
Confidential Information
” means
information that the disclosing party identifies as confidential or the receiving party should reasonably understand to be confidential given the circumstances of the disclosure and the nature of the information. Confidential Information does not include information that the receiving party can demonstrate: (a) it knew without restriction before receipt from the disclosing party, (b) is publicly available through no fault of the receiving party, (c) it rightfully received from a third-party without a duty of confidentiality, or (d) is independently developed without use of or reference to Confidential Information. The receiving party may use Confidential Information only to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and must use at least reasonable care to prevent any unauthorized use or disclosure of Confidential Information, but in any event no less stringent a standard than receiving party applies to its own Confidential Information. The receiving party may share Confidential Information with its employees, agents and contractors who need to know it, as long as they are bound to confidentiality obligations that are consistent with this Agreement, provided that the receiving party shall remain solely responsible for their compliance with this Agreement. If compelled to do so by law, the receiving party may disclose Confidential Information as long as it provides reasonable prior notice to the disclosing party (unless legally prohibited).   For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement prohibits Quantcast from using and sharing high level data that is compiled and summarized from the combination of Campaign Data with equivalent data generated by campaigns of other Quantcast customers, that does not allow identification of Company or Clients. Company will delete all Quantcast Confidential Information promptly upon termination of this Agreement.
12.
Indemnity
12.1.  Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents, and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast, its affiliated entities, and its and their directors, officers, employees and agents, and its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) use of the Services or Third-Party Services in violation of this Agreement; (b) Company Data or Ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of Sections 6.2. 6.3, 7 or 8.
12.2.  The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
12.3.  Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or Campaign Data, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast that would have cured the cause of action, (e) use of the Services or Campaign Data other than as described herein, or (f) Inventory or Third-Party Services selected and/or purchased by Company. In such cases, Company will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
12.4.  If Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing or terminate this Agreement.  Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section 12 are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability and Company’s sole remedy as to infringement.
13.
Account Closure, Termination and Suspension
13.1.  Company may close its account at any time via the Platform. Quantcast may terminate this Agreement upon notice for any reason or no reason. Sections 5, 6.6, 7 and 11-15 will survive account closure or termination of this Agreement, in addition to any other sections that by their nature would be presumed to, will survive account closure or termination.
13.2.  Without limiting any other remedies, Quantcast may immediately suspend or terminate any individual Campaign, Authorized User’s access, and/or Company or Client account, including if Quantcast in its sole discretion suspects that a Campaign, Authorized User, Client, or Company is in breach this Agreement (including, without limitation, any failure to comply with the Incorporated Terms. If Quantcast suspends or closes Company’s account, Company may not re-open an account without Quantcast’s prior written approval.
14.
DISCLAIMER, LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
14.1.  QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING PERFORMANCE OR THE RESULTS AND BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. QUANTCAST HAS NO LIABILITY FOR THIRD-PARTY SERVICES. QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY OR DISCONTINUE ANY OR ALL SERVICES AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY OR NO REASON, WITH OR WITHOUT NOTICE.
14.2.  EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION 14.2 LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED.
14.3.  EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE (SECTION 5), AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE.
14.4.  The limitations and exclusions contained in this Agreement represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with this Agreement and the payments made hereunder.
15.
General
.
15.1.  This Agreement is the entire agreement of the parties relating to the Services and it supersedes all other commitments and understandings with respect to the Services. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement does not apply to or include Quantcast Measure. To the extent that Incorporated Terms conflict with the main body of this Agreement, the Incorporated Terms will control. Any other terms included in a purchase order or similar document will be of no force and effect.
15.2.  Except for Quantcast’s right to make changes as described herein, no changes to this Agreement are effective unless such changes are in writing and signed by Quantcast.
15.3.  This Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement will be governed by (i) the laws of the State of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the laws of New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the laws of Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited, each without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
15.4.  Any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement will be brought exclusively in (i) the state or federal courts in the Northern District of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the relevant courts in New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the relevant courts in Dublin, Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited. Quantcast and Company hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, these courts (as applicable). Actions arising under or related to this Agreement or the Services must be brought in the initiating party’s individual capacity, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class action or similar proceeding.
15.5.  The Services may be subject to export and/or import control laws and regulations. Company is solely responsible for complying with all applicable export control laws and regulations.
15.6.  Unless provided otherwise in the Additional Terms, there are no third-party beneficiaries to this Agreement.
15.7.  All notices will be in writing. Notices to Company may be delivered via the Platform or sent to the address associated with Company’s account. Notices to Quantcast will be sent to the applicable physical and email addresses set forth below for Quantcast. Notice will be deemed to have been given upon: (a) the date delivered in person; (b) the day after the date sent by overnight courier; or (c) the date posted in the Platform by Quantcast. Notices may be confirmed by email.
Quantcast Corp
.: 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107, United States of America
Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd
.: The Executive Centre, Level 24, 300 Barangaroo Avenue, Sydney, NSW, 2000, Australia
Quantcast International Limited
: Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn
: Legal Department
Email
: legal@quantcast.com
15.8.  Quantcast will not be liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder on account of events beyond Quantcast’s reasonable control.
15.9.  This Agreement and the licenses granted herein are not transferable or assignable without prior written consent of the non-transferring or non-assigning party except that a party may upon written notice assign this Agreement to an acquirer of substantially all of that party’s assets, stock or business by sale, merger or otherwise or to an Affiliate. “
Affiliate
” means an entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a party. Any assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
15.10.  The parties have been represented in execution of this Agreement by legal counsel or have voluntarily declined to seek such counsel. If any provision of this Agreement is unenforceable, the validity of the remaining provisions will not be affected.
15.11.  Quantcast’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of this Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if made explicitly, in writing and signed by Quantcast.
Effective April 22nd 2024
to
May 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
QUANTCAST  BUYER TERMS
Last Updated: April 22, 2024
If Company has an active, duly executed contract for one or more of the Services, that existing agreement will govern Company’s use of such Services within the scope of such agreement instead of these Quantcast Buyer Terms (“
Agreement
”).
This Agreement is a legally binding contract between Quantcast and Company. “
Company
” means (A) when an individual accepts this Agreement on his or her own behalf, such individual, or (B) when an individual accepts this Agreement on behalf of a company or other legal entity, that company or legal entity.  “
Quantcast
” means (X) Quantcast Corp. if Company is domiciled in the United States, (Y) Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd. if Company is domiciled in any country or territory located in the Asia Pacific (APAC) region and (Z) Quantcast International Limited if Company is domiciled in any other country or territory.
Quantcast may modify this Agreement. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Services. Company’s continued use of the Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates.
1.  Incorporated Terms
This Agreement incorporates the following additional terms (“
Incorporated Terms
”), as updated from time to time:
Quantcast Campaign Policy
(“
Campaign Policy
”)
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners
(“
Privacy Implementation
”)
US State Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent
the Services include processing Personal Information
subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (“
DPA
”)
International Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent that the Services include processing Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum)
(also “
DPA
”)
Any applicable
Additional Terms
(defined below)
2.  Services
2.2.  “
Services
”
means
the
Quantcast platform (“
Platform
”)
and, to the extent provided by Quantcast under this Agreement, Campaign Tags, Platform Data, and any other services provided by Quantcast. The Services may permit Company to purchase ad placements on third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video, and other content/properties) (“
Inventory
”) that are made available by third-party providers (“
Inventory Providers
”) and Third-Party Services (defined below). For clarity, the “Services” do not include Inventory or Third-Party Services.
2.3.  Some Services may be subject to different or additional terms (“
Additional Terms
”) that are
described on the Additional Terms page linked above, in the Platform or otherwise made available to Company in writing.
Unless the parties agree in writing for Quantcast to provide campaign management services or professional services, the Services do not include those services.
3.  Accounts and Authorized Users
3.1.  Company will ensure its account information is accurate and current. Company will promptly notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of Company access credentials. Quantcast may review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
3.2.  “
Authorized User
” means an individual authorized by Company to use Company’s account on the Platform.
Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials
. Company acknowledges that
each Authorized User may have the ability to add and terminate other Authorized Users. Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including the confidentiality of all access credentials. Company will immediately notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of any access credentials. Company will ensure that all Authorized Users use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, and are aware of, and comply with, this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is liable for any breach of this Agreement by any Authorized User.
4.  Company
Clients
If Company is using the Services on behalf of third-party clients (“
Clients
”), Company represents and warrants that it has all rights and authorizations needed to do so. Company will only use the Services for Clients with which Company has a direct written agreement and will obligate its Clients to comply with this Agreement, including the Incorporated Terms. Company is responsible for the actions and/or inactions of Clients and for ensuring their compliance.
5.  Fees and Payment
5.1.  Fees will be provided in the Platform or by other written means.
5.2.  Unless Quantcast approves a different payment arrangement in writing, Company authorizes Quantcast to charge amounts owed under this Agreement after the end of each month to Company’s credit card, via automatic ACH, or such other similar payment method, at Quantcast’s option. Company will provide its most current credit card and/or other information required to complete payment, and keep such information updated if it changes. For the avoidance of doubt, if Company makes credit card, wire transfer or ACH payments or such other similar payment method, Company agrees to the applicable third-party terms as set forth in the Additional Terms. If Quantcast authorizes Company to pay invoices in arrears, Company will pay invoices within thirty (30) days of the invoice date. Quantcast may revise Company’s credit limit or require prepayment at any time in its sole discretion. Quantcast may charge interest at a rate of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company is responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect unpaid invoices. All payment obligations are non-cancelable and all amounts paid for Services provided are non-refundable. If Company requires a purchase order to make payments, Company will include the corresponding purchase order number in the Platform. All amounts due must be paid without setoff or deduction.
5.3.  Company is solely responsible for all amounts due for any Third-Party Services (defined below) that Company opts to use. Company acknowledges that any charges for Third-Party Services shown in the Platform or otherwise provided by Quantcast are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
5.4.  Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating all metrics related to the Services, including all amounts owed under this Agreement. Company acknowledges that all amounts shown in Platform reporting are preliminary and final amounts will be as invoiced or billed by Quantcast.
5.5.  All charges under this Agreement are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of this Agreement for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
6.
Services
License and Requirements
6.1.  Company may use the Services solely as set forth in this Agreement.
Subject
to this Agreement, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable license to (a) access and use the Platform on a self-serve basis, and (b) use the Platform Data presented in the Platform user interface solely for the purpose of using the Services.
6.2.  If Company uses the Services to manage Campaigns and purchase Inventory, Company will obtain all rights necessary to perform tracking and analytics, and store and serve the advertisements (“
Ads
”) associated with Company’s campaigns (“
Campaigns
”), including ad creatives. Company will not use the Services with Ads that violate any applicable laws, regulations, third-party rights, or this Agreement including the Incorporated Terms. If Company asks for Quantcast’s assistance with Company’s use of the Services, Company consents to the actions and/or inactions that Quantcast takes on its behalf and retains sole responsibility for such assisted use of the Services.
6.3. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of a Client, if applicable), (d) reproduce,
distribute
, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile, or disassemble the Services, including Platform Data, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform or to end users via Ads, (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than the relevant Client who is obligated to treat such reports confidentially) or (g) create or enrich profiles of individual end users on the basis of Campaign Data (defined below) or information derived from Campaign Data, including the third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video and other content/properties) that the end users have visited or the content or general interest area of such media. For example, Company may not create an audience of Conde Nast end users based on information derived or obtained by using the Services.
6.4. For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing, and improving the Services.
6.5. Quantcast
reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon.
6.6.  Except
as expressly set forth in this Agreement, neither party grants the other party any rights, express or implied, and each party reserves all rights. If Company
provides Quantcast with feedback regarding the Services, Company hereby grants Quantcast a perpetual, irrevocable, fully paid up right and license to such feedback, without accounting, attribution, or compensation to Company.
7.  Data
Issues
7.1. Data
Definitions
:
7.1.1. “
Aggregated Data
” means generalized, combined data from numerous campaigns of multiple Quantcast customers, including Company, that concerns campaign parameters, goals, or performance results of such campaigns and that does not permit identification of Company or any other Quantcast custom
er of the Services.
7.1.2.  “
Campaign Data
” means the campaign-related reporting data generated in the course of the Services and provided to Company under this Agreement, such as Campaign performance reports. For the avoidance of doubt, Campaign Data does not include Tag Data.
7.1.3.  “
Campaign Tag
” means a tag, pixel or other element provided by Quantcast to Company for Company or Clients to place on Company Media to enable the collection of Tag Data. For clarity, the term “Campaign Tags” does not refer to any ad serving tags provided by Quantcast (i.e., if Company elects to use Quantcast ad serving).
7.1.4.  “
Company Data
” means all information and materials that are onboarded to Company’s account in the Platform, whether directly or via a third-party (e.g., an onboarding service provider). Without limiting the foregoing, Company Data includes all Campaign parameters (the data entered into the Platform for a Campaign such as name, budget, targeting strategy, etc.), Tag Data and any data onboarded by or on behalf of Company (e.g., first and/or third-party audiences). Company Data is a subset of Company’s Confidential Information.
7.1.5.  “
Company Media
”
means
the websites, apps and other digital properties or content associated with Ads, including the webpages, app screens and other digital properties on which Company or Clients place Campaign Tags
.
7.1.6.
“
Model
” means the predictive profile of shared attributes and characteristics of a group of end
users that Company desires to reach in a Campaign, created algorithmically by deriving observations from Company Data and Platform Data. For the avoidance of doubt, Models do not include any data at individual end
u
ser level or any end
u
ser-level identifiers that may be used to distinguish one end
u
ser from another end
u
ser (such as an end
u
ser ID or IP address).
7.1.7.
“
Platform Data
” means the data residing in the Platform or otherwise generated or used
in connection with
the Servic
es that does not constitute Company Data or
Campaign
Data, including Aggregated Data, Models, and third-party data (“
Third-Party Data
”). Some Platform Data may be presented to Company in the Platform user interface while other Platform Data may be used by the Platform on the back end (i.e., behind the scenes) to provide the Services. Platform Data is a subset of Quantcast’s Confidential Information.
7.1.8.
“
Tag Data
” means the data collected via Campaign Tags.
7.2.
Company Data
: As between the parties, Company Data is the exclusive property of Company and/or the applicable Client. As to all Company Data (whether provided by Company, Client or a third
-
party on Company’s or a Client’s behalf), Company
represents
and warrants that it has sufficient rights to provide Company Data for use by Quantcast in compliance with this Agreement. Quantcast may use Company Data solely in compliance with the DPAs (including to create Models for Company,
deliver
Campaigns and create audience insights, etc.). Quantcast will not share Company Data with any third
-
party except to the extent that Company reque
sts third-party services that utilize Company Data (e.g., third-party measurement),
Company Data is included as a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data)
or as otherwise authorized by Company
. In addition, Quantcast may use
non-company-identifiable inferences made from Tag Data
to produce, and as contained in, the Aggregated Data.
7.3.
Platform Data
: As between the parties, Platform Data is the exclusive property of Quantcast (or its third-party partners). Company may use Platform Data (whether directly, to the extent presented to Company in the Platform, or indirectly, to the extent used by the Platform to enable the Services) solely internally and solely for the purpose of using the Services as described in this Agreement. As to any Platform Data that Company can access and export using the self
-serve features of the Platform
, Company will not share such Platform Data with any third
-
party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Platform Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement
.
If Quantcast provides Company with
Platform Data outside the self-serve
features
of the Platform (
e.g.
,
further detail about available audien
ces, e
tc.)
, such Platform
Data
is subject to any applicable Additional Terms.
Company will not attempt to extract or recreate any Third-Party Data or other Platform Data that is not readily accessible via the normal functionality presented in the Platform or assemble similar data or audience segments itself (directly or indirectly through a third
-
party) on the basis of Third-Party Data or other Platform Data or information derived from the use of such data under this Agreement.
7.4.
Campaign
Data
: Company may use
Campaign
Data for its internal business purposes provided that (a) it complies with its privacy policy, (b) it complies with the terms of this Agreement, and (c) it does not disclose
Campaign Data
to any
third-
party except, if applicable, Company’s
Client(s) that such Campaign Data pertains to and/or
third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement. Quantcast may use
Campaign
Data (i) to provide the Services, and (ii)
within a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company.
7.5.
Models
:
Models reside solely within the Platform and are not directly accessible to Company. Company’s license above
includes
the ability to use Models as an integrated part of the Services, solely for the purpose of
selecting
and gaining insights about the end users that Company wishes to reach with its Campaigns.  Quantcast will not share Models generated in connection with C
ompany’s Campaigns
with other customers.
7.6.
Client Data
: Upon request from a Client, Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in
accordance
with
such
request (including sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Quantcast Platform). For clarity, “
Client
Data
” means the (i)
Tag Data from
Client websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments created using the Tag Data or any Campaign
Data
generated from Campaigns delivered using such Client Data.
7.7.
No Off-Platform Use
: Company will not use the Services, the
Campaign
Data, or any information derived from the Services, Models or
Campaign
Data to create or enrich profiles of individual end users or to
retarget any end user except via the Services.
8.
Compliance and Privacy
8.1.  Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services), including Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self-regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means US State Privacy Laws and International Privacy Laws (defined in the linked DPAs). Company will comply with the Incorporated Terms.
8.2.  Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of an end user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media directed at children (collectively, “
Prohibited Data
”). “
Direct Identifier
” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID and certain hashed identifiers (e.g., email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email). For purposes of this Agreement, “
children
” refers to anyone age 16 or under or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
9.
Third
-Party Services
9.1. If Company uses any third-party branded product or service in connection with the Services (including Third-Party Data made available for use via the Services) (“
Third-Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply.
9.2. Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third-party terms and requirements. For Third-Party Services offered via the Platform, such third-party terms and requirements may be provided in the Platform, the Additional Terms, otherwise by Quantcast or by the third-party.
9.3. Quantcast is not responsible for Third-Party Services and makes no representations as to such services, including their privacy practices. Quantcast cannot guarantee continued availability or pricing of Third-Party Services and may stop enabling access to them without liability. Company may be required to register for or log into Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company Data with Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
10.
Marketing, Publicity
Quantcast may include Company’s name and logo in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, in promotional materials, and in the Platform. Company will not use Quantcast’s name or logo without prior written permission. All goodwill from the use of Quantcast’s name or logo inures to Quantcast. Neither party will make a press release or any other public statement about this Agreement without the other party’s prior agreement (email sufficing).
11
.  Confidentiality
“
Confidential Information
” means
information that the disclosing party identifies as confidential or the receiving party should reasonably understand to be confidential given the circumstances of the disclosure and the nature of the information. Confidential Information does not include information that the receiving party can demonstrate: (a) it knew without restriction before receipt from the disclosing party, (b) is publicly available through no fault of the receiving party, (c) it rightfully received from a third-party without a duty of confidentiality, or (d) is independently developed without use of or reference to Confidential Information. The receiving party may use Confidential Information only to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and must use at least reasonable care to prevent any unauthorized use or disclosure of Confidential Information, but in any event no less stringent a standard than receiving party applies to its own Confidential Information. The receiving party may share Confidential Information with its employees, agents and contractors who need to know it, as long as they are bound to confidentiality obligations that are consistent with this Agreement, provided that the receiving party shall remain solely responsible for their compliance with this Agreement. If compelled to do so by law, the receiving party may disclose Confidential Information as long as it provides reasonable prior notice to the disclosing party (unless legally prohibited).  For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement prohibits Quantcast from using and sharing high level data that is compiled and summarized from the combination of Campaign Data with equivalent data generated by campaigns of other Quantcast customers, that does not allow identification of Company or Clients. Company will delete all Quantcast Confidential Information promptly upon termination of this Agreement.
12
.  Indemnity
12.1. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents, and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast, its affiliated entities, and its and their directors, officers, employees and agents, and its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) use of the Services or Third-Party Services in violation of this Agreement; (b) Company Data or Ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of Sections 6.2. 6.3, 7 or 8.
12.2.  The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
12.3. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or Campaign Data, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast that would have cured the cause of action, (e) use of the Services or Campaign Data other than as described herein, or (f) Inventory or Third-Party Services selected by Company. In such cases, Company will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
12.4.  If Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing or terminate this Agreement.  Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section 12 are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability and Company’s sole remedy as to infringement.
13
.  Account Closure, Termination and Suspension
13.1. Company may close its account at any time via the Platform. Quantcast may terminate this Agreement upon notice for any reason or no reason. Sections 5, 6.6, 7 and 11-15 will survive account closure and/or termination.
13.2. Without limiting any other remedies, Quantcast may immediately suspend or terminate any individual Campaign, Authorized User’s access, and/or Company or Client account, including if Quantcast in its sole discretion suspects that a Campaign, Authorized User, Client, or Company is in breach this Agreement (including failure to comply with the Incorporated Terms. If Quantcast suspends or closes Company’s account, Company may not re-open an account without Quantcast’s prior written approval.
14.
DISCLAIMER, LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
14.1. QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. QUANTCAST HAS NO LIABILITY FOR THIRD-PARTY SERVICES. QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY OR DISCONTINUE ANY OR ALL SERVICES AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY OR NO REASON, WITH OR WITHOUT NOTICE.
14.2. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION 14.2 LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED.
14.3. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE (SECTION 5), AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE.
14.4.  The limitations and exclusions contained in this Agreement represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with this Agreement and the payments made hereunder.
15.
General
.
15.1. This Agreement is the entire agreement of the parties relating to the Services and it supersedes all other commitments and understandings with respect to the Services. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement does not apply to Quantcast Measure. To the extent that Incorporated Terms conflict with the main body of this Agreement, the Incorporated Terms will control.
15.2. Except for Quantcast’s right to make changes as described herein, no changes to this Agreement are effective unless such changes are in writing and signed by Quantcast.
15.3. This Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement will be governed by (i) the laws of the State of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the laws of New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the laws of Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited, each without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
15.4. Any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement will be brought exclusively in (i) the state or federal courts in the Northern District of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the relevant courts in New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the relevant courts in Dublin, Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited. Quantcast and Company hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, these courts (as applicable). Actions arising under or related to this Agreement or the Services must be brought in the initiating party’s individual capacity, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class action or similar proceeding.
15.5. The Services may be subject to export and/or import control laws and regulations. Company is solely responsible for complying with all applicable export control laws and regulations.
15.6. Unless provided otherwise in the Additional Terms, there are no third-party beneficiaries to this Agreement.
15.7.  All notices will be in writing. Notices to Company may be delivered via the Platform or sent to the address associated with Company’s account. Notices to Quantcast will be sent to the applicable physical and addresses set forth below for Quantcast. Notice will be deemed to have been given upon: (a) the date actually delivered in person; (b) the day after the date sent by overnight courier; or (c) the date posted in the Platform by Quantcast. Notices may be confirmed by email.
Quantcast Corp
.: 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107
Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd
.: 99 Elizabeth Street, Sydney 2000 NSW, Australia
Quantcast International Limited
: Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn
: Legal Department
Email
: legal@quantcast.com
15.8. Quantcast will not be liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder on account of events beyond Quantcast’s reasonable control.
15.9. This Agreement and the licenses granted herein are not transferable or assignable without prior written consent of the non-transferring or non-assigning party except that a party may upon written notice assign this Agreement to an acquirer of substantially all of that party’s assets, stock or business by sale, merger or otherwise or to an Affiliate. “
Affiliate
” means an entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a party. Any assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
15.10. The parties have been represented in execution of this Agreement by legal counsel or have voluntarily declined to seek such counsel. If any provision of this Agreement is unenforceable, the validity of the remaining provisions will not be affected.
15.11. Quantcast’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of this Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if made explicitly, in writing and signed by Quantcast.
Effective April 22nd 2024
to
April 22nd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
QUANTCAST  BUYER TERMS
Last Updated: April 22, 2024
If Company has an active, duly executed contract for one or more of the Services, that existing agreement will govern Company’s use of such Services within the scope of such agreement instead of this Quantcast Master Services Agreement (“
Agreement
”).
This Agreement is a legally binding contract between Quantcast and Company. “
Company
” means (A) when an individual accepts this Agreement on his or her own behalf, such individual, or (B) when an individual accepts this Agreement on behalf of a company or other legal entity, that company or legal entity.  “
Quantcast
” means (X) Quantcast Corp. if Company is domiciled in the United States, (Y) Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd. if Company is domiciled in any country or territory located in the Asia Pacific (APAC) region and (Z) Quantcast International Limited if Company is domiciled in any other country or territory.
Quantcast may modify this Agreement. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Services. Company’s continued use of the Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates.
1.  Incorporated Terms
This Agreement incorporates the following additional terms (“
Incorporated Terms
”), as updated from time to time:
Quantcast Campaign Policy
(“
Campaign Policy
”)
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners
(“
Privacy Implementation
”)
US State Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent
the Services include processing Personal Information
subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (“
DPA
”)
International Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent that the Services include processing Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum)
(also “
DPA
”)
Any applicable
Additional Terms
(defined below)
2.  Services
2.2  “
Services
”
means
the
Quantcast platform (“
Platform
”)
and, to the extent provided by Quantcast under this Agreement, Campaign Tags, Platform Data, and any other services provided by Quantcast. The Services may permit Company to purchase ad placements on third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video, and other content/properties) (“
Inventory
”) that are made available by third-party providers (“
Inventory Providers
”) and Third-Party Services (defined below). For clarity, the “Services” do not include Inventory or Third-Party Services.
2.3  Some Services may be subject to different or additional terms (“
Additional Terms
”) that are
described on the Additional Terms page linked above, in the Platform or otherwise made available to Company in writing.
Unless the parties agree in writing for Quantcast to provide campaign management services or professional services, the Services do not include those services.
3.  Accounts and Authorized Users
3.1  Company will ensure its account information is accurate and current. Company will promptly notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of Company access credentials. Quantcast may review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
3.2  “
Authorized User
” means an individual authorized by Company to use Company’s account on the Platform.
Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials
. Company acknowledges that
each Authorized User may have the ability to add and terminate other Authorized Users. Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including the confidentiality of all access credentials. Company will immediately notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of any access credentials. Company will ensure that all Authorized Users use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, and are aware of, and comply with, this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is liable for any breach of this Agreement by any Authorized User.
4.  Company
Clients
If Company is using the Services on behalf of third-party clients (“
Clients
”), Company represents and warrants that it has all rights and authorizations needed to do so. Company will only use the Services for Clients with which Company has a direct written agreement and will obligate its Clients to comply with this Agreement, including the Incorporated Terms. Company is responsible for the actions and/or inactions of Clients and for ensuring their compliance.
5.  Fees and Payment
5.1  Fees will be provided in the Platform or by other written means.
5.2  Unless Quantcast approves a different payment arrangement in writing, Company authorizes Quantcast to charge amounts owed under this Agreement after the end of each month to Company’s credit card, via automatic ACH, or such other similar payment method, at Quantcast’s option. Company will provide its most current credit card and/or other information required to complete payment, and keep such information updated if it changes. For the avoidance of doubt, if Company makes credit card, wire transfer or ACH payments or such other similar payment method, Company agrees to the applicable third-party terms as set forth in the Additional Terms. If Quantcast authorizes Company to pay invoices in arrears, Company will pay invoices within thirty (30) days of the invoice date. Quantcast may revise Company’s credit limit or require prepayment at any time in its sole discretion. Quantcast may charge interest at a rate of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company is responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect unpaid invoices. All payment obligations are non-cancelable and all amounts paid for Services provided are non-refundable. If Company requires a purchase order to make payments, Company will include the corresponding purchase order number in the Platform. All amounts due must be paid without setoff or deduction.
5.3.  Company is solely responsible for all amounts due for any Third-Party Services (defined below) that Company opts to use. Company acknowledges that any charges for Third-Party Services shown in the Platform or otherwise provided by Quantcast are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
5.4  Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating all metrics related to the Services, including all amounts owed under this Agreement. Company acknowledges that all amounts shown in Platform reporting are preliminary and final amounts will be as invoiced or billed by Quantcast.
5.5  All charges under this Agreement are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of this Agreement for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
6.
Services
License and Requirements
6.1.  Company may use the Services solely as set forth in this Agreement.
Subject
to this Agreement, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable license to (a) access and use the Platform on a self-serve basis, and (b) use the Platform Data presented in the Platform user interface solely for the purpose of using the Services.
6.2.  If Company uses the Services to manage Campaigns and purchase Inventory, Company will obtain all rights necessary to perform tracking and analytics, and store and serve the advertisements (“
Ads
”) associated with Company’s campaigns (“
Campaigns
”), including ad creatives. Company will not use the Services with Ads that violate any applicable laws, regulations, third-party rights, or this Agreement including the Incorporated Terms. If Company asks for Quantcast’s assistance with Company’s use of the Services, Company consents to the actions and/or inactions that Quantcast takes on its behalf and retains sole responsibility for such assisted use of the Services.
6.3. Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of a Client, if applicable), (d) reproduce,
distribute
, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile, or disassemble the Services, including Platform Data, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform or to end users via Ads, (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than the relevant Client who is obligated to treat such reports confidentially) or (g) create or enrich profiles of individual end users on the basis of Campaign Data (defined below) or information derived from Campaign Data, including the third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video and other content/properties) that the end users have visited or the content or general interest area of such media. For example, Company may not create an audience of Conde Nast end users based on information derived or obtained by using the Services.
6.4. For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing, and improving the Services.
6.5. Quantcast
reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon.
6.6.  Except
as expressly set forth in this Agreement, neither party grants the other party any rights, express or implied, and each party reserves all rights. If Company
provides Quantcast with feedback regarding the Services, Company hereby grants Quantcast a perpetual, irrevocable, fully paid up right and license to such feedback, without accounting, attribution, or compensation to Company.
7.  Data
Issues
7.1. Data
Definitions
:
7.1.1. “
Aggregated Data
” means generalized, combined data from numerous campaigns of multiple Quantcast customers, including Company, that concerns campaign parameters, goals, or performance results of such campaigns and that does not permit identification of Company or any other Quantcast custom
er of the Services.
7.1.2.  “
Campaign Data
” means the campaign-related reporting data generated in the course of the Services and provided to Company under this Agreement, such as Campaign performance reports. For the avoidance of doubt, Campaign Data does not include Tag Data.
7.1.3.  “
Campaign Tag
” means a tag, pixel or other element provided by Quantcast to Company for Company or Clients to place on Company Media to enable the collection of Tag Data. For clarity, the term “Campaign Tags” does not refer to any ad serving tags provided by Quantcast (i.e., if Company elects to use Quantcast ad serving).
7.1.4.  “
Company Data
” means all information and materials that are onboarded to Company’s account in the Platform, whether directly or via a third-party (e.g., an onboarding service provider). Without limiting the foregoing, Company Data includes all Campaign parameters (the data entered into the Platform for a Campaign such as name, budget, targeting strategy, etc.), Tag Data and any data onboarded by or on behalf of Company (e.g., first and/or third-party audiences). Company Data is a subset of Company’s Confidential Information.
7.1.5.  “
Company Media
”
means
the websites, apps and other digital properties or content associated with Ads, including the webpages, app screens and other digital properties on which Company or Clients place Campaign Tags
.
7.1.6.
“
Model
” means the predictive profile of shared attributes and characteristics of a group of end
users that Company desires to reach in a Campaign, created algorithmically by deriving observations from Company Data and Platform Data. For the avoidance of doubt, Models do not include any data at individual end
u
ser level or any end
u
ser-level identifiers that may be used to distinguish one end
u
ser from another end
u
ser (such as an end
u
ser ID or IP address).
7.1.7.
“
Platform Data
” means the data residing in the Platform or otherwise generated or used
in connection with
the Servic
es that does not constitute Company Data or
Campaign
Data, including Aggregated Data, Models, and third-party data (“
Third-Party Data
”). Some Platform Data may be presented to Company in the Platform user interface while other Platform Data may be used by the Platform on the back end (i.e., behind the scenes) to provide the Services. Platform Data is a subset of Quantcast’s Confidential Information.
7.1.8.
“
Tag Data
” means the data collected via Campaign Tags.
7.2.
Company Data
: As between the parties, Company Data is the exclusive property of Company and/or the applicable Client. As to all Company Data (whether provided by Company, Client or a third
-
party on Company’s or a Client’s behalf), Company
represents
and warrants that it has sufficient rights to provide Company Data for use by Quantcast in compliance with this Agreement. Quantcast may use Company Data solely in compliance with the DPAs (including to create Models for Company,
deliver
Campaigns and create audience insights, etc.). Quantcast will not share Company Data with any third
-
party except to the extent that Company reque
sts third-party services that utilize Company Data (e.g., third-party measurement),
Company Data is included as a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data)
or as otherwise authorized by Company
. In addition, Quantcast may use
non-company-identifiable inferences made from Tag Data
to produce, and as contained in, the Aggregated Data.
7.3.
Platform Data
: As between the parties, Platform Data is the exclusive property of Quantcast (or its third-party partners). Company may use Platform Data (whether directly, to the extent presented to Company in the Platform, or indirectly, to the extent used by the Platform to enable the Services) solely internally and solely for the purpose of using the Services as described in this Agreement. As to any Platform Data that Company can access and export using the self
-serve features of the Platform
, Company will not share such Platform Data with any third
-
party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Platform Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement
.
If Quantcast provides Company with
Platform Data outside the self-serve
features
of the Platform (
e.g.
,
further detail about available audien
ces, e
tc.)
, such Platform
Data
is subject to any applicable Additional Terms.
Company will not attempt to extract or recreate any Third-Party Data or other Platform Data that is not readily accessible via the normal functionality presented in the Platform or assemble similar data or audience segments itself (directly or indirectly through a third
-
party) on the basis of Third-Party Data or other Platform Data or information derived from the use of such data under this Agreement.
7.4.
Campaign
Data
: Company may use
Campaign
Data for its internal business purposes provided that (a) it complies with its privacy policy, (b) it complies with the terms of this Agreement, and (c) it does not disclose
Campaign Data
to any
third-
party except, if applicable, Company’s
Client(s) that such Campaign Data pertains to and/or
third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement. Quantcast may use
Campaign
Data (i) to provide the Services, and (ii)
within a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company.
7.5.
Models
:
Models reside solely within the Platform and are not directly accessible to Company. Company’s license above
includes
the ability to use Models as an integrated part of the Services, solely for the purpose of
selecting
and gaining insights about the end users that Company wishes to reach with its Campaigns.  Quantcast will not share Models generated in connection with C
ompany’s Campaigns
with other customers.
7.6.
Client Data
: Upon request from a Client, Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in
accordance
with
such
request (including sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Quantcast Platform). For clarity, “
Client
Data
” means the (i)
Tag Data from
Client websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments created using the Tag Data or any Campaign
Data
generated from Campaigns delivered using such Client Data.
7.7.
No Off-Platform Use
: Company will not use the Services, the
Campaign
Data, or any information derived from the Services, Models or
Campaign
Data to create or enrich profiles of individual end users or to
retarget any end user except via the Services.
8.
Compliance and Privacy
8.1  Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services), including Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self-regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means US State Privacy Laws and International Privacy Laws (defined in the linked DPAs). Company will comply with the Incorporated Terms.
8.2  Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of an end user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media directed at children (collectively, “
Prohibited Data
”). “
Direct Identifier
” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID and certain hashed identifiers (e.g., email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email). For purposes of this Agreement, “
children
” refers to anyone age 16 or under or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
9.
Third
-Party Services
9.1 If Company uses any third-party branded product or service in connection with the Services (including Third-Party Data made available for use via the Services) (“
Third-Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply.
9.2. Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third-party terms and requirements. For Third-Party Services offered via the Platform, such third-party terms and requirements may be provided in the Platform, the Additional Terms, otherwise by Quantcast or by the third-party.
9.3. Quantcast is not responsible for Third-Party Services and makes no representations as to such services, including their privacy practices. Quantcast cannot guarantee continued availability or pricing of Third-Party Services and may stop enabling access to them without liability. Company may be required to register for or log into Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company Data with Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
10.
Marketing, Publicity
Quantcast may include Company’s name and logo in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, in promotional materials, and in the Platform. Company will not use Quantcast’s name or logo without prior written permission. All goodwill from the use of Quantcast’s name or logo inures to Quantcast. Neither party will make a press release or any other public statement about this Agreement without the other party’s prior agreement (email sufficing).
11
.  Confidentiality
“
Confidential Information
” means
information that the disclosing party identifies as confidential or the receiving party should reasonably understand to be confidential given the circumstances of the disclosure and the nature of the information. Confidential Information does not include information that the receiving party can demonstrate: (a) it knew without restriction before receipt from the disclosing party, (b) is publicly available through no fault of the receiving party, (c) it rightfully received from a third-party without a duty of confidentiality, or (d) is independently developed without use of or reference to Confidential Information. The receiving party may use Confidential Information only to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and must use at least reasonable care to prevent any unauthorized use or disclosure of Confidential Information, but in any event no less stringent a standard than receiving party applies to its own Confidential Information. The receiving party may share Confidential Information with its employees, agents and contractors who need to know it, as long as they are bound to confidentiality obligations that are consistent with this Agreement, provided that the receiving party shall remain solely responsible for their compliance with this Agreement. If compelled to do so by law, the receiving party may disclose Confidential Information as long as it provides reasonable prior notice to the disclosing party (unless legally prohibited).  For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement prohibits Quantcast from using and sharing high level data that is compiled and summarized from the combination of Campaign Data with equivalent data generated by campaigns of other Quantcast customers, that does not allow identification of Company or Clients. Company will delete all Quantcast Confidential Information promptly upon termination of this Agreement.
12
.  Indemnity
12.1. Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents, and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast, its affiliated entities, and its and their directors, officers, employees and agents, and its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) use of the Services or Third-Party Services in violation of this Agreement; (b) Company Data or Ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of Sections 6.2. 6.3, 7 or 8.
12.2.  The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
12.3. Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or Campaign Data, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast that would have cured the cause of action, (e) use of the Services or Campaign Data other than as described herein, or (f) Inventory or Third-Party Services selected by Company. In such cases, Company will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
12.4.  If Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing or terminate this Agreement.  Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section 12 are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability and Company’s sole remedy as to infringement.
13
.  Account Closure, Termination and Suspension
13.1. Company may close its account at any time via the Platform. Quantcast may terminate this Agreement upon notice for any reason or no reason. Sections 5, 6.6, 7 and 11-15 will survive account closure and/or termination.
13.2. Without limiting any other remedies, Quantcast may immediately suspend or terminate any individual Campaign, Authorized User’s access, and/or Company or Client account, including if Quantcast in its sole discretion suspects that a Campaign, Authorized User, Client, or Company is in breach this Agreement (including failure to comply with the Incorporated Terms. If Quantcast suspends or closes Company’s account, Company may not re-open an account without Quantcast’s prior written approval.
14.
DISCLAIMER, LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
14.1. QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. QUANTCAST HAS NO LIABILITY FOR THIRD-PARTY SERVICES. QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY OR DISCONTINUE ANY OR ALL SERVICES AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY OR NO REASON, WITH OR WITHOUT NOTICE.
14.2. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION 14.2 LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED.
14.3. EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE (SECTION 5), AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE.
14.4.  The limitations and exclusions contained in this Agreement represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with this Agreement and the payments made hereunder.
15.
General
.
15.1. This Agreement is the entire agreement of the parties relating to the Services and it supersedes all other commitments and understandings with respect to the Services. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement does not apply to Quantcast Measure. To the extent that Incorporated Terms conflict with the main body of this Agreement, the Incorporated Terms will control.
15.2. Except for Quantcast’s right to make changes as described herein, no changes to this Agreement are effective unless such changes are in writing and signed by Quantcast.
15.3. This Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement will be governed by (i) the laws of the State of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the laws of New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the laws of Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited, each without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
15.4. Any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement will be brought exclusively in (i) the state or federal courts in the Northern District of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the relevant courts in New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the relevant courts in Dublin, Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited. Quantcast and Company hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, these courts (as applicable). Actions arising under or related to this Agreement or the Services must be brought in the initiating party’s individual capacity, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class action or similar proceeding.
15.5. The Services may be subject to export and/or import control laws and regulations. Company is solely responsible for complying with all applicable export control laws and regulations.
15.6. Unless provided otherwise in the Additional Terms, there are no third-party beneficiaries to this Agreement.
15.7.  All notices will be in writing. Notices to Company may be delivered via the Platform or sent to the address associated with Company’s account. Notices to Quantcast will be sent to the applicable physical and addresses set forth below for Quantcast. Notice will be deemed to have been given upon: (a) the date actually delivered in person; (b) the day after the date sent by overnight courier; or (c) the date posted in the Platform by Quantcast. Notices may be confirmed by email.
Quantcast Corp
.: 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107
Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd
.: 99 Elizabeth Street, Sydney 2000 NSW, Australia
Quantcast International Limited
: Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn
: Legal Department
Email
: legal@quantcast.com
15.8. Quantcast will not be liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder on account of events beyond Quantcast’s reasonable control.
15.9. This Agreement and the licenses granted herein are not transferable or assignable without prior written consent of the non-transferring or non-assigning party except that a party may upon written notice assign this Agreement to an acquirer of substantially all of that party’s assets, stock or business by sale, merger or otherwise or to an Affiliate. “
Affiliate
” means an entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a party. Any assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
15.10. The parties have been represented in execution of this Agreement by legal counsel or have voluntarily declined to seek such counsel. If any provision of this Agreement is unenforceable, the validity of the remaining provisions will not be affected.
15.11. Quantcast’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of this Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if made explicitly, in writing and signed by Quantcast.
Effective February 12th 2024
to
April 22nd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
QUANTCAST  BUYER TERMS
Last Updated: January 16, 2023
If Company has an active, duly executed contract for one or more of the Services, that existing agreement will govern Company’s use of such Services within the scope of such agreement instead of this Quantcast Master Services Agreement (“
Agreement
”).
This Agreement is a legally binding contract between Quantcast and Company. “
Company
” means (A) when an individual accepts this Agreement on his or her own behalf, such individual, or (B) when an individual accepts this Agreement on behalf of a company or other legal entity, that company or legal entity.  “
Quantcast
” means (X) Quantcast Corp. if Company is domiciled in the United States, (Y) Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd. if Company is domiciled in any country or territory located in the Asia Pacific (APAC) region and (Z) Quantcast International Limited if Company is domiciled in any other country or territory.
Quantcast may modify this Agreement. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Services. Company’s continued use of the Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates.
Incorporated Terms
This Agreement incorporates the following additional terms (“
Incorporated Terms
”), as updated from time to time:
Quantcast Campaign Policy
(“
Campaign Policy
”)
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners
(“
Privacy Implementation
”)
US State Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent
the Services include processing Personal Information
subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (“
DPA
”)
International Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent that the Services include processing Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum)
(also “
DPA
”)
Any applicable
Additional Terms
(defined below)
Services
“
Services
”
means
the
Quantcast platform (“
Platform
”)
and, to the extent provided by Quantcast under this Agreement, Campaign Tags, Platform Data, and any other services provided by Quantcast. The Services may permit Company to purchase ad placements on third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video, and other content/properties) (“
Inventory
”) that are made available by third-party providers (“
Inventory Providers
”) and Third-Party Services (defined below). For clarity, the “Services” do not include Inventory or Third-Party Services.
Some Services may be subject to different or additional terms (“
Additional Terms
”) that are
described on the Additional Terms page linked above, in the Platform or otherwise made available to Company in writing.
Unless the parties agree in writing for Quantcast to provide campaign management services or professional services, the Services do not include those services.
Accounts and Authorized Users
Company will ensure its account information is accurate and current. Company will promptly notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of Company access credentials. Quantcast may review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
“
Authorized User
” means an individual authorized by Company to use Company’s account on the Platform.
Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials
. Company acknowledges that
each Authorized User may have the ability to add and terminate other Authorized Users. Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including the confidentiality of all access credentials. Company will immediately notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of any access credentials. Company will ensure that all Authorized Users use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, and are aware of, and comply with, this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is liable for any breach of this Agreement by any Authorized User.
Company
Clients
If Company is using the Services on behalf of third-party clients (“
Clients
”), Company represents and warrants that it has all rights and authorizations needed to do so. Company will only use the Services for Clients with which Company has a direct written agreement and will obligate its Clients to comply with this Agreement, including the Incorporated Terms. Company is responsible for the actions and/or inactions of Clients and for ensuring their compliance.
Fees and Payment
Fees will be provided in the Platform or by other written means.
Unless Quantcast approves a different payment arrangement in writing, Company authorizes Quantcast to charge amounts owed under this Agreement to Company’s credit card, or to receive payment via wire transfer, automatic ACH, or such other similar payment method, at Quantcast’s option. Company will provide its most current credit card and/or other information required to complete payment, and keep such information updated if it changes. For the avoidance of doubt, if Company makes credit card, wire transfer or ACH payments or such other similar payment method, Company agrees to the applicable third-party terms as set forth in the Additional Terms. If Quantcast provides Company with the ability to pay invoices in arrears, Company will pay invoices upon receipt.  Quantcast may revise Company’s credit limit or require prepayment at any time in its sole discretion. Quantcast may charge interest at a rate of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company is responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect unpaid invoices. All payment obligations are non-cancelable and all amounts paid for Services provided are non-refundable. If Company requires a purchase order to make payments, Company will include the corresponding purchase order number in the Platform. All amounts due must be paid without setoff or deduction.
Company is solely responsible for all amounts due for any Third-Party Services (defined below) that Company opts to use. Company acknowledges that any charges for Third-Party Services shown in the Platform or otherwise provided by Quantcast are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating all metrics related to the Services, including all amounts owed under this Agreement. Company acknowledges that all amounts shown in Platform reporting are preliminary and final amounts will be as invoiced or billed by Quantcast.
All charges under this Agreement are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of this Agreement for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
Services
License and Requirements
Company may use the Services solely as set forth in this Agreement.
Subject
to this Agreement, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable license to (a) access and use the Platform on a self-serve basis, and (b) use the Platform Data presented in the Platform user interface solely for the purpose of using the Services.
If Company uses the Services to manage Campaigns and purchase Inventory, Company will obtain all rights necessary to perform tracking and analytics, and store and serve the advertisements (“
Ads
”) associated with Company’s campaigns (“
Campaigns
”), including ad creatives. Company will not use the Services with Ads that violate any applicable laws, regulations, third-party rights, or this Agreement including the Incorporated Terms. If Company asks for Quantcast’s assistance with Company’s use of the Services, Company consents to the actions and/or inactions that Quantcast takes on its behalf and retains sole responsibility for such assisted use of the Services.
Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of a Client, if applicable), (d) reproduce,
distribute
, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile, or disassemble the Services, including Platform Data, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform or to end users via Ads, (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than the relevant Client who is obligated to treat such reports confidentially) or (g) create or enrich profiles of individual end users on the basis of Campaign Data (defined below) or information derived from Campaign Data, including the third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video and other content/properties) that the end users have visited or the content or general interest area of such media. For example, Company may not create an audience of Conde Nast end users based on information derived or obtained by using the Services.
For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing, and improving the Services.
Quantcast
reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon.
Except
as expressly set forth in this Agreement, neither party grants the other party any rights, express or implied, and each party reserves all rights. If Company
provides Quantcast with feedback regarding the Services, Company hereby grants Quantcast a perpetual, irrevocable, fully paid up right and license to such feedback, without accounting, attribution, or compensation to Company.
Data
Issues
Data
Definitions
:
“
Aggregated Data
” means generalized, combined data from numerous campaigns of multiple Quantcast customers, including Company, that concerns campaign parameters, goals, or performance results of such campaigns and that does not permit identification of Company or any other Quantcast custom
er of the Services.
“
Campaign Data
” means the campaign-related reporting data generated in the course of the Services and provided to Company under this Agreement, such as Campaign performance reports. For the avoidance of doubt, Campaign Data does not include Tag Data.
“
Campaign Tag
” means a tag, pixel or other element provided by Quantcast to Company for Company or Clients to place on Company Media to enable the collection of Tag Data. For clarity, the term “Campaign Tags” does not refer to any ad serving tags provided by Quantcast (i.e., if Company elects to use Quantcast ad serving).
“
Company Data
” means all information and materials that are onboarded to Company’s account in the Platform, whether directly or via a third-party (e.g., an onboarding service provider). Without limiting the foregoing, Company Data includes all Campaign parameters (the data entered into the Platform for a Campaign such as name, budget, targeting strategy, etc.), Tag Data and any data onboarded by or on behalf of Company (e.g., first and/or third-party audiences). Company Data is a subset of Company’s Confidential Information.
“
Company Media
”
means
the websites, apps and other digital properties or content associated with Ads, including the webpages, app screens and other digital properties on which Company or Clients place Campaign Tags
.
“
Model
” means the predictive profile of shared attributes and characteristics of a group of end
users that Company desires to reach in a Campaign, created algorithmically by deriving observations from Company Data and Platform Data. For the avoidance of doubt, Models do not include any data at individual end
u
ser level or any end
u
ser-level identifiers that may be used to distinguish one end
u
ser from another end
u
ser (such as an end
u
ser ID or IP address).
“
Platform Data
” means the data residing in the Platform or otherwise generated or used
in connection with
the Servic
es that does not constitute Company Data or
Campaign
Data, including Aggregated Data, Models, and third-party data (“
Third-Party Data
”). Some Platform Data may be presented to Company in the Platform user interface while other Platform Data may be used by the Platform on the back end (i.e., behind the scenes) to provide the Services. Platform Data is a subset of Quantcast’s Confidential Information.
“
Tag Data
” means the data collected via Campaign Tags.
Company Data
: As between the parties, Company Data is the exclusive property of Company and/or the applicable Client. As to all Company Data (whether provided by Company, Client or a third
-
party on Company’s or a Client’s behalf), Company
represents
and warrants that it has sufficient rights to provide Company Data for use by Quantcast in compliance with this Agreement. Quantcast may use Company Data solely in compliance with the DPAs (including to create Models for Company,
deliver
Campaigns and create audience insights, etc.). Quantcast will not share Company Data with any third
-
party except to the extent that Company reque
sts third-party services that utilize Company Data (e.g., third-party measurement),
Company Data is included as a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data)
or as otherwise authorized by Company
. In addition, Quantcast may use
non-company-identifiable inferences made from Tag Data
to produce, and as contained in, the Aggregated Data.
Platform Data
: As between the parties, Platform Data is the exclusive property of Quantcast (or its third-party partners). Company may use Platform Data (whether directly, to the extent presented to Company in the Platform, or indirectly, to the extent used by the Platform to enable the Services) solely internally and solely for the purpose of using the Services as described in this Agreement. As to any Platform Data that Company can access and export using the self
-serve features of the Platform
, Company will not share such Platform Data with any third
-
party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Platform Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement
.
If Quantcast provides Company with
Platform Data outside the self-serve
features
of the Platform (
e.g.
,
further detail about available audien
ces, e
tc.)
, such Platform
Data
is subject to any applicable Additional Terms.
Company will not attempt to extract or recreate any Third-Party Data or other Platform Data that is not readily accessible via the normal functionality presented in the Platform or assemble similar data or audience segments itself (directly or indirectly through a third
-
party) on the basis of Third-Party Data or other Platform Data or information derived from the use of such data under this Agreement.
Campaign
Data
: Company may use
Campaign
Data for its internal business purposes provided that (a) it complies with its privacy policy, (b) it complies with the terms of this Agreement, and (c) it does not disclose
Campaign Data
to any
third-
party except, if applicable, Company’s
Client(s) that such Campaign Data pertains to and/or
third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement. Quantcast may use
Campaign
Data (i) to provide the Services, and (ii)
within a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company.
Models
:
Models reside solely within the Platform and are not directly accessible to Company. Company’s license above
includes
the ability to use Models as an integrated part of the Services, solely for the purpose of
selecting
and gaining insights about the end users that Company wishes to reach with its Campaigns.  Quantcast will not share Models generated in connection with C
ompany’s Campaigns
with other customers.
Client Data
: Upon request from a Client, Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in
accordance
with
such
request (including sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Quantcast Platform). For clarity, “
Client
Data
” means the (i)
Tag Data from
Client websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments created using the Tag Data or any Campaign
Data
generated from Campaigns delivered using such Client Data.
No Off-Platform Use
: Company will not use the Services, the
Campaign
Data, or any information derived from the Services, Models or
Campaign
Data to create or enrich profiles of individual end users or to
retarget any end user except via the Services.
Compliance and Privacy
Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services), including Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self-regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means US State Privacy Laws and International Privacy Laws (defined in the linked DPAs). Company will comply with the Incorporated Terms.
Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of an end user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media directed at children (collectively, “
Prohibited Data
”). “
Direct Identifier
” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID and certain hashed identifiers (e.g., email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email). For purposes of this Agreement, “
children
” refers to anyone age 16 or under or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
Third
-Party Services
If Company uses any third-party branded product or service in connection with the Services (including Third-Party Data made available for use via the Services) (“
Third-Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply.
Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third-party terms and requirements. For Third-Party Services offered via the Platform, such third-party terms and requirements may be provided in the Platform, the Additional Terms, otherwise by Quantcast or by the third-party.
Quantcast is not responsible for Third-Party Services and makes no representations as to such services, including their privacy practices. Quantcast cannot guarantee continued availability or pricing of Third-Party Services and may stop enabling access to them without liability. Company may be required to register for or log into Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company Data with Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
Marketing, Publicity
Quantcast may include Company’s name and logo in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, in promotional materials, and in the Platform. Company will not use Quantcast’s name or logo without prior written permission. All goodwill from the use of Quantcast’s name or logo inures to Quantcast. Neither party will make a press release or any other public statement about this Agreement without the other party’s prior agreement (email sufficing).
Confidentiality
“
Confidential Information
” means
information that the disclosing party identifies as confidential or the receiving party should reasonably understand to be confidential given the circumstances of the disclosure and the nature of the information. Confidential Information does not include information that the receiving party can demonstrate: (a) it knew without restriction before receipt from the disclosing party, (b) is publicly available through no fault of the receiving party, (c) it rightfully received from a third-party without a duty of confidentiality, or (d) is independently developed without use of or reference to Confidential Information. The receiving party may use Confidential Information only to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and must use at least reasonable care to prevent any unauthorized use or disclosure of Confidential Information, but in any event no less stringent a standard than receiving party applies to its own Confidential Information. The receiving party may share Confidential Information with its employees, agents and contractors who need to know it, as long as they are bound to confidentiality obligations that are consistent with this Agreement, provided that the receiving party shall remain solely responsible for their compliance with this Agreement. If compelled to do so by law, the receiving party may disclose Confidential Information as long as it provides reasonable prior notice to the disclosing party (unless legally prohibited).  For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement prohibits Quantcast from using and sharing high level data that is compiled and summarized from the combination of Campaign Data with equivalent data generated by campaigns of other Quantcast customers, that does not allow identification of Company or Clients. Company will delete all Quantcast Confidential Information promptly upon termination of this Agreement.
Indemnity
Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents, and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast, its affiliated entities, and its and their directors, officers, employees and agents, and its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) use of the Services or Third-Party Services in violation of this Agreement; (b) Company Data or Ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of Sections 6.2. 6.3, 7 or 8.
The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or Campaign Data, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast that would have cured the cause of action, (e) use of the Services or Campaign Data other than as described herein, or (f) Inventory or Third-Party Services selected by Company. In such cases, Company will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
If Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing or terminate this Agreement.  Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section 12 are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability and Company’s sole remedy as to infringement.
Account Closure, Termination and Suspension
Company may close its account at any time via the Platform. Quantcast may terminate this Agreement upon notice for any reason or no reason. Sections 5, 6.6, 7 and 11-15 will survive account closure and/or termination.
Without limiting any other remedies, Quantcast may immediately suspend or terminate any individual Campaign, Authorized User’s access, and/or Company or Client account, including if Quantcast in its sole discretion suspects that a Campaign, Authorized User, Client, or Company is in breach this Agreement (including failure to comply with the Incorporated Terms. If Quantcast suspends or closes Company’s account, Company may not re-open an account without Quantcast’s prior written approval.
DISCLAIMER, LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. QUANTCAST HAS NO LIABILITY FOR THIRD-PARTY SERVICES. QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY OR DISCONTINUE ANY OR ALL SERVICES AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY OR NO REASON, WITH OR WITHOUT NOTICE.
EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION 14.2 LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED.
EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE (SECTION 5), AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE.
The limitations and exclusions contained in this Agreement represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with this Agreement and the payments made hereunder.
General
.
This Agreement is the entire agreement of the parties relating to the Services and it supersedes all other commitments and understandings with respect to the Services. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement does not apply to Quantcast Measure. To the extent that Incorporated Terms conflict with the main body of this Agreement, the Incorporated Terms will control.
Except for Quantcast’s right to make changes as described herein, no changes to this Agreement are effective unless such changes are in writing and signed by Quantcast.
This Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement will be governed by (i) the laws of the State of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the laws of New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the laws of Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited, each without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
Any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement will be brought exclusively in (i) the state or federal courts in the Northern District of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the relevant courts in New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the relevant courts in Dublin, Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited. Quantcast and Company hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, these courts (as applicable). Actions arising under or related to this Agreement or the Services must be brought in the initiating party’s individual capacity, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class action or similar proceeding.
The Services may be subject to export and/or import control laws and regulations. Company is solely responsible for complying with all applicable export control laws and regulations.
Unless provided otherwise in the Additional Terms, there are no third-party beneficiaries to this Agreement.
All notices will be in writing. Notices to Company may be delivered via the Platform or sent to the address associated with Company’s account. Notices to Quantcast will be sent to the applicable physical and addresses set forth below for Quantcast. Notice will be deemed to have been given upon: (a) the date actually delivered in person; (b) the day after the date sent by overnight courier; or (c) the date posted in the Platform by Quantcast. Notices may be confirmed by email.
Quantcast Corp
.: 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107
Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd
.: 99 Elizabeth Street, Sydney 2000 NSW, Australia
Quantcast International Limited
: Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn
: Legal Department
Email
: legal@quantcast.com
Quantcast will not be liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder on account of events beyond Quantcast’s reasonable control.
This Agreement and the licenses granted herein are not transferable or assignable without prior written consent of the non-transferring or non-assigning party except that a party may upon written notice assign this Agreement to an acquirer of substantially all of that party’s assets, stock or business by sale, merger or otherwise or to an Affiliate. “
Affiliate
” means an entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a party. Any assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
The parties have been represented in execution of this Agreement by legal counsel or have voluntarily declined to seek such counsel. If any provision of this Agreement is unenforceable, the validity of the remaining provisions will not be affected.
Quantcast’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of this Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if made explicitly, in writing and signed by Quantcast.
Effective February 12th 2024
to
February 12th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
QUANTCAST  BUYER TERMS
Last Updated: January 16, 2023
If Company has an active, duly executed contract for one or more of the Services, that existing agreement will govern Company’s use of such Services within the scope of such agreement instead of this Quantcast Master Services Agreement (“
Agreement
”).
This Agreement is a legally binding contract between Quantcast and Company. “
Company
” means (A) when an individual accepts this Agreement on his or her own behalf, such individual, or (B) when an individual accepts this Agreement on behalf of a company or other legal entity, that company or legal entity.  “
Quantcast
” means (X) Quantcast Corp. if Company is domiciled in the United States, (Y) Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd. if Company is domiciled in any country or territory located in the Asia Pacific (APAC) region and (Z) Quantcast International Limited if Company is domiciled in any other country or territory.
Quantcast may modify this Agreement. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Services. Company’s continued use of the Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates.
Incorporated Terms
This Agreement incorporates the following additional terms (“
Incorporated Terms
”), as updated from time to time:
Quantcast Campaign Policy
(“
Campaign Policy
”)
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners
(“
Privacy Implementation
”)
US State Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent
the Services include processing Personal Information
subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (“
DPA
”)
International Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent that the Services include processing Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum)
(also “
DPA
”)
Any applicable
Additional Terms
(defined below)
Services
“
Services
”
means
the
Quantcast platform (“
Platform
”)
and, to the extent provided by Quantcast under this Agreement, Campaign Tags, Platform Data, and any other services provided by Quantcast. The Services may permit Company to purchase ad placements on third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video, and other content/properties) (“
Inventory
”) that are made available by third-party providers (“
Inventory Providers
”) and Third-Party Services (defined below). For clarity, the “Services” do not include Inventory or Third-Party Services.
Some Services may be subject to different or additional terms (“
Additional Terms
”) that are
described on the Additional Terms page linked above, in the Platform or otherwise made available to Company in writing.
Unless the parties agree in writing for Quantcast to provide campaign management services or professional services, the Services do not include those services.
Accounts and Authorized Users
Company will ensure its account information is accurate and current. Company will promptly notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of Company access credentials. Quantcast may review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
“
Authorized User
” means an individual authorized by Company to use Company’s account on the Platform.
Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials
. Company acknowledges that
each Authorized User may have the ability to add and terminate other Authorized Users. Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including the confidentiality of all access credentials. Company will immediately notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of any access credentials. Company will ensure that all Authorized Users use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, and are aware of, and comply with, this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is liable for any breach of this Agreement by any Authorized User.
Company
Clients
If Company is using the Services on behalf of third-party clients (“
Clients
”), Company represents and warrants that it has all rights and authorizations needed to do so. Company will only use the Services for Clients with which Company has a direct written agreement and will obligate its Clients to comply with this Agreement, including the Incorporated Terms. Company is responsible for the actions and/or inactions of Clients and for ensuring their compliance.
Fees and Payment
Fees will be provided in the Platform or by other written means.
Unless Quantcast approves a different payment arrangement in writing, Company authorizes Quantcast to charge amounts owed under this Agreement to Company’s credit card, or to receive payment via wire transfer, automatic ACH, or such other similar payment method, at Quantcast’s option. Company will provide its most current credit card and/or other information required to complete payment, and keep such information updated if it changes. For the avoidance of doubt, if Company makes credit card, wire transfer or ACH payments or such other similar payment method, Company agrees to the applicable third-party terms as set forth in the Additional Terms. If Quantcast provides Company with the ability to pay invoices in arrears, Company will pay invoices upon receipt.  Quantcast may revise Company’s credit limit or require prepayment at any time in its sole discretion. Quantcast may charge interest at a rate of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company is responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect unpaid invoices. All payment obligations are non-cancelable and all amounts paid for Services provided are non-refundable. If Company requires a purchase order to make payments, Company will include the corresponding purchase order number in the Platform. All amounts due must be paid without setoff or deduction.
Company is solely responsible for all amounts due for any Third-Party Services (defined below) that Company opts to use. Company acknowledges that any charges for Third-Party Services shown in the Platform or otherwise provided by Quantcast are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating all metrics related to the Services, including all amounts owed under this Agreement. Company acknowledges that all amounts shown in Platform reporting are preliminary and final amounts will be as invoiced or billed by Quantcast.
All charges under this Agreement are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of this Agreement for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
Services
License and Requirements
Company may use the Services solely as set forth in this Agreement.
Subject
to this Agreement, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable license to (a) access and use the Platform on a self-serve basis, and (b) use the Platform Data presented in the Platform user interface solely for the purpose of using the Services.
If Company uses the Services to manage Campaigns and purchase Inventory, Company will obtain all rights necessary to perform tracking and analytics, and store and serve the advertisements (“
Ads
”) associated with Company’s campaigns (“
Campaigns
”), including ad creatives. Company will not use the Services with Ads that violate any applicable laws, regulations, third-party rights, or this Agreement including the Incorporated Terms. If Company asks for Quantcast’s assistance with Company’s use of the Services, Company consents to the actions and/or inactions that Quantcast takes on its behalf and retains sole responsibility for such assisted use of the Services.
Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of a Client, if applicable), (d) reproduce,
distribute
, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile, or disassemble the Services, including Platform Data, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform or to end users via Ads, (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than the relevant Client who is obligated to treat such reports confidentially) or (g) create or enrich profiles of individual end users on the basis of Campaign Data (defined below) or information derived from Campaign Data, including the third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video and other content/properties) that the end users have visited or the content or general interest area of such media. For example, Company may not create an audience of Conde Nast end users based on information derived or obtained by using the Services.
For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing, and improving the Services.
Quantcast
reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon.
Except
as expressly set forth in this Agreement, neither party grants the other party any rights, express or implied, and each party reserves all rights. If Company
provides Quantcast with feedback regarding the Services, Company hereby grants Quantcast a perpetual, irrevocable, fully paid up right and license to such feedback, without accounting, attribution, or compensation to Company.
Data
Issues
Data
Definitions
:
“
Aggregated Data
” means generalized, combined data from numerous campaigns of multiple Quantcast customers, including Company, that concerns campaign parameters, goals, or performance results of such campaigns and that does not permit identification of Company or any other Quantcast custom
er of the Services.
“
Campaign Data
” means the campaign-related reporting data generated in the course of the Services and provided to Company under this Agreement, such as Campaign performance reports. For the avoidance of doubt, Campaign Data does not include Tag Data.
“
Campaign Tag
” means a tag, pixel or other element provided by Quantcast to Company for Company or Clients to place on Company Media to enable the collection of Tag Data. For clarity, the term “Campaign Tags” does not refer to any ad serving tags provided by Quantcast (i.e., if Company elects to use Quantcast ad serving).
“
Company Data
” means all information and materials that are onboarded to Company’s account in the Platform, whether directly or via a third-party (e.g., an onboarding service provider). Without limiting the foregoing, Company Data includes all Campaign parameters (the data entered into the Platform for a Campaign such as name, budget, targeting strategy, etc.), Tag Data and any data onboarded by or on behalf of Company (e.g., first and/or third-party audiences). Company Data is a subset of Company’s Confidential Information.
“
Company Media
”
means
the websites, apps and other digital properties or content associated with Ads, including the webpages, app screens and other digital properties on which Company or Clients place Campaign Tags
.
“
Model
” means the predictive profile of shared attributes and characteristics of a group of end
users that Company desires to reach in a Campaign, created algorithmically by deriving observations from Company Data and Platform Data. For the avoidance of doubt, Models do not include any data at individual end
u
ser level or any end
u
ser-level identifiers that may be used to distinguish one end
u
ser from another end
u
ser (such as an end
u
ser ID or IP address).
“
Platform Data
” means the data residing in the Platform or otherwise generated or used
in connection with
the Servic
es that does not constitute Company Data or
Campaign
Data, including Aggregated Data, Models, and third-party data (“
Third-Party Data
”). Some Platform Data may be presented to Company in the Platform user interface while other Platform Data may be used by the Platform on the back end (i.e., behind the scenes) to provide the Services. Platform Data is a subset of Quantcast’s Confidential Information.
“
Tag Data
” means the data collected via Campaign Tags.
Company Data
: As between the parties, Company Data is the exclusive property of Company and/or the applicable Client. As to all Company Data (whether provided by Company, Client or a third
-
party on Company’s or a Client’s behalf), Company
represents
and warrants that it has sufficient rights to provide Company Data for use by Quantcast in compliance with this Agreement. Quantcast may use Company Data solely in compliance with the DPAs (including to create Models for Company,
deliver
Campaigns and create audience insights, etc.). Quantcast will not share Company Data with any third
-
party except to the extent that Company reque
sts third-party services that utilize Company Data (e.g., third-party measurement),
Company Data is included as a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data)
or as otherwise authorized by Company
. In addition, Quantcast may use
non-company-identifiable inferences made from Tag Data
to produce, and as contained in, the Aggregated Data.
Platform Data
: As between the parties, Platform Data is the exclusive property of Quantcast (or its third-party partners). Company may use Platform Data (whether directly, to the extent presented to Company in the Platform, or indirectly, to the extent used by the Platform to enable the Services) solely internally and solely for the purpose of using the Services as described in this Agreement. As to any Platform Data that Company can access and export using the self
-serve features of the Platform
, Company will not share such Platform Data with any third
-
party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Platform Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement
.
If Quantcast provides Company with
Platform Data outside the self-serve
features
of the Platform (
e.g.
,
further detail about available audien
ces, e
tc.)
, such Platform
Data
is subject to any applicable Additional Terms.
Company will not attempt to extract or recreate any Third-Party Data or other Platform Data that is not readily accessible via the normal functionality presented in the Platform or assemble similar data or audience segments itself (directly or indirectly through a third
-
party) on the basis of Third-Party Data or other Platform Data or information derived from the use of such data under this Agreement.
Campaign
Data
: Company may use
Campaign
Data for its internal business purposes provided that (a) it complies with its privacy policy, (b) it complies with the terms of this Agreement, and (c) it does not disclose
Campaign Data
to any
third-
party except, if applicable, Company’s
Client(s) that such Campaign Data pertains to and/or
third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement. Quantcast may use
Campaign
Data (i) to provide the Services, and (ii)
within a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company.
Models
:
Models reside solely within the Platform and are not directly accessible to Company. Company’s license above
includes
the ability to use Models as an integrated part of the Services, solely for the purpose of
selecting
and gaining insights about the end users that Company wishes to reach with its Campaigns.  Quantcast will not share Models generated in connection with C
ompany’s Campaigns
with other customers.
Client Data
: Upon request from a Client, Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in
accordance
with
such
request (including sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Quantcast Platform). For clarity, “
Client
Data
” means the (i)
Tag Data from
Client websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments created using the Tag Data or any Campaign
Data
generated from Campaigns delivered using such Client Data.
No Off-Platform Use
: Company will not use the Services, the
Campaign
Data, or any information derived from the Services, Models or
Campaign
Data to create or enrich profiles of individual end users or to
retarget any end user except via the Services.
Compliance and Privacy
Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services), including Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self-regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means US State Privacy Laws and International Privacy Laws (defined in the linked DPAs). Company will comply with the Incorporated Terms.
Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of an end user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media directed at children (collectively, “
Prohibited Data
”). “
Direct Identifier
” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID and certain hashed identifiers (e.g., email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email). For purposes of this Agreement, “
children
” refers to anyone age 16 or under or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
Third
-Party Services
If Company uses any third-party branded product or service in connection with the Services (including Third-Party Data made available for use via the Services) (“
Third-Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply.
Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third-party terms and requirements. For Third-Party Services offered via the Platform, such third-party terms and requirements may be provided in the Platform, the Additional Terms, otherwise by Quantcast or by the third-party.
Quantcast is not responsible for Third-Party Services and makes no representations as to such services, including their privacy practices. Quantcast cannot guarantee continued availability or pricing of Third-Party Services and may stop enabling access to them without liability. Company may be required to register for or log into Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company Data with Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
Marketing, Publicity
Quantcast may include Company’s name and logo in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, in promotional materials, and in the Platform. Company will not use Quantcast’s name or logo without prior written permission. All goodwill from the use of Quantcast’s name or logo inures to Quantcast. Neither party will make a press release or any other public statement about this Agreement without the other party’s prior agreement (email sufficing).
Confidentiality
“
Confidential Information
” means
information that the disclosing party identifies as confidential or the receiving party should reasonably understand to be confidential given the circumstances of the disclosure and the nature of the information. Confidential Information does not include information that the receiving party can demonstrate: (a) it knew without restriction before receipt from the disclosing party, (b) is publicly available through no fault of the receiving party, (c) it rightfully received from a third-party without a duty of confidentiality, or (d) is independently developed without use of or reference to Confidential Information. The receiving party may use Confidential Information only to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and must use at least reasonable care to prevent any unauthorized use or disclosure of Confidential Information, but in any event no less stringent a standard than receiving party applies to its own Confidential Information. The receiving party may share Confidential Information with its employees, agents and contractors who need to know it, as long as they are bound to confidentiality obligations that are consistent with this Agreement, provided that the receiving party shall remain solely responsible for their compliance with this Agreement. If compelled to do so by law, the receiving party may disclose Confidential Information as long as it provides reasonable prior notice to the disclosing party (unless legally prohibited).  For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement prohibits Quantcast from using and sharing high level data that is compiled and summarized from the combination of Campaign Data with equivalent data generated by campaigns of other Quantcast customers, that does not allow identification of Company or Clients. Company will delete all Quantcast Confidential Information promptly upon termination of this Agreement.
Indemnity
Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents, and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast, its affiliated entities, and its and their directors, officers, employees and agents, and its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) use of the Services or Third-Party Services in violation of this Agreement; (b) Company Data or Ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of Sections 6.2. 6.3, 7 or 8.
The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or Campaign Data, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast that would have cured the cause of action, (e) use of the Services or Campaign Data other than as described herein, or (f) Inventory or Third-Party Services selected by Company. In such cases, Company will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
If Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing or terminate this Agreement.  Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section 12 are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability and Company’s sole remedy as to infringement.
Account Closure, Termination and Suspension
Company may close its account at any time via the Platform. Quantcast may terminate this Agreement upon notice for any reason or no reason. Sections 5, 6.6, 7 and 11-15 will survive account closure and/or termination.
Without limiting any other remedies, Quantcast may immediately suspend or terminate any individual Campaign, Authorized User’s access, and/or Company or Client account, including if Quantcast in its sole discretion suspects that a Campaign, Authorized User, Client, or Company is in breach this Agreement (including failure to comply with the Incorporated Terms. If Quantcast suspends or closes Company’s account, Company may not re-open an account without Quantcast’s prior written approval.
DISCLAIMER, LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. QUANTCAST HAS NO LIABILITY FOR THIRD-PARTY SERVICES. QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY OR DISCONTINUE ANY OR ALL SERVICES AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY OR NO REASON, WITH OR WITHOUT NOTICE.
EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION 14.2 LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED.
EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE (SECTION 5), AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE.
The limitations and exclusions contained in this Agreement represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with this Agreement and the payments made hereunder.
General
.
This Agreement is the entire agreement of the parties relating to the Services and it supersedes all other commitments and understandings with respect to the Services. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement does not apply to Quantcast Measure. To the extent that Incorporated Terms conflict with the main body of this Agreement, the Incorporated Terms will control.
Except for Quantcast’s right to make changes as described herein, no changes to this Agreement are effective unless such changes are in writing and signed by Quantcast.
This Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement will be governed by (i) the laws of the State of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the laws of New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the laws of Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited, each without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
Any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement will be brought exclusively in (i) the state or federal courts in the Northern District of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the relevant courts in New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the relevant courts in Dublin, Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited. Quantcast and Company hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, these courts (as applicable). Actions arising under or related to this Agreement or the Services must be brought in the initiating party’s individual capacity, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class action or similar proceeding.
The Services may be subject to export and/or import control laws and regulations. Company is solely responsible for complying with all applicable export control laws and regulations.
Unless provided otherwise in the Additional Terms, there are no third-party beneficiaries to this Agreement.
All notices will be in writing. Notices to Company may be delivered via the Platform or sent to the address associated with Company’s account. Notices to Quantcast will be sent to the applicable physical and addresses set forth below for Quantcast. Notice will be deemed to have been given upon: (a) the date actually delivered in person; (b) the day after the date sent by overnight courier; or (c) the date posted in the Platform by Quantcast. Notices may be confirmed by email.
Quantcast Corp
.: 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107
Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd
.: 99 Elizabeth Street, Sydney 2000 NSW, Australia
Quantcast International Limited
: Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn
: Legal Department
Email
: legal@quantcast.com
Quantcast will not be liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder on account of events beyond Quantcast’s reasonable control.
This Agreement and the licenses granted herein are not transferable or assignable without prior written consent of the non-transferring or non-assigning party except that a party may upon written notice assign this Agreement to an acquirer of substantially all of that party’s assets, stock or business by sale, merger or otherwise or to an Affiliate. “
Affiliate
” means an entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a party. Any assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
The parties have been represented in execution of this Agreement by legal counsel or have voluntarily declined to seek such counsel. If any provision of this Agreement is unenforceable, the validity of the remaining provisions will not be affected.
Quantcast’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of this Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if made explicitly, in writing and signed by Quantcast.
Effective January 17th 2024
to
February 12th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
QUANTCAST MASTER BUYER TERMS
Last Updated: January 16, 2023
If Company has an active, duly executed contract for one or more of the Services, that existing agreement will govern Company’s use of such Services within the scope of such agreement instead of this Quantcast Master Services Agreement (“
Agreement
”).
This Agreement is a legally binding contract between Quantcast and Company. “
Company
” means (A) when an individual accepts this Agreement on his or her own behalf, such individual, or (B) when an individual accepts this Agreement on behalf of a company or other legal entity, that company or legal entity.  “
Quantcast
” means (X) Quantcast Corp. if Company is domiciled in the United States, (Y) Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd. if Company is domiciled in any country or territory located in the Asia Pacific (APAC) region and (Z) Quantcast International Limited if Company is domiciled in any other country or territory.
Quantcast may modify this Agreement. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Services. Company’s continued use of the Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates.
Incorporated Terms
This Agreement incorporates the following additional terms (“
Incorporated Terms
”), as updated from time to time:
Quantcast Campaign Policy
(“
Campaign Policy
”)
Privacy Implementation for Quantcast Advertiser Partners
(“
Privacy Implementation
”)
US State Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent
the Services include processing Personal Information
subject to U.S. State Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum) (“
DPA
”)
International Data Privacy Addendum
, to the extent that the Services include processing Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws (as defined in such Addendum)
(also “
DPA
”)
Any applicable
Additional Terms
(defined below)
Services
“
Services
”
means
the
Quantcast platform (“
Platform
”)
and, to the extent provided by Quantcast under this Agreement, Campaign Tags, Platform Data, and any other services provided by Quantcast. The Services may permit Company to purchase ad placements on third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video, and other content/properties) (“
Inventory
”) that are made available by third-party providers (“
Inventory Providers
”) and Third-Party Services (defined below). For clarity, the “Services” do not include Inventory or Third-Party Services.
Some Services may be subject to different or additional terms (“
Additional Terms
”) that are
described on the Additional Terms page linked above, in the Platform or otherwise made available to Company in writing.
Unless the parties agree in writing for Quantcast to provide campaign management services or professional services, the Services do not include those services.
Accounts and Authorized Users
Company will ensure its account information is accurate and current. Company will promptly notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of Company access credentials. Quantcast may review and, if needed, correct, the information and setup associated with Company’s account and Authorized Users.
“
Authorized User
” means an individual authorized by Company to use Company’s account on the Platform.
Each Authorized User must use unique access credentials
. Company acknowledges that
each Authorized User may have the ability to add and terminate other Authorized Users. Company is solely responsible for all Authorized Users and all activity under its account, including the confidentiality of all access credentials. Company will immediately notify Quantcast of any accidental disclosure or unauthorized use of any access credentials. Company will ensure that all Authorized Users use Company’s account solely on behalf of Company, and are aware of, and comply with, this Agreement. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is liable for any breach of this Agreement by any Authorized User.
Company
Clients
If Company is using the Services on behalf of third-party clients (“
Clients
”), Company represents and warrants that it has all rights and authorizations needed to do so. Company will only use the Services for Clients with which Company has a direct written agreement and will obligate its Clients to comply with this Agreement, including the Incorporated Terms. Company is responsible for the actions and/or inactions of Clients and for ensuring their compliance.
Fees and Payment
Fees will be provided in the Platform or by other written means.
Unless Quantcast approves a different payment arrangement in writing, Company authorizes Quantcast to charge amounts owed under this Agreement to Company’s credit card, or to receive payment via wire transfer, automatic ACH, or such other similar payment method, at Quantcast’s option. Company will provide its most current credit card and/or other information required to complete payment, and keep such information updated if it changes. For the avoidance of doubt, if Company makes credit card, wire transfer or ACH payments or such other similar payment method, Company agrees to the applicable third-party terms as set forth in the Additional Terms. If Quantcast provides Company with the ability to pay invoices in arrears, Company will pay invoices upon receipt.  Quantcast may revise Company’s credit limit or require prepayment at any time in its sole discretion. Quantcast may charge interest at a rate of 2% per month (or the legal maximum, whichever is lower) for late payments. Company is responsible for reasonable out-of-pocket costs that Quantcast incurs to collect unpaid invoices. All payment obligations are non-cancelable and all amounts paid for Services provided are non-refundable. If Company requires a purchase order to make payments, Company will include the corresponding purchase order number in the Platform. All amounts due must be paid without setoff or deduction.
Company is solely responsible for all amounts due for any Third-Party Services (defined below) that Company opts to use. Company acknowledges that any charges for Third-Party Services shown in the Platform or otherwise provided by Quantcast are based on the information Quantcast receives from the third parties and are subject to the final amounts charged by such third parties.
Quantcast is the system of record and is solely responsible for calculating all metrics related to the Services, including all amounts owed under this Agreement. Company acknowledges that all amounts shown in Platform reporting are preliminary and final amounts will be as invoiced or billed by Quantcast.
All charges under this Agreement are exclusive of all taxes and duties, if any. Company is responsible for and must pay all sales and use or other transactional taxes and duties including interest and penalty imposed on the amounts charged hereunder, or from the performance of this Agreement for which Quantcast issues an invoice. Company will promptly reimburse Quantcast for any such tax or duty and indemnify Quantcast and hold Quantcast harmless for any such taxes and duties that Quantcast must pay to a tax authority for which Company is responsible. If Company claims a tax exemption, Company must provide Quantcast with appropriate exemption certificates or documentation charges (including, without limitation, VAT or GST) acceptable to tax authorities.
Services
License and Requirements
Company may use the Services solely as set forth in this Agreement.
Subject
to this Agreement, Quantcast grants Company a limited, non-exclusive, non-transferable, and non-sublicensable license to (a) access and use the Platform on a self-serve basis, and (b) use the Platform Data presented in the Platform user interface solely for the purpose of using the Services.
If Company uses the Services to manage Campaigns and purchase Inventory, Company will obtain all rights necessary to perform tracking and analytics, and store and serve the advertisements (“
Ads
”) associated with Company’s campaigns (“
Campaigns
”), including ad creatives. Company will not use the Services with Ads that violate any applicable laws, regulations, third-party rights, or this Agreement including the Incorporated Terms. If Company asks for Quantcast’s assistance with Company’s use of the Services, Company consents to the actions and/or inactions that Quantcast takes on its behalf and retains sole responsibility for such assisted use of the Services.
Company will not: (a) attempt to circumvent any Platform security measure, (b) share its access credentials, (c) grant direct or indirect access to the Platform to any third-party (other than an Authorized User of a Client, if applicable), (d) reproduce,
distribute
, modify, prepare derivative works of, translate, reverse engineer, reverse compile, or disassemble the Services, including Platform Data, (e) introduce viruses or other malware into the Platform or to end users via Ads, (f) share reports generated by the Services with any third-party (other than the relevant Client who is obligated to treat such reports confidentially) or (g) create or enrich profiles of individual end users on the basis of Campaign Data (defined below) or information derived from Campaign Data, including the third-party media (e.g., webpages, apps, video and other content/properties) that the end users have visited or the content or general interest area of such media. For example, Company may not create an audience of Conde Nast end users based on information derived or obtained by using the Services.
For the avoidance of doubt, Quantcast may collect analytics information about its customers’ use of the Services (e.g., how Authorized Users engage with the Platform user interface, etc.) for purposes of understanding how its customers use the Services and providing, customizing, and improving the Services.
Quantcast
reserves the right but not the obligation to place the AdChoices icon (or a similar icon) on Ads that do not already include such icon.
Except
as expressly set forth in this Agreement, neither party grants the other party any rights, express or implied, and each party reserves all rights. If Company
provides Quantcast with feedback regarding the Services, Company hereby grants Quantcast a perpetual, irrevocable, fully paid up right and license to such feedback, without accounting, attribution, or compensation to Company.
Data
Issues
Data
Definitions
:
“
Aggregated Data
” means generalized, combined data from numerous campaigns of multiple Quantcast customers, including Company, that concerns campaign parameters, goals, or performance results of such campaigns and that does not permit identification of Company or any other Quantcast custom
er of the Services.
“
Campaign Data
” means the campaign-related reporting data generated in the course of the Services and provided to Company under this Agreement, such as Campaign performance reports. For the avoidance of doubt, Campaign Data does not include Tag Data.
“
Campaign Tag
” means a tag, pixel or other element provided by Quantcast to Company for Company or Clients to place on Company Media to enable the collection of Tag Data. For clarity, the term “Campaign Tags” does not refer to any ad serving tags provided by Quantcast (i.e., if Company elects to use Quantcast ad serving).
“
Company Data
” means all information and materials that are onboarded to Company’s account in the Platform, whether directly or via a third-party (e.g., an onboarding service provider). Without limiting the foregoing, Company Data includes all Campaign parameters (the data entered into the Platform for a Campaign such as name, budget, targeting strategy, etc.), Tag Data and any data onboarded by or on behalf of Company (e.g., first and/or third-party audiences). Company Data is a subset of Company’s Confidential Information.
“
Company Media
”
means
the websites, apps and other digital properties or content associated with Ads, including the webpages, app screens and other digital properties on which Company or Clients place Campaign Tags
.
“
Model
” means the predictive profile of shared attributes and characteristics of a group of end
users that Company desires to reach in a Campaign, created algorithmically by deriving observations from Company Data and Platform Data. For the avoidance of doubt, Models do not include any data at individual end
u
ser level or any end
u
ser-level identifiers that may be used to distinguish one end
u
ser from another end
u
ser (such as an end
u
ser ID or IP address).
“
Platform Data
” means the data residing in the Platform or otherwise generated or used
in connection with
the Servic
es that does not constitute Company Data or
Campaign
Data, including Aggregated Data, Models, and third-party data (“
Third-Party Data
”). Some Platform Data may be presented to Company in the Platform user interface while other Platform Data may be used by the Platform on the back end (i.e., behind the scenes) to provide the Services. Platform Data is a subset of Quantcast’s Confidential Information.
“
Tag Data
” means the data collected via Campaign Tags.
Company Data
: As between the parties, Company Data is the exclusive property of Company and/or the applicable Client. As to all Company Data (whether provided by Company, Client or a third
-
party on Company’s or a Client’s behalf), Company
represents
and warrants that it has sufficient rights to provide Company Data for use by Quantcast in compliance with this Agreement. Quantcast may use Company Data solely in compliance with the DPAs (including to create Models for Company,
deliver
Campaigns and create audience insights, etc.). Quantcast will not share Company Data with any third
-
party except to the extent that Company reque
sts third-party services that utilize Company Data (e.g., third-party measurement),
Company Data is included as a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data)
or as otherwise authorized by Company
. In addition, Quantcast may use
non-company-identifiable inferences made from Tag Data
to produce, and as contained in, the Aggregated Data.
Platform Data
: As between the parties, Platform Data is the exclusive property of Quantcast (or its third-party partners). Company may use Platform Data (whether directly, to the extent presented to Company in the Platform, or indirectly, to the extent used by the Platform to enable the Services) solely internally and solely for the purpose of using the Services as described in this Agreement. As to any Platform Data that Company can access and export using the self
-serve features of the Platform
, Company will not share such Platform Data with any third
-
party except, if applicable, Company’s Client(s) that such Platform Data pertains to and/or third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement
.
If Quantcast provides Company with
Platform Data outside the self-serve
features
of the Platform (
e.g.
,
further detail about available audien
ces, e
tc.)
, such Platform
Data
is subject to any applicable Additional Terms.
Company will not attempt to extract or recreate any Third-Party Data or other Platform Data that is not readily accessible via the normal functionality presented in the Platform or assemble similar data or audience segments itself (directly or indirectly through a third
-
party) on the basis of Third-Party Data or other Platform Data or information derived from the use of such data under this Agreement.
Campaign
Data
: Company may use
Campaign
Data for its internal business purposes provided that (a) it complies with its privacy policy, (b) it complies with the terms of this Agreement, and (c) it does not disclose
Campaign Data
to any
third-
party except, if applicable, Company’s
Client(s) that such Campaign Data pertains to and/or
third-party service providers who are each under confidentiality restrictions, and subject to the terms of this Agreement. Quantcast may use
Campaign
Data (i) to provide the Services, and (ii)
within a customary field in the data accessible to Inventory Providers and other technical service providers (e.g., bidstream and reporting data) or as otherwise authorized by Company.
Models
:
Models reside solely within the Platform and are not directly accessible to Company. Company’s license above
includes
the ability to use Models as an integrated part of the Services, solely for the purpose of
selecting
and gaining insights about the end users that Company wishes to reach with its Campaigns.  Quantcast will not share Models generated in connection with C
ompany’s Campaigns
with other customers.
Client Data
: Upon request from a Client, Quantcast is authorized to use the Client Data associated with such Client in
accordance
with
such
request (including sharing such Client Data with another entity within the Quantcast Platform). For clarity, “
Client
Data
” means the (i)
Tag Data from
Client websites, apps and/or other digital properties; and (ii) Quantcast’s proprietary analysis of such data. Client Data does not include any predictive models or data segments created using the Tag Data or any Campaign
Data
generated from Campaigns delivered using such Client Data.
No Off-Platform Use
: Company will not use the Services, the
Campaign
Data, or any information derived from the Services, Models or
Campaign
Data to create or enrich profiles of individual end users or to
retarget any end user except via the Services.
Compliance and Privacy
Each party will comply with all applicable laws and regulations (Quantcast in its provision of the Services in the form provided by Quantcast and Company in its use of the Services), including Applicable Privacy Laws and applicable self-regulatory principles, such as the Digital Advertising Alliance’s Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising (“
DAA
”) or the Network Advertising Initiative Code of Conduct (“
NAI
”). “
Applicable Privacy Laws
” means US State Privacy Laws and International Privacy Laws (defined in the linked DPAs). Company will comply with the Incorporated Terms.
Company will not use the Service with any (a) Direct Identifiers, any special or sensitive categories of personal data as defined by Applicable Privacy Laws, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media whose content reveals special or sensitive categories of personal data of an end user, or personal data relating to criminal offenses or criminal convictions; or (b) any data of children, including by placing Campaign Tags on Ads or Company Media directed at children (collectively, “
Prohibited Data
”). “
Direct Identifier
” means any information that identifies a particular individual without additional information, including name, address, mobile number, email address, financial account number or government-issued identifier. Direct Identifiers do not include pseudonymous identifiers such as IP address, cookie ID and certain hashed identifiers (e.g., email addresses that have been encoded using a cryptographic hashing function to obfuscate the email). For purposes of this Agreement, “
children
” refers to anyone age 16 or under or such other age specified by Applicable Privacy Laws under which the processing of personal information is prohibited or requires opt-in or parental consent.
Third
-Party Services
If Company uses any third-party branded product or service in connection with the Services (including Third-Party Data made available for use via the Services) (“
Third-Party Service
”), the following additional terms apply.
Company is solely responsible for complying with any applicable third-party terms and requirements. For Third-Party Services offered via the Platform, such third-party terms and requirements may be provided in the Platform, the Additional Terms, otherwise by Quantcast or by the third-party.
Quantcast is not responsible for Third-Party Services and makes no representations as to such services, including their privacy practices. Quantcast cannot guarantee continued availability or pricing of Third-Party Services and may stop enabling access to them without liability. Company may be required to register for or log into Third-Party Services on their respective websites or to share Company Data with Third-Party Services (e.g., services requiring data integration).
Marketing, Publicity
Quantcast may include Company’s name and logo in descriptions of Quantcast’s partners on its website, in media, in promotional materials, and in the Platform. Company will not use Quantcast’s name or logo without prior written permission. All goodwill from the use of Quantcast’s name or logo inures to Quantcast. Neither party will make a press release or any other public statement about this Agreement without the other party’s prior agreement (email sufficing).
Confidentiality
“
Confidential Information
” means
information that the disclosing party identifies as confidential or the receiving party should reasonably understand to be confidential given the circumstances of the disclosure and the nature of the information. Confidential Information does not include information that the receiving party can demonstrate: (a) it knew without restriction before receipt from the disclosing party, (b) is publicly available through no fault of the receiving party, (c) it rightfully received from a third-party without a duty of confidentiality, or (d) is independently developed without use of or reference to Confidential Information. The receiving party may use Confidential Information only to fulfill its obligations under this Agreement and must use at least reasonable care to prevent any unauthorized use or disclosure of Confidential Information, but in any event no less stringent a standard than receiving party applies to its own Confidential Information. The receiving party may share Confidential Information with its employees, agents and contractors who need to know it, as long as they are bound to confidentiality obligations that are consistent with this Agreement, provided that the receiving party shall remain solely responsible for their compliance with this Agreement. If compelled to do so by law, the receiving party may disclose Confidential Information as long as it provides reasonable prior notice to the disclosing party (unless legally prohibited).  For the avoidance of doubt, nothing in this Agreement prohibits Quantcast from using and sharing high level data that is compiled and summarized from the combination of Campaign Data with equivalent data generated by campaigns of other Quantcast customers, that does not allow identification of Company or Clients. Company will delete all Quantcast Confidential Information promptly upon termination of this Agreement.
Indemnity
Quantcast shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Company and its directors, officers, employees and agents, and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Company Parties
”) against any claim, liability, damage, loss or expense (including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs) (“
Liabilities
”) incurred by the Company Parties in connection with any third-party claim (including any regulatory or governmental action) (“
Claim
”) that Quantcast’s proprietary technology that provides the Services, in the form provided by Quantcast, infringes any patent or other third-party intellectual property right. Company shall indemnify, defend and hold harmless Quantcast, its affiliated entities, and its and their directors, officers, employees and agents, and its and their respective successors, heirs and assigns (“
Quantcast Parties
”) against any Liabilities incurred by the Quantcast Parties in connection with any Claim arising out of or relating to (a) Company’s (including any Client’s, if applicable) use of the Services or Third-Party Services in violation of this Agreement; (b) Company Data or Ads; (c) the nature of Company’s or any Client’s products, services and industry, including without limitation any claims in the nature of product liability or any claim or allegation that such services or products are not in compliance with applicable industry-specific laws, or (d) breach of Sections 6.2. 6.3, 7 or 8.
The indemnified party will promptly notify the indemnifying party of any indemnified claim (provided that failure to notify promptly will only relieve the indemnifying party of its obligations to the extent it demonstrates material prejudice from the failure) and at the indemnifying party’s expense, provide assistance reasonably necessary to defend such claim. The indemnifying party will not enter into any settlement or compromise that does not fully absolve the indemnified party of liability.
Quantcast will have no obligation for any claim arising from or related to (a) compliance with Company specifications, (b) combination of the Services with products or services not supplied by Quantcast, (c) adaptation or modification of the Services or Campaign Data, (d) Company’s failure to follow instructions provided by Quantcast that would have cured the cause of action, (e) use of the Services or Campaign Data other than as described herein, or (f) Inventory or Third-Party Services selected by Company. In such cases, Company will indemnify, defend, and hold harmless the Quantcast Parties from and against any Liabilities arising directly or indirectly from such claims.
If Quantcast’s right to provide the Services is enjoined or in Quantcast’s opinion is likely to be enjoined, Quantcast may obtain the right to continue providing the Services, replace or modify the Services so that they become non-infringing or terminate this Agreement.  Quantcast’s obligations as stated in this Section 12 are Quantcast’s sole and exclusive liability and Company’s sole remedy as to infringement.
Account Closure, Termination and Suspension
Company may close its account at any time via the Platform. Quantcast may terminate this Agreement upon notice for any reason or no reason. Sections 5, 6.6, 7 and 11-15 will survive account closure and/or termination.
Without limiting any other remedies, Quantcast may immediately suspend or terminate any individual Campaign, Authorized User’s access, and/or Company or Client account, including if Quantcast in its sole discretion suspects that a Campaign, Authorized User, Client, or Company is in breach this Agreement (including failure to comply with the Incorporated Terms. If Quantcast suspends or closes Company’s account, Company may not re-open an account without Quantcast’s prior written approval.
DISCLAIMER, LIMITATION OF LIABILITY
QUANTCAST MAKES NO REPRESENTATIONS REGARDING THE BENEFITS FROM THE SERVICES, OR THAT THE PLATFORM OR ANY INFORMATION WILL BE ERROR-FREE, ALWAYS AVAILABLE OR OPERATE WITHOUT LOSS OR CORRUPTION OF DATA OR TECHNICAL MALFUNCTION. QUANTCAST HAS NO LIABILITY FOR THIRD-PARTY SERVICES. QUANTCAST MAY MODIFY OR DISCONTINUE ANY OR ALL SERVICES AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY OR NO REASON, WITH OR WITHOUT NOTICE.
EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), NEITHER PARTY WILL BE LIABLE TO THE OTHER FOR ANY INDIRECT, SPECIAL, INCIDENTAL, PUNITIVE, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING AS A RESULT OF DELAYS, LOSS OF DATA, LOSS OF USE OR LOSS OF PROFIT) ARISING OUT OF OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT, HOWEVER CAUSED AND UNDER WHATEVER CAUSE OF ACTION OR THEORY OF LIABILITY BROUGHT (INCLUDING CONTRACT OR NEGLIGENCE), EVEN IF SUCH PARTY HAS BEEN ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH DAMAGES. NOTHING IN THIS SECTION 14.2 LIMITS ANY LIABILITY FOR FRAUD, FRAUDULENT MISREPRESENTATION, OR ANY OTHER LIABILITY WHICH CANNOT LEGALLY BE LIMITED.
EXCEPT FOR CLAIMS RELATING TO PAYMENTS DUE (SECTION 5), AND/OR INDEMNIFICATION (SECTION 12), IN NO EVENT WILL EITHER PARTY’S TOTAL AGGREGATE LIABILITY FOR ALL CLAIMS ARISING UNDER OR RELATED TO THIS AGREEMENT EXCEED THE GREATER OF (A) ONE HUNDRED THOUSAND U.S. DOLLARS (US $100,000) OR (B) THE ACTUAL AMOUNT PAID AND/OR PAYABLE TO QUANTCAST FOR THE PROVISION OF SERVICES TO COMPANY IN THE TWELVE (12) MONTHS PRIOR TO THE DATE THE LIABILITY FIRST AROSE.
The limitations and exclusions contained in this Agreement represent the parties’ agreement based upon the perceived level of risk associated with this Agreement and the payments made hereunder.
General
.
This Agreement is the entire agreement of the parties relating to the Services and it supersedes all other commitments and understandings with respect to the Services. For the avoidance of doubt, this Agreement does not apply to Quantcast Measure. To the extent that Incorporated Terms conflict with the main body of this Agreement, the Incorporated Terms will control.
Except for Quantcast’s right to make changes as described herein, no changes to this Agreement are effective unless such changes are in writing and signed by Quantcast.
This Agreement and all matters arising out of or relating to this Agreement will be governed by (i) the laws of the State of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the laws of New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the laws of Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited, each without regard to its conflict of law provisions.
Any legal action or proceeding relating to this Agreement will be brought exclusively in (i) the state or federal courts in the Northern District of California if Quantcast is Quantcast Corp.; (ii) the relevant courts in New South Wales, Australia if Quantcast is Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd.; or (iii) the relevant courts in Dublin, Ireland if Quantcast is Quantcast International Limited. Quantcast and Company hereby agree to submit to the jurisdiction of, and agree that venue is proper in, these courts (as applicable). Actions arising under or related to this Agreement or the Services must be brought in the initiating party’s individual capacity, not as a plaintiff or class member in any class action or similar proceeding.
The Services may be subject to export and/or import control laws and regulations. Company is solely responsible for complying with all applicable export control laws and regulations.
Unless provided otherwise in the Additional Terms, there are no third-party beneficiaries to this Agreement.
All notices will be in writing. Notices to Company may be delivered via the Platform or sent to the address associated with Company’s account. Notices to Quantcast will be sent to the applicable physical and addresses set forth below for Quantcast. Notice will be deemed to have been given upon: (a) the date actually delivered in person; (b) the day after the date sent by overnight courier; or (c) the date posted in the Platform by Quantcast. Notices may be confirmed by email.
Quantcast Corp
.: 795 Folsom Street, San Francisco, CA 94107
Quantcast Australia Pty. Ltd
.: 99 Elizabeth Street, Sydney 2000 NSW, Australia
Quantcast International Limited
: Beaux Lane House, Lower Mercer Street, Dublin 2, Ireland
Attn
: Legal Department
Email
: legal@quantcast.com
Quantcast will not be liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder on account of events beyond Quantcast’s reasonable control.
This Agreement and the licenses granted herein are not transferable or assignable without prior written consent of the non-transferring or non-assigning party except that a party may upon written notice assign this Agreement to an acquirer of substantially all of that party’s assets, stock or business by sale, merger or otherwise or to an Affiliate. “
Affiliate
” means an entity that controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a party. Any assignment or transfer in violation of this section will be null and void. This Agreement will inure to the benefit of the successors and permitted assigns of the parties.
The parties have been represented in execution of this Agreement by legal counsel or have voluntarily declined to seek such counsel. If any provision of this Agreement is unenforceable, the validity of the remaining provisions will not be affected.
Quantcast’s failure to exercise or enforce any right or provision of this Agreement will not constitute a waiver of such right or provision. Any waiver of any provision of this Agreement will be effective only if made explicitly, in writing and signed by Quantcast.
Effective April 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
International Data Privacy Addendum
Effective Date: September 28, 2023
This International Data Privacy Addendum (“
Addendum
”) is incorporated into the services agreement(s) (all such agreements, the “
Agreement
”) between Quantcast International Limited on behalf of itself and any other Quantcast entity identified in the Agreement (“
Quantcast
”) and the counterparty(ies) identified in the Agreement (“
Company
”).
This Addendum applies to the extent that International Privacy Laws apply, as described below. This Addendum replaces any terms previously applicable to the processing of Personal Data to which International Privacy Laws apply.
Capitalized terms not defined in this Addendum are as defined in the Agreement. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms of the Agreement and this Addendum, the terms of this Addendum shall prevail.
Quantcast reserves the right to modify this Addendum. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Quantcast services and products that are subject to this Addendum. Company's continued use of the Quantcast services and products after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company agrees to the updates.
Definitions
.
“
Authorized
Purposes
” means all purposes for which the Agreement requires or permits Quantcast to use Company Information and Personal Data in the Agreement, including as applicable, personalized advertising and audience measurement.
“
Canadian Privacy Laws
” means the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act, SC 2000 c 5; the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003, c P-6.5; the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003, c 63; and the Act respecting the protection of personal information in the private sector, CQLR c P-39.1, as amended by Law 25.
"
Company Information
” means any Personal Data that is provided to Quantcast by or on behalf of Company or onboarded to Company’s account with Quantcast, whether directly or via a third party (e.g., an onboarding service provider), including data collected via a Tag.
“
European Privacy Laws
” means the EU General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) and any EU Member State laws implementing the GDPR, and the UK GDPR and the UK Data Protection Act 2018, the e-Privacy Directive (Directive 2002/58/EC) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003, and the Swiss Act on Federal Data Protection.
“
International Privacy Laws
” means the Canadian Privacy Laws, European Privacy Laws and any other non-US privacy laws referenced in this Addendum.
“
Online Properties
” means Company Media or Client Data (if defined in the Agreement) or other webpages, advertisements and other digital properties on which the Tag is implemented.
“
Personal Data
” means any information relating to an individual that is subject to protection under the International Privacy Laws and includes information that is referred to as “personal information” and similar terms as may be defined in the International Privacy Laws.
“
Tags
” means Quantcast-provided cookies, tags, pixels or other tracking technologies, including campaign tags, ad serving tags and measurement tags (including Campaign Tags, if defined in the Agreement).
“
Transparency Framework
” means any applicable transparency and consent framework, including the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework and the IAB Transparency and Consent Framework Canada (TCF Canada), or other technical standard agreed to by the parties.
2.
Lawful Collection and Processing
.
To the extent that International Privacy Laws apply, including where Online Properties are accessed by individuals in any country or region subject to International Privacy Laws and where Company Information that includes Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws is provided, Company agrees to:
2.1.  Provide users with information about (i) Quantcast’s use of Company
Information (where applicable) and Quantcast’s use of Tags and/or other storing and/or accessing of information stored on users’ devices, including means of activating such functions where required by International Privacy Laws (e.g., under Quebec law); and (ii) Quantcast’s processing of users’ Personal Data for the Authorized Purposes, including by posting a link to Quantcast’s Products and Services Privacy Policy (
www.quantcast.com/privacy
).
2.2.  Obtain any required consents for (i) Quantcast’s use of Company Information and of Tags and/or other storing and/or accessing of information stored on users’ devices and (ii) Quantcast’s collection, use, disclosure or other processing of users’ Personal Data for the Authorized Purposes.
2.3. As to Tags, inform Quantcast in accordance with the Transparency Framework that the conditions of 2.1 and 2.2 are met, or prevent Tags from executing unless the conditions of 2.1 and 2.2 are met. To the extent that Company has implemented a consent management platform configured to provide transparency about and obtain consent for Quantcast in accordance with the Transparency Framework, the conditions of 2.1, 2.2 and 2.3 shall be deemed to be met.
3.
European Privacy Laws.
This section applies to the extent that European Privacy Laws apply, including where Online Properties are accessed by individuals in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom and where Company Information that includes Personal Data subject to European Privacy Laws is provided (whether provided directly by Company or via third parties on Company’s behalf).
3.1. As to all Quantcast services for marketers (such as Quantcast Advertise and managed campaign services) and as to Quantcast’s provision of audience measurement services to Company, Company and Quantcast acknowledge joint determination of the means and purposes of processing of Personal Data. Such joint controllership covers the collection of Personal Data through the Tags and any other transmission of such Personal Data to Quantcast in connection with the foregoing services.
3.2. As to Agreements in which the Authorized Purposes includes Quantcast’s use of Company Information beyond the services provided directly to Company (i.e., Quantcast Measure), Company and Quantcast acknowledge that as to such uses, there is no joint determination of the purposes and means, and Quantcast and Company are separate and independent controllers.
3.3. The parties’ respective responsibilities for compliance with the obligations under European Privacy Laws in connection with the processing of Personal Data of users in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom that is collected by Quantcast from Online Properties on which Company places Tags is as follows:
3.3.1. Without prejudice to any obligations set forth in Agreement, Quantcast will ensure that it has a legal basis for the collection and processing of Personal Data. Quantcast will make available information about its data processing, as well as a means for users to exercise their data subject rights and other information required by European Privacy Laws, in its Products and Services Privacy Policy at
www.quantcast.com/privacy
. Quantcast will implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to enhance the security of its processing of Personal Data.
3.3.2. In addition to any obligations set forth in Agreement, Company will ensure that it has a legal basis for the collection and processing of Personal Data. Company will make available information about its data processing and other information required by European Privacy Laws in its privacy policy.
3.3.3. If any user exercises its rights under European Privacy Laws with respect to the parties' processing of Personal Data collected by Quantcast from Online Properties on which Company placed Tags, or if Company is contacted by a supervisory authority with regard to such processing, Company will, promptly and no later than seven (7) days following receipt of the request, forward all relevant information regarding such requests to Quantcast at
privacy.qil@quantcast.com
. Quantcast agrees to respond to such requests as required by European Privacy Laws. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is not authorized to answer on Quantcast’s behalf.
4.
Canadian
Privacy Laws.
This section applies to the extent that Canadian Privacy Laws apply, including where Online Properties are accessed by individuals in Canada and where Company Information that includes Personal Data subject to Canadian Privacy Laws is provided (whether provided directly by Company or via third parties on Company’s behalf).
4.1. Quantcast agrees that any Company Information received from the Company or exposed to it in connection with the Agreement in Canada is done so solely for the Authorized Purposes, and Quantcast acquires no right or interest in or to the Company Information except as set out in the Agreement.
4.2. Quantcast will not use any Company Information provided or disclosed by the Company for any purpose other than that for which it was provided or disclosed to it, and as authorized in the Agreement. Except to the extent that the Authorized Purposes include Quantcast’s use of Company Information beyond the services provided directly to Company (i.e., Quantcast Measure), as necessary to fulfill its obligations under the Agreement, or as required by law, Quantcast shall not disclose any Company Information to any third party except Quantcast’s third party service providers who process the Company Information solely on Quantcast’s behalf.
4.3.  Quantcast will implement safeguards to protect against the loss, disclosure, alteration or misuse of Company Information that is in its care or custody, and will protect Company Information with the same degree of care and diligence that Quantcast uses to protect and safeguard its own like information, but not less than the degree of care that would be exercised by a reasonable person given the sensitivity of such Company Information.
4.4.  Quantcast will cooperate as may be necessary to assist in any access or other individual requests, questions, complaints, audits and any investigations related to Company Information. In the event that Quantcast is contacted by any individual whose Personal Data is the subject of the Agreement or this Addendum, or by any person (including a regulator) respecting the Agreement, Quantcast will refer them to the Company and will promptly give the Company’s Privacy Officer notice of such contact. Quantcast will not communicate with any individual whose Personal Data is subject to this Addendum unless authorized to do so by the Company, except (a) as needed to acknowledge the request and direct the individual to Quantcast’s opt out functionality, and (b) as required by applicable law, including Canadian Privacy Laws.
4.5. Quantcast will only retain Company Information for as long as is reasonably necessary for the Authorized Purposes.
4.6. In the event that Quantcast becomes legally required to disclose any Company Information, Quantcast shall provide Company with prompt notice (unless Quantcast is prohibited from doing so) in order for Company to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy and/or waive compliance with the provisions of this Addendum. In the event that such protective order or other remedy is not obtained, Quantcast shall furnish only that portion of the Company Information which is legally required to be furnished in the opinion of Quantcast’s counsel.
4.7. In addition to the requirements in Section 2 above, Company will provide users with information about transfers of Company Information outside of Canada and/or Quebec.
5.
Application
. For the avoidance of doubt, this Addendum applies to all Quantcast-branded services used by Company, such as Quantcast ad serving and audience measurement.
Effective January 23rd 2024
to
April 23rd 2024
Download
Table of Contents
International Data Privacy Addendum
Effective Date: September 28, 2023
This International Data Privacy Addendum (“
Addendum
”) is incorporated into the services agreement(s) (all such agreements, the “
Agreement
”) between Quantcast International Limited on behalf of itself and any other Quantcast entity identified in the Agreement (“
Quantcast
”) and the counterparty(ies) identified in the Agreement (“
Company
”).
This Addendum applies to the extent that International Privacy Laws apply, as described below. This Addendum replaces any terms previously applicable to the processing of Personal Data to which International Privacy Laws apply.
Capitalized terms not defined in this Addendum are as defined in the Agreement. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms of the Agreement and this Addendum, the terms of this Addendum shall prevail.
Quantcast reserves the right to modify this Addendum. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the Quantcast services and products that are subject to this Addendum. Company's continued use of the Quantcast services and products after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company agrees to the updates.
Definitions
.
“
Authorized
Purposes
” means all purposes for which the Agreement requires or permits Quantcast to use Company Information and Personal Data in the Agreement, including as applicable, personalized advertising and audience measurement.
“
Canadian Privacy Laws
” means the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act, SC 2000 c 5; the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003, c P-6.5; the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003, c 63; and the Act respecting the protection of personal information in the private sector, CQLR c P-39.1, as amended by Law 25.
"
Company Information
” means any Personal Data that is provided to Quantcast by or on behalf of Company or onboarded to Company’s account with Quantcast, whether directly or via a third party (e.g., an onboarding service provider), including data collected via a Tag.
“
European Privacy Laws
” means the EU General Data Protection Regulation (Regulation (EU) 2016/679) and any EU Member State laws implementing the GDPR, and the UK GDPR and the UK Data Protection Act 2018, the e-Privacy Directive (Directive 2002/58/EC) and the UK Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003, and the Swiss Act on Federal Data Protection.
“
International Privacy Laws
” means the Canadian Privacy Laws, European Privacy Laws and any other non-US privacy laws referenced in this Addendum.
“
Online Properties
” means Company Media or Client Data (if defined in the Agreement) or other webpages, advertisements and other digital properties on which the Tag is implemented.
“
Personal Data
” means any information relating to an individual that is subject to protection under the International Privacy Laws and includes information that is referred to as “personal information” and similar terms as may be defined in the International Privacy Laws.
“
Tags
” means Quantcast-provided cookies, tags, pixels or other tracking technologies, including campaign tags, ad serving tags and measurement tags (including Campaign Tags, if defined in the Agreement).
“
Transparency Framework
” means any applicable transparency and consent framework, including the IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework and the
IAB Transparency and Consent Framework Canada (TCF Canada),
or other technical standard agreed to by the parties.
Lawful Collection and Processing
.
To the extent that International Privacy Laws apply, including where Online Properties are accessed by individuals in any country or region subject to International Privacy Laws and where Company Information that includes Personal Data subject to International Privacy Laws is provided, Company agrees to:
Provide users with information about (i) Quantcast’s use of Company
Information (where applicable)
and Quantcast’s use of
Tags
and/or other storing and/or accessing of information stored on users’ devices
, including means of activating such functions where required by International Privacy Laws (e.g., under Quebec law)
; and
(ii) Quantcast’s processing of users’
Personal Data
for
the Authorized Purposes
, including by posting a link to Quantcast’s Products and Services Privacy Policy (
www.quantcast.com/privacy
)
.
Obtain any required consents for (i) Quantcast’s use of Company Information and of Tags and/or other storing and/or accessing of information stored on users’ devices and (ii) Quantcast’s
collection, use, disclosure or other
processing of users’ Personal Data for the Authorized Purposes.
As to Tags, inform Quantcast in accordance with the Transparency Framework that the conditions of 2.1 and 2.2 are met, or prevent Tags from executing unless the conditions of 2.1 and 2.2 are met. To the extent that Company has implemented a consent management platform configured to provide transparency about and obtain consent for Quantcast in accordance with the Transparency Framework, the conditions of 2.1, 2.2 and 2.3 shall be deemed to be met.
European Privacy Laws.
This section applies to the extent that European Privacy Laws apply, including where Online Properties are accessed by individuals in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom and where Company Information that includes Personal Data subject to European Privacy Laws is provided (whether provided directly by Company or via third parties on Company’s behalf).
As to all Quantcast services for marketers (such as Quantcast Advertise and managed campaign services) and as to Quantcast’s provision of audience measurement services to Company, Company and Quantcast acknowledge joint determination of the means and purposes of processing of Personal Data. Such joint controllership covers the collection of Personal Data through the Tags and any other transmission of such Personal Data to Quantcast in connection with the foregoing services.
As to Agreements in which the Authorized Purposes includes Quantcast’s use of Company Information beyond the services provided directly to Company (i.e., Quantcast Measure), Company and Quantcast acknowledge that as to such uses, there is no joint determination of the purposes and means, and Quantcast and Company are separate and independent controllers.
The parties’ respective responsibilities for compliance with the obligations under European Privacy Laws in connection with the processing of Personal Data of users in the European Economic Area, Switzerland, or the United Kingdom that is collected by Quantcast from Online Properties on which Company places Tags is as follows:
Without prejudice to any obligations set forth in Agreement, Quantcast will ensure that it has a legal basis for the collection and processing of Personal Data. Quantcast will make available information about its data processing, as well as a means for users to exercise their data subject rights and other information required by European Privacy Laws, in its Products and Services Privacy Policy at
www.quantcast.com/privacy
. Quantcast will implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to enhance the security of its processing of Personal Data.
In addition to any obligations set forth in Agreement, Company will ensure that it has a legal basis for the collection and processing of Personal Data. Company will make available information about its data processing and other information required by European Privacy Laws in its privacy policy.
If any user exercises its rights under European Privacy Laws with respect to the parties' processing of Personal Data collected by Quantcast from Online Properties on which Company placed Tags, or if Company is contacted by a supervisory authority with regard to such processing, Company will, promptly and no later than seven (7) days following receipt of the request, forward all relevant information regarding such requests to Quantcast at
privacy.qil@quantcast.com
. Quantcast agrees to respond to such requests as required by European Privacy Laws. For the avoidance of doubt, Company is not authorized to answer on Quantcast’s behalf.
Canadian
Privacy Laws.
This section applies to the extent that Canadian Privacy Laws apply, including where Online Properties are accessed by individuals in Canada and where Company Information that includes Personal Data subject to Canadian Privacy Laws is provided (whether provided directly by Company or via third parties on Company’s behalf).
Quantcast agrees that any Company Information received from the Company or exposed to it in connection with the Agreement in Canada is done so solely for the
Authorized
Purposes, and Quantcast acquires no right or interest in or to the Company Information except as set out in the Agreement.
Quantcast will not use any Company Information provided or disclosed by the Company for any purpose other than that for which it was provided or disclosed to it, and as authorized in the Agreement. Except
to the extent that the Authorized Purposes include Quantcast’s use of Company Information beyond the services provided directly to Company (i.e., Quantcast Measure),
as necessary to fulfill its obligations under the Agreement, or as required by law, Quantcast shall not disclose any Company Information to any third party except Quantcast’s third party service providers who process the Company Information solely on Quantcast’s behalf.
Quantcast will implement safeguards to protect against the loss, disclosure, alteration or misuse of Company Information that is in its care or custody, and will protect Company Information with the same degree of care and diligence that Quantcast uses to protect and safeguard its own like information, but not less than the degree of care that would be exercised by a reasonable person given the sensitivity of such Company Information.
Quantcast will cooperate as may be necessary to assist in any access or other individual requests, questions, complaints, audits and any investigations related to Company Information. In the event that Quantcast is contacted by any individual whose Personal Data is the subject of the Agreement or this Addendum, or by any person (including a regulator) respecting the Agreement, Quantcast will refer them to the Company and will promptly give the Company’s Privacy Officer notice of such contact. Quantcast will not communicate with any individual whose Personal Data is subject to this Addendum unless authorized to do so by the Company, except (a) as needed to acknowledge the request and direct the individual to Quantcast’s opt out functionality, and (b) as required by applicable law, including Canadian Privacy Laws.
Quantcast will only retain Company Information for as long as is reasonably necessary for the
Authorized
Purposes.
In the event that Quantcast becomes legally required to disclose any Company Information, Quantcast shall provide Company with prompt notice (unless Quantcast is prohibited from doing so) in order for Company to seek a protective order or other appropriate remedy and/or waive compliance with the provisions of this Addendum. In the event that such protective order or other remedy is not obtained, Quantcast shall furnish only that portion of the Company Information which is legally required to be furnished in the opinion of Quantcast’s counsel.
In addition to the requirements in Section 2 above, Company will provide users with information about transfers of Company Information outside of Canada and/or Quebec.
Application
. For the avoidance of doubt, this Addendum applies to all Quantcast-branded services used by Company, such as Quantcast ad serving and audience measurement.
Effective March 6th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
ADDITIONAL TERMS
Last Updated: March 6, 2025
These Additional Terms supplement the terms of the agreement (e.g., the
Quantcast Buyer Terms
, a Master Services Agreement, insertion order or other agreement (“
Agreement
”)) between the party using Quantcast’s services (“
Company
”) and Quantcast (as defined in the Agreement).
Quantcast may modify these Additional Terms. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not agree to the changes, Company must stop using the relevant Services. Company’s continued use of such Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company agrees to the updates. Any capitalized terms not defined in the Additional Terms shall have the meaning given to such terms (or such similar defined terms) in the Agreement. If a capitalized term is not defined in the Agreement, it has the meaning given in the
Quantcast Buyer Terms
.
GENERAL
1. Trial Services
This section will apply if Company selects the Trial option when signing up for Quantcast Services. Quantcast may make available to new Quantcast customers a trial period for limited use of the Services (“
Trial
”). Unless the Trial description provides for a different period, the Trial will last for a period of 14 days only and may only be used once (unless an exception is made by Quantcast). After the Trial, Company will be required to submit payment to Quantcast in order to continue accessing the Services. If Company does not wish to continue using the Services after the Trial, Company may close its account via the Platform. Failure to act will result in Company’s access to the Services being automatically disabled. Company will not attempt to circumvent the limit on Trials, including by registering multiple accounts. Quantcast reserves the right to change the features of the Trial and/or remove or cancel the Trial at any time with no liability. For purposes of the Trial, the Services are provided on an ‘as is’ basis, without any representations, warranties, or covenants by Quantcast.
2. Test Releases
From time to time, Quantcast may offer Company the right to use certain experimental features and functionality ("
Test Releases
"), including those identified as “alpha” or “beta”. All Test Releases shall be provided on an ‘as is’ basis, without any representations, warranties, or covenants by Quantcast, and may be terminated by Quantcast in its sole discretion. Notwithstanding any other provision in the Agreement, Quantcast shall have no liability for Test Releases. Use of Test Releases may be subject to additional terms and conditions, which Quantcast will provide in each applicable instance.
YOUR DATA
3. Data Subject Requests
At least once every thirty (30) days, Company will provide any opt outs and deletion requests via the technical means set forth in Quantcast’s documentation (e.g., see
Customer (CRM) Audiences
or other instructions provided by Quantcast).
4. Sensitive Data
Without limiting the restrictions set forth in the Agreement, Company will not provide Quantcast with any data considered sensitive location data under applicable laws, including guidance and orders from the U.S. Federal Trade Commission where applicable.
5. Company Tags
Company is solely responsible for any pixels, tags, macros or other data collection mechanisms that send data to Company and/or third parties (“
Company
Tags
”) included in Company’s ads, websites, apps and other materials, regardless of whether Company Tags are implemented by Company or Quantcast on Company’s behalf. In connection with Company Tags, Company represents and warrants that Company and the third parties comply with all applicable laws, provide notice and choice to users and obtain any consents required by applicable laws and industry standards. To the extent that Company Tags provide any data to Quantcast, such data constitutes Company Data. Company’s indemnity obligations under the Agreement include all claims arising from or related to such Company Tags.
6. Data Sharing
The following applies if Quantcast shares data with a third party (“
Company Service Provider
”) to enable the Company Service Provider to provide campaign analytics or measurement services to Company. Quantcast shares such data at Company’s instruction in Quantcast’s role as service provider or processor to Company. Company is solely responsible for Company Service Providers and their services, including use of data received from Quantcast. Such third party services do not constitute Third Party Services under the Agreement.
Company will not export shared data from any Company Service Provider or use such data for any purpose other than receiving campaign analytics or measurement services from the Company Service Provider. Without limiting the foregoing, Company will not attempt to use shared data to create or supplement audiences or for targeting.
INVENTORY RELATED TERMS
7. Quantcast Curation Services
The Services may provide Company the option to purchase packages of Inventory, curated by Quantcast and/or by or on behalf of Company (“
Curated Inventory
”). For the avoidance of doubt, Curated Inventory constitutes “inventory” or “Inventory” (or similar terms such as “supply”) under the Agreement. Company may only use Curated Inventory curated by Quantcast via the Services. Any inventory sourced by Company must meet the requirements of the Quantcast Supply Policy.
8. Additional Inventory Provider Restrictions
By accessing and using the Inventory Providers, Company agrees to comply, and shall be liable for its non-compliance with the applicable Inventory Provider Restrictions as linked below:
Telaria and Rubicon:
https://www.magnite.com/legal/ad-quality-guidelines/
Pubmatic:
https://pubmatic.com/legal/aq-policy/
THIRD-PARTY SERVICES
9. LiveRamp Services
The following terms apply to the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “
LiveRamp
”) in connection with the Platform or Services, outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company. For clarity, “Third-Party Services” as used in the Agreement shall include use of any LiveRamp product or service with the Platform. Company will only provide data to LiveRamp for permitted territories.
LiveRamp Usage Terms
. Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to this Agreement with respect to this Section and has the right to enforce this Section directly against Company, and Company agrees: (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Services to Company, including to access and download Company's CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp's SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp's Data Onboarding Services to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) re-identify, derive any data from, or otherwise reverse engineer data Company may receive through LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Services, (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are considered or related to adult entertainment, tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to any restricted or sensitive categories of data, including individual's health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), or (iii) which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent for; and (e) to additionally warrant that: (i) it will not direct data to any destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such third-party destination and the handling of such data by such third-party destination is subject to the terms and conditions of that direct agreement, (ii) it has obtained and maintains all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder for purposes of LiveRamp providing its Data Onboarding Services.
LiveRamp Fees
. During each month of the Term that Company utilizes Quantcast’s upload facility (e.g., a Quantcast S3 bucket) to provide data to LiveRamp or otherwise utilizes LiveRamp with the Platform outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company shall additionally pay Quantcast “LiveRamp Fees” at the rates communicated by Quantcast to Company. For clarity, “
Third Party Costs
” as used in the Agreement shall include the LiveRamp Fees.
For avoidance of doubt, Quantcast is not liable for any fees to LiveRamp for Company’s use of its own upload facility with LiveRamp or otherwise under Company’s direct agreement with LiveRamp.
10. Stripe Payment Services
Quantcast uses Stripe to execute online payment transactions (e.g., credit card, wire transfer, automatic ACH, etc.). If Company uses this feature, it agrees to be bound by the Stripe Connected Account Agreement, available at
https://stripe.com/connect/account-terms
, to comply with the Stripe Payment Method Terms, available at
https://stripe.com/gb/legal/payment-terms
and to be subject to the Stripe Privacy Policy, available at
https://stripe.com/privacy
. Company also understands and agrees to the business restrictions imposed by Stripe at
https://stripe.com/gb/legal/restricted-businesses
. Each of these terms may be updated from time to time. For avoidance of doubt, if any payment Company initiates using Stripe does not successfully complete, Company is obligated to immediately pay Quantcast by another means acceptable to Quantcast and Company is liable for any costs, penalties or charges imposed by Stripe. Company authorizes Quantcast to make repeating automatic payments using the credit card or other payment means provided to Stripe. For clarity, “Third-Party Services” as used in the Agreement shall include use of any Stripe product or service with the Platform.
PAYMENT CARDS
11. By providing payment card information (including via Stripe), Company represents that it has authority to authorize Quantcast to charge the payment card for amounts owed to Quantcast by Company and acknowledges that such information may be used by any Authorized User with access to Company’s account.
CREATIVE SERVICES
12. The following terms apply unless Company and Quantcast have signed separate written terms governing creative services. If Quantcast provides creative services, Company is solely responsible for all creatives resulting from such services and all materials provided by Company to Quantcast for such creatives. Any use of such creatives constitutes Company’s express approval of the creatives. For the avoidance of doubt, Company shall retain all intellectual property rights in its creatives.
Effective March 6th 2025
to
March 6th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
ADDITIONAL TERMS
Last Updated: March 4, 2025
These Additional Terms supplement the terms of the agreement (e.g., the
Quantcast Buyer Terms
, a Master Services Agreement, insertion order or other agreement (“
Agreement
”)) between the party using Quantcast’s services (“
Company
”) and Quantcast (as defined in the Agreement).
Quantcast may modify these Additional Terms. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not agree to the changes, Company must stop using the relevant Services. Company’s continued use of such Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company agrees to the updates. Any capitalized terms not defined in the Additional Terms shall have the meaning given to such terms (or such similar defined terms) in the Agreement. If a capitalized term is not defined in the Agreement, it has the meaning given in the
Quantcast Buyer Terms
.
GENERAL
1. Trial Services
This section will apply if Company selects the Trial option when signing up for Quantcast Services. Quantcast may make available to new Quantcast customers a trial period for limited use of the Services (“
Trial
”). Unless the Trial description provides for a different period, the Trial will last for a period of 14 days only and may only be used once (unless an exception is made by Quantcast). After the Trial, Company will be required to submit payment to Quantcast in order to continue accessing the Services. If Company does not wish to continue using the Services after the Trial, Company may close its account via the Platform. Failure to act will result in Company’s access to the Services being automatically disabled. Company will not attempt to circumvent the limit on Trials, including by registering multiple accounts. Quantcast reserves the right to change the features of the Trial and/or remove or cancel the Trial at any time with no liability. For purposes of the Trial, the Services are provided on an ‘as is’ basis, without any representations, warranties, or covenants by Quantcast.
2. Test Releases
From time to time, Quantcast may offer Company the right to use certain experimental features and functionality ("
Test Releases
"), including those identified as “alpha” or “beta”. All Test Releases shall be provided on an ‘as is’ basis, without any representations, warranties, or covenants by Quantcast, and may be terminated by Quantcast in its sole discretion. Notwithstanding any other provision in the Agreement, Quantcast shall have no liability for Test Releases. Use of Test Releases may be subject to additional terms and conditions, which Quantcast will provide in each applicable instance.
YOUR DATA
3. Data Subject Requests
At least once every thirty (30) days, Company will provide any opt outs and deletion requests via the technical means set forth in Quantcast’s documentation (e.g., see
Customer (CRM) Audiences
or other instructions provided by Quantcast).
4. Sensitive Data
Without limiting the restrictions set forth in the Agreement, Company will not provide Quantcast with any data considered sensitive location data under applicable laws, including guidance and orders from the U.S. Federal Trade Commission where applicable.
5. Company Tags
Company is solely responsible for any pixels, tags, macros or other data collection mechanisms that send data to Company and/or third parties (“
Third Party Tags
”) included in Company’s ads, websites, apps and other materials, regardless of whether Company Tags are implemented by Company or Quantcast on Company’s behalf. In connection with Company Tags, Company represents and warrants that Company and the third parties comply with all applicable laws, provide notice and choice to users and obtain any consents required by applicable laws and industry standards. To the extent that Company Tags provide any data to Quantcast, such data constitutes Company Data. Company’s indemnity obligations under the Agreement include all claims arising from or related to such Company Tags.
6. Data Sharing
The following applies if Quantcast shares data with a third party (“
Company Service Provider
”) to enable the Company Service Provider to provide campaign analytics or measurement services to Company. Quantcast shares such data at Company’s instruction in Quantcast’s role as service provider or processor to Company. Company is solely responsible for Company Service Providers and their services, including use of data received from Quantcast. Such third party services do not constitute Third Party Services under the Agreement.
Company will not export shared data from any Company Service Provider or use such data for any purpose other than receiving campaign analytics or measurement services from the Company Service Provider. Without limiting the foregoing, Company will not attempt to use shared data to create or supplement audiences or for targeting.
INVENTORY RELATED TERMS
7. Quantcast Curation Services
The Services may provide Company the option to purchase packages of Inventory, curated by Quantcast and/or by or on behalf of Company (“
Curated Inventory
”). For the avoidance of doubt, Curated Inventory constitutes “inventory” or “Inventory” (or similar terms such as “supply”) under the Agreement. Company may only use Curated Inventory curated by Quantcast via the Services. Any inventory sourced by Company must meet the requirements of the Quantcast Supply Policy.
8. Additional Inventory Provider Restrictions
By accessing and using the Inventory Providers, Company agrees to comply, and shall be liable for its non-compliance with the applicable Inventory Provider Restrictions as linked below:
Telaria and Rubicon:
https://www.magnite.com/legal/ad-quality-guidelines/
Pubmatic:
https://pubmatic.com/legal/aq-policy/
THIRD-PARTY SERVICES
9. LiveRamp Services
The following terms apply to the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “
LiveRamp
”) in connection with the Platform or Services, outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company. For clarity, “Third-Party Services” as used in the Agreement shall include use of any LiveRamp product or service with the Platform. Company will only provide data to LiveRamp for permitted territories.
LiveRamp Usage Terms
. Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to this Agreement with respect to this Section and has the right to enforce this Section directly against Company, and Company agrees: (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Services to Company, including to access and download Company's CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp's SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp's Data Onboarding Services to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) re-identify, derive any data from, or otherwise reverse engineer data Company may receive through LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Services, (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are considered or related to adult entertainment, tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to any restricted or sensitive categories of data, including individual's health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), or (iii) which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent for; and (e) to additionally warrant that: (i) it will not direct data to any destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such third-party destination and the handling of such data by such third-party destination is subject to the terms and conditions of that direct agreement, (ii) it has obtained and maintains all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder for purposes of LiveRamp providing its Data Onboarding Services.
LiveRamp Fees
. During each month of the Term that Company utilizes Quantcast’s upload facility (e.g., a Quantcast S3 bucket) to provide data to LiveRamp or otherwise utilizes LiveRamp with the Platform outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company shall additionally pay Quantcast “LiveRamp Fees” at the rates communicated by Quantcast to Company. For clarity, “
Third Party Costs
” as used in the Agreement shall include the LiveRamp Fees.
For avoidance of doubt, Quantcast is not liable for any fees to LiveRamp for Company’s use of its own upload facility with LiveRamp or otherwise under Company’s direct agreement with LiveRamp.
10. Stripe Payment Services
Quantcast uses Stripe to execute online payment transactions (e.g., credit card, wire transfer, automatic ACH, etc.). If Company uses this feature, it agrees to be bound by the Stripe Connected Account Agreement, available at
https://stripe.com/connect/account-terms
, to comply with the Stripe Payment Method Terms, available at
https://stripe.com/gb/legal/payment-terms
and to be subject to the Stripe Privacy Policy, available at
https://stripe.com/privacy
. Company also understands and agrees to the business restrictions imposed by Stripe at
https://stripe.com/gb/legal/restricted-businesses
. Each of these terms may be updated from time to time. For avoidance of doubt, if any payment Company initiates using Stripe does not successfully complete, Company is obligated to immediately pay Quantcast by another means acceptable to Quantcast and Company is liable for any costs, penalties or charges imposed by Stripe. Company authorizes Quantcast to make repeating automatic payments using the credit card or other payment means provided to Stripe. For clarity, “Third-Party Services” as used in the Agreement shall include use of any Stripe product or service with the Platform.
PAYMENT CARDS
11. By providing payment card information (including via Stripe), Company represents that it has authority to authorize Quantcast to charge the payment card for amounts owed to Quantcast by Company and acknowledges that such information may be used by any Authorized User with access to Company’s account.
CREATIVE SERVICES
12. The following terms apply unless Company and Quantcast have signed separate written terms governing creative services. If Quantcast provides creative services, Company is solely responsible for all creatives resulting from such services and all materials provided by Company to Quantcast for such creatives. Any use of such creatives constitutes Company’s express approval of the creatives. For the avoidance of doubt, Company shall retain all intellectual property rights in its creatives.
Effective December 16th 2024
to
March 6th 2025
Download
Table of Contents
ADDITIONAL TERMS
Last Updated: December 16, 2024
These Additional Terms supplement the Master Services Agreement or other agreement (“
Agreement
”) between the party using Quantcast’s services (“
Company
”) and Quantcast (as defined in the Agreement).
Quantcast may modify these Additional Terms. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the relevant Services. Company’s continued use of such Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates. Any capitalized terms not defined in the Additional Terms shall have the meaning given to such terms (or such similar defined terms) in the Agreement.
GENERAL
1. Trial Services
This section will apply if Company selects the Trial option when signing up for Quantcast Services. Quantcast may make available to new Quantcast customers a trial period for limited use of the Services (“
Trial
”). Unless the Trial description provides for a different period, the Trial will last for a period of 14 days only and may only be used once (unless an exception is made by Quantcast). After the Trial, Company will be required to submit payment to Quantcast in order to continue accessing the Services. If Company does not wish to continue using the Services after the Trial, Company may close its account via the Platform. Failure to act will result in Company’s access to the Services being automatically disabled. Company will not attempt to circumvent the limit on Trials, including by registering multiple accounts. Quantcast reserves the right to change the features of the Trial and/or remove or cancel the Trial at any time with no liability. For purposes of the Trial, the Services are provided on an ‘as is’ basis, without any representations, warranties, or covenants by Quantcast.
2. Test Releases
From time to time, Quantcast may offer Company the right to use certain experimental features and functionality ("
Test Releases
"), including those identified as “alpha” or “beta”. All Test Releases shall be provided on an ‘as is’ basis, without any representations, warranties, or covenants by Quantcast, and may be terminated by Quantcast in its sole discretion. Notwithstanding any other provision in the Agreement, Quantcast shall have no liability for Test Releases. Use of Test Releases may be subject to additional terms and conditions, which Quantcast will provide in each applicable instance.
INVENTORY RELATED TERMS
3. Quantcast Curation Services
The Services may provide Company the option to purchase packages of Inventory, curated by Quantcast and/or by or on behalf of Company (“
Curated Inventory
”). For the avoidance of doubt, Curated Inventory constitutes “inventory” or “Inventory” (or similar terms such as “supply”) under the Agreement. Company may only use Curated Inventory curated by Quantcast via the Services. Any inventory sourced by Company must meet the requirements of the Quantcast Supply Policy.
4. Additional Inventory Provider Restrictions
By accessing and using the Inventory Providers, Company agrees to comply, and shall be liable for its non-compliance with the applicable Inventory Provider Restrictions as linked below:
Telaria and Rubicon:
https://www.magnite.com/legal/ad-quality-guidelines/
Pubmatic:
https://pubmatic.com/legal/aq-policy/
THIRD-PARTY SERVICES
5. LiveRamp Services.
The following terms apply to the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “
LiveRamp
”) in connection with the Platform or Services, outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company. For clarity, “Third-Party Services” as used in the Agreement shall include use of any LiveRamp product or service with the Platform.
LiveRamp Usage Terms
. Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to this Agreement with respect to this Section and has the right to enforce this Section directly against Company, and Company agrees: (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Services to Company, including to access and download Company's CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp's SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp's Data Onboarding Services to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) re-identify, derive any data from, or otherwise reverse engineer data Company may receive through LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Services, (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are considered or related to adult entertainment, tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to any restricted or sensitive categories of data, including individual's health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), or (iii) which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent for; and (e) to additionally warrant that: (i) it will not direct data to any destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such third-party destination and the handling of such data by such third-party destination is subject to the terms and conditions of that direct agreement, (ii) it has obtained and maintains all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder for purposes of LiveRamp providing its Data Onboarding Services.
LiveRamp Fees
: During each month of the Term that Company utilizes Quantcast’s upload facility (e.g., a Quantcast S3 bucket) to provide data to LiveRamp or otherwise utilizes LiveRamp with the Platform outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company shall additionally pay Quantcast “LiveRamp Fees” at the rates communicated by Quantcast to Company. For clarity, “
Third Party Costs
” as used in the Agreement shall include the LiveRamp Fees.
For avoidance of doubt, Quantcast is not liable for any fees to LiveRamp for Company’s use of its own upload facility with LiveRamp or otherwise under Company’s direct agreement with LiveRamp.
Data Subject Requests
: At least one every thirty days, Company will provide any opt outs and deletion requests to a specific SMTP folder or other means enabled by Quantcast.
6. Stripe Payment Services
Quantcast uses Stripe to execute online payment transactions (e.g., credit card, wire transfer, automatic ACH, etc.). If Company uses this feature, it agrees to be bound by the Stripe Connected Account Agreement, available at
https://stripe.com/connect/account-terms
, to comply with the Stripe Payment Method Terms, available at
https://stripe.com/gb/legal/payment-terms
and to be subject to the Stripe Privacy Policy, available at
https://stripe.com/privacy
. Company also understands and agrees to the business restrictions imposed by Stripe at
https://stripe.com/gb/legal/restricted-businesses
. Each of these terms may be updated from time to time. For avoidance of doubt, if any payment Company initiates using Stripe does not successfully complete, Company is obligated to immediately pay Quantcast by another means acceptable to Quantcast and Company is liable for any costs, penalties or charges imposed by Stripe. Company authorizes Quantcast to make repeating automatic payments using the credit card or other payment means provided to Stripe. For clarity, “Third-Party Services” as used in the Agreement shall include use of any Stripe product or service with the Platform.
Effective May 23rd 2024
to
December 16th 2024
Download
Table of Contents
ADDITIONAL TERMS
Last Updated: May 22, 2024
These Additional Terms supplement the Master Services Agreement or other agreement (“
Agreement
”) between the party using Quantcast’s services (“
Company
”) and Quantcast (as defined in the Agreement).
Quantcast may modify these Additional Terms. Quantcast will notify Company by making the revised version available on this page or an identified successor page, and an updated revision date will indicate that changes have been made. If Company does not accept the changes, Company must stop using the relevant Services.  Company’s continued use of such Services after Quantcast publishes changes means that Company consents to the updates. Any capitalized terms not defined in the Additional Terms shall have the meaning given to such terms (or such similar defined terms) in the Agreement.
GENERAL
1. Trial Services
This section will apply if Company selects the Trial option when signing up for Quantcast Services. Quantcast may make available to new Quantcast customers a trial period for limited use of the Services (“
Trial
”). Unless the Trial description provides for a different period, the Trial will last for a period of 14 days only and may only be used once (unless an exception is made by Quantcast). After the Trial, Company will be required to submit payment to Quantcast in order to continue accessing the Services. If Company does not wish to continue using the Services after the Trial, Company may close its account via the Platform. Failure to act will result in Company’s access to the Services being automatically disabled. Company will not attempt to circumvent the limit on Trials, including by registering multiple accounts. Quantcast reserves the right to change the features of the Trial and/or remove or cancel the Trial at any time with no liability. For purposes of the Trial, the Services are provided on an ‘as is’ basis, without any representations, warranties, or covenants by Quantcast.
2.  Test Releases
From time to time, Quantcast may offer Company the right to use certain experimental features and functionality ("
Test Releases
"), including those identified as “alpha” or “beta”.  All Test Releases shall be provided on an ‘as is’ basis, without any representations, warranties, or covenants by Quantcast, and may be terminated by Quantcast in its sole discretion. Notwithstanding any other provision in the Agreement, Quantcast shall have no liability for Test Releases.  Use of Test Releases may be subject to additional terms and conditions, which Quantcast will provide in each applicable instance.
INVENTORY RELATED TERMS
3. Quantcast Curation Services
The Services may provide Company the option to purchase packages of Inventory, curated by Quantcast and/or by or on behalf of Company (“
Curated Inventory
”). For the avoidance of doubt, Curated Inventory constitutes “inventory” or “Inventory” (or similar terms such as “supply”) under the Agreement.  Company may only use Curated Inventory curated by Quantcast via the Services. Any inventory sourced by Company must meet the requirements of the Quantcast Supply Policy.
4. Additional Inventory Provider Restrictions
By accessing and using the Inventory Providers, Company agrees to comply, and shall be liable for its non-compliance with the applicable Inventory Provider Restrictions as linked below:
Telaria and Rubicon:
https://www.magnite.com/legal/ad-quality-guidelines/
Pubmatic:
https://pubmatic.com/legal/aq-policy/
THIRD-PARTY SERVICES
5. LiveRamp Services.
The following terms apply to the extent Company uses any product or service of LiveRamp, Inc. or its subsidiaries (collectively, “
LiveRamp
”) in connection with the Platform or Services, outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company. For clarity, “Third-Party Services” as used in the Agreement shall include use of any LiveRamp product or service with the Platform.
LiveRamp Usage Terms
. Company agrees that LiveRamp is an intended third-party beneficiary to this Agreement with respect to this Section and has the right to enforce this Section directly against Company, and Company agrees: (a) to authorize LiveRamp to provide its Data Onboarding Services to Company, including to access and download Company's CRM data for placement of data cookies and delivery of such cookies to Quantcast; (b) to upload all data to LiveRamp's SFTP site, and not provide such data directly to Quantcast. Company is prohibited from sending Quantcast any Direct Identifiers, or recombining any data it receives from Quantcast with Direct Identifiers; (c) Company will not (i) resell or provide access to LiveRamp's Data Onboarding Services to anyone except Authorized Users, (ii) re-identify, derive any data from, or otherwise reverse engineer data Company may receive through LiveRamp’s Data Onboarding Services, (iii) use such service to sell or advertise any products that are considered or related to adult entertainment, tobacco, illegal gambling, firearms, or any other illegal product; (d) Company will not provide LiveRamp with any data (i) related to any restricted or sensitive categories of data, including individual's health or medical condition, sexual orientation, or religion, (ii) of those under age 18 (or age 13 if from Australia), or (iii) which Company does not own or have rights to, or has not otherwise obtained consent for; and (e) to additionally warrant that: (i) it will not direct data to any destination other than Quantcast unless Company has a direct agreement with the entity controlling such third-party destination and the handling of such data by such third-party destination is subject to the terms and conditions of that direct agreement, (ii) it has obtained and maintains all required consents under Applicable Privacy Laws for LiveRamp to collect, use and retain personally identifiable information provided to LiveRamp hereunder for purposes of LiveRamp providing its Data Onboarding Services.
LiveRamp Fees
:   During each month of the Term that Company utilizes Quantcast’s upload facility (e.g., a Quantcast S3 bucket) to provide data to LiveRamp or otherwise utilizes LiveRamp with the Platform outside of a direct agreement between LiveRamp and Company, Company shall additionally pay Quantcast “LiveRamp Fees” at the rates communicated by Quantcast to Company. For clarity, “
Third Party Costs
” as used in the Agreement shall include the LiveRamp Fees.
For avoidance of doubt, Quantcast is not liable for any fees to LiveRamp for Company’s use of its own upload facility with LiveRamp or otherwise under Company’s direct agreement with LiveRamp.
Data Subject Requests
: At least one every thirty days, Company will provide updated data that omits any data subject to an opt out or deletion request.
6. Stripe Payment Services
Quantcast uses Stripe to execute online payment transactions (e.g., credit card, wire transfer, automatic ACH, etc.). If Company uses this feature, it agrees to be bound by the Stripe Connected Account Agreement, available at
https://stripe.com/connect/account-terms
, to comply with the Stripe Payment Method Terms, available at
https://stripe.com/gb/legal/payment-terms
and to be subject to the Stripe Privacy Policy, available at
https://stripe.com/privacy
. Company also understands and agrees to the business restrictions imposed by Stripe at
https://stripe.com/gb/legal/restricted-businesses
. Each of these terms may be updated from time to time. For avoidance of doubt, if any payment Company initiates using Stripe does not successfully complete, Company is obligated to immediately pay Quantcast by another means acceptable to Quantcast and Company is liable for any costs, penalties or charges imposed by Stripe. Company authorizes Quantcast to make repeating automatic payments using the credit card or other payment means provided to Stripe. For clarity, “Third-Party Services” as used in the Agreement shall include use of any Stripe product or service with the Platform.
Effective July 1st 2024
Download
Table of Contents
Page:
/
Please download the PDF to view this document.
Download
Sub-policy 2
https://www.scorecardresearch.com/privacy.aspx?newlanguage=1:

Sub-policy 3
https://www.parse.ly/privacy-policy/:
Skip to content
WordPress VIP Privacy Policy
Who We Are and What This Policy Covers
This Privacy Policy applies to information collected by WPVIP Inc. (“WPVIP,” “we,” or “us”) about users of our WordPress VIP and Parse.ly products and services, which include:
Our websites (including wpvip.com and parse.ly);
Our plugins (including the
Parse.ly Plugin
);
Our mobile applications (including the Parse.ly mobile app); and
Our products and services including those accessed through our websites (for example, the Parse.ly Dashboard and the WordPress VIP Dashboard).
Throughout this Privacy Policy we’ll refer to our websites, mobile applications, and other products and services collectively as “Services.”
Please note that this Privacy Policy does not apply to data collected from any other products or services operated by our parent company, Automattic, or our affiliates, all of which are subject to a separate privacy policy. For example, the
Automattic Privacy Policy
covers use of WordPress.com, Jetpack, WooCommerce and much more.
WordPress.org vs WordPress.com vs WordPress VIP: What’s the Difference?
WordPress VIP
was purpose-built for the highest volume, most security conscious, and most demanding digital properties.
Learn more
Information We Collect
Information You Provide to Us
It’s probably no surprise that we collect information that you provide to us directly. For example, we may collect information directly from you when you request customer support, request a quote or demo via our websites, use the contact forms on our websites or otherwise communicate with us. The types of information about you that we collect may include your name, email address, and phone number, and any other information you choose to provide.
Information We Collect Automatically
We also collect some information automatically about your interactions with us or our Services, including:
Activity, Device and Usage information:
We collect information about how you access our Services, including data about the device and network you use, such as your hardware model, operating system version, mobile network, IP address, unique device identifiers, browser type, and app version. We also collect information about your activity on our Services, such as access times, pages viewed, links clicked, and the page you visited before navigating to our Services.
Information from cookies & other technologies:
A cookie is a string of information that a website stores on a visitor’s computer, and that the visitor’s browser provides to the website each time the visitor returns. Pixel tags (also called web beacons) are small blocks of code placed on websites and emails. WPVIP uses cookies and other technologies like pixel tags to help us identify and track visitors, usage, and access preferences for our Services, as well as track and understand email campaign effectiveness and to deliver targeted ads. For more information about our use of cookies and other technologies for tracking, including how you can control the use of cookies, please see our
Cookie Policy
and the Your Choices section below.
Information We Collect from Other Sources
In connection with our marketing and sales efforts, we may obtain information about you from other sources like public databases, data providers, social media platforms, and other third parties. This information may include names, mailing addresses, job titles, email addresses, phone numbers, Internet Protocol (IP) addresses, social media profiles, social media URLs and custom profiles, for purposes of targeted advertising and event promotion. Additionally, if you create or log into your account through a third-party platform (such as GitHub), we may have access to certain information from that platform, such as your name and email address, in accordance with the authorization procedures determined by such platform.
Information We Derive
We may derive information or draw inferences from you based on the information we (or those that perform work for us) collect. For example, we may determine the approximate location of your device from your IP address. We collect and use this information to provide certain features of the Parse.ly Services. We may also use the information to calculate how many people visit our Services from certain geographic regions.
How and Why We Use Information
We use information we collect to:
Provide, maintain, improve, and develop new products and services, including to debug and repair errors in our Services;
Personalize your experience with us;
Send you technical notices, security alerts, support messages and other transactional or relationship messages;
Communicate with you about products, services, and events offered by WPVIP and others and provide news and information that we think will interest you (see the Your Choices section below for information about how to opt out of these communications at any time);
Monitor and analyze trends, usage, and activities in connection with our products and services;
Detect, investigate, and help prevent security incidents and other malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity and help protect the rights and property of WPVIP and others;
Comply with our legal and financial obligations; and
Carry out any other purpose described to you at the time the information was collected.
We also create aggregated, anonymized or de-identified information that cannot reasonably be used to identify you. If we create de-identified data that we intend to treat as non-personal information, we process, maintain, and use this information only in a de-identified fashion and will not attempt to re-identify such information, except as permitted by law.
Sharing of Information
We share information about you in the following circumstances or as otherwise described in this policy:
Affiliated companies and independent contractors:
We may disclose information about you to our parent company (Automattic), affiliated companies, and independent contractors who need the information to help us provide our Services or process the information on our behalf. We require all such entities to follow this Privacy Policy for any personal information that we share with them;
Third-party vendors:
We may share information about you with third-party vendors, service providers, contractors, and consultants who need the information in order to provide their services to us, or to provide their services to you or your site. This includes vendors that help us provide our Services to you (like cloud storage services, postal and email delivery services that help us stay in touch with you, and customer chat and email support services that help us communicate with you); those that assist us with our marketing efforts (e.g., by providing tools for identifying a specific marketing target group or improving our marketing campaigns); those that help us understand and enhance our Services (like analytics providers); those that make tools to help us run our operations (like programs that help us with task management, scheduling, word processing, email and other communications, and collaboration among our teams); and other third-party tools that help us manage operations. We require vendors to agree to privacy commitments in order to share information with them. Other vendors are listed in our more specific policies (e.g., our
Cookie Policy
);
Legal and regulatory requirements:
We may disclose information about you in accordance with, or as required by, any applicable law or legal process, including a response to a subpoena, court order, or other governmental request;
To protect rights, property, and others:
We may disclose information about you when we believe in good faith that disclosure is reasonably necessary to protect the property or rights of WPVIP, our users, third parties, or the public at large. For example, if we have a good faith belief that there is an imminent danger of death or serious physical injury, we may disclose information related to the emergency without delay;
Business transfers:
In connection with any merger, sale of company assets, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business by another company, or in the unlikely event that we go out of business or enters bankruptcy, user information would likely be one of the assets that is transferred or acquired by a third party. If any of these events were to happen, this Privacy Policy would continue to apply to your information and the party receiving your information may continue to use your information, but only consistent with this Privacy Policy;
With your consent:
We may share and disclose information with your consent or at your direction. For example, we may share your information with third parties when you authorize us to do so;
Aggregated or de-identified information:
We may share information that has been aggregated or de-identified, so that it can no longer reasonably be used to identify you. For instance, we may publish aggregate statistics about the use of our Services.
Your Choices
You have several choices available when it comes to information about you:
Limit the information that you provide:
You may choose to limit the information you provide to us when you contact us via wpvip.com and parse.ly.
Opt out of marketing communications:
You may opt out of receiving promotional communications from us. Just follow the instructions in those communications or let us know. If you opt out of promotional communications, we may still send you other communications, like those about your account and legal notices.
Set your browser to reject cookies:
At this time, WPVIP does not respond to “do not track” signals across all of our Services. However, you can
usually choose
to set your browser to remove or reject browser cookies before using our websites, with the drawback that certain features of the websites may not function properly without the aid of cookies.
How Long We Keep Information
We generally discard information about you when it’s no longer needed for the purposes for which we collect and use it — described in the section above on How and Why We Use Information — and we’re not legally required to keep it. For example, in most cases, we keep web server logs that record information about a visitor to one of WPVIP’s websites, like the visitor’s IP address, browser type, and operating system, for approximately 30 days. We retain the logs for this period of time in order to, among other things, analyze traffic to VIP’s websites and investigate issues if something goes wrong on one of our websites.
Your Rights
If you are located in certain parts of the world, including some US states and countries that fall under the scope of the European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), you may have certain rights regarding your personal information, like the right to request access to or deletion of your data.
US Privacy Laws
Laws in some US states require us to provide a list of the “categories” of personal information we collect, as that term is defined in the law.
In the last 12 months, we collected the following categories of personal information, depending on the Services used:
Identifiers (like your name, contact information, and device and online identifiers);
Internet or other electronic network activity information (such as your usage of our Services);
Geolocation data (such as your approximate location based on your IP address);
Professional or employment-related information (such as your company); and
Inferences we make (such as approximate location based on IP address).
You can find more information about what we collect and sources of that information in the Information We Collect section above.
We collect personal information for the business and commercial purposes described in the How and Why We Use Information section. And we share this information with the categories of third parties described in the Sharing of Information section. We retain this information for the length of time described in our How Long We Keep Information section.
In some US states, you have additional rights, subject to any exemptions provided by your state’s respective law, including the right to:
Request a copy of the specific pieces of information we collect about you and, if you’re in California, to know the categories of personal information we collect, the categories of business or commercial purpose for collecting and using it, the categories of sources from which the information came, and the categories of third parties we share it with;
Request deletion of your personal information;
Request correction of your personal information;
Opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information;
Receive a copy of your information in a readily portable format; and
Not receive discriminatory treatment for exercising your rights.
Right to Opt Out
We never directly sell your personal information in the conventional sense (i.e., for money).
We may share your information as necessary with our third-party service providers to provide our services to you. To the extent that we share your information with certain advertising, marketing, or analytics vendors, this can be considered a “sale” or “share” in certain U.S. states, which you may have the right to opt out of.
You can learn more about this sharing and how to opt out by clicking the “Do Not Sell My Personal Information” link in the footer of our websites. Note that in some instances this link will only display to individuals visiting our sites from within the relevant states.
Our opt-out is managed through cookies, so if you delete cookies, your browser is set to delete cookies automatically after a certain length of time, or if you visit sites in a different browser, you’ll need to make this selection again.
We also respect the GPC browser signal and will treat it as a valid means of communicating your desire to opt out.
We do not collect or process your sensitive personal information except where it is strictly necessary to provide you with our service, where the processing is not for the purpose of inferring characteristics about you, or for other purposes that do not require an option to limit under California law. We don’t knowingly sell or share personal information of those under 16.
Contacting Us About These Rights
Scroll down to the How to Reach Us section to find out how to contact us about any of these rights.
When you contact us about one of your rights under this section, we’ll need to verify that you are the right person. You can also designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf by giving us written authorization. We may still require you to verify your identity with us.
Appeals Process for Rights Requests Denials
In some circumstances we may deny your request to exercise one of these rights. For example, if we cannot verify that you are the account owner we may deny your request to access the personal information associated with your account. As another example, if we are legally required to maintain a copy of your personal information we may deny your request to delete your personal information.
In the event that we deny your request, we will communicate this fact to you in writing. You may appeal our decision by responding in writing to our denial email and stating that you would like to appeal. All appeals will be reviewed by an internal expert who was not involved in your original request. In the event that your appeal is also denied this information will be communicated to you in writing.
If your appeal is denied, in some US states you may refer the denied appeal to the state attorney general if you believe the denial is in conflict with your legal rights. The process for how to do this will be communicated to you in writing at the same time we send you our decision about your appeal.
European Privacy Laws
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom, or Switzerland, you have certain rights and protections under the law regarding the processing of your personal data, and this section applies to you.
Legal Bases for Collecting and Using Information
A note here for those in the European Union about our legal grounds for processing information about you under EU data protection laws, which is that our use of your information is based on the grounds that:
(1) The use is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation;
(2) The use is necessary in order to protect your vital interests or those of another person;
(3) We have a legitimate interest in using your information — for example, to provide and update our Services; to improve our Services so that we can offer you an even better user experience; to safeguard our Services; to communicate with you; to measure, gauge, and improve the effectiveness of our advertising; and to understand our user retention and attrition; to monitor and prevent any problems with our Services; and to personalize your experience; or
(4) You have given us your consent — for example when you opt in to receive marketing communications from us. When consent is the legal basis for our processing of your personal data, you may withdraw such consent at any time.
Data Subject Requests
Subject to certain limitations, you have the right to request access to the personal data we hold about you and to receive your data in a portable format, the right to ask that your personal data be corrected or erased, and the right to object to, or request that we restrict, certain processing.
Questions or Complaints
If you have a concern about our processing of personal data that we are not able to resolve, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the Data Protection Authority where you reside. Contact details for your Data Protection Authority can be found using the links below:
For individuals in the EEA:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
For individuals in the UK:
https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us/
For individuals in Switzerland:
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home/the-fdpic/contact.html
Other Things You Should Know
Transferring Information
Because our Services are offered worldwide, the information about you that we process when you use the Services in the EU may be used, stored, and/or accessed by individuals operating outside the European Economic Area (EEA) who work for us, other members of our group of companies, or third-party data processors. This is required for the purposes listed in the How and Why We Use Information section above.
When providing information about you to entities outside the EEA, we will take appropriate measures to ensure that the recipient protects your personal information adequately as required by applicable law. These measures include by obtaining your consent or entering into European Commission approved standard contractual arrangements with entities based in countries outside the EEA.
Privacy Policy Changes
Although most changes are likely to be minor, WPVIP may change its Privacy Policy from time to time. WPVIP encourages visitors to frequently check this page for any changes to the Privacy Policy. If we make changes, we will notify you by revising the change log below, and, in some cases, we may provide additional notice (like adding a statement to our homepage or the WordPress VIP Lobby or sending you a notification through email or your dashboard). Your further use of the Services after a change to our Privacy Policy will be subject to the updated policy.
How to Reach Us
If you have a question about this Privacy Policy, or you would like to contact us about any of the rights mentioned above, please contact us at 1-877-273-3049 or privacy@wpvip.com.
Change Log
March 15 2023:
Initial Publication
September 12 2023:
Clarification regarding sharing of information with parent and affiliated companies.
Further Reading
Google Analytics 4 vs. Universal Analytics: Key Differences and What They Mean for Content Teams
Read more
What You Need to Know About Enterprise WordPress Security
Read more
WordPress.org vs WordPress.com vs WordPress VIP: What’s the Difference?
Read more
Request a WordPress VIP demo
Learn how we can help your organization build better digital experiences.
Business Email
*
First Name
*
Last Name
*
Job title
*
Company name
*
Phone number
*
Country Region
*
Afghanistan
Åland Islands
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Asia/Pacific Region
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Bouvet Island
Brazil
British Indian Ocean Territory
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Canary Islands
Cape Verde
Caribbean Netherlands
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Cote d'Ivoire
Croatia
Cuba
Curaçao
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of the Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Europe
Falkland Islands
Faroe Islands
Fiji
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
French Southern and Antarctic Lands
Gabon
Gambia
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guernsey
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Heard Island and McDonald Islands
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Isle of Man
Israel
Italy
Jamaica
Japan
Jersey
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia (FYROM)
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar (Burma)
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Island
North Korea
Northern Mariana Islands
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Pitcairn Islands
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Réunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Barthélemy
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Pierre and Miquelon
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome and Principe
Saudi Arabia
Senegal
Serbia
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Georgia and the South Sandwich Islands
South Korea
South Sudan
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Svalbard and Jan Mayen
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Tokelau
Tonga
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
U.S. Virgin Islands
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
United States Minor Outlying Islands
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City
Venezuela
Vietnam
Wallis and Futuna
Western Sahara
Yemen
Zambia
Zimbabwe
Message
*
Stay in the loop! Check this box to get the latest updates, tips, and exclusive content. Unsubscribe anytime. Your information is protected per our
privacy policy.
*
Referrer URL
utm_campaign
utm_medium
utm_source
utm_term
utm_content
GCLID
redirect_url
parent_url
parsely_conversion_label
parsely_conversion_type
parsely_visitor_id
parsely_visitor_last_session_ts
parsely_visitor_session_count
parsely_site_id
Form Tier
Inquiry Type
Sub-policy 4
https://www.liveintent.com/services-privacy-policy/:
LiveIntent
1+1=4: LiveIntent has agreed to be acquired by Zeta: Read the Press Release
button/arrow
Popular topics
People-Based Marketing
Meet-a-LiveIntenter
Email Revenue
Identity Graph
Subscriber Acquisition
First-Party Data
Direct-to-Consumer
Cookie Apocalypse
LiveIntent Privacy Policy
WEBSITE PRIVACY POLICY (data collection and use at this website)
LIVEINTENT SERVICES PRIVACY POLICY (collection and use of fully identifiable personal data across LiveIntent’s range of services)
Last updated December 6, 2024.
1. WEBSITE PRIVACY POLICY
Scope
This LiveIntent Website Privacy Policy (the “Privacy Policy”) applies solely to information collected by LiveIntent, Inc. (collectively, “LiveIntent,” “we,” “our,” or “us”) on this LiveIntent website (the “Site”). This Privacy Policy provides information on how and why LiveIntent collects and uses the information we obtain through this Site.
For information on LiveIntent’s range of services, how we use data across our different services—including for cross-context behavioral advertising—and your options with respect to that data and our uses, please refer to the LiveIntent General Services Privacy Policy located below.
Links to Third Party Sites
This Privacy Policy does not apply to the practices of third-party sites including, but not limited to, client and affiliate websites, applications and websites on which we may place advertisements, and any third-party websites you may link to from our Site. LiveIntent does not endorse or make any representations about these third-party sites or applications, or any information, software, products or materials found there. We encourage you to review the privacy policies of these sites and applications to understand their data collection and use practices.
Information Collection, Use and Sharing
Information Collection
We collect three types of information from and about visitors to this Site: (1) information collected directly from you when you provide it to us, (2) information we collect from third-party sources, and (3) tracking data that is collected automatically when you navigate the Site. All types of data are considered “personal information” or “personal data” (these terms mean the same thing and can be used interchangeably) by applicable privacy laws.
“Personal information” means information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household. In these policies, we use “personal information” and “data” interchangeably.
The specific categories of personal information we collect from the sources described above (from you directly, from third party sources, and tracking data) includes:
Identifiers,
such as your name, email address, and phone number, as well as other demographic data like your age, gender, and language preference. We may collect this data directly from you, such as when you register for events, create accounts on the Site, or communicate directly with us.  We also automatically collect identifiers such as your IP address, or mobile advertising IDs when you visit the site.  We may collect your telephone number and/or email address from third-party sources.
Professional and employment-related information
such as your employer and job title, if you provide it when applying for a job with us or in other direct communications to us.
Imprecise geolocation information,
such as your ZIP code, city, state, or country. This information may be either provided by you or collected and processed automatically.
Internet and electronic network activity information,
such as your IP address, unique digital identifiers (such as mobile advertising IDs), and information related to the devices you use to access the Site such as the device type, operating system, and version. This information may also include the Uniform Resource Locator (“URL”) of the site you visited before coming to this Site, the URL of the site you visit after leaving our Site, the type of browser you are using, and the ways you interact with our Site, emails, advertisements, and apps. This information is collected and processed automatically by us and our Site’s service partners.
Inferences;
we may use the personal information we collect to generate certain inferences about which general topics may be of interest to you.
The “Cookies” section of this Privacy Policy describes the ways we automatically collect information from you and the electronic tools, like cookies or pixel tags, that we use to do so.
Information Use
LiveIntent uses the data we collect at this Site to fulfill your requests, respond to your inquiries, communicate with you, provide LiveIntent news or updates, and to understand the audience for our Site. We may also use your information to make our Site easier for you to use and to inform you of service and product updates, whitepapers, new products, market research opportunities and other related information from LiveIntent, or to send you promotional messages regarding various LiveIntent products and services. We also use the information we collect when we believe in good faith that the use of that information is necessary to protect our rights, the integrity of our services, or your safety or the safety of others; to detect, prevent, or respond to fraud, intellectual property infringement, violations of terms of use, or violations of law; and to fulfill the purposes described to you at the point of collection and pursuant to your consent.
LiveIntent uses tracking data to analyze trends, administer the Site, track users’ activities on the Site, help us understand the parts of our Site visited most often, and gather aggregated demographic information for use in improving the Site. We and our service providers also use the data we collect to generate and analyze statistics about the performance of our advertising campaigns, to improve performance over time, to provide and improve our offerings, and to develop new offerings.
LiveIntent may also obtain personal information from you if you apply for a job with us. This data would include your name, email address, mailing address, employment history and any other information contained in any application materials that you submit. We may use this information to review your application for employment.
Information Sharing and Disclosure
LiveIntent may share your information with our affiliates and service providers for the purposes described in this policy; with our business partners with whom we provide co-branded materials or events that you elect to receive or participate in, such as webinars, white papers, events, or case studies, for their marketing purposes; and to affiliates, service providers, advisors, and other third parties to the extent reasonably necessary to proceed with the negotiation or completion of a merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, or sale of all or a portion of our assets.
We may disclose your information as required by law, court order or other valid legal processes. We also reserve the right to disclose your information if we believe in good faith that disclosure is necessary to protect our rights or the safety of any person, investigate fraud, or respond to a valid government request.
Bases for Processing
Certain jurisdictions, including the European Union, have laws that require us to have a “legal basis” to process your personal information. Where required by applicable law, we rely on one of the following legal bases to justify our processing of your personal information:
to fulfil our contractual obligations to you, for example to provide access to Sites that you request and to ensure that invoices are delivered or paid correctly. Failure to provide personal information necessary to perform a contract may prevent or delay the fulfilment of our contractual obligations;
to comply with our legal obligations, for example to respond to legally binding requests from regulators, law enforcement authorities, or other government authorities;
to meet our legitimate interests, for example to understand how you use the Sites and to enable us to derive knowledge that enables us to develop new Offerings. When we process personal information to meet our legitimate interests, we put in place safeguards to protect your privacy and to determine that our legitimate interests are not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms; and
to exercise our legal rights where it is necessary to do so, for example to detect, prevent and respond to fraud claims, intellectual property infringement claims, or other violations of law.
We may obtain your consent to collect and use certain types of personal information when we are required to do so by law. If we ask for your consent to process your personal information, you may withdraw your consent, where permitted by law, using the contact details at the end of this Privacy Policy.
Choices
Opt-Out of LiveIntent Corporate Communications
You may opt-out from receiving LiveIntent Corporate Communications by clicking on the unsubscribe mechanism included in each email message we send.
Even if you choose to opt-out of our communications, LiveIntent will retain and use your information to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, enforce our agreements and to maintain a record of your opt-out. You may also still receive transactional emails, such as registration confirmation, product updates and responses to direct requests you have made.
Cookies
Cookies are small text files that store data using your web browser to enable websites and marketing companies to recognize you and to associate your browsing activity with other data. We, and our third-party service providers who assist with managing our Site, use cookies, web beacons and similar technologies to track use of our Site in order to improve its performance, ensure we are providing content that is of interest to our Site visitors, and make our Site more user-friendly. We also use cookies for cross-context behavioral advertising.  What this means in practice is that we use cookies to help determine which ads you see online, by logging your visits to many advertiser / brand websites, and then showing you ads for similar products and services.
You may manage your cookie preferences
here
.
Types of Cookies Used on Our Site
Strictly Necessary Cookies
: These cookies are necessary for the Site to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the Site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Performance Cookies
: These cookies collect data about how visitors use our Site for web analytics purposes, for instance which pages visitors go to most often and error messages received. These cookies are only used to improve how our Site works and your experience on our Site; they do not track your browsing activity on other websites. By using our Site, you agree that we can place these types of cookies on your device.
Functionality Cookies
: These cookies allow our Site to remember choices you make (such as your username and password, language preference or the region you are in) and provide enhanced, more personalized features. These cookies may also be used to remember changes you have made to text size, fonts and other personalization. They may also be used to provide services you have requested, such as keeping you logged in to your account as you browse the internet. These cookies do not track your browsing activity on other websites. By using our Site or by signing up for an account with us, you agree that we can place these types of cookies on your device.
Targeting Cookies
: These cookies may be set through our Site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Managing Cookies in Your Browser
You may be able to adjust your browser settings to manage your cookie preferences, such as setting your browser to notify you when you receive a cookie and give you the choice to decide whether or not to accept it. If you reject cookies, you may still use our Site, but the functionality of some areas may be limited.
Below are links to information about managing your cookie preferences in common browsers:
Google Chrome Cookies
Mozilla Firefox Cookies
Internet Explorer Cookies
Safari Cookies
Google Analytics
Social Media and Content Sharing Features
Our Site may include social media sharing features, such as LinkedIn and X (formerly Twitter) buttons, and may set a cookie to enable the feature to function properly. These features may collect your IP address and which page you are visiting on our Site. Social media features are governed by that social media company’s privacy policy.
Meta Privacy
(Facebook and Instagram)
X Privacy
Linkedin Privacy
Data Retention
We retain the information we collect for only as long as necessary to fulfil the purposes for which we collected it, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal information, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the information, the purposes for which we obtained the information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, as well as applicable legal requirements.
Data Security
LiveIntent uses commercially reasonable safeguards to protect personal information against loss, misuse or alteration and to maintain the integrity and security of all information collected through the Site. These include technical, physical, and administrative security controls.
Your Rights Regarding Personal Data
Privacy laws around the world give individuals different versions of the rights described below. LiveIntent allows any person to exercise the following rights no matter where they live. LiveIntent will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights. Prior to fulfilling a request for a copy of your personal information, LiveIntent is required to reasonably verify your identity, which we generally do by sending a verification link to the email address associated with your personal information. Under applicable laws, you can use an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf, but that agent must be able to complete our verification process in order to demonstrate that they have been authorized to make the request.
To exercise your rights
with respect to your personal information in LiveIntent’s databases, please visit our privacy center
here
. If you make a request, we will normally respond within 30 days if you live in Europe or Canada, or 45 days if you live elsewhere. However, if we are experiencing a high volume of requests or if your request is more complex, we may take up to 90 days to respond.
Data Access / Portability
– you can request a copy of your personal information (data that relates to you) that we hold in a human-readable form. Note that some of the personal information that we process is not ordinarily maintained in a human-readable form, and that privacy laws generally do not require companies to convert personal information to become human-readable for the purpose of responding to an access request.
Correction
—you can ask us to correct personal information that we hold and is related to you if it is inaccurate. In many cases we do not have the technical ability to change the personal information in our database, and so will delete the incorrect data instead.
Data Deletion
—you can ask us to delete your personal information. As allowed by applicable laws, there may be some cases where we will decline requests for deletion, but these are rare cases. We may also delete the personal information contained in a profile and retain anonymized data that cannot be linked back to you or used to identify you. In the very unlikely case that we refuse your request, you can appeal that decision by contacting privacy@liveintent.com for a review of your case.
Objection / Restricting Processing
–in some US states and countries you have a legal right to object to processing of your personal information, or to ask that such processing be restricted. To keep things simple, if you wish to exercise these rights, please request to have your data deleted—our systems cannot process partial opt-outs.
Opt-Out of our use of Sensitive Data
–you can ask LiveIntent not to use Sensitive Data that relates to you. In order to keep things simple, we will treat these requests as Data Deletion requests (see above).
Opt-Out of Receiving Email from LiveIntent
–you can ask to be added to our global email suppression list so that we won’t send any more commercial emails to the email address you opt out.
Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Data
-you can request that we do not make your personal information available to our clients for their own use. If you select this option, we may still use your personal information for internal analysis, or to send advertisements to you.
You also have the right in many countries to contact a privacy or data protection authority if you believe we are not complying with privacy laws, and we have not been able to resolve the situation to your satisfaction. Many countries have a dedicated privacy / data protection authority; in the United States you can make a complaint to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission or your state Attorney General.
International Data Transfers
This Site is hosted in the United States. This means that when you submit personal information to the Site or we collect tracking data at the Site, it will be processed in the United States and may also be accessed by LiveIntent personnel and technical support teams in Germany, Denmark, Canada, India, and the Philippines. Your data may also be shared with our affiliates or with our service providers.
Do Not Track / Global Privacy Control (“GPC”)
LiveIntent does not currently process browser-based “Do Not Track” signals, largely because they are not currently supported by the most popular browsers that are used by the vast majority of users, however, if and when these DNT mechanisms come into widespread use, LiveIntent will support them to the extent required by applicable laws.  LiveIntent’s website does recognize the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) feature.  Please note, however, that this only applies to personal information that would be collected on LiveIntent’s website.
Children’s Privacy
This Site and the services we provide are intended for general audiences, and is not intended for use by persons under the age of 18. If we learn that we have inadvertently collected personal information from a child under the age of 18, we will delete it. If you believe that we have collected personal information from a child under 18, please contact us at privacy@liveintent.com.
Updates To This Privacy Policy
We reserve the right to modify this privacy statement at any time. Note the date of the most recent update at the top of this page.
Contact Us
To ask questions about LiveIntent’s Privacy Policy or to request more information on LiveIntent’s privacy practices, email us at privacy@liveintent.com. You can also contact us via mail at:
LiveIntent
1 World Trade Center, Suite 45A
New York, NY 10007
2. GENERAL SERVICES PRIVACY POLICY
OVERVIEW OF LIVEINTENT’S USE OF DATA
This section of the privacy policy describes how LiveIntent collects and uses personal information in connection with the two types of services we offer to our clients: Identity Services and Marketing and Advertising Services (together our “Services”). LiveIntent also works with affiliated companies that are separately branded and that have their own privacy policies. LiveIntent and our affiliates make every effort to comply with all applicable laws.
LiveIntent collects and uses data about individual consumers for the limited purpose of helping our clients identify and reach their intended audiences. We use a lot of data to create these audiences, which in turn allows our clients to serve more relevant advertising for consumers and better target their marketing campaigns.
Our data comes from (a) data that our clients have provided to us, (b) data from our cookies or similar tracking technologies, which may be on your browser and which are recognized when you visit websites—either controlled by us or by third parties—where our tracking technologies are in use, and (c) data purchased or licensed from third parties who are in the business of selling consumer data, which may also include companies that are under common ownership with LiveIntent.
This Services Privacy Policy applies to the Services that LiveIntent provides, which are divided into two main categories:
LiveIntent Acting as a Service Provider
: where LiveIntent handles personal data that was collected by another company (our client) under the terms of its privacy policy solely to perform a service for that company. This privacy policy does not apply to these Services.
LiveIntent Acting as a Data Collector
: where LiveIntent collects, uses, and shares personal information from and about individuals for our own purposes. This privacy policy applies only to these Services and describes our practices regarding collection, use, and sharing of personal information through our online and digital services, and instructions for opting out of our use of your personal information for online behavioral advertising.
When we act as a service provider, we follow the client’s privacy policy because the data we process in that role belongs to our client. We handle that data only at the client’s direction and acting exclusively on their behalf. When LiveIntent collects data directly from consumers or obtains data collected by third parties for our own business purposes, we are responsible for how such data is used and shared, and for giving effect to individuals’ privacy legal rights.
All Services may include some amount of “lookalike modeling,” where we use personal information about known purchasers of a product or respondents to an ad to identify individual attributes that indicate a propensity to buy that product or respond to that ad. This allows us to create a profile of the attributes of a person most likely to respond to an ad, which is used to inform who a future ad will go to.
Many of our Services include a component of online behavioral advertising (also called cross-context behavioral advertising) which means that LiveIntent has matched consumer data belonging to our clients with data from other sources in order to better tailor advertising to individual consumers.
We do not
provide Services that include ads with illegal or adult content, nor do we advertise on adult sites or collect data about what adult sites people visit. In fact, your browsing history is only collected from certain websites, so it is never a complete history of all your online activity.
We do not knowingly collect, solicit, or sell personal information from children under 18.
In the event that we learn that we have collected personal information from a child under the age of 18, we will delete it. Our Services are directed to businesses – advertisers and their agencies – and are not directed to children under 18. If you believe that we might have any personal information from a child younger than 18, please contact us as set forth below.
We do not knowingly facilitate any advertising that is exploitative, discriminatory, hateful, deceptive, or abusive
.
We do not allow our data to be used to make impactful decisions about individuals
, such as eligibility for credit, insurance, housing, employment, or education. Our data is used exclusively to match people to ads that may interest them.
The types of data
we use
are the same across all our Services and come from:
(1)
Data you have provided
directly either to LiveIntent, our client (an advertiser or publisher), or another company you authorized to share your data for marketing purposes. This data is usually personal information, and generally includes an email address, but may also include other information, such as your name, street address, and/or the answers to survey questions.
(2)
Data collected indirectly from you
using cookies or other online or mobile technologies that allow us to identify the categories of websites that you visit. Included is personal information about when and where you gave your permission to receive commercial email, your IP address, and visits you made to certain websites or apps. We log these visits to help infer your interests in order to build groups of consumer into audiences that our clients can use to target their marketing campaigns. This data typically does not include direct identifiers (like name and address), but it can still be linked back to you via unique identifiers like a cookie ID, mobile ad ID, or an encrypted version of your email address. We generally only log your visits to categories of websites—we do not track every page you view across the Internet. We collect data related to your activity on our Site, such as time spent on the Site, the website that you came from, and the website to which you exit.
(3)
Data we have obtained from third-party data brokers or data partners
. This may include personal information obtained from public records (like your street address, age, and gender), data about physical locations you have visited in the past (we do not collect real-time precise geolocation data), as well as data relating to purchases, interests, or likely interests that can be derived from a wide variety of sources.
We collect and process data from the following sources
:
You, when you give data directly to one of our websites, affiliated companies, clients, or data-sharing partners;
Publishers who entrust data they have collected from or about you that we use to perform marketing and advertising services for them;
Data that we or others collect using cookies or other online trackers. This data may be associated or linked with other data that identifies you (e.g. email);
Data brokers who supply data obtained from public records, or who resell data obtained from private sources. Data from private sources (like magazine publishers, credit card companies, or retailers) typically has  identifying data removed (like your name and email address) and is linked instead via unique identifiers like a proprietary ID, encrypted email address, a cookie ID, or other indirect identifiers, but in many cases, we are able to link this data to your identifying information.
Data partners who supply data similar to the kinds we obtain from data brokers. The difference between a data broker and a data partner is that we buy or license data from data brokers, but we may exchange data with data partners.
We may send data to the following recipients:
Service providers who perform services for us like web hosting, data security services, auditing, or sending email on our behalf;
Our advertiser and publisher clients who we may share data with or sell data to;
Advertising technology companies and intermediaries;
Data aggregators that provide information, including identifiers and inferences, about individuals;
Companies that we may trade data with for purposes of Online Behavioral Advertising (also called cross-context behavioral advertising; see below); and
Companies with whom we may share data in order to facilitate online behavioral advertising, such as companies who perform cookie matching services, real-time bidding exchanges, supply-side and demand-side platforms, and companies who perform analytics and reporting.
As required to respond to a legal request for information or to protect the rights, interests, or safety of any person.
To a successor or assignee in connection with a corporate change in control such as a merger or acquisition or other transaction.
You will find more details in the sections below describing each of our Services.
SERVICES WHERE LIVEINTENT ACTS ONLY AS A SERVICE PROVIDER
Where we perform Services exclusively as a service provider or data processor, the data that we handle belongs to our client. In most cases this data will be put in LiveIntent’s care by the client in order to use our marketing or identity software and tools. Clients may also ask us to collect data on their behalf through various means, including direct collection from individuals, via cookies or other online tracking mechanisms, or via third-party sources like data brokers. When we collect and process data as a Service, all of the data we collect belongs to our client and is governed by the client’s privacy policy.
Who are LiveIntent’s Clients?
Our clients are companies you interact with every day. Consumer products brands, retailers, financial institutions, travel, dining, and hospitality providers, education providers, healthcare, political advertisers, and others. Sometimes we work with them directly, sometimes we work with advertising agencies who represent many clients of their own. In either case our mission, and the purpose for which we collect, use, and share personal data, is to help these companies use their marketing resources more efficiently by matching offers to the people who are most likely to be interested in them.
SERVICES WHERE LIVEINTENT COLLECTS AND USES DATA ON ITS OWN BEHALF
In addition to acting as a service provider, LiveIntent also collects or obtains and uses personal information on its own behalf. LiveIntent maintains databases where we store data that we have obtained from the different sources described above. Some of these databases also include connections to other third-party sources of data (data brokers and data sharing partners) so that we can get data at or near real time in order to inform specific ad placements. This approach means that we are using the freshest, most up-to-date data we can obtain, and it also reduces the amount of data we need to gather into one place in order to provide our Services. Our proprietary software, machine learning, and AI tie all these sources of data together which enables us to make very complex decisions about which people best fit into various audiences so our clients can serve the most relevant ads.  This is often called online behavioral advertising or cross-context behavioral advertising.
Personal Information We Process
The types of personal information that we collect, from the sources described above, to provide our Services include:
Identifiers,
such as your email address. We may also automatically collect information related to devices used to access our business partners’ emails and websites, such as the your device type, operating system, version, IP address, and technical identifiers such as mobile advertising ID (Apple IDFA or Google AAID, for example). Depending on the service, we may de-identify this information using a mathematical process (commonly known as hashing) to convert the information into a code.
Imprecise Geolocation Information,
such as your IP address (which may indicate your location), ZIP code, city, state, or country. We may also automatically collect information from which we could identify your ZIP code, city, state, or country.
Internet and Electronic Network Activity Information,
such as whether an email sent by one of our business partners has been opened, or whether a link has been clicked in one of those emails. We also collect information about activity on our business partners’ websites, such as the time users spend on the website, from which websites users came, and what other websites users visit.
Commercial Information,
such as whether you purchased a product or service after viewing a related advertisement.  We may collect this information automatically, or this may be provided to us by third-party sources.
Inferences.
We may use the information we collect to generate certain inferences, such as what advertisements may be of interest to you. We may also collect these inferences from third-party sources.
Sensitive Data.
Some privacy laws define certain categories of data as “Sensitive Data.” Depending on the specific law, this category can include government-issued identification numbers, such as US social security numbers or a driver’s license number; genetic data; race/ethnicity; religion; sexual orientation; labor union or political party membership, data about health conditions, or other data that can either be used to commit financial crimes or to expose sensitive details about an individual. For instance, LiveIntent collects and uses data to build audiences around interests in specific health conditions, religion, LGBTQ+, or multicultural or ethnic matters that may constitute Sensitive Data. These types of audiences are built from people who have visited web pages with related content where LiveIntent tracking technologies are in use, or who subscribe to our clients’ newsletters on specific interests.  Some privacy laws require prior consent to collect Sensitive Data, and LiveIntent does not collect this type of data from residents who live in those places. Anyone may opt out of our use of their Sensitive Data at any time by visiting our
Privacy Choices
page.
We also combine, de-identify, or aggregate any of the information we collect through our Services for any of the purposes described below. We also receive de-identified information from our business partners.
Purposes for Processing Personal Information
We and our business partners use the personal information we collect to deliver personalized messages that match your interests, including interest-based advertising to efficiently distribute email publications; to customize user experiences when they use our advertising partners’ services; to generate and analyze statistics about the performance of marketing campaigns and improve their performance over time; and when necessary to (a) protect the integrity of the Services, or your safety or the safety of others, or (b) to detect, prevent, or respond to fraud, intellectual property infringement, violation of terms of use related to the Service, or violations of law.
Where a business partner has allowed us to use personal information for our own purposes, we use it to provide the Services, such as to facilitate the delivery of and reporting on personalized messages and targeted advertising; to troubleshoot and secure the Services and our systems; to enhance existing offerings, such as identifying browsers and devices accessing various digital platforms and develop new ones; and to deliver and improve the Services and the Identity Service.
We may also use the data that we hold on a temporary, limited basis to evaluate potential data sharing partners, meaning that we might share your data as part of a sample of our data for a limited time to be used in a test environment with another company to evaluate the effectiveness of each company’s services. When we do one of these evaluations, it is subject to appropriate contractual terms that include that the company we are evaluating may not do anything else with the data and must delete any data that we share with them at the end of the evaluation period.
Bases for Processing
Certain jurisdictions, including the European Union, have laws that require us to have a “legal basis” to process your personal information. Where required by applicable law, we rely on one of the following legal bases to justify our processing of your personal information:
to fulfill our contractual obligations, for example the contracts we have with our clients, and only to the extent permitted by those contracts;
to comply with our legal obligations, for example to respond to legally binding requests from regulators, law enforcement authorities, or other government authorities;
to meet our legitimate interests, for example to understand how you use the Sites and to enable us to derive knowledge that enables us to develop new Offerings. When we process personal information to meet our legitimate interests, we put in place safeguards to protect your privacy and to determine that our legitimate interests are not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms; and
to exercise our legal rights where it is necessary to do so, for example to detect, prevent and respond to fraud claims, intellectual property infringement claims, or other violations of law.
We may obtain your consent to collect and use certain types of personal information when we are required to do so by law. If we ask for your consent to process your personal information, you may withdraw, where permitted by law, your consent by contacting us using the details at the end of this Privacy Policy.
Opting-out of Online Behavioral Advertising and Data Collection
Go to https://privacy.liveintent.com to opt out of interest-based advertising from LiveIntent.
To learn more about Online Behavioral Advertising (also called interest-based advertising or cross-context behavioral advertising), analytics services and your choices, including how to opt-out of some interest based advertising, visit:
https://www.youronlinechoices.com
,
https://youronlinechoices.eu/
,
the DAA Consumer Opt-Out Page
,
NAI Consumer Opt-Out Page
and
Google’s information page
.
If you opt-out of interest-based advertising with LiveIntent, then we will opt you out for all the identifiers or devices that we have associated with you at the time of the opt-out request. We use a predictive process to associate identifiers and devices and do not know definitively all devices or browsers that you may use, so that process is not guaranteed to be error free. If you want to be completely thorough, we recommend that you use this opt-out process for each device and browser you use.
Browser-Based “Do Not Track” Mechanisms and the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”)
LiveIntent does not currently process browser-based “Do Not Track” signals, largely because they are not currently supported by the most popular browsers that are used by the vast majority of users, however, if and when these DNT mechanisms come into widespread use, LiveIntent will support them to the extent required by applicable laws.  LiveIntent’s website does recognize the Global Privacy Control (“GPC”) feature.  Please note, however, that this only applies to  information that would be collected on LiveIntent’s website.
YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
Privacy laws around the world give individuals different versions of the rights described below. LiveIntent allows any person to exercise the following rights no matter where they live. LiveIntent will not discriminate against you for exercising your privacy rights. Prior to fulfilling a request for a copy of your personal information, LiveIntent is required to reasonably verify your identity, which we generally do by sending a verification link to the email address associated with your personal information. Under applicable laws, you can use an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf, but that agent must be able to complete our verification process in order to demonstrate that they have been authorized to make the request.
To exercise your rights
with respect to your personal information in LiveIntent’s databases, please visit our privacy center
here
. If you make a request, we will normally respond within 30 days if you live in Europe or Canada, or 45 days if you live elsewhere. However, if we are experiencing a high volume of requests or if your request is more complex, we may take up to 90 days to respond.
Data Access / Portability
– you can request a copy of  that we hold in a human-readable form. Note that some of the personal information that we process is not ordinarily maintained in a human-readable form, and that privacy laws generally do not require companies to convert personal information to become human-readable for the purpose of responding to an access request.
Correction
—you can ask us to correct personal information that we hold about you if it is inaccurate. In many cases we do not have the technical ability to change the personal information in our database, and so will delete the incorrect data instead.
Data Deletion
—you can ask us to delete your personal information. As allowed by applicable laws, there may be some cases where we will decline requests for deletion, but these are rare cases. We may also delete the personal information contained in a profile and retain anonymized data that cannot be linked back to you or used to identify you. In the very unlikely case that we refuse your request, you can appeal that decision by contacting privacy@liveintent.com for a review of your case.
Objection / Restricting Processing
–in some US states and countries you have a legal right to object to processing of your personal information, or to ask that such processing be restricted. To keep things simple, if you wish to exercise these rights, please request to have your data deleted—our systems cannot process partial opt-outs.
Opt-Out of our use of Sensitive Data
–you can ask LiveIntent not to use Sensitive Data that relates to you. In order to keep things simple, we will treat these requests as Data Deletion requests (see above).
Opt-Out of Receiving Email from LiveIntent
–you can ask to be added to our global email suppression list so that we won’t send any more commercial emails to the email address you opt out.
Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Data
-you can request that we do not make your personal information available to our clients for their own use. If you select this option, we may still use your personal information for internal analysis, or to send advertisements to you.
You also have the right in many countries to contact a privacy or data protection authority if you believe we are not complying with privacy laws, and we have not been able to resolve the situation to your satisfaction. Many countries have a dedicated privacy / data protection authority; in the United States you can make a complaint to the U.S. Federal Trade Commission or your state Attorney General.
Statistics on Exercise of Privacy Rights during 2024
We are required by law to publish statistics on how many people exercised their privacy rights in the previous year. Because our mechanism for honoring privacy rights with respect to cookie-linked data operates in real time as an automated conversation between your browser and our server, we are not able to provide statistics on the number of people who use it. The following statistics are for 2024.
Number of requests for access to (copy of) personal information: 304
Number of these requests that were not actioned because the requestor did not complete the verification process: 0
Number of requests for personal information deletion: 91,146
Number of these requests that were not actioned because the requestor did not complete the verification process: 0
Number of requests for opt-out (Do Not Sell): 156,749
Number of these requests that were not actioned because the requestor did not complete the verification process: 0
WHERE WE PROCESS DATA
LiveIntent is headquartered in the United States, and the majority of our Services are performed in the United States and Canada with technical support provided by LiveIntent staff in United States, Europe, India and/or the Philippines. When you provide data to LiveIntent, you consent to its processing in any of our other locations around the world.
HOW LONG WE KEEP DATA
We keep data only for the period of time needed in order to achieve our stated purposes—i.e. to match people with the audiences that correspond with their interests. Different data is therefore needed for different lengths of time. If you have given us data and permission to market through one of our websites or a partner website, we may continue to use some version of your data for marketing purposes until you revoke your consent / opt out. Certain data, like your contact information, we will keep as long as it is current. Data linked to a device like a smartphone will be maintained for as long as we detect that device on websites or using mobile apps on a regular basis. But data relating to your interests needs to be current to be useful to us, so we are constantly refreshing such data and rely only on the past six months’ data to inform our marketing choices. Data that is years old is generally not useful to us because it is a poor indicator of your current interests.
LiveIntent only keeps personal information in a form that can identify your computer or device for 180 days.
DATA SECURITY and PRIVACY BY DESIGN
LiveIntent uses commercially reasonable, industry standard practices to protect data and personal information. These include technical, physical, and organizational controls designed to prevent loss or unauthorized access to data. Our security measures are audited every year by an independent third party, and we are constantly evolving our approach to security to keep pace with emerging threats.
LiveIntent also follows the practice of “Privacy by Design,” meaning that we consider the privacy implications of our products and Services and ensure that they are built to standards that align to privacy requirements and enable privacy rights around the world.
HOW TO CONTACT LIVEINTENT’S PRIVACY PERSONNEL
You can reach LiveIntent by emailing 1 World Trade Center, Suite 45A, New York, NY, 10007
CHANGES TO THIS POLICY STATEMENT
We reserve the right to amend this policy statement from time to time. The effective date of the current version will be posted on the top of the page.
Sub-policy 5
https://www.crazyegg.com/privacy:
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy
Cookie Policy
Opt Out
Privacy Policy
Last Updated:
January 6, 2025
This Privacy Policy describes the privacy practices of Crazy Egg, Inc. (“Crazy Egg”, “we”, “us”, “our”) on our websites located at the domains crazyegg.com, crazyeggvcr.com, and crazyeggproxy.com, as well as such other websites or mobile applications that we own or operate (individually and collectively, “Our Website” or the “Crazy Egg Website”).
Scope of this Privacy Policy
As further discussed, below, data protection laws, regulations, and directives in certain jurisdictions distinguish between the rights and responsibilities of “Controller(s)” of personal information or data (“Information”), from those who are “Processor(s)” of such Information or data on the applicable controllers’ behalf. Crazy Egg is generally the controller of Information that it collects from and about the persons and entities who are visiting Our Website (“Crazy Egg Visitors”), and this Privacy Policy applies to Crazy Egg Visitors.
We also provide certain services to commercial persons and entities (each, a “Client” and collectively, “Clients”), who, in turn, own and operate their own websites or mobile applications (“Client Site(s)”), and who wish to utilize our code, software and services and reports (the “Service(s)”) to analyze how third party visitors to their Client Sites (“Client Site Visitor(s)”) use, interact with, and engage their Client Sites. The applicable Clients are the Controllers of Information collected from their Client Site Visitors, whether or not such information is accessed, analyzed, or otherwise utilized by or on behalf of the Client via the Service (“Client Visitor Information”); Crazy Egg is not the Controller of such Client Visitor Information. This Privacy Policy applies to the use of Services by our Clients. However, this Privacy Policy does not apply to the Client Sites themselves, nor to any Client Visitor Information. For any questions regarding the privacy, security, or other practices or policies on the Client Sites, please contact the applicable Client.
Information Collected from Crazy Egg Visitors
Device Information from Crazy Egg Visitors
We may receive and collect certain Information furnished by the visitor's browser or otherwise by their access device (“Device Information”), such as:
Browser Information
Operating System Information
Mobile Device Information (e.g., device identifier, mobile operating system, etc.)
IP address (stored in anonymized form)
Page Accessed
Geographic Location
Time of visit (by day, week, and duration)
Whether the visitor is a new or return visitor
Other such Information as may be delivered or shared by the applicable browser or access software or device.
Referral Information
We may also receive certain information regarding visitors from the prior website visited by such visitors (“Referral Information”). For instance, if a Crazy Egg Visitor navigates to the Crazy Egg Website from another website, Crazy Egg may receive certain information from the referring website (i.e., the last website the visitor visited before visiting the Crazy Egg Website) as part of the Hypertext Transfer Protocol ("HTTP") request. For example, if a Crazy Egg Visitor navigates to the Crazy Egg Website from a search engine, Crazy Egg may receive information contained in the referring URL for the applicable search query, such as the terms the Crazy Egg Visitor was searching for before visiting the Crazy Egg Website.
Registration Information from Crazy Egg Clients
When Crazy Egg Visitors register as Clients to use the Crazy Egg Service, register to use a trial version of the Crazy Egg Service, or request additional information about Crazy Egg, Crazy Egg may require Information, such as name, employer or company name, e-mail, mailing address, phone number, financial information (e.g., credit card number, billing address), and/or proposed Client Site to be tracked, to process the registration or request ("Client Registration Information").
Session Recording Information
We may use session recording software on the Crazy Egg Website. This software enables us to record Crazy Egg Visitors’ use, interaction, and engagement with the Crazy Egg Website. This software may capture user input, such as mouse and keyboard inputs and mobile gestures, and user views, such as browser or screen output. We use this software to help us optimize Crazy Egg Visitors’ experience. By using the Crazy Egg Website, you consent to our use of session recording software.
Crazy Egg’s Use of Crazy Egg Visitor Information
Crazy Egg may use Information of Crazy Egg Visitors, including Device Information and Referral Information of Crazy Egg Visitors and Client Registration Information, to:
authenticate Client’s access to the Crazy Egg Site, trial versions, or Service;
process and fulfill Client requests or purchases;
register Client accounts;
check the Crazy Egg Visitor’s qualifications for registration and/or to bill Crazy Egg Clients for the Services.
Crazy Egg may also use Client Information to:
provide Crazy Egg's products and Services, personalize and tailor your experience on the Crazy Egg Website;
operate our business;
understand how Clients are engaging with Crazy Egg Website and Service;
request additional information necessary to process or fulfill an order;
assess Client satisfaction with the Crazy Egg Service;
inform Clients that an upgrade is available; or to contact Clients with information about Crazy Egg, including information about new or existing products and services or special offers. For example, we may periodically send promotional materials or notifications related to our products and Services to the email address associated with a registered account.
Otherwise for our legitimate business interests.
If Information is aggregated or de-identified so it is no longer reasonably associated with an identified or identifiable natural person, Crazy Egg may use it for any business purpose. To the extent Information is associated with an identified or identifiable natural person and is protected as personal data under applicable data protection law, it is referred to in this Privacy Policy as “Personal Data”.
Use of Cookies by the Service
As described in our Cookie Policy, the Service may utilize first-party cookies (small text files that Crazy Egg stores locally on a Client Site Visitor’s device) on Client Sites for one or more of the following purposes: to help identify whether a Client Site Visitor is a first time visitor, or has visited previously (provided that we will not store identifiers that can be used to personally identify such Client Site Visitors); assess usage patterns and perform traffic analysis; identify preferences; diagnose problems with our Service; analyze trends; and otherwise administer Crazy Egg products and services. Cookies placed by Crazy Egg on the computers of Client Site Visitors do not include Personally Identifiable Information such as name, phone number, e-mail address or mailing address, nor does Crazy Egg link cookies to such Personally Identifiable Information on our servers or databases.
For further information on our use of cookies, please see our Cookie Policy, which is incorporated in this Privacy Policy by this reference.
Information Collected by or on Behalf of Our Clients via the Service
Crazy Egg Clients use the Service to obtain information regarding how Client Site Visitors to their Client Sites are interacting with such Client Sites. This Service allows a Crazy Egg Client to evaluate and potentially modify its Client Site based on its findings regarding Client Site Visitors use and interaction with the Client Site.
Types of Client Visitor Information. Crazy Egg Clients may use the Service to collect, store, and analyze Client Visitor Information, on the Client’s behalf as the Controller of such Client Visitor Information, on Crazy Egg's servers, as the Client’s Processor of such Client Visitor Information. Such Client Visitor Information is transmitted in encrypted form, and pursuant to applicable data transfer provisions further described below. The Service may process such Client Visitor Information on behalf of the Client, to perform analyses and produce reports for the Crazy Egg Client. The interactions that may be recorded or analyzed (“Recorded Interactions”) may include mouse scrolls and clicks by a Client Site Visitor; and/or pages viewed or visited by a Client Site Visitor, including the duration of such visits. Recorded Interactions may also include images of the Client Site that are recorded during the Client Site Visitor’s interactions with such Client Site, such as, by way of example, images of forms displayed or populated by the Client Site Visitor on the Client Site, or other multimedia content that may be posted by Client Site Visitors. Such Client Visitor Information may also include Device Information and/or Referral Information from the Client Site Visitor. Client Visitor Information is provided to Clients in the form of aggregated reports and/or statistics that identify the collective behavior of Client Visitors to the Client's Site. Clients will also have access to Recorded Interactions through the Service.
Our Processing of Client Visitor Information.
As the Processor of Client Visitor Information, we will process Client Visitor Information only in compliance with the applicable Client’s instructions regarding the processing of Client Visitor Information, including any applicable
terms
, but subject to applicable laws and regulations regarding such Client Visitor Information, and as otherwise required by applicable law and regulations.
Crazy Egg Disclaimers Regarding Personally Identifying Information of Client Site Visitors.
Crazy Egg's Service is not designed to knowingly collect or extract from Client Visitor Information (including any Recorded Interactions or Device Information received from Client Sites through the Service) information that could be used to personally identify Client Site Visitors, such as a Client Site Visitor’s name, address or phone number ("Personally Identifiable Information") when a Client Site Visitor visits a Client Site that uses the Crazy Egg Service. Crazy Egg also generally prohibits Clients from collecting Personally Identifiable Information using the Service or otherwise providing Personally Identifiable Information of Client Site Visitors to Crazy Egg in connection with the Service.
Crazy Egg Does Not Collect Visitor Information Across Multiple Sites
Crazy Egg does not collect or aggregate information about visitor behavior on multiple, different websites.
Retention and Deletion of Client Visitor Information.
Crazy Egg will retain Client Visitor Information in accordance with the applicable Client’s instructions, including any applicable
terms
and as required by applicable law. Client agrees and acknowledges that the deletion of Client Visitor Information may affect the delivery or performance of the Service. Crazy Egg will comply with such instructions to delete Client Visitor Information as soon as reasonably practicable and within a maximum period of 180 days, unless applicable laws require retention or earlier deletion. Crazy Egg may retain Client Registration Information as long as necessary for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy and the other
terms
. This may include keeping Client Registration Information after the account has been deactivated as needed for Crazy Egg to pursue legitimate business interests, record keeping procedures, legal compliance, preservation of rights, security purposes, and enforcement of legal and contractual rights.
Client agrees and acknowledges that it will be responsible for exporting any Client Visitor Information or Client Registration Information that it wishes to retain following the termination of the
terms
Crazy Egg's Sharing and Disclosure of Crazy Egg Visitor Information and Client Visitor Information.
This section describes the manner and extent to which Crazy Egg may share and disclose Information. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary below or elsewhere herein, as between a Client and Crazy Egg, the Client is solely responsible for its policies and practices for the sharing and disclosure of Client Visitor Information as the Controller of such Information.
Crazy Egg’s Default Policy Regarding Sharing of Client Visitor Information.
Except to the limited extent described otherwise in this Privacy Policy, Crazy Egg never sells or shares any Client Visitor Information with individuals or companies other than the specific Client from whose Client Site Crazy Egg collected the Client Visitor Information.
Crazy Egg’s Default Policy Regarding Sharing of Client’s Personally Identifiable Information.
With the exception of the limited circumstances discussed elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, Crazy Egg does not provide Clients' Personally Identifiable Information to third parties for any purpose.
Disclosure Pursuant to the Client’s Instructions.
Crazy Egg will share and disclose Client Visitor Information in accordance with the applicable Client’s instructions, including any applicable
Terms
, and otherwise in compliance with but subject to applicable laws and regulations.
Subprocessors.
We may utilize affiliates or third parties as subprocessors of the Information, to support the Services, and otherwise to support the conduct of our business, to provide, by way of example, service such as computing and storage services. We will use subprocessors subject to contracts that are substantially as protective of Personally Identifiable Information as those contained herein, and, to the extent applicable, in compliance with Article 28(3) of the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation. For further information regarding our use of subprocessors, please contact us at privacy@crazyegg.com.
Our Affiliates.
We may share Information hereunder with our corporate affiliates provided that such affiliates are obligated, contractually or otherwise under applicable laws, to be bound by our obligations with respect to such Information.
Change of Control.
If Crazy Egg, or substantially all of its assets, is acquired by another company or successor entity, the Information hereunder will be one of the assets transferred or acquired by the purchaser or successor. You acknowledge that such transfers may occur, and that any purchaser of or successor to Crazy Egg or its assets may continue to collect, use and disclose your Information as set forth in this policy.
Payment Processors.
Like many companies that accept payment by credit card, Crazy Egg relies on third-party payment processors to process financial payments. When you make payments to Crazy Egg to obtain or use Crazy Egg's products or services, Crazy Egg may share Personally Identifiable Information, such as your name, address, and credit card information, with qualified third parties in order to process your order.
Law Enforcement/Legal Process.
Crazy Egg reserves the right to disclose any Information (including Personally Identifiable Information): (1) to comply with any law, regulation, or legal request, if and to the extent that we reasonably believe disclosure is in accordance with or required by any applicable law, regulation or legal process; (2) to enforce, apply, or investigate breaches of the
Terms
or other agreements; or (3) protect the rights, property, user experience, or safety of Crazy Egg, our employees, our users, our Clients, or others.
Aggregated, Anonymized, Pseudonymized, or De-identified Information.
We may disclose or use aggregated, anonymized, pseudonymized, or otherwise de-identified Information for any purpose.
Transfer of Data Abroad; International Users.
Our Website is directed to visitors from the United States of America. If you are visiting Our Website or a Client Site from a country other than the United States of America the various communications will necessarily result in the transfer of information across international boundaries. By visiting Our Website or the Client Site, as applicable, you consent to the processing and transfer of your data as set out in this Privacy Policy. By using Our Website or the Client Site, as applicable, you consent to the collection, storage, processing, and transfer of your information in and to the United States, or other countries and territories, pursuant to the laws of the United States.
If we are asked by a Client to transfer Personally Identifying Information from a Client Site in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), Switzerland, or the United Kingdom to other countries not deemed to have adequate data protection regulations under applicable data protection law, we will offer to enter into the European Union Model Clauses, also known as Standard Contractual Clauses, or such other equivalent clauses issued by the applicable country, with the Client. To request to enter into such clauses, please contact us at privacy@crazyegg.com.
Security and Protection of Visitor Information and Client Information
Crazy Egg implements security mechanisms to protect Visitor Information and Client Information from loss, misuse and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration and destruction. Examples of these security mechanisms include limited and password-protected access, firewalls, and SSL encryption to protect transmission of data, as further described above and in our
Terms of Use
. For additional questions or information regarding our security standards, please contact us at privacy@crazyegg.com.
Policy Concerning Children Under Age of 16
Crazy Egg does not knowingly or intentionally collect Personally Identifiable Information from children under 16. If we learn that we have Personally Identifiable Information of a child under age 16, we will remove it. If you believe we have Personally Identifiable Information about a child under the age of 16, please notify us at privacy@crazyegg.com.
Changes to Our Privacy Policy
Crazy Egg retains the discretion to amend or modify this policy from time to time. Use and disclosure of Information we obtain is subject to the later of: (1) the policy in effect at the time such visitor Information or Client Information is collected or (2) any subsequent policy to which you agree or of which you have notice, if you elect to use Crazy Egg or a Crazy Egg Client Site (including the Crazy Egg Website) following such acceptance or notice. If we make material changes in the way we use or disclose Personally Identifiable Information, we will notify you through one or more of the following means: a direct communication to your Crazy Egg account, a communication to the e-mail address associated with your account, or a clear and prominent announcement on the Crazy Egg Website. Your continued access to or use of Crazy Egg or websites that use Crazy Egg following notice of material changes to this Privacy Policy shall constitute consent to any amendments and/or modifications.
For More Information / Your Information Rights
Privacy Officer / Notices.
Crazy Egg welcomes any questions or comments about this Privacy Policy or our privacy practices, including regarding any disclosure of third party information for direct marketing purposes. Any such comments or questions should be submitted via e-mail to: privacy@crazyegg.com.
Access to Personally Identifiable Information or other Information Stored at Crazy Egg
At any time, a Crazy Egg Client or Crazy Egg Visitor may access and/or modify their Personally Identifiable Information or other Information stored by Crazy Egg on their behalf, to enable them to access, rectify and restrict processing of their respective Information, and allow them to export their Information, by accessing their Crazy Egg account and contacting us at privacy@crazyegg.com.
California Information Rights.
Under California Civil Code Section 1798.83 (the “Shine the Light” law), California residents who provide personal information in obtaining products or services for personal, family or household use are entitled to request and obtain from us once per calendar year certain disclosures about the personal information we shared, if any, with other businesses for their own direct marketing uses. If applicable, this information would include the categories of personal information, and the names and addresses of those businesses with which we shared personal information, for the immediately prior calendar year (e.g. requests made in 2019 will receive information regarding 2019 sharing activities). To make such a request, please send an email to privacy@crazyegg.com with a subject line of “Request for California Privacy Information.” Please be aware that not all information sharing is covered by the “Shine the Light” requirements and only information on covered sharing will be included in our response.
Do-Not-Track Signals
Some web browsers may transmit “do-not-track” signals to the websites with which the user communicates. Because of differences in how web browsers incorporate and activate this feature, it is not always clear whether users intend for these signals to be transmitted, or whether they even are aware of them. Our practices with respect to such signals are set forth in
https://www.crazyegg.com/opt-out
.
Manage my cookie preferences
Edit preferences
close modal
This website uses cookies
We use cookies to provide a tailored experience on Crazy Egg.
Customize your cookies
We use cookies to provide a tailored experience on Crazy Egg.
Essential cookies
toggle marketing cookie consent
Cookies that are essential to the use and operation of our website and services.
Marketing and advertising
toggle marketing cookie consent
Cookies that are used by Crazy Egg to better understand the types of individuals who are interested in our products and services and how we can promote those services based on that information.
Analytics
toggle analytics cookie consent
Cookies that help us understand how visitors engage with our website, such as usage statistics, or to reconstruct viewed UI elements in order to improve our services.
Accept cookies
Edit cookies
Save preferences
Cancel
Opt out
Privacy policy
Cookie policy
Sub-policy 6
https://www.optimizely.com/legal/privacy-policy/:
Privacy notice
V 2024-02. Published 12 February 2024
This Privacy Notice explains how information about you, that directly identifies you, or that makes you identifiable (“
personal information
” (also referred to as “
personal data
” in some jurisdictions)) is collected, used, disclosed, and otherwise processed by Optimizely. This Privacy Notice replaced Optimizely’s former Privacy Policy.
SUMMARY
Who Collects And Processes Your Personal Information?
Optimizely does, in the form of the respective legal entity, entity of the global group of the Optimizely group of companies. The Optimizely Privacy Notice describes in detail which processing activities of which Optimizely group entity apply.
What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect?
Optimizely may collect various types of personal information about you when conducting its business, including (but not limited to):
personal contact information,
personal information related to your or your employer’s business relationship with Optimizely,
personal information Optimizely must collect due to legal- and compliance-related purposes,
personal usage, registration, and participation data which Optimizely may generate through your use of its web and online offerings,
special categories of personal information,
application-related personal information,
personal information which Optimizely may receive from third parties,
personal information Optimizely requires to ensure your or your employer’s satisfaction with our products, services and offerings.
The purposes Optimizely collects Your Personal Information?
Optimizely processes your personal information to:
pursue its business relationships with you, your employer, or your employer’s customers, including ensuring your satisfaction with and keeping you up to date on the latest news about our products and services,
develop and offer you its software products, cloud and other services,
protect the quality and safety of its premises, facilities, products or services,
secure and, if necessary, defend its protected legal assets against unlawful attacks, assert our rights or defend Optimizely against legal claims,
ensure compliance with statutory laws and regulations applicable to Optimizely,
operate Optimizely’s Internet pages, web offerings, or other online events including analyzing the behaviour of the users, enabling you to create a user profile, benefit from an identity service and to promote and continuously improve your user experience,
search you as a potential talent for Optimizely,
transfer it to recipients like other entities of the Optimizely Group, third-party service providers, Optimizely partners and others.
Rights of Access, Correction & Return
. You have the right to request from Optimizely access to, correction of, and/or the return or the deletion of your personal information. You may request from Optimizely to restrict the access to your personal information or to exclude it from further processing. You may revoke a once given consent or object to processing activities which Optimizely may intend to pursue in a given case. When you believe that Optimizely was processing your personal information not in accordance with this Privacy Notice or under breach of applicable personal information protection laws, you have the right to lodge a complaint with a relevant supervisory authority. The Privacy Notice describes each of these rights in detail, including how you can reach us to exercise any of these rights against Optimizely and how to identify, if necessary, the relevant personal information protection authority.
Country Specific Disclosures
. In
Schedule I
, Optimizely addresses several country specific aspects that must be explained in a privacy Notice under relevant country laws. The country-specific requirements include, but is not limited to those, from the EU and EEA, the United States of America (and specifically, the State of California) and the United Kingdom.
Intranet Sites.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to Optimizely internet-pages or web-services which present their own privacy Notice – (for example, at Optimizely Careers).
Learn More
. This summary does not replace or supersede the detailed explanations in the Optimizely Privacy Notice. In case of any doubt, please always refer to the relevant passage in the actual full Notice below. If you want to learn more about each of these purposes for which Optimizely may collect, transfer, and use your personal information, including for how long your personal information is being retained, please refer to the full Privacy Notice below.
______________________________
Definitions.
When we use -
“Optimizely”, “Optimizely Group”, “we”, “us”, or “our” in this Privacy Notice - we are referring to Optimizely North America Inc. and Optimizely AB and their respective affiliates. And “Local Optimizely’ means an applicable Optimizely Group company.
“Service” - we are referring to any of the services and product offerings that we offer as a controller, our websites
https://www.optimizely.com
and https://world.optimizely.com, or any other Optimizely Group product or service that posts or links to this Privacy Notice. Servicesmay include any of Optimizely’s on-prem and cloud software products, web services, apps, online-forums, webinars and events, non-marketing related newsletters, white papers, tutorials, trainings, as well as other offerings like contests or sweepstakes.
“personal information”, we are also referring to personal information and personally
identifiable information
Optimizely as a Data Controller
: This Privacy Notice applies only where Optimizely is the “data controller” (or similar term under applicable laws) and is responsible for and controls the processing of your personal information collected by Optimizely for Optimizely through your use of our Services.
Optimizely as a Data Processor
: In providing our Services, our customers may collect and process data in their utilisation of Services (“
Customer Data
”), or we may collect such data on their behalf, which may in either case include the personal information of our customers’ authorized users. Here, Optimizely is a “data processor” (or similar term under applicable laws), and we have contractually committed ourselves to our customers (typically in the form of our Software Subscription Agreement, and data processing agreement) to process that Customer Data (and personal information) under the instruction of the respective client, who is the data controller in these cases. As such, this Privacy Notice does not apply to the processing of Customer Data (including personal information), and we recommend you read the privacy notice of the respective client if their processing concerns your personal information.
Table of Contents
For What Purposes Does Optimizely Use Your Personal Information
What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect And Use, And How To We Collect It
How Long Will Your Personal Information Be Stored & Used by Optimizely
Who May Optimizely Share Your Personal Information
Your Control of Your Personal Information
Your Control of Our Marketing Messages
How Can You Exercise Your Rights of Control?
Children
Region-specific Disclosures
Third Party Websites And Services
EU-US Data Privacy Framework
Changes To This Privacy Notice
Contact Us
Region and Country Specific Disclosures
1. For What Purposes Does Optimizely Use Your Personal Information
.
When conducting business and operating our various web presences and other communication channels, Optimizely collects limited personal information of the people it interacts with, including customers, partners, suppliers, vendors, candidates, and any other people with whom we interact. In any of these cases, Optimizely may use this personal information for one or more of the following business purposes:
To pursue business relationships with customers, partners, and others.
Optimizely may use personal information to pursue its business relationships with customers, partners, and other users to fulfill pre-contractual and contractual business relations. This may include satisfying requests, processing orders, delivering an ordered product or service, or engaging in any other relevant action to establish, fulfill and maintain our business relationships. When you purchase or intend to purchase Services from Optimizely on behalf of a corporate customer or are otherwise associated as contact person for the business relationship between Optimizely and a corporate customer or partner, Optimizely will use your personal information for this purpose. More specifically, Optimizely may use your personal information to confirm your opening of an account, manage the contract execution, send you disclosures as may be required by law, notice of payments, and other information about our products and services. Optimizely may respond to related inquiries, provide you with necessary support and process your feedback. In the context of your or your employers use of our Services, Optimizely may communicate with you by post, email, live chat, contact forms, phone or any other medium to resolve your, a user’s, or a customer’s question or complaint or to investigate suspicious transactions. In case of telephone calls or chat sessions, Optimizely may record such calls or chat sessions to improve the quality of Optimizely’s services after informing you accordingly during that call and, subject to applicable law, receiving your prior consent before the recording begins.
Customer Satisfaction
- Within an existing business relationship between you or your employer and Optimizely, Optimizely may use your personal information to help us understand how satisfied you are with the functionality and quality of our Services, to provide you with relevant information on our latest product announcements, software updates or upgrades, events, special offers, and other information about Optimizely’s Services that is relevant and useful to you.
To develop our Services.
To the extent permitted by applicable law, Optimizely may process your personal information for internal research, technological demonstration and development, and to help Optimizely create, develop, operate, deliver, improve, upgrade or enhance Optimizely’s products and services. Optimizely may process personal information to create anonymized data sets which may then be used to improve Optimizely’s Services.
To ensure legal compliance
.
Optimizely processes personal information to comply with statutory obligations. This includes Optimizely’s compliance with applicable export laws, trade sanctions and embargoes of various countries including, without limitation, those of the European Union and its member states, and of the United States of America. Optimizely may use personal information to the extent necessary to comply with these legal requirements. Specifically, Optimizely may use personal information to conduct automated checks against applicable sanctioned-party lists, to regularly repeat such checks whenever a sanctioned-party list is updated or when a user updates his or her information. In case of a potential match, Optimizely will block access to Optimizely’s services and systems and contact the user to confirm his or her identity. If necessary, Optimizely uses personal information to prevent or prosecute criminal activities such as any form of cybercrime, the illegal use of our products and services or fraud, to assert our rights or defend Optimizely against legal claims. To comply with data protection and unfair competition law related requirements. Depending on the country in which the relevant Optimizely Group company operates, and whether you have expressly consented to or opted out of receiving commercial information, Optimizely may process personal information necessary to accommodate your data protection and privacy choices for the receipt of such information and, when necessary to ensure compliance, exchange such information with the other entities of the Optimizely Group.
Technical and Organizational Security
.
Optimizely may use your personal information for the purpose of ensuring an adequate level of technical and organizational security of Optimizely's products, services, online events, facilities, and premises. Optimizely may take the measures necessary to verify or maintain the quality and safety of a product or service which is owned, manufactured by or for, or controlled by Optimizely. This may comprise the use of personal information for sufficient identification and authorization of designated users, internal quality control through auditing, analysis, and research, debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing or intended functionality, account and network security, replication for loss prevention, detecting security incidents, protection against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecuting those responsible for such kind of activity. We may further process your name, likeness, and other contact or compliance related data when you visit an Optimizely Group office in the context of access management and video surveillance to protect the security and safety of our locations and assets.
To operate Optimizely internet pages, web-offerings, or other online events
.
Optimizely may use your personal information for the purpose of operating, providing to you and administering your use of Optimizely’s internet pages, web offerings, or other online events. This includes the following -
Creating user profiles
. Certain web offerings linked to Optimizely’s websites, including forums, blogs, and networks (for example @ https://world.optimizely.com), require you to register and create a user profile. Through the user profile you can share personal information about you with other users, such as your name, photo, social media accounts, postal or email address, telephone number, personal interests, skills, and basic information about your company. The user profiles serve to personalize the interactions between the users (for example, by way of messaging or follow functionality) and to allow Optimizely to foster the collaboration and quality of communication through such offerings. The profile settings of the relevant web offering allow you to determine which information you want to share.
Identity service
.
The user profile may be specific to a single web offering of Optimizely, but it also allows you to access other web offerings of Optimizely or of other entities of the Optimizely Group. It is your choice whether or not to use any of these additional web offerings. If you do, Optimizely will make your personal information available to such other web offerings to provide you with initial access. Kindly note that without your consent for Optimizely to create such user profiles, Optimizely will not be able to offer such services to you where your consent is a statutory requirement that Optimizely can provide these services to you.
Event profiling
. If you register for an event, seminar, or webinar of Optimizely, Optimizely may share basic participant information (your name, company, and email address) with other participants of the same event, seminar, or webinar to promote the interaction between the participants and to stimulate the communication and the exchange of ideas.
User experience improvement
. Optimizely processes information that relates to your visit to our web offerings to improve your user experience, identify your individual demand and to personalize the way we provide you with the information you are looking for. For this purpose, we collect information regardless of whether you register with a user profile or not.
Cookies and similar tools
. We and our third-party providers may use (i) cookies or small data files that are stored on an individual’s computer and (ii) other, related technologies, such as web beacons, pixels, embedded scripts, location-identifying technologies and logging technologies (collectively, “cookies”) to automatically collect this personal information. For more information about these practices and your choices regarding cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
To Recruit.
Optimizely is collecting and using personal information of qualified individuals and people interested in our career opportunities from various sources. Job applicants and candidates are asked to apply via Optimizely’s Careers Portal, regardless of whether this is done initiatively or in response to an advertised posting. Optimizely collects personal information by means of the Careers Portal for the purposes of carrying out the application procedures and selecting applicants. You may find further information about how Optimizely collects and uses applicant’s personal information in the privacy notice specific to the Optimizely careers websites and portals.
To offer Optimizely’ Services
.
Optimizely collects and processes personal information for sales and marketing purposes. We aim to keep you updated on upcoming events and Optimizely’s latest products and services. If possible, we may contact you to discuss further your interest in Optimizely services and offerings. This sales and marketing purposes includes the following -
Request feedback, questionnaires and surveys
. To the extent allowed by applicable law, Optimizely may contact you for feedback regarding the improvement of the relevant material, product, or service. Optimizely may also invite you to participate in questionnaires and surveys. These will generally be designed so you can participate without having to provide information that identifies you as a participant. If you nonetheless provide your personal information, Optimizely will use it for the purpose stated in the questionnaire or survey or to improve its products and services.
To keep you up to date
.
Within an existing business relationship between you or your employer and Optimizely, Optimizely may use your personal information to inform you about Optimizely products or services which are similar or relate to products and services you or your employer have already purchased or used. Optimizely will inform you by email or phone about such news only as far as it is allowed by law, or if Optimizely has collected such information in the context of the business relationship. You are entitled to object to Optimizely’s use for this purpose at any time by selecting the opt-out option at the bottom of each marketing related approach.
Personalized Content
.
Optimizely processes information about your interactions with Optimizely across its various business areas and its offerings (your or your employers prior and current use of Optimizely products or services, your participation in and use of Optimizely’s web offerings, events, white papers, free trials or newsletters) to provide you with the requested products and services and to improve our personal communications with you. This data may also be used to efficiently operate Optimizely’s business, which also includes: the automation and aggregation of data to support various analytic and statistical efforts, performance and predictive analytics and data science to support your customer journey and to fulfill such requests. To the extent permitted by law, Optimizely may combine and use such information in an aggregated manner to help us understand your interests and business demands, develop our business insight and marketing strategies, and to create, develop, deliver, and improve our personalized communications with you. It may also be used by Optimizely to display relevant content on Optimizely owned or third-party websites.
Advertising ID’s
. If you consent or as permitted by applicable law, Optimizely may create a hashed user ID to provide to third party operated social networks or other web offerings (such as Twitter, LinkedIn, Facebook, Instagram or Google). This information is then matched against the third party’s own user database to display to you more relevant Optimizely content.
2. What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect And Use, And How Do We Collect It
Optimizely processes various types of personal information about the people we interact with when conducting our business or operating our various web presences and other communication channels. When you interact with us, we are collecting personal information about you. Sometimes we collect personal information automatically when you interact with our Services and sometimes we collect the personal information directly from you. At times, we may collect personal information about you from third parties with a legitimate right to share it.
Depending on the individual case, this may comprise the following types of personal information:
Contact Information
.
Optimizely processes the following categories of personal information as contact information: first name, last name, email addresses, postal address/location (country, state/province, city), telephone numbers, and your relationship history with Optimizely.
Personal information related to the business relationship with Optimizely.
In the context of established business relationships, Optimizely processes the business partner’s company name, industry, your job title and role, department and function and your company’s relationship history to Optimizely. If you provide a credit card number or bank details to order products or services, Optimizely will collect this information to process your payment for the requested products or services.
Compliance related personal information.
If required by statutory law or regulation, Optimizely may process data categories like date of birth, academic credentials, identity cards or other ID numbers, geolocation, business partner relevant information about e.g., significant litigation or other legal proceedings, and other export control or custom compliance relevant information.
Information generated through your use of, or participation in, Optimizely’s internet pages, web, or online offerings
Usage information
.
Optimizely processes certain user-related information, e.g., info regarding your browser, operating system, or your IP address when you visit Optimizely’s web properties. We also process information regarding your use of our web-offerings, like the pages you visit, the amount of time you spend on a page, the page which has referred you to our page and the links on our sites you select.
Without limiting Usage Data collection,
we and our third-party providers and partners collect certain personal information automatically when you visit, interact with, or use our Service: (A) Log Data (including your internet protocol (IP) address, operating system, browser details such as type, ID, and configuration, unique identifiers, device type and version, the referring URL, date/time of your visit, the time you spent on our services and any errors that may occur during your visit to our Services; (B) Analytics Data (including the electronic path you take to our services, through our services and when exiting our services, UTM source, as well as your usage and activity on our services, such as the time zone, activity information (first and last active date and time), usage history (flows created, campaigns scheduled, emails opened, total log-ins) as well as the pages, links, objects, products and benefits you view, click or otherwise interact with. We may also analyse the interaction between you and your customer using our Services, (C) Location Data (including your general geographic location based on the IP address we collect, and (D) Platform data (if you have an account to use the services we offer as a processor, we may in addition also collect your name, phone number, email address, company information, status in the sales cycle, lead and commercial details (like platform specifics, initial marketing channel), and user and account ID and other identifiers (such as Salesforce ID and Optimizely ID), NPS/account sentiments, Optimizely Academy user profile/history data, account health status, event attendance, status as lead/account, integrations. We and our third-party providers may use (i) cookies or small data files that are stored on an individual’s computer and (ii) other, related technologies, such as web beacons, pixels, embedded scripts, location-identifying technologies and logging technologies automatically collect this personal information. For more information about these practices and your choices regarding cookies, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Registration information
.
Optimizely may process your contact data as set out above and other information which you may provide directly to Optimizely if you register for any of Optimizely 's events or other web services.
Participation information
.
When you participate in webinars, virtual seminars, events, or other Optimizely web services, Optimizely may process your interactions with the relevant webservice to organize the event including its sessions, polls, surveys, or other interactions between Optimizely and/or its participants. Depending on the event and subject to a respective notification of the participants, Optimizely may collect audio and video recordings of the event or session.
Special categories of personal information.
In connection with the registration for an event, Optimizely may ask for your dietary preferences or information about potential disabilities for purposes of consideration for the health and well-being of our guests. Any collection of such information is always based on the consent of the participants. Kindly note that if you do not provide such information about dietary preferences, Optimizely may not have the opportunity to respond to such requests at the time of the event.
Personal information received during an application for a job at Optimizely.
Optimizely processes personal information of individuals applying for a job at Optimizely as set out in the privacy notice at Optimizely’s career websites and portals.
Personal information received from our partners.
In some circumstances, we also collect, or our partners provide us with, publicly available information which may contain Personal Data that you have published or that has been made available online. The way in which our partners collect this is detailed in their own privacy policies, available on their websites.
Personal information received from other third-parties, including publicly available sources.
Optimizely aims to collect personal information directly from the data subjects. If you or applicable law allows Optimizely to do so, Optimizely may obtain personal information also from third party sources. These third-party sources may include:
(i)
your employer in the context of its business dealings with Optimizely and/or the Optimizely Group,
(ii)
third parties you directed to share your personal information with Optimizely, and
(iii)
third party sources and publicly available sources like business oriented social networks or information broker. When we collect personal information from third party sources, established internal controls aim to ensure that the third-party source was permitted to provide this information to Optimizely and that we may use it for this purpose. Optimizely will treat this personal information according to this Privacy Notice, plus any additional restrictions imposed by the third party that provided the personal information to Optimizely or by applicable national law.
Personal information necessary for customer satisfaction
. To the extent permitted by law or based on your consent, Optimizely may combine the information we collect either directly or indirectly about specific users to ensure the completeness and correctness of the data and to help us better tailor our interactions with you and determine the information which best serves your respective interest or demand.
Our collection of your personal information can also include the following:
(i)
personal information you provide in connection with our Service – for example, account creation and profile information for any Optimizely account or Optimizely ID, and this information includes your email and password, company name, company URL, office phone number and office address, and you may also add or confirm your name, company industry, tax ID, billing address, time zone and source of contact/lead;
(ii)
Contract Information - if your company enters into a contractual relationship with us, we may collect your name, job title, email address, signature (if wet signed or a copy of their autograph is used), customer name and address, and information how you heard about us
; (iii)
payment and transaction Information - if you sign up for one of our Services requiring payment, we collect the information provided in connection with such payment using a third party payment processor to process your payments and as such, all such information is provided directly by you to our third-party processor and that payment processor’s use of your personal information is governed by their privacy notice, although we will only receive the last 4 digits of the credit card number along with transaction-related information (i.e., payment date, amount, device type, IP address and card type), and if any custom billing is arranged, then the account contact’s name, email, job title, company and address may be collected as well;
(iv)
communications - when you contact us through any method of communications, including through one of our website “Contact Us”, “Chat” or “Support” functions or you request information about, or a demonstration of, our Services, we may collect your name, email address, mailing address, phone number, company/company URL, account ID, type of inquiry, or any other personal information you choose to provide to us, such as how many contacts you have/your company has, which products interest you, what platform is currently being used, and meeting dates and times;
(v)
Newsletter, Marketing Emails, and Blog - if you sign up to receive news or alerts from us, or subscribe to our blog, we may collect your email and applicable interests and communication preferences;
(vi)
Optimizely educational resources if you sign up for courses or training at the Optimizely Academy (powered by Intellum) - you will be asked for your user’s name, email, and password, and you may be able to add a profile picture, and when using that platform, a user’s history on registrations, courses taken, scores, and product certifications, survey responses and lead status as well as unique identifier are captured;
(vii)
Optimizely World Communities
.
if you wish to participate in the Optimizely network with other account holders and developers, and find resources, insights and further support from other used, you may participate in various Optimizely communities. In this case we may collect the following information: your account credentials, your Optimizely account ID, email address and partner ID, and your account will also show classifications based on your involvement in the relevant Community and badges showing your based on your involvement/accomplishment (both of which can be manages in the profile settings to be visible or not visible to other users of the applicable Community) as well as all content you share via the Community function, and you may be able to add your name, username, job title, city, country, profile picture, social media (Instagram and Twitter), and bio/signature details that may be visible to the other users of the relevant Community; and
(viii)
Events, Surveys, Feedback and Promotions (including Contests, Sweepstakes, Webinars, and Training Sessions) - if you fill out any forms or otherwise provide your information to us in connection with Optimizely events, surveys, or other promotional events (including contests, sweepstakes, webinars, and trainings), as well as when you provide feedback to us, we may collect your contact information (such as your name, email, and phone number), your organization company, your job title, the office address and any other information you provide to us.
We may also collect your personal information from:
(A)
within the Optimizely Group - we may receive your personal information from within Optimizely Group
; (B)
Optimizely Business and Marketing Partners - we may also disclose personal information with other business and marketing partners with whom we jointly offer products or services, co-market or host events, or who are part of our partner ecosystem, and the information we disclose may include your name, phone number, email address, company name and address, opportunity/interest details of your company, and information on whether your company is a current client of our partner;
(C)
Social Media
– when an individual interacts with us through various social media networks, such as when someone “Likes” us on Facebook or follows us or shares our content on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram or other social networks through, for example, the social media buttons embedded into our website, we may receive some information about individuals that they permit the social network to share with third parties, and this information we receive is dependent upon an individual’s privacy settings with the social network. Individuals should always review and, if necessary, adjust their privacy settings on third-party websites and social media networks and services before sharing information and/or linking or connecting them to other services, and (iv) Service Providers - our service providers that perform services solely on our behalf, such as chat services, payout processing, and marketing providers, collect personal information and often share some or all of this information with us.
3. How Long Will Your Personal Information Be Stored & Used by Optimizely
Optimizely will only process your personal information only for as long as it is required:
to make Services requested by you or your employer available to you;
for Optimizely Group to comply with statutory obligations to retain personal information, resulting inter alia e.g. from applicable export, finance, tax or commercial laws;
to fulfill Optimizely’s legitimate business purposes as further described in this Privacy Notice, unless you object to Optimizely’s use of your personal information for these purposes;
until you revoke a consent you previously granted to Optimizely to process your personal information.
Optimizely may process your personal information for Service development until this no longer necessary or Optimizely is informed that your relationship with the Optimizely customer has changed.
Optimizely may retain your personal information for additional periods if necessary for compliance with legal obligations to process your personal information or if the personal information is needed by Optimizely to assert or defend itself against legal claims. Optimizely will retain your personal information until the end of the relevant retention period or until the claims in question have been settled.
To learn more about how you may revoke consent, please refer to Your Control of Your Personal Information sections below, How Can You Exercise Your Rights of Control, and Contact Us sections below.
4. Who May Optimizely Share Your Personal Information
We may also share, transmit, disclose, grant access to, make available, and provide your personal information as described below.
Optimizely Group
: As Optimizely is making available its Services to its customers only via local business relationships, Optimizely may transfer your personal information to the locally relevant Optimizely Group entity for the purpose and to the extent necessary to conduct a business relationship. Other entities of the Optimizely Group may also receive or gain access to personal information either when rendering group internal services centrally and on behalf of the Optimizely Group or when personal information is transferred to them on a respective legal basis. These companies will use your personal information in the same way as we can under this Privacy Notice. If you would like to find out which Optimizely Group entity is responsible for the business relationship with you or your employer, please contact us at
privacy@optimizely.com
Service Providers
: We may share your personal information with third party contractors and service providers, that are subject to reasonable confidentiality terms, and which may include processing payments, providing web hosting and maintenance services, technology support providers, email and messaging communications providers, analytics providers, data storage providers, and web and video hosting providers and developers. Any such service providers will be subject to confidentiality provisions, and be bound to only process the information on our behalf and under our instructions, unless such service providers act as their own controllers (e.g., in the case we seek advice from consultants).
Business and Marketing Partners:
We may also disclose personal information with other business and marketing partners with whom we jointly offer products or services, co-market or host events, or who are part of our partner ecosystem. We may obtain your consent where required by applicable law. Our business and marketing partners will use your information in accordance with their own privacy notices.
Advertising Partners:
We may share certain personal information (including information collected through cookies) with our advertising service providers and vendors in order to advertise our Services to you. For more information on how we collect and share this information, please see the Online Advertising section below.
Corporate Transaction:
We may transfer any information we collect in the event we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets (including any shares in the company) or any portion or combination of our products, services, businesses and/or assets. Should such a transaction occur (whether a divestiture, merger, acquisition, bankruptcy, dissolution, reorganization, liquidation, change of control or similar transaction or proceeding), we will use reasonable efforts to ensure that any transferred information is treated in a manner consistent with this Privacy Notice.
Legal Obligations and Rights:
We may disclose personal information to third parties, such as legal advisors and law enforcement agencies, regulators, other authorities and other third parties for legal reasons if we reasonably believe that such action is necessary:
in connection with the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims;
to comply with laws or to respond to lawful requests and legal process;
to protect our rights and property and the rights, personal safety and property of others, including to enforce our agreements and policies;
to detect, suppress, or prevent fraud; or
as otherwise required by applicable law.
The Public/Other
Optimizely World Community users
: when you post content on any Optimizely World Community portion of the website: Remember, our websites allow you to connect and interact with others. In that case, your personal information may be visible to others as set out above under “Optimizely World Community”.
With Your Consent:
We may disclose personal information about an individual to certain other third parties or publicly with their consent or direction. For example, with an individual’s consent or direction we may post their testimonial on our website or service-related publications.
5. Your Control of Your Personal Information
You can manage and control our use of your personal information as outlined in this Privacy Notice.
In addition, If you have a Optimizely account with us, you have the ability to modify certain information in your account (e.g., your contact information and profile picture) through the “Settings” tab in your Optimizely log-in account. Not all personal information is maintained in a format that you can access or change. If you would like to request access to, or correction or deletion of personal information, you may send your request to us by messaging support in the support portal through your Optimizely account. We will review your request and may require you to provide additional information to identify yourself, but we do not promise that we will be able to satisfy your request.
Please direct any requests to exercise your rights to
privacy@optimizely.com
.
6. Your Control of Marketing Messages
You can manage our marketing messages to you.
Email Communications
. From time to time, we may send you emails regarding updates to our Services, products or services, notices about our organization, or information about products/services we offer that we think may be of interest to you. If you wish to unsubscribe from such emails, simply click the “unsubscribe link” provided at the bottom of the email communication.
Note that you cannot unsubscribe from certain services-related communications (e.g., account verification, confirmations of transactions, technical or legal notices).
Messaging Platforms
. We may use personal information we collect to communicate with individuals via messaging platforms (such as WhatsApp), including to market to you or offer you information and updates on products or services we think you may be interested in. You can unsubscribe from these messages at any time by replying STOP in one of our messages.
SMS Text Messaging
. We may use personal information we collect to communicate with individuals via text message, including (with your consent) to market to you or offer you information and updates on products or services we think you may be interested in. You can unsubscribe from marketing text messages at any time by replying STOP or clicking the unsubscribe link (where available) in one of our messages.
If you do not want to receive any marketing communications from us, you can also at any time go to our ‘unsubscribe’ page @
https://pages.optimizely.com/UnsubscribePage.html
Our customers are solely responsible for their own marketing emails and other communications and we cannot unsubscribe you from their communications. If you believe any of our customers or partners has engaged in unsolicited sending of mass email (or SPAM) and that they are using our Products and Services to do so, please contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
7. How Can You Exercise Your Rights of Control?
Please direct any requests to exercise your rights to
privacy@optimizely.com
Optimizely will take steps to ensure it verifies your identity to a reasonable degree of certainty before it will process the information protection right you want to exercise. When practical and commercially reasonable, Optimizely will match personal information provided by you in submitting a request to exercise your rights with information already maintained by Optimizely. This could include matching two or more data points you provide when you submit a request with two or more data points that are already maintained by Optimizely. Optimizely will not process requests that are manifestly unfounded, excessive, fraudulent, represented by third parties without duly representing respective authority or are otherwise not required by local law.
8. Children
Our Services are not directed to, and we do not intend to, or knowingly, collect or solicit personal information from children under the age of 16. If an individual is under the age of 16, they should not use our Services or otherwise provide us with any personal information either directly or by other means. If a child under the age of 16 has provided personal information to us, we encourage the child’s parent or guardian to contact us to request that we remove the personal information from our systems. If we learn that any personal information we collect has been provided by a child under the age of 16, we will promptly delete that personal information.
9. Region-Specific Disclosures
This Privacy Notice is designed to apply to our website visitors, users of our Service, and other companies and users on a global basis. Please refer to
Schedule I
for additional disclosures that may be applicable to you:
10. Third Party Websites And Services
The Services may contain integrations or links to third party websites or services, including those of our business partners. By interacting with these third parties, you are providing information directly to the third party and not Optimizely. Please note that Optimizely is not responsible for the privacy practices of these third parties or any entity that it does not own or control. We encourage you to review the privacy notices and online terms of those third parties to learn more about how they handle your personal information.
11. EU-US, US-UK and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Optimizely complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (collectively, the “
Data Privacy Frameworks”
or “
DPFs
”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce (
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
) regarding the collection, use, and retention of personal information transferred to the U.S. from the European Union (EU), United Kingdom (UK) and /or Switzerland respectively. Optimizely has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that will adhere to the DPF Principles with respect to such information (“
DPF Principles
”), and accordingly, Optimizely is subject to the regulatory enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission with respect to personal information received or transferred pursuant to those Data Privacy Frameworks and the DPF Principles. Furthermore, Optimizely shall be liable to you for any third-party agent to which Optimizely transfers your personal information and that processes such personal information in a manner that violates the DPF Principles, unless Optimizely can demonstrate that it is not responsible for the resulting damages. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Notice and the DPF Principles, the DPF Principles shall prevail and govern. To learn more about any Data Privacy Framework program, and to view our certifications, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
In compliance with the Data Privacy Frameworks, Optimizely commits to resolve complaints about our collection or use of your personal information. EU, UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our Data Privacy Framework policy should first contact Optimizely at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Optimizely has further committed to refer unresolved Data Privacy Framework complaints to (i) the American Arbitration Association at the International Centre for Dispute Resolution (‘ICDR AAA’) or to (ii) JAMS (
formerly known as,
Judicial Arbitration and Mediation Services), as alternative dispute resolution providers. The ICDR AAA and JAMS are both located in the United States. Either is available to you, at your choice. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint from us, or if we have not reasonably addressed your complaint to your satisfaction, please visit ICDR AAA at
https://go.adr.org/dpf_irm.html
or JAMS at
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. Those services are made available to you at no cost to you.
Alternatively, for European residents, the
EU Data Protection Authorities
(EU DPAs), and for United Kingdom residents, the
Information Commissioner’s Office
, are also available to serve as an independent recourse mechanism for the dispute resolution arising from our collection, use, and retention of your personal data transferred to the United States. You may contact your UK ICO
here
, local EU DPA
here
and for Swiss individuals, the Swiss Federal Data Protection office
here
for more information. Those services are also made available at no cost to you.
Optimizely also commits to cooperate and comply with advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs), and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of human personal data received in reliance on Data Privacy Frameworks.
In certain circumstances, the Data Privacy Frameworks provide you with the right to invoke binding arbitration by the Data Privacy Framework Panel. For more information on this option, please see refer to the DPF Principles.
12. Changes To This Privacy Notice
We reserve the right to change this Privacy Notice from time to time in our sole discretion. We will notify you about material changes in the way we treat personal information by adequately informing you via your account, by placing a prominent notice on our website, or through other appropriate communication channels. It is your responsibility to review this Privacy Notice periodically. All changes shall be effective from the date of publication unless otherwise provided.
13. Contact Us
If you have any questions or requests in connection with this Privacy Notice or other privacy-related matters, please send an email to
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Region Specific Disclosures
________________________________________________
Where Optimizely is subject to privacy requirements in the EU, EEA and other GDPR relevant countries, and the United Kingdom and Switzerland
.
Optimizely Group maintains operations in Europe and may direct our services to individuals located in the EEA, UK and Switzerland. In these instances, the following additional disclosures apply to our processing of personal information. When we use the term “
personal data
”, we mean personal information – that is, information relating to an identified or identifiable natural person.
Controllers.
Subject to your location, either Optimizely North America Inc or Optimizely AB. is the controller of your personal data. In addition, the Optimizely Group entities are each jointly responsible with Optimizely North America Inc and Optimizely AB to process your personal data for the following reasons: to perform our contractual services, as further described below.
Legal Bases For The Processing
.
Regularly, we use your personal data based on the following legal grounds according to the Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (the “
EU GDPR
”) or, where applicable, the “
UK GDPR
” as it forms part of the law of England and Wales, Scotland and Northern Ireland by virtue of section 3 of the UK European Union (Withdrawal) Act 2018 GDPR:
Perform our contractual services, including prior to entering into a contract with you
: If you order Services from us or if you contact us to request our Services, we use your personal data to provide you with these Services, including for account and contract management, to facilitate user benefits and services, including customer support, and evaluate your candidacy for employment and to facilitate the onboarding process.
Justified by our legitimate interests
: The usage of your personal data may also be necessary for our own business interests. For example, we may use some of your personal data to send gifts to you; market our Services to individuals; administer, improve and personalize our Services, including by recognizing an individual and remembering their information when they return to our Services and analyzing our client-base; Process payment for our Services; conduct market research; opportunity tracking, conversion and lead generation; test, enhance, update and monitor the Services, or diagnose or fix technology problems; help maintain the safety, security and integrity of our property and Services, technology assets and business; enforce our
Website Terms of Use
and other online terms for our Services resolve disputes, carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and protect our business interests and the interests and rights of third parties; and prevent, investigate or provide notice of fraud or unlawful or criminal activity.
Consent
: In some cases, we may ask you to grant us separate consent to use your personal data.
Compliance with legal obligations
. We are obligated to retain certain personal data because of legal requirements, for example, tax or commercial laws, or we may be required by law enforcement to provide personal data on request. We do not use your personal data for automated individual decision-making.
How Long Will We Store Your Personal Data.
We will usually store the personal data we collect about you for no longer than necessary for the purposes as set above, and in accordance with our legal obligations and legitimate business interests. The criteria used to determine the period for which personal data about you will be retained varies depending on the legal basis under which we process the personal data:
Contract
.Where we are processing personal data is based on contract, we generally will retain your personal data for the duration of the contract plus some additional limited period of time that is necessary to comply with law or that represents the statute of limitations for legal claims that could arise from our contractual relationship.
Legitimate Interests
.Where we are processing personal data based on our legitimate interests, we generally will retain such information for a reasonable period of time based on the particular interest, taking into account your fundamental interests and your rights and freedoms.
Consent
.Where we are processing personal data based on your consent, we generally will retain your personal data until you withdraw your consent, or otherwise for the period of time necessary to fulfil the underlying agreement with you or provide you with the applicable service for which we process that personal data.
Legal Obligation
.Where we are processing personal data based on a legal obligation, we generally will retain your personal data for the period of time necessary to fulfil the legal obligation.
Legal Claim
. We may need to apply a “legal hold” that retains information beyond our typical retention period where we face threat of legal claim or intent to establish a claim. In that case, we will retain the information until the hold is removed, which typically means the claim or threat of claim has been resolved.
In all cases, in addition to the purposes and legal bases, we consider the amount, nature and sensitivity of the personal data, as well as the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data.
Marketing And Advertising
.
From time to time we may contact you with information about our services, including sending you marketing messages and asking for your feedback on our Services. Most marketing messages we send will be by email or via messaging platform. For some marketing messages, we may use personal data we collect about you to help us determine the most relevant marketing information to share with you. We may send you marketing messages if you have given us your consent to do so or where we have relied on the soft opt-in rule (where applicable). If you wish to unsubscribe from such communication, please see the details set out under “Your Rights In Respect Of Your Personal Data”.
Storing And Transferring Your Personal Data
Security
.
We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal data against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal data we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers. We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting credit or debit card information.
International Transfers of your Personal data
. The personal data we collect may be transferred to and stored in countries outside the EEA, UK and Switzerland in countries where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States, where Optimizely North America Inc. is located. In the event of a transfer by Optimizely, we ensure that: (i) the personal data is transferred to countries recognized as offering an equivalent level of protection; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as standard contractual clauses adopted by the European Commission. If you wish to enquire further about these safeguards used, please contact us using the details set out under the Contact Us section of the main Privacy Notice.
Your Rights In Respect Of Your Personal Data.
In accordance with applicable privacy law, you may have the following rights in respect of your personal data that we hold:
Right of access
. You have the right to obtain certain information about our processing of your personal data which includes:
confirmation of whether, and where, we are processing your personal data;
information about the categories of personal data we are processing, the purposes for which we process your personal data and information as to how we determine applicable retention periods;
information about the categories of recipients with whom we may share your personal data; and
a copy of the personal data we hold about you.
Right of portability
. You have the right, in certain circumstances, to receive a copy of the personal data you have provided to us in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format that supports re-use, or to request the transfer of your personal data to another person.
Right to rectification
. You have the right to obtain rectification of any inaccurate or incomplete personal data we hold about you without undue delay.
Right to erasure
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to erase your personal data without undue delay, such as if the continued processing of that personal data is not justified.
Right to restriction
. You have the right, in some circumstances, to require us to limit the purposes for which we process your personal data, such as where the accuracy of the personal data is contested by you.
Right to withdraw consent
. There are certain circumstances where we require your consent to process your personal data. In these instances, and if you have provided consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. If you withdraw your consent, this will not affect the lawfulness of our use of your personal data before your withdrawal.
Right to Object
. You also have the right to object to any processing based on our legitimate interests where there are grounds relating to your particular situation. There may be compelling reasons for continuing to process your personal data, and we will assess and inform you if that is the case. You can object to marketing activities for any reason at any time
.
You also have the right to lodge a complaint to your local data protection authority. If you are based in the EU, information about how to contact your local data protection authority is available
here
. If you are based in the UK or Switzerland, your local data protection authorities are the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (
https://ico.org.uk/global/contact-us/
) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (
https://www.edoeb.admin.ch/edoeb/en/home/deredoeb/kontakt.html
).
If you wish to exercise one of these rights, please submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
. You can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
.
Due to the confidential nature of data processing, we may ask you to provide proof of identity when exercising the above rights.
Cookies And Similar Technologies.
Our European Services and emails use cookies and similar technologies such as pixels and Local Storage Objects (LSOs) like HTML5 (together “
cookies
”) to distinguish you from other users of our Services. This helps us to provide you with a good experience when you use our Services and also allows us to monitor and analyse how you use and interact with our Services so that we can continue to improve our Services. It also helps us and our partners to determine products and services that may be of interest to you. Please see our
Cookie Notice
for more information about these practices and your choices regarding cookies. You can also always contact the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
for more information.
________________________________________________
Where Optimizely is subject to privacy requirements in the United States, the following also applies.
U.S. Children’s Privacy
.
Optimizely does not knowingly collect the personal information of children under the age of 13. If you are a parent or guardian and believe Optimizely collected information about a child, please contact Optimizely as described in “Contact Us” section of the main Privacy Notice. Optimizely will take steps to delete the information as soon as possible. Given that Optimizely websites and online services are not directed to users under 16 years of age and in accordance with the disclosure requirements of the CCPA, Optimizely does not sell the personal information of any minors under 16 years of age.
California residents.
These California disclosure provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individual residents of the State of California, either online or offline, within the scope of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (collectively, the “
CCPA
”) – (“
CA Disclosures
”). Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these CA Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our Privacy Notice or as otherwise defined in the CCPA. When we use the term “personal information” in this CA Disclosure, we mean information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, with a particular consumer or household.
Collection and Use of Your Personal Information
.
Optimizely collects personal information from and about you for a variety of purposes, as described in previous sections of this Privacy Notice.
Categories of Personal Information Collected
.
In the last 12 months, we have collected the following categories of personal information: (i) identifiers, such as your first, middle and last name, email address, username, or other similar identifiers; (ii) CA customer categories, such as your name, phone number, and postal address; (iii) commercial information, such as records of services purchased, obtained or considered; (iv) internet/network Information, such as device information, logs and analytics data; (v) geolocation data, such as approximate location data generated based on your IP address or other information; (vi) sensory information, such as recordings of any phone calls or video calls (with your permission, as applicable) between you and Optimizely; (vii) professional/employment information, such as the business or organization you represent, your title with that business or organization and information relating to your role with the business or organization, job application information and other details contained in your resume; (viii) inferences about your interests and preferences, generated from your use of our sites; and (ix) other personal information, including information you submit into the feedback form and any communications between you and Optimizely, as well as information we receive from social networking sites. We collect this information from the following sources: (i) directly from you, (ii) from our business partners and affiliates, (iii) from your browser or device when you visit and / access and use any of our Services, or (iv) from third parties that you permit to share information with us. Please see the
What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect And Use, And How Do We Collect It
section above for more information about the sources of personal information we collect.
Disclosure of Personal Information
. Optimizely may share your personal information with third parties for business purposes. The categories of third parties to whom we disclose your personal information for a business purpose include: (i) within the Optimizely Group; (ii) our service providers and advisors; (iii) analytics providers; (iv) marketing and strategic partners; and (v) social networks. In the previous 12 months, we have disclosed all of the categories of personal information we collect, explained in the
Collection and Use of Personal Information
section above, to third parties for a business purpose, as described in the
What Purposes Does Optimizely Use Your Personal Information, What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect, Use and How we Collect It,
and
Who May We Share your Personal Information
sections in this Privacy Notice.
Sale Of Personal Information.
As further described in the
What Purposes Does Optimizely Use Your Personal Information, What Personal Information Does Optimizely Collect, Use and How we Collect,
and
Who May We Share your Personal Information
sections of the Privacy Notice, we may “sell” or “share” your personal information (as those terms are defined by the CCPA) to third parties, subject to your right to opt out of those sales or sharing (see the
Exercise Your Right To Opt Out
section below). In the last 12 months, we have sold or shared the following categories of personal information for the purposes described in our Privacy Notice, subject to your settings and preferences and your Right to Opt-Out: (i) identifiers, such as your name and email address, (ii) CA customer categories, such as your name and phone number, and (iii) commercial information, such as records of services purchased, obtained or considered. The categories of third parties to whom we may sell or share the personal information include: (A) business and marketing partners, (B) online advertising networks and analytics providers, and (C) Social Networks. We may also disclose personal information to third parties at your direction or upon your request, in connection with a corporate business transaction, or to comply with legal or contractual obligations, as described in our Privacy Notice.
Your California Privacy Rights
.
As a California resident, you may be able to exercise the following rights in relation to the personal information that we have collected about you (subject to certain limitations at law): (A) The Right to Access/Know, (B) The Right to Request Deletion, (C) The Right to Correction, (D) The Right to Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Personal Information, (E) The Right to Limit Use and Disclosure of Personal Information, (F) The Right to Control Over Automated Decision-Making / Profiling, (G) The Right to Non-Retaliation, and (H) to “Shine the Light”.
Your Right to Access/Know
means that you have the right to request any or all of the following information relating to your personal information we have collected and disclosed in the last 12 months, upon verification of your identity: (i) the specific pieces of personal information we have collected about you; (ii) the categories of personal information we have collected about you; (iii) the categories of sources of the personal information; (iv) the categories of personal information that we have disclosed to third parties for a business purpose, and the categories of recipients to whom this information was disclosed; (v) the categories of personal information we have sold about you (if any), and the categories of third parties to whom the information was sold; and (vi) the business or commercial purposes for collecting or, if applicable, selling the personal information.
Your Right to Request Deletion means you have the right to request the deletion of personal information we have collected from you, subject to certain exceptions.
Your Right to Correction means you have the right to request that any inaccuracies in your personal information be corrected, taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of your personal information.
Your Right to Opt-Out of Sales or Sharing of Personal Information means you have the right to direct us not to “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” your personal information to third parties for cross-context behavioural advertising purposes. If you are under the age of 16, you have the right to opt in, or to have a parent or guardian opt in on your behalf, to such sales.
Your Right to Limit Use and Disclosure of Personal Information means you have the right to direct us to limit the use of your sensitive personal information to certain purposes, subject to certain exceptions.
Your Right to Control Over Automated Decision-Making / Profiling means you have the right to direct us not to use automated decision-making or profiling for certain purposes.
Your Right to Non-Retaliation means you have the right not to receive retaliatory or discriminatory treatment for exercising these rights. However, please note that if the exercise of these rights limits our ability to process personal information (such as in the case of a deletion request), we may no longer be able to provide you our products and services or engage with you in the same manner.
Your “Shine the Light” right means that California residents that have an established business relationship with us have rights to know how their information is disclosed to third parties for their direct marketing purposes under California’s “Shine the Light” law, or the right to opt out of such practices (Civ. Code §1798.83).
How To Exercise Your California Privacy Rights.
To exercise your Right to Access, Right to Know, Right to Correction, or your Right to Deletion: please submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
. You can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Before processing your request, we will need to verify your identity and confirm you are a resident of the State of California. In order to verify your identity, we will generally either require the successful authentication of your account, or the matching of sufficient information you provide us to the information we maintain about you in our systems. This process may require us to request additional personal information from you, including, but not limited to, your email address, phone number, and/or date of last transaction on our Services.
In certain circumstances, we may decline a request to exercise the rights described above, particularly where we are unable to verify your identity or locate your information in our systems. If we are unable to comply with all or a portion of your request, we will explain the reasons for declining to comply with the request.
Exercise Your Right to Opt-Out of Personal Information Sales or Sharing for Targeted Advertising.
Unless you have exercised your Right to Opt-Out, we may disclose or “sell” your personal information to third parties for monetary or other valuable consideration, or “share” your personal information to third parties for cross-context behavioural advertising purposes. The third parties to whom we sell or share personal information may use such information for their own purposes in accordance with their own privacy policies. You do not need to create an account with us to exercise your Right to Opt-Out. However, we may ask you to provide additional personal information so that we can properly identify you to track compliance with your opt-out request. We will only use personal information provided in an opt-out request to review and comply with the request. If you choose not to provide this information, we may only be able to process your request to the extent we are able to identify you in our data systems. To exercise the Right to Opt-Out of personal information “sales,” you may submit a request as outlined below Additionally, as is common practice among companies that operate online, we permit third party advertising networks, social media companies and other third party businesses to collect and disclose your personal information (including preferences, geolocation, commercial information and internet, network and device information) directly from your browser or device through cookies or tracking technologies when you visit or interact with our websites, use our apps or otherwise engage with us. These third parties use this information for the purposes of serving ads that are more relevant, for ad campaign measurement and analytics, and for fraud detection and reporting and may sell or share that information to other businesses for advertising and other purposes. To learn more about how third parties collect information through tracking technologies and what other choices you may have in relation to those activities, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
To exercise the Right to Opt-Out of the sharing of your personal information for cross-context behavioural advertising purposes (targeted advertising).
You may submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
, and you can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Authorized Agents.
In certain circumstances, you may permit an authorized agent to submit requests to exercise your California Privacy Rights on your behalf. The authorized agent must provide a letter signed by you confirming the agent has permission to submit a request on your behalf or must provide sufficient evidence to show that the authorized agent has been lawfully vested with power of attorney. For security purposes, we may need to verify your identity and confirm directly with you that you have provided the authorized agent permission to submit the request, and it may take additional time to fulfil agent-submitted requests. We may deny a request in the event we are not able to verify the authorized agent’s authority to act on your behalf. Please note that for privacy and security reasons, we will direct future communications to the data subject on whose behalf the request was made.
“Shine the Light” Disclosures.
The California “Shine the Light” law gives residents of California the right under certain circumstances to request information from us regarding the manner in which we share certain categories of personal information (as defined in the Shine the Light law) with third parties for their direct marketing purposes. To opt out of this type of sharing, please submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
, and you can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Notice of Financial Incentives.
In addition, we may offer you financial incentives for the collection, sale, retention, and use of your personal information as permitted by the CCPA that can, without limitation, result in reasonably different prices, rates, or quality levels. The material aspects of any financial incentive will be explained and described in its program terms. Please note that participating in incentive programs is entirely optional, you will have to affirmatively opt-in to the program and you can opt-out of each program (i.e., terminate participation and forgo the ongoing incentives) prospectively by following the instructions in the applicable program description and terms. We may add or change incentive programs, and/or their terms by posting notice on the program descriptions and terms linked to above, so check them regularly. Each financial incentive or price or service difference related to the collection and use of personal information is based upon our reasonable, good-faith determination of the estimated value of such information to our business, taking into consideration the value of the offer itself and the anticipated revenue generation that may be realized by rewarding brand loyalty. We calculate the value of the offer and financial incentive by using the expense related to the offer.
Minors.
We do not sell the personal information and do not have actual knowledge that we sell the personal information of minors under 16 years of age. Please contact us at
privacy@optimizely.com
, to inform us if you, or your minor child, are under the age of 16. If you are under the age of 18 and you want to remove your name or comments from our website or publicly displayed content, please contact us directly at
privacy@optimizely.com
. We may not be able to modify or delete your information in all circumstances.
Nevada residents.
This Nevada disclosure provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individual residents of the State of Nevada, either online or offline, within the scope of the Chapter 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes – (“
NV Disclosures
”). Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these NV Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our Privacy Notice or as otherwise defined in the Chapter 603A. Chapter 603A of the Nevada Revised Statutes permits a Nevada resident to opt out of future sales of certain covered information that a website operator has collected or will collect about the resident. To opt out of this kind of future sales, please submit a request by completing our,
Privacy Rights Request Form
, and you can also always contact our Data Protection Officer at
DPO@optimizely.com
, and the Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
.
Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia residents.
In accordance with applicable privacy law and the jurisdiction in Colorado, Connecticut, Utah and Virginia
,
residents of those states may be able to exercise some or all of the rights as detailed under the CA Disclosures in respect of your personal information that we have collected (subject to certain limitations at law).
________________________________________________
Where Optimizely may be subject to privacy requirements in Australia, the following also applies.
Australian residents.
These additional disclosures for Australian residents (“
Australian Disclosures
”) supplement the information contained in our Privacy Notice and applies solely to individuals lawfully resident in Australia (“
you
”). These Australian Disclosures provide additional information about how we collect, use, disclose and otherwise process personal information of individuals in Australia, either online or offline, within the Australian Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) and the Australian Privacy Principles (“
APPs
”) found in Schedule 1 of the Privacy Act. Unless otherwise expressly stated, all terms in these Australian Disclosures have the same meaning as defined in our Privacy Notice or as otherwise defined in the Privacy Act. When we use the term “personal information” in this Australian Disclosures notice, we mean information or an opinion about an identified individual or an individual who is reasonably identifiable, whether the information or opinion: (i) is true or not; and (ii) is recorded in a material form or not.
How We Collect Your Australian Personal Information.
The various ways in which your personal information is collected are described in the main Privacy Notice. We may also collect your personal information if we record any phone calls or video calls (with your permission) between you and Optimizely.
Overseas Transfers From Australian Of Your Personal Information.
Your personal information may be transferred to and stored in locations outside Australia where we and our third-party service providers have operations, including in the United States, where Optimizely North America Inc. is located, United Kingdom, where Optimizely Ltd is located, and Sweden, where Optimizely AB is located. In the event of a transfer by Optimizely to a location outside Australia, we ensure that: (i) personal information is transferred to countries recognised as having an equivalent level of privacy protection to Australia; or (ii) the transfer is made pursuant to appropriate safeguards, such as contractual obligations.
Storing Your Australian Personal Information.
We implement appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect your personal information against accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, change or damage. All personal information we collect will be stored by our cloud hosting provider on secure servers. We will never send you unsolicited emails or contact you by phone requesting credit or debit card information.
YOUR AUSTRALIAN PRIVACY RIGHTS.
You have various rights under the APPs.
You have the right to request access to and/or the correction of your personal information held by Optimizely. You can exercise these rights by contacting our Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
. We will respond to your request within a reasonable time. If your request is refused, you will be provided with written reasons for the refusal and information about the mechanisms you can use to complain about the refusal.
To exercise your right to access, right to know, right to correction, or your right to deletion: please submit a request by completing our
Privacy Rights Request Form
.
You have the right to make a privacy complaint to our Privacy Office at
privacy@optimizely.com
. Our Privacy Office will first consider your complaint to determine whether there are simple or immediate steps which can be taken to resolve the complaint. Our Privacy Office will endeavour to complete the investigation into your complaint promptly. You may be asked to provide further information about your complaint and the outcome you are seeking. Our Privacy Office will then typically gather relevant facts, locate and review relevant documents, and speak with individuals involved. In most cases, our Privacy Office will investigate and provide a written response to your complaint within 30 days of receipt of the complaint. If the matter is more complex or the investigation may take longer, our Privacy Office will let you know.If you are not satisfied with Optimizely’s response to your complaint, a complaint may be made to the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner (“
OAIC
”). The OAIC can be contacted by telephone on 1300 363 992 or by using the contact details on the website
www.oaic.gov.au
.
Your privacy
We use cookies to improve your experience, including to personalise content, provide useful features, analyse traffic, and measure ad performance.
By closing this banner, you agree to our use of cookies.
See more details in our policy
Settings
Reject All
Accept all
Sub-policy 7
https://liveramp.com/privacy/:
Data is a powerful tool. At LiveRamp, we believe a culture of accountability is essential to success in a data-driven world.
Read our Privacy Notices
Where required, we maintain privacy notices for various business purposes and multiple regions or regulatory jurisdictions of the world. The choices available to an individual may vary within these areas based on local laws and customs. Our full list of privacy notices is available on this page. Please select a privacy notice below to
understand what information we collect, how the information is used and what choices you have to protect your information.
General Privacy Notices
Product and Service Privacy Notice
(How we handle data within our databases when we are the business or controller.)
Web and Business Representative Privacy Notice
(How we handle data on this website and collected from corporate activities and events.)
Specific Country or U.S. State Privacy Notices
North America
California Privacy Notice
(How we handle personal data for California residents.)
Mexico Privacy Notice
(How we handle personal data for Mexico residents.)
Asia-Pacific
Australia Privacy Policies
Japan
European Union and United Kingdom
UK
France
Germany
Italy
Netherlands
Spain
Security
In addition to our privacy notices, we maintain strict security policies and procedures. See our
Data Security Knowledge Base page
for details.
Your Privacy Choices
You may have certain legal rights with respect to data. These rights may include the right of access, deletion, limiting the use of or correction of personal data. These rights may be limited, for example if fulfilling your request would reveal personal data about another person, if they would infringe the rights of a third party (including our rights) or if you ask us to delete information which we are required by law to keep or have compelling legitimate interests in keeping. We will inform you of any relevant exemptions we rely upon when responding to any request you make.
Select the appropriate link below to exercise your rights:
Universal LiveRamp Opt Out Tools
United States Your Privacy Choices portal
Asia Pacific Countries (except Australia), email
apaclegal@liveramp.com
Australia Your Rights portal
Canada Your Rights portal
EEA Countries
The UK Your Rights Portal
France
residents, email dpo.de@liveramp.com
Germany residents
,
email privacy.de@liveramp.com
Spain
residents, email privacy.es@liveramp.com
Italy
residents, email privacy.it@liveramp.com
Belgium residents, email privacy.be@liveramp.com
The Netherlands residents, email privacy.nl@liveramp.com
Mexico Your Rights portal
Sub-policy 8
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/:
GPC signal not detected.
Please
download a browser/extension
that supports it.
Take control of your privacy.
Online privacy should be accessible to everyone. It starts with a simpler way to exercise your rights.
Get Started
Get Involved
Read the Latest Press Release
and
Follow @globalprivctrl on Twitter
.
Turn On
GPC
Enable Global Privacy Control to communicate your privacy preference.
Send the Signal
Your browser will send the
GPC
signal to websites you visit.
Exercise Your Rights
Participating websites can respect your privacy rights accordingly.
You may have noticed “Do Not Sell” and “Object To Processing” links around the web from companies complying with privacy regulations. To opt out of websites selling or sharing your personal information, you need to click these links for every site you visit.
Now you can exercise your legal privacy rights in one step via Global Privacy Control (
GPC
), required under the California Consumer Protection Act (CCPA).
Together, over a dozen organizations are developing the
GPC
specification.
Get Involved
GPC
lets users signal their desired privacy, just by browsing.
GPC
is available as part of several major browsers, extensions, and websites.
View Full Spec
Test against the reference server
The
GPC
signal will be intended to communicate a Do Not Sell request from a global privacy control, as per
CCPA-REGULATIONS §999.315
for that browser or device, or, if known, the consumer. Under the GDPR, the intent of the
GPC
signal is to convey a general request that data controllers limit the sale or sharing of the user’s personal data to other data controllers (
GDPR Articles 7 & 21
). Over time, the
GPC
signal may be intended to communicate rights in other jurisdictions.
“
CA DOJ is encouraged to see the technology community developing a global privacy control in furtherance of the CCPA and consumer privacy rights.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
“
40 million consumers are now using web browsers and other privacy tools that support this global opt out. Major publishers, the New York Times, Washington Post, have already pledged to respect it. California's Attorney General has already said that companies must respect GPC. This is a big step in Americans privacy, a big, big step forward.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
My hope is that Governor Northam and the legislature will improve [the newly passed Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act] in the near future in important ways... making it easier for Virginia citizens to invoke their privacy rights, such as through a global privacy control.
”
Mark R. Warner
VA Senator
“
GPC provides a clear and binary indication of an individual's choice... Based on a review of several of the web browsers' intentions regarding GPC, it appears likely to be a prominent, easily understandable, and accessible mechanism in the browser settings.
”
Alexander McD White
Bermuda Privacy Commissioner
“
It's past time to give consumers a real and enforceable way to stop companies from tracking and selling their data. My Mind Your Own Business Act would do just that, and this project [Global Privacy Control] shows it’s possible.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
CCPA requires businesses to treat a user-enabled global privacy control as a legally valid consumer request to opt out of the sale of their data. CCPA opened the door to developing a technical standard, like the GPC, which satisfies this legal requirement & protects privacy.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
Got to slide
0
Got to slide
1
Got to slide
2
Got to slide
3
Got to slide
4
Got to slide
5
Join over 50 million users.
Download a supported browser or extension and start exercising your privacy rights with GPC.
View All Downloads
Abine DeleteMe
LEARN MORE
about
Abine DeleteMe
Brave Browser
LEARN MORE
about
Brave Browser
Disconnect
LEARN MORE
about
Disconnect
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
LEARN MORE
about
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
Firefox
LEARN MORE
about
Firefox
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
LEARN MORE
about
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
Privacy Badger by EFF
LEARN MORE
about
Privacy Badger by EFF
lockrMail by lockr
LEARN MORE
about
lockrMail by lockr
Founding Organizations
The following organizations, representing 50 million users and hundreds of thousands of websites, are in support of GPC.
View All Organizations
Featured Press & Announcements
GPC Privacy Browser Signal Now Used by Millions and Honored By Major Publishers
Global Privacy Control
Your browser can tell websites how to treat your data. But companies didn’t have to listen — until now
The Washington Post
‘Do Not Track’ Is Back, and This Time It Might Work
Wired
Tech-publisher coalition backs new push for browser-level privacy controls
TechCrunch
View More Press
Frequently Asked Questions
Global Privacy Control (GPC) is a proposed specification designed to allow
Internet users to notify businesses of their privacy preferences, such as
whether or not they want their personal information to be sold or shared. It
consists of a setting or extension in the user’s browser or mobile device and
acts as a mechanism that websites can use to indicate they support the
specification.
GPC is being developed by a broad coalition of stakeholders:
technologists, web publishers, technology companies,
browser vendors, extension developers, academics, and
civil rights organizations.
The GPC was initially spearheaded by
Ashkan
Soltani
Georgetown
Law
and
Sebastian
Zimmeck
(
Wesleyan
University
) in collaboration with
The New York
Times
,
The Washington
Post
,
Financial Times
,
Automattic (Wordpress.com & Tumblr)
,
Glitch
,
DuckDuckGo
,
Brave
,
Mozilla
,
Disconnect
,
Abine
,
Digital Content Next (DCN)
,
Consumer
Reports
, and the
Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF)
.
GPC is available for an increasing number of browsers and browser extensions,
listed
here
. If you want to use
GPC, you can download and enable it via a participating browser or browser
extension. More information about downloading GPC is available
here
.
The GPC spec is easy to implement on a wide variety of websites and other
services. The proposed specification and back-end implementation reference
documentation are available
here
.
For additional information, please feel free to reach out on Github or Twitter
(
@globablprivctrl
).
As it is intended to invoke users’ privacy rights, we encourage policymakers
from around the world to engage in the development of this specification. If you
would like to learn more about how GPC could work in your jurisdiction, please
contact us via email at
info[at]globalprivacycontrol.org
.
GPC was initially introduced at the World Wide Web Consortium (W3C)
Privacy
Community Group
(Privacy CG) in April 2020. A
number of stakeholders are part of that community. There are ongoing
discussions in the Privacy CG. Interested parties are encouraged to engage with
the proposal
here
.
Additionally, GPC is currently being implemented across the web. A number of
browsers, extensions, and publishers are supporting or implementing GPC (see
below).
View All
FAQ
s
Get Involved
Contact us to learn more about supporting
GPC
in your browser, app, or website.
@globalprivctrl